Summary
"EXCLUSIVE LOCATION & GENEROUS GARDEN PLOT - A superior, six double bedroom three storey detached residence, offering over 2700 square feet of beautifully appointed living accommodation and offering a generous rear garden which we believe to be one of the largest plots on this development. The pro..."
BEAUTIFUL HOME SET IN LARGE GARDENS - Fine 1920's built detached residence formerly known as The Vicarage to St Matthews Church in Darley Abbey. Close To Darley Park and Allestree Park.
"***NEW OFFER - Reserve a plot at Stephenson Gardens in Littleover by 31st March and we’ll offer up to £15,000 to spend on extras. The extras are limited to fitted carpets and or fitted wardrobes using Ivygrove’s nominated contractors (see terms and conditions within details) *** STEPHENSON GARDE..."
"***NEW OFFER - Reserve a plot at Stephenson Gardens in Littleover by 31st March and we’ll offer up to £15,000 to spend on extras. The extras are limited to fitted carpets and or fitted wardrobes using Ivygrove’s nominated contractors (see terms and conditions within details) *** STEPHENSON GARDEN..."
OFFERING EXCELLENT POTENTIAL FOR FURTHER REDEVELOPMENT - Charming five bedroom detached family home with an extensive south facing garden
"Petersfield is an impressive four-bedroom 1930s property with stunning interiors, and Art Deco influences throughout that provide a stylish and contemporary family home. The property benefits from having a bespoke kitchen with breakfast area and the"
"***NEW OFFER - Reserve a plot at Stephenson Gardens in Littleover by 31st March and we’ll offer up to £15,000 to spend on extras. The extras are limited to fitted carpets and or fitted wardrobes using Ivygrove’s nominated contractors (see terms and conditions within details) *** - STEPHENSON GARD..."
"This truly majestic and unique period home offers a once in a lifetime opportunity to anyone looking for a forever family home. Upgraded throughout to the highest of standards, the property perfectly balances period charm, modern living and a highly sought after location"
ECCLESBOURNE SCHOOL CATCHMENT AREA – A four bedroom detached residence enjoying a south facing garden located in a quiet cul-de-sac close to the charming walks over Bunkers Hill to Duffield. The property does offer potential to be extended and our current clients have planning granted fo...
"*** SELECT PROPERTY *** This expansive, stylish and high specification home offers architect designed, modern and spacious accommodation, a generous plot and the added benefit of a self-contained apartment. Finished to the highest of standards, an internal viewing is a must. Standing well back..."
"Situated in the heart of Darley Abbey, within a short walk of the delightful Darley Park, this is a well appointed five bedroom detached property which benefits from gas central heating, double glazing, gardens, driveway and double garage."
FAMILY HOUSE WITH ANNEXE! - A unique and rare opportunity to acquire one of Allestree's most highly individual four bedroom detached home with a three bedroom annexe enjoying far reaching views over to Allestree Hall and Allestree Park. The property sits on a deep garden plot extending t...
"Private, peaceful and contemporary living describes what No.5 The Plantation has to offer. This property, situated in a bespoke, gated development in the heart of Littleover, Derby just has to be viewed to fully appreciate how much versatile living space is on offer here."
A substantial seven double bedroom detached property offering over 2550 SF of accommodation in a sought after location situated on a large plot ideally suited to family living.
"CURRENTLY A COMMERCIAL PROPERTY. Large detached property currently a health clinic, large car park to the rear "
"LITTLEOVER SCHOOL CATCHMENT - A most spacious, FIVE DOUBLE BEDROOM, three storey detached home of style and character, occupying this highly sought after location on Pastures Hill in the highly desirable suburb of Littleover. Constructed in 2002 and offering around 1900 square feet of living acco..."
"""WOW"" IS PROBABLY GOING TO BE THE FIRST THING YOU SAY WHEN YOU VIEW THIS PICTURESQUE HOME IN THE DESIRABLE VILLAGE OF BREADSALL! THIS FAR FROM AVERAGE DETACHED DORMA BUNGALOW BOASTS FIVE GENEROUS BEDROOMS, THREE BATHROOMS AND FOUR RECEPTON ROOMS. THERE IS NOTHING NOT TO LOVE ABOUT THIS IDYLLIC HOME!"
STUNNING BUNGALOW - PRIVATE GARDEN - OPEN VIEWS - Superior three double bedroom detached bungalow offering spacious high specification living accommodation and located in this highly desirable location with delightful views towards Breadsall Village Church. This superb single-storey prop...
"Excellent Modern HMO Residential Investment. Current gross income - £68,640 per annum.
"
"Spectacular home featuring kitchen with BI-FOLD DOORS & ISLAND, 20ft lounge, principal bedroom with DRESSING AREA & en-suite. Further EN-SUITE to 2nd bedroom, DOUBLE GARAGE, GARDENS."
"A handsome detached residence featuring a striking symmetrical style, providing highly impressive living and sleeping accommodation arranged over three floors also with a beautiful garden, double garage and large attached brick built store, located on this executive development in the highly soug..."
"GUIDE PRICE £340,000 - £350,000 SUBSTANTIAL DETACHED HOME WITH PLANNING PERMISSION FOR A TWO-STOREY EXTENSION... This substantial sized detached house is situated in a sought after location with excellent access to all the amenities of Spondon, including shops, popular and highl..."
"CLOSE TO ALLESTREE PARK - This deceptively spacious, traditional four bedroom detached bungalow enjoys a highly sought-after location and beautiful south-facing gardens. This home has the advantage of gas fired central heating and UPVC double glazing and the accommodation comprises of: ..."
PRIVATE CUL-DE-SAC BETWEEN ALLESTREE & QUARNDON - Highly appealing four double bedroom - three bathroom detached home with private garden and double garage.
"** SELECT PROPERTY ** Rare to the market is this beautiful, double-fronted, Edwardian detached family home. Thoughtfully extended and enhanced, Claremont House offers modern and impressive original features throughout including Minton flooring and sash windows, high ceilings with coving and ceili..."
"A most spacious detached family residence featuring five bedrooms, two en-suites, three reception rooms, double garage along with a prime Allestree location."
"Soak up stunning views of the countryside with three storeys of luxury living. Presenting 6 lavishly sized double bedrooms, a substantially sized kitchen with a central island, and a grand sociable living room. Perfect for modern family living."
"Property number 48570.
We are proud to offer this impressive and spacious, 3 storey, 4 bed, 4 ensuite showhome. Set in a small cul-de-sac as part of an exclusive new development; situated in south Derby. Easy access to the A50 with access to the A6, A38 and M1 The home has a professionally styled..."
"A stunning six/five bedroom house with living room and gallery leading to formal dining room, extensive open plan living/dining kitchen, master and guest suites including walk-in dressing rooms and ensuites, spacious games room, study and double garage."
"One of Allestree's premier six bedroomed family homes, well presented throughout and occupying an excellent plot in a fantastic location. The accommodation on offer briefly comprises; Entrance hallway; reception room/games room; living room; ground floor bedroom with en suite and dressing sp..."
"This impressive semi detached Edwardian Villa dates back to 1905 and offers generous living accommodation arranged over three floors. The property is beautifully presented throughout and features five reception rooms, six bedrooms, generous garden and garage and plenty of parking."
"GUIDE PRICE - £625,000 - £650,000
The space and style that this property offers a family are second to none, with the bonus of it being within walking distance of Chellaston Academy!"
Key features Detached modern family home; finished to a high standard Four spacious double bedrooms with two ensuites  Four downstairs reception rooms that could double as additional bedrooms Set in a generous and private corner plot Ecclesbourne catchment area Open plan ki...
Enjoying a beautiful position within the heart of the village and Ecclesbourne school catchment is this stunning four bedroom detached family home also featuring a superb open plan extended living dining kitchen and delightfully landscaped gardens.
"A well-presented detached family home offering six bedrooms with two ensuites & family bathroom, a lovely kitchen/diner, down-stairs W.C and parking/double garage. A viewing of this home is highly recommended in order to fully appreciate the accommodation on offer."
LYNWOOD - Most charming home of style and character set in generous mature gardens located in a prime position in Quarndon Village. The property is believed to date back to the mid 1830's and has an attractive symmetrical facade with twin bay windows beneath a traditional pitched slate r...
"CLOSE TO DARLEY PARK - A most spacious and well presented four double bedroom detached home of style and character, occupying this highly desirable location in the noted Strutts Park Conservation area just a short walk away from the beautiful Darley Park and Derby City Centre. The property offers..."
"PREMIER LOCATION - A most attractive four double bedroom of style and character, set within one of Mickleover's most sought after locations. This beautifully appointed home offers a high quality finish and specification throughout including bespoke plantation shutters and Kedleston Interiors des..."
"*** SELECT PROPERTY *** This expansive, six bedroomed detached home stands overlooking a beautiful open green space and could not be better located. With a stunning open plan living/kitchen/diner, spacious lounge, separate dining room and three bathrooms - it offers all the space you could ever n..."
"Situated in the heart of Derby, close to the vibrant city centre, this is a substantial four bedroom detached property, recently re-roofed and benefiting from gas central heating, double glazing and large gardens to both the front and rear."
PLOT 15 THE HAMPTON - Ready for occupation - Built by Meadowview Homes - Spring offers available on all remaining house types. Please enquire for more details - Viewings are by appointment only - Superb five bedroom detached family home currently under the course of construction with single garag...
"*** SELECT PROPERTY *** This expansive detached family home is located in one of Allestree's most sought after cul-de-sacs and offers three generous reception rooms, a sunroom and a spacious breakfast kitchen. With four well proportioned bedrooms and a master en suite - it must be viewed. Ben..."
"*Prestigious 5 bedroom home* 17ft LOUNGE , L-SHAPED BREAKFAST KITCHEN with French doors, STUDY/PLAYROOM, Principal bedroom with DRESSING AREA, 2 bedrooms EN-SUITE & DOUBLE GARAGE"
"** SELECT PROPERTY ** A rarely available and impressively sized family home, located on one of Derby's most sought-after street locations. Crimson Cross Cottage is nestled towards the end of the road and offers stunning views overlooking Parker's Place and Darley Park. The cottage was once the Br..."
"STUNNING HIGH SPECIFICATION HOME IN PREMIER LOCATION - A most attractive and extended 1930's bay detached home of style and character, offering an impressive level of specification throughout including Kedleston Interiors designed and installed contemporary breakfast kitchen with Siemens applianc..."
"**Select Property** Found within the grounds of the Pastures Hospital Mickleover, the property sits to the end of a quiet cul-de-sac in a much sought after position. Offered to the market with no upward chain and available for immediate vacant possession, the property benefits from a spacious and..."
"LITTLEOVER SCHOOL CATCHMENT AREA – Most spacious and beautifully presented two double bedroom period terraced home of style and character, occupying this highly convenient location just a short stroll away from local amenities in Littleover Village centre and offering easy access to the Royal Der..."
"Executive detached family home offering light and spacious, stylish accommodation situated in this highly aspirational locality within the renowned Littleover Secondary School, Wren Park Primary School catchments and within close proximity to Derby High School for girls and boys together with D..."
"This modern, expansive and well presented five bedroomed detached bungalow is located along a private road in the most sought after area of Chellaston. With generous accommodation including a two-storey, detached two bedroomed self-contained annex, a detached garage and ample parking, it must be ..."
"LITTLEOVER SCHOOL & WREN PARK SCHOOL CATCHMENT - A beautifully presented and extended four bedroom, 1930's style detached home of style and character with generous mature rear garden and superb 18ft x 15ft timber framed summerhouse - NO CHAIN INVOLVED The property has the benefit of gas ..."
"Enjoying a favoured and popular location close within the heart of the old Spondon Village, this highly appealing four bedroom Georgian double fronted detached residence offers stylish living accommodation."
"Built circa 1890s is this extended, four bedroom detached property offering an abundance of character. Brought to the market with no upward chain, this family home offers deceptively spacious living accommodation, solar pannels, off road parking together with a detached garage and a private rear ..."
NO CHAIN - LARGE PLOT - An extended period four bedroom detached property in a sought after location in Chellaston offered for sale with no onward chain.
A spacious three bedroom detached bungalow on a good size plot in Darley Abbey offered for sale with no onward chain.
"A beautifully presented and modestly improved four bedroom detached family home, occupying an excellent plot nestled in one of Oakwoods most sought after cul-de-sac locations. The accommodation on offer very briefly comprises; Entrance hallway, spacious lounge, formal dining room, a third flexib..."
"Looking for your forever family home then look no further. Introducing this extremely well presented four bedroom detached family home, viewing is strongly advised to truly appreciate the fantastic living accommodation that the property offers. It doesn't stop with the well proportioned rooms th..."
"An attractive detached residence offering flexible spacious living and sleeping accommodation with delightful private garden, two driveways and garage located in this highly sought after village location."
"Beautiful four bedroom double fronted traditional detached bungalow, occupying a one fifth acre plot in a desirable part of Allestree"
"This traditional extended detached residence offers generous and well presented living accommodation and would make a great family home. The property features two reception rooms, four bedrooms driveway and garage and is located close to the Royal Derby Hospital and is within Littleover catchment."
"Extended and spacious family home located a short walk from Littleover village centre offering four bedrooms, two reception rooms, breakfast kitchen, conservatory. ground floor cloakroom, driveway, large garage and generous sized and private rear garden, being sold with no upward chain. The pro..."
Superb three bedroom bungalow enjoying a magnificent location with a very private garden
"EXECUTIVE, DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN THE SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION OF DARLEY ABBEY. With generous and versatile accommodation featuring three receptions spaces, four bedrooms and double garage."
"A NEW, SUPERB FOUR-BEDROOMED, DETACHED EXECUTIVE residence, enjoying a small, private cul-de-sac setting, in a well-established residential location highly convenient for the Royal Derby Hospital, and the city centre. The property offers a high specification interior, with the benefit of gas cent..."
BEAUTIFUL HOME & GARDEN - A highly appealing detached property with private garden located in a prime position within Breadsall Village.
"A spacious three bedroom detached bungalow on a beautiful, large garden plot in a sought after location in Darley Abbey."
A recently re-appointed and stylishly presented detached three-bedroom bungalow enjoying an enviable cul-de-sac location
Strike is pleased to present this property in Derby.
Hall & Benson are delighted to bring to market this superbly located three bedroom detached house on a sought after street in Allestree. The property benefits from having lots of space both internally and externally so would be a perfect family home!
SUPERB HOME - A beautifully appointed four bedroom detached home which occupies a highly convenient cul-de-sac location just a short walk from the amenities at Park Farm Shopping Centre and Markeaton Park. The property offers spacious and versatile accommodation with over 1500 sq. ft. A ...
PRIVATE POSITION – IMPRESSIVE TWO STOREY HOME – A traditional detached residence set in mature private gardens occupying one of Mickleover’s most sought after locations.
LITTLEOVER SCHOOL CATCHMENT - A fantastic opportunity to acquire this extended four bedroom semi-detached property with driveway and detached garage in the ever popular location of Littleover.
**OPEN 7 DAYS** HOPKINS & DAINTY of TICKNALL are delighted to offer a rare opportunity to acquire this stunning and quite unique Grade II Listed detached property - 'Ivy Cottage' offering a plethora of original features and also benefitting form a separate detached annex known as 'The Byre' suita...
"Stylish detached four bedroom property, enjoying an elevated position within favoured village location - Ecclesbourne School Catchment"
Ideal for the family - Traditional four double bedroomed semi-detached bay fronted property with l arge patio to the rear with extensive garden and views
"EXTENDED, LARGER THAN AVERAGE FAMILY HOME, FOUR/FIVE BEDROOMS, 2 X KITCHENS, 29FT LOUNGE, 2 X BATHROOMS Situated close to local schooling and amenities is this spacious, well presented family home. In brief the living accommodation comprises; entrance porch, entrance hallway, 29ft loung..."
"LOCATED ON THE EDGE OF THE DEVELOPMENT – A four bedroom, ex-showhouse home located in a convenient cul-de-sac location with easy access to Markeaton Park and Park Farm Shopping Centre. The gas central heating and double glazed living accommodation briefly consists on the ground floor: ..."
A fantastic opportunity to accquire this four bedroom detached executive property with garage and driveway occupying a private plot in the ever popular location of Oakwood.
"A beautifully presented and idyllically located four bedroomed detached property, occupying a fantastic corner plot in a pleasant cul-de-sac position and overlooking greenery and water. Offered to the market with no upward chain, the property benefits from a variety of optional extras including a..."
"SPACIOUS DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN THE SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION OF ALLESTREE With generous and versatile accommodation featuring three receptions spaces, four bedrooms and double garage. For sale with no upward chain."
"In a sought-after location ideally situated close to local amenities within Littleover Village and being close to the Royal Derby Hospital, this beautifully presented and deceptively spacious family home offers a modern interior set over three floors. Boasting many impressive features including ..."
"***SELECT PROPERTY*** This beautifully presented and most spacious five bedroom detached family home occupies a sought after location in Oakwood and really must be seen to be fully appreciated. Offering generous living space including an expansive lounge diner, fantastic master suite with en-sui..."
"*** SELECT PROPERTY *** This simply outstanding detached home stands on a most generous corner plot in a pleasant cul-de-sac within Elvaston Meadows and is presented to show home standard throughout. With three reception rooms, a fully integrated breakfast kitchen, double garage and landscaped ga..."
Rare opportunity to acquire a brand new home situated in Mickleover Village. This home is being sold with no onward chain and is ready to move into immediately. This has been built to an extremely high specification throughout and viewings are a must to truly appreciate both the size and quality.
SUPERB HOME OFFICE GARAGE CONVERSION. A substantial high specification 'David Wilson' built executive detached family home occupying a delightful landscaped low maintenance plot and situated in this highly popular edge of development locality. A full inspection is absolutely essential to apprecia...
"A beautifully presented detached family home located in the sought after village of Allestree, offering four double bedrooms, large lounge, study, open plan kitchen diner, ground floor cloakroom, large driveway, garage and generous sized rear garden. The property benefits from gas central h..."
"STUNNING BUNGALOW - Beautiful three bedroom, en-suite detached bungalow with landscaped gardens, large driveway and brick garage occupying a very sought after cul-de-sac location close to Oakwood’s excellent amenities including shops, doctors, bus services and walks in pleasant parks and woodland."
"A spacious and well presented executive family home, located within a cul de sac offering four generous sized bedrooms, three reception rooms, dressing room and en-suite to the master bedroom, breakfast kitchen, utility, driveway, double garage and enclosed rear garden. Located within walking di..."
"*** SELECT PROPERTY *** This modern, spacious and ideally located four bedroomed detached home offers two en suites, three reception rooms, a uPVC double glazed conservatory and a detached garage to the rear. Offered for sale with no upward chain, an internal inspection is highly recommended. ..."
*LITTLEOVER SCHOOL CATCHMENT AREA* - *CHAIN FREE* - Scoffield Stone are pleased to offer for sale this four bedroom detached family home located within a quiet cul de sac position and occupying a generous plot with POTENTIAL TO EXTEND subject to approval. This well presented property benefits f...
Spacious family detached home - Prestigious cul-de-sac location - Five good size bedrooms - Situated on a highly sought-after cul-de-sac location is this impressive and spacious family detached home. This property would be ideal for the growing family and in brief comprises: Entrance hallway wi...
"**NO UPWARD CHAIN**Modern and beautifully presented three double bedroom detached family home, set within the popular Hackwood Farm Development. The property includes a number of developer additions including down lighting, Neff appliances, granite work surfaces, Porcelanosa floor tiles, direct s..."
"EXTENDED FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN SOUGHT AFTER AREA. Substantial, four bedroom semi detached property with stunning kitchen/diner, large garden and driveway parking."
A great opportunity to accquire a four double bedroom detached property with garage and driveway in the ever popular location of Heatherton Village.
"POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION CLOSE TO COUNTRYSIDE – A four double bedroom detached property with garage, located on the edge of the development. The gas central heating and double glazed living accommodation briefly consists on the ground floor: Spacious entrance hall with staircase lea..."
NO CHAIN - An excellent opportunity to acquire this three bedroom terrace property with private rear garden in the ever popular location of Littleover.
Impressive four bedroom detached residence occupying a particularly impressive landscaped plot set back from the road
"OPEN 7 DAYS A WEEK - HOPKINS & DAINTY of TICKNALL are pleased to offer this traditional, detached family residence. Set in the popular suburb of Littleover, backing onto school playing fields and standing on a generous and mature garden plot. The spacious living accommodation comprises: entra..."
** NO CHAIN ** LOVELY SIZE GARDENS ** TWO RECEPTIONS ** CONSERVATORY **** FITTED KITCHEN ** BATHROOM ** FOUR BEDROOMS ** VIEWING RECOMMENDED **
"About Hackwood Park On the north-western edge of Derby, close to miles of open countryside and farmland yet just three and a half miles from the vibrant heart of the metropolis, this beautifully landscaped selection of attractive, energy efficient two, three, four and five bedroom homes combines..."
"Impressive family home with 20ft LOUNGE, L-shaped BREAKFAST KITCHEN, formal dining room/STUDY, LAUNDRY ROOM, principal bedroom with EN-SUITE, GARAGE."
"Four double bedroom extended detached, enjoying an enviable position within the sought after village of Darley Abbey"
"The Fenchurch is a five-bedroom family home with an integral double garage. The open-plan kitchen/dining/family room has two sets of French doors to the garden. A separate living room, utility room and downstairs WC are great features. Two of the bedrooms are en-suite and there's a family bathroom."
"** SELECT PROPERTY ** This largely extended, expansive and beautifully well presented five bedroomed detached home has been upgraded by the current owners and stands as one of the star properties in the area. With two very generous reception rooms, two en suites and a well proportioned rear garde..."
"A wonderful family home and location, superbly presented and thoughtfully extended to provide spacious living and sleeping accommodation featuring a stunning living dining kitchen. The property is attractively offered for sale with no upward chain."
"*** SELECT PROPERTY *** Offered for sale with no chain is this stunningly well presented and most spacious five bedroomed detached home, located on a popular new development in the much sought after area of Chellaston. With two generous reception rooms and a simply outstanding living/kitchen/dini..."
A fabulously positioned detached family home enjoying Ecclesbourne catchment in this sought after village location attractively offered for sale with no upward chain.
The Regent is a five-bedroom detached home with an open-plan kitchen/breakfast/family room with French doors to the garden. The living and dining rooms have bay windows. Two of the bedrooms share a Jack and Jill bathroom and two use the family bathroom. The master bedroom suite is on the top floor.
FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED home with a SPACIOUS INTERIOR including LARGE SEPARATE LOUNGE and OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM. First floor boasts 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS with an EN-SUITE to the master.
"BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOME IN A SOUGHT AFTER AREA OF MICKLEOVER WITH TWO EN-SUITES, A GARAGE WITH DRIVEWAY PARKING AND A LOVELY OUTLOOK TO THE FRONT! With a lounge, kitchen dining living area, utility room and WC, downstairs has great living space. Upstairs there are two bed..."
"A spacious and immaculately presented extended detached family home, offering five double bedrooms, two reception rooms, open plan kitchen diner, utility, four-piece bathroom suite, ground floor cloakroom, generous driveway and enclosed private garden. The property benefits from gas central ..."
"***SELECT PROPERTY*** Having undergone a recent scheme of complete refurbishment, this stunning and spacious home stands the most generous grounds along a private driveway. With a beautiful lounge, modern fitted kitchen and stunning gardens, this property must be viewed! Benefiting from uPVC d..."
"*** SELECT PROPERTY *** Offering five good sized bedrooms, a beautiful open plan dining kitchen, two reception rooms and a generous garden, this spacious home is ideal for the growing family and is located in one of Derby's most sought after suburbs. Benefitting from uPVC double glazing and ga..."
"This is a substantial double fronted detached property built approx five years ago which is situated in this most popular location to the South of Derby. The property includes spacious and tastefully finished accommodation which includes a reception hall with ground floor w.c. off, a through lou..."
NO CHAIN - A fantastic opportunity to acquire a three double bedroom detached bungalow with detached garage and large corner plot in the ever popular location of Oakwood.
"This generously extended fantastic five/six bedroomed detached family home which has benefitted from an extremely high standard renovation project to offer a brilliant living space for buyers is a MUST VIEW! Downstairs this home benefits from entrance hallway, Large living room space with bay win..."
"This beautiful home is finished to a high standard and ready to move straight into. With a double garage, a large driveway and en-suite to the master bedroom, this is a beautiful family home which has something to offer for the whole family. Overlooking a green area this home is in the catchment ..."
"Arguably the best example of its type. This stunning detached family home requires a full inspection both internally and externally to appreciate the location, size of accommodation and wealth of high specification appointments on offer. Finished to a high standard this delightful light and spaci..."
"BEAUTIFUL DETACHED HOME WITH GENEOUS CORNER PLOT & BUILDING PLOT - A most attractive and beautifully presented, three bedroom 1930's style detached home of style and character, occupying this prominent corner plot position close to local shops and amenities. The property has been appointed to an ..."
"Brought to the market for the first time in over forty years. This unique substantial period home of immense charm and character, circa 1750 was originally two dwellings until its conversion and restoration. Since then it has undergone a litany of improvements and extensions to provide a large ve..."
A spacious and well-presented four bedroom detached home on a large plot located accessed via a private driveway off Shardlow Road.
"A spacious and beautifully finished house, this home is perfect for growing families. With an impressive amount of living space and a stunning conservatory, this four-bedroom detached house is an exciting opportunity. Close to local amenities such as schools, local shops, pubs and restaurants, an..."
"A quite superb substantial detached family home situated in this sought after locality, sited on a landscaped south facing plot and in a private position of Templebell Close. This delightful greatly improved and tastefully decorated house offers quality high specification accommodation and benefi..."
"** SELECT PROPERTY ** This modern and beautifully presented, double-fronted family home occupies an envious position set within the popular Hackwood Farm Development. Having been built with a wide variety of upgrades and additions, the property benefits from an impressive sized lounge and living ..."
"This stylish detached residence is located on the edge of the sought after Durose Country Park development and enjoys far reaching views over Derby. The property offers many upgraded fixtures and fittings and features generous open plan living kitchen, four bedrooms, driveway and detached garage."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this beautifully presented Five Bedroom Detached Property. In short this property compromises of; Entrance Hallway, Lounge, Large Kitchen/Diner, Utility Room, W.C and Study Room on the ground floor. To the first floor there are Five Good sized spacio..."
"This modern detached home is presented to an extremely high specification is located in the sought after area of Chellaston. The property features a stylish breakfast kitchen, four bedrooms, enclosed rear garden and double detached garage. There are excellent road links close by."
ALLESTREE PARK & LAKE – A traditional detached property requiring full modernisation located on a highly regarded avenue next to beautiful Allestree Park. The property does require a full scheme of modernisation but offers excellent potential for the genuine purchaser to acquire a lovely...
"Offered with no upward chain and on a private road is this well presented, modern style bungalow which offers spacious living accommodation, a park view to the rear and a neutral decorative theme throughout. In brief the property comprises of L shaped entrance hallway, integrated kitchen/diner,..."
THREE BEDROOM DETACHED home with SPACIOUS OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/FAMILY AREA and a LARGE SEPARATE LOUNGE. An EN-SUITE to EVERY BEDROOM and a walk-in wardrobe to the master.
"A four bedroom detached family home offering spacious and well presented accommodation and found close to many amenities and transport links. With gas central heating and double glazing the accommodation comprises of a hall, ground floor w.c., lounge, separate dining room, dining kitchen and uti..."
"LITTLEOVER SCHOOL CATCHMENT & WREN PARK PRIMARY SCHOOL CATCHMENT- A most spacious FIVE DOUBLE BEDROOM, three storey semi-detached home, offering incredibly spacious living accommodation with over 2200 square feet of living area over three floors. The property occupies this highly sought after loc..."
"OPEN 7 DAYS A WEEK - HOPKINS & DAINTY of TICKNALL bring to the market this spacious FIVE bedroom detached family residence, standing on a corner plot with a pleasant SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN and A DETACHED DOUBLE GARAGE. Built by Charles Church Homes (in 2017) on the BLUEBELL GRANGE development i..."
"A MODERN and SPACIOUS home in Chellaston, available CHAIN FREE, ideal for INVESTORS or GROWING FAMILIES. Call to enquire! Bettermove are pleased to present this charming four bedroom detached house in Chellaston, available with no forward chain.The property benefits fro..."
"* £11,000 CASHBACK ON COMPLETION * Stylish DETACHED family home, LOUNGE with feature bay window, open plan DINING KITCHEN with French doors, LAUNDRY ROOM, DINING ROOM/STUDY, principal bedroom with EN-SUITE, GARAGE."
"PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE - NO UPWARD CHAIN New to the market this Marleybone style Persimmon Homes property on the much favoured Regent Place development is due to be build complete in January 2023, please contact us today to arrange a site visit and for any additional information. The propert..."
"The Marylebone has a spacious open-plan kitchen/breakfast/family room with French doors opening onto the garden. This detached five-bedroom, two-bathroom family home has separate living and dining rooms, a utility room, a downstairs WC and built-in storage. Bedroom five could become a home office."
"**** PART-EXCHANGE CONSIDERED. *** OPEN 7 DAYS A WEEK - HOPKINS & DAINTY of TICKNALL are pleased to offer this BRAND NEW house for sale in Chellaston, on the southern edge of Derby. Due to be ready around New Year 2023. The Marylebone is a FIVE bedroom detached house with two separate reception r..."
FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED family home with INTEGRAL GARAGE and EN-SUITE MASTER BEDROOM.  Extensive OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM along with a SEPARATE UTILITY and CLOAKROOM and a LARGE SEPARATE LOUNGE.
"Beautifully presented bay fronted semi-detached residence occupying an impressive plot, on the edge of Allestree bordering Quarndon"
"A wonderful opportunity to acquire the “last” property in Allestree, a beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached family home occupying a large plot and with stunning front views."
"Beautiful family home with GARAGE, lounge with feature bay window, STUDY, 22ft kitchen with FRENCH DOORS, LAUNDRY ROOM, EN-SUITE to master bedroom."
"Plot 43 * ENERGY BILLS PAID for a year * FLOORING, appliances & turf included * Double bedrooms with en suite to master bedroom * Showhome available to view * Stunning open plan kitchen / dining / family space * Separate study - great for home working *"
"**** BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED DETACHED BUNAGLOW IN A HIGHLY REGARDED LOCATION **** This is a great opportunity to purchase a modernised bungalow, with ample parking and a well maintained and easy to manage garden. In brief the property offers a porch and hallway, lounge with a feature log burner, ne..."
"This traditional detached property is located in the heart of Littleover Village and is being offered for sale with no onward chain. The property features lounge and open plan dining kitchen, three bedrooms, driveway and garage. The property is within the noted Littleover school catchments."
"STYLISH PRESENTATION - A beautifully presented and recently upgraded, three bedroom semi-detached home with superb open plan dining kitchen and detached garage, occupying this highly convenient location close the local shops and amenities at Park Farm Centre. The property would be ideally suited ..."
"Recently refurbished to an excellent standard, the property features a generous extension to the rear as well as a full loft conversion and dormer window extension providing extensive accommodation. INTERNAL VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED."
"We are delighted to present this Four Bedroom Detached House located on the desirable Highfields development  on the outskirts of Derby. The property offers an ideal family home with ample living space. The property comprises: Four bedrooms, family bathroom..."
"Guide Price £425,000 - £450,000 This well presented detached home is located on this popular tree lined road in the sought after area of Chaddesden. The property is ideal for the large family and features five bedrooms, driveway and garage and a generous rear garden."
"**SELECT PROPERTY** **SELECT PROPERTY** This substantial and extremely versatile family residence is located in a popular area of Alvaston. Boasting seven bedrooms (six doubles and a single), two double bedrooms located on the ground floor with en-suites accessible via its own entrance hall, offe..."
"BEAUTIFUL EXTENDED BUNGALOW - A most attractive and extended double fronted, 1930's style, detached bungalow of style and character occupying this highly sought-after and mature residential location off Duffield Road, close to Allestree Park and Darley Park. This property offers spacious and vers..."
"*** SELECT PROPERTY *** This recently updated and beautifully presented, four bedroom, detached home is ideally located in the sought-after area of Allestree and offers excellent sized accommodation including three reception rooms, ample gardens and a generous driveway. Offered for sale with n..."
"FIVE DOUBLE BEDROOMED END OF TERRACE HOUSE SET OVER FOUR FLOORS SITUATED IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION IN THE LOVELY VILLAGE OF DARLEY ABBEY! With bedrooms and a shower room on the ground floor, open plan living, kitchen and dining on the first floor and further bedrooms on the second and third floor,..."
Scargill Mann & Co are delighted to offer this prime residential development opportunity with planning consent granted recently for two residential dwellings via an outline planning application and approval - Planning Reference 19/00543/FUL. The plans proposed are for two superior detached dwel...
"YOPA are delighted to welcome to the market this well presented and spacious four bedroom detached family property in the sought after location of Chellaston. Benefitting from an open plan kitchen/diner and a low maintenance rear garden, this striking family home is not to be missed!"
"*** SELECT PROPERTY *** Offered for sale with no upward chain and standing in an elevated position with fantastic views from the rear is this spacious three-storey detached home.  Boasting three reception rooms, two en suites and generous bedrooms - this property must be viewed! Benefitin..."
"We are pleased to bring to market this impressively well presented six bedroom property in a popular location in Derby. The property benefits from having off road parking and a private, south facing rear garden. Viewing is highly advised in order to appreciate what the property has to offer!"
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** A fantastic opportunity arises for any growing family to purchase this superbly presented, five bedroomed detached property, set in the popular Bluebell Grange development in Boulton Moor. Boasting a modern and stylish interior throughout, the property sits on a good size..."
"Must be viewed to be able to appreciate what this property has to offer! We are delighted to bring to market this newly refurbished, semi-detached cottage, which still retains some original features. Offering three bedrooms, family bathroom and en-suite, this is perfect for a growing family."
"Wow, Location, Space and beautifully presented! Upon viewing this truly amazing home you will be amazed by the space and meticulous presentation. The home is situated within a popular modern development built CIRCA 2019"
"A GREAT OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A LARGE THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME TOGETHER WITH AN ATTACHED SEPARATE ONE / TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT EITHER FOR THE USE OF A DEPENDENT RELATIVE, OR TO LET OUT AND PROVIDE A USEFUL INCOME. My Pad Phillips & Co are delighted to offer this quite superb traditional ..."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** Occupying a superb position within a pleasant cul-de-sac location and falling within the Chellaston Academy Catchment Area, this extended family home offers well-presented and excellent sized accommodation throughout. Boasting a square bay-fronted lounge, fitted kitchen ..."
"**PREMIER PROPERTY** This most spacious, modern, and beautifully presented expansive detached family home is set within the popular Cuttle Brook development in Chellaston and offers substantial accommodation of the highest specification throughout. Standing on a sizeable corner plot, the property..."
"This beautifully presented, spacious and extended four bedroom family home is ideally located in the most sought after area of Spondon. The property offers views over beautiful open fields and ancient woodland and is modernised throughout. The property also has the option to create a separate A..."
"SPACIOUS DETACHED BUNGALOW - A most spacious detached four bedroom chalet bungalow with a generous mature south facing rear garden plot, which offers an excellent level of privacy and a most impressive DETACHED BAR AND ENTERTAINMENT ROOM. The property occupies this highly sought after location ju..."
"LITTLEOVER SCHOOL & WREN PARK SCHOOL CATCHMENT - A well presented and improved four bedroom detached family home with generous rear south facing garden plot, occupying this popular development close to Mickleover Golf Club and the Royal Derby Hospital. .The accommodation has the benefit..."
Beautifully presented traditional bay fronted four bedroom semi-detached property of style and character located in a very sought after location close to nearby Allestree Park with its golf course and fishing lake. The property is constructed of brick beneath a pitched tiled roof with th...
"CHAIN FREE - Scoffield Stone are delighted to offer for sale this extended three bedroom detached bungalow, found in a cul de sac position and located at a much cherished address within the village. The property is very well presented throughout and has a number of key features to include, but n..."
"The Wortham is our largest four bedroom home at Boundary Moor Gardens, at 1525sqft The Wortham is a four bedroom house with an integral garage, offering plenty of space for growing families. Featuring a spacious kitchen/ dining room with adjoining utility and double doors leading to ..."
"We are delighted to bring to market this newly refurbished three bedroom detached bungalow in the heart of Allestree. The bungalow comprises three double bedrooms, one with an en-suite, a shower room, lounge, utility room and impressive brand new kitchen."
"*****COMING TO MARKET SOON*****MORE DETAILS TO FOLLOW SHORTLY***** A spacious 1850 SQ.FT. four bedroom family home situated in CORNER PLOT position in a popular residential location with easy access to major transport links, and walking distance to Derby city centre and the Royal Derby Hospital..."
A fantastic opportunity to acquire this beautifully presented four bedroom detached property in a quiet cul-de-sac location located in the ever popular location of Chellaston.
**ATTRACTIVE REFURBISHED BUNGALOW ** THREE BEDROOMS** STYLISH DINING KITCHEN** TWO CONSERVATORIES ** SHOWER ROOM** LANDSCAPED GARDENS**** PARKING FOR SEVERAL VEHICLES AND 25FT MOTORHOME
" Unlike so many plain modern homes, the four bedroom detached Stratford boasts a traditional Arts and Crafts inspired frontage finished with craftsmanship and care, including bay windows and a roofed porch. Yet behind its impressive exterior architecture, this home d..."
"A highly impressive and beautifully presented four bedroom detached house featuring a superb living dining kitchen, principal bedroom with en suite and being located in this established residential area off Kedleston Road."
"A well-presented detached family home offering four bedrooms a family bathroom, an additional shower room, a lovely kitchen, down-stairs W.C and parking for mulitple vehicles. A viewing of this home is highly recommended in order to fully appreciate the accommodation on offer."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** Located in the highly sought after suburb of Allestree and close to the Park Farm shopping Centre and all of its amenities, stands this superbly extended family home backing onto the Lawn Primary School fields and offered for sale with no upward chain. The property benefi..."
"We are proud to offer this Four Bedroom Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £380,000 - £390,000*"
"Leaders are pleased to present this Four Bedroom Mid Terraced property which is set over FOUR FLOORS located in the ever increasingly popular area of Littleover, Derby. Set within close proximity to Littleover Community School, Derby High Primary, Wren Park School and an abundance of local amenit..."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** This spacious, detached home is located in a sought after area and offers two reception rooms, a modern fitted kitchen/diner and a beautifully appointed en suite shower room. With feature lighting, driveway and a double garage, an internal inspection is highly recommended..."
"An opportunity arises to acquire this detached property located in the Littleover Community School Catchment Area. The property, offered with no upward chain, is ideal for any investors or families and perfectly located close to the Royal Derby Hospital and Derby City Centre. The property require..."
"** SELECT PROPERTY ** LITTLEOVER SCHOOL CATCHMENT ** An excellent opportunity arises for a growing family to purchase this traditional four bedroomed detached house, located in the sought after area of Littleover Village. Situated in the heart of the village and close to The Royal Derby Hospital..."
A fantastic opportunity to acquire this beautifully presented four bedroom detached property in a quiet location located in the ever popular location of Chellaston. New to market is this immaculate four bedroom detached property with a driveway for several cars in Chellaston. The accommodation i...
"Hall & Benson are delighted to market this very well presented, four bedroom detached property in a sought after location in Derby. The property benefits from having been completely refurbished throughout to make it the perfect family home. Book with us now!"
**SUPERB ACCOMMODATION ** MUST BE VIEWED** ECCLESBOURNE CATCHMENT****SPACIOUS LOUNGE** LIVING DINING KITCHEN ** FOUR BEDROOMS INCLUDING GROUND FLOOR BEDROOM** LANDSCAPED GARDEN** AMPLE OFF ROAD PARKING**
"The Carnaby is a four-bedroom home with plenty of space including an open plan kitchen/family room and separate living room - both with French doors leading into the garden - plus a bright front-aspect dining room. The first floor is home to four good-sized bedrooms, with an en suite to bedroom one."
"A brilliant detached family home featuring four good sized bedrooms, en-suite and a spacious kitchen leading into a large conservatory. The property is attractively offered for sale with no upward chain and vacant possession."
LITTLEOVER SCHOOL CATCHMENT - An extended and well maintained 1930's style character semi detached home with LARGE DETACHED DOUBLE GARAGE (23FT x 23FT) set within this Premier location in one of Littleover's most attractive tree-lined avenues. . The property has been extended generous single stor...
"Perfect family home comprising 17ft LOUNGE with French doors, DINING ROOM/STUDY, open plan FAMILY/KITCHEN, EN-SUITE to principal bedroom, GARAGE."
"A well presented and fantastically located four bedroom detached family home, occupying an end-of-cul-de-sac position in the ever popular Derbyshire suburb of Oakwood. The accommodation on offer briefly comprises; Entrance hallway, lounge, dining room, breakfast kitchen, utility room and down..."
Genuine three bedroom detached bungalow occupying quiet cul-de-sac location in sought after Spondon
"This recently constructed three storey semi detached home is located in the sought after area of Chellaston and would make a great family home. The property is immaculately presented and is finished to an extremely high specification. There are four bedrooms, landscaped rear garden and driveway."
"***PREMIER PROPERTY*** Simply outstanding! With a beautiful modern interior, this extended family home offers a stunning kitchen and snug, home gym and a beautiful fitted shower room, it stands on a most generous plot with beautiful gardens! Ideally located in the popular area of Chaddesden an..."
" A fantastic opportunity to acquire a very versatile property which includes a spacious three double bedroom house with large garden, off road parking and a separate annex which could be offered as a rental for extra income if desired. There is also of course, the main shop floor which is locate..."
STUNNING EXTENDED HIGH SPECIFICATION HOME - A superb detached property that has been beautifully presented throughout to a contemporary theme and being upgraded to an impressive high specification including a beautiful open plan kitchen dining room with quality integrated appliances and granite w...
NO CHAIN - FOUR BEDROOMS - THREE RECEPTION ROOM - A spacious detached family home in a sought after cul-de-sac location in Oakwood offered for sale with no onward chain.
"** PREMIER PROPERTY ** A beautifully presented and extremely spacious, five-bedroomed, detached family home occupying a generous plot in one of Chellaston's sought after cul-de-sac locations. The property has the benefit of uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, off road parking, an integral..."
"A character property with flexible accommodation offering a self-contained annexe alongside the main house, viewings are highly recommended to see what this house has to offer . This semi-detached cottage is located in the heart of old Allestree village and close to all amenities."
"Are you searching for a move in ready family home, but don't want to compromise between space, style or location? Then this incredible house could be your dream home"
"ECCLESBOURNE SCHOOL CATCHMENT AREA - EDGE OF ESTATE LOCATION - A most attractive four bedroom detached property, occupying this delightful edge of estate location with views over a nature pond and green area, The property is situated in the sought after Langley Country Park development and was b..."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** This modern and spacious detached family home is located in the sought after area of Chellaston and offers two reception rooms, conservatory, master en suite and an integral garage. Ideal for the growing family, an early viewing is highly recommended. Benefitting from..."
"This attractive traditional detached home is located in the sought after area of Littleover and is being offered for sale with no onward chain. The property features two reception rooms, three bedrooms, generous rear garden, off road parking and is close to well regarded schools."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** This stunning family residence is superbly decorated, has been upgraded by the current owners and offers ample living space. Set within the sought after suburb of Littleover and backing onto Sunnydale Park woodland area, the property features two reception rooms, a spaci..."
"AUCTION SALE 18 April 2023 - FOR SALE VIA BAGSHAWS RESIDENTIAL AUCTIONS IN ASSOCIATION WITH BARNARD MARCUS AUCTIONS ON TUESDAY 18TH APRIL 2023 AT 9.30AM AT THE DE VERE GRAND CONNAUGHT ROOMS, 61-65 GREAT QUEEN STREET, COVENT GARDENS, LONDON WC2B 5DA. YOU CAN ALSO RE..."
"A superb three bedroomed detached bungalow, located in the sought after area of Mickleover and sitting on a good sized plot towards the end of a pleasant cul-de-sac location. The property overlooks an open green area and towards Mickleover Golf course and benefits from a home security alarm syste..."
LITTLEOVER SCHOOL CATCHMENT - A fantastic opportunity to acquire this fully renovated four double bedroom detached property with driveway for three cars and rear garden with outbuilding in the ever popular location of Littleover.
"An improved and well positioned four bedroom detached family home offered with no upward chain, occupying an excellent plot in a sought after Oakwood cul-de-sac location. The accommodation on offer briefly comprises; Entrance hallway, spacious lounge, excellent breakfast kitchen, dining room, ut..."
A fantastic and rare opportunity to acquire this truly stunning three bedroom detached bungalow with large driveway and garage in tucked away in a quiet cul-de-sac in Chellaston.
"ENERGY BILLS PAID for a year * Flooring, appliances, turf & more included * Occupying a prominent CORNER position, The Burns is an exceptional new detached home, with 4 generous DOUBLE bedrooms, a stunning open plan kitchen / dining / family area and spacious lounge."
"The Harley has four bedrooms and an integral garage. The kitchen/dining/family room has two sets of French doors leading into the garden and there’s a separate living room, a utility room, a downstairs WC and storage on both floors. A study has been included in the spacious first-floor layout."
"Situated in the modern development of Langley Country Park is this four bedroom detached house. Being less than 5 years old, this property is very modern and would make a lovely home for a family."
"Sold with vacant possession and no upward chain is this well maintained four bedroom detached house, situated on this highly sought after residential area, set on a good sized plot with a driveway providing parking for multiple vehicles, garage and a mainly lawned rear garden."
"This traditional detached residence is beautifully appointed throughout and is finished with high specification fixtures and fittings. The property features two reception room, three bedrooms a lovely breakfast kitchen and has a fabulous rear garden, driveway and garage."
"YOPA are thrilled to welcome to the market this exceptional four bedroom detached family home property in the sought after location of Highfields in Littleover, offering ample space for the whole family, including a conservatory and ample off street parking, this family home is not to be missed!"
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN *** A well appointed and presented detached family home occupying a sought after residential location just off Locko Road. The property has been modernised over recent years and has the benefit of gas fired central heating, UPVC double glazing, rewiring and neutral déc..."
"Great family home or attractive buy to let investment opportunity. A spacious detached family home offering four bedrooms, large lounge diner, ground floor cloakroom, enclosed garden, driveway and garage, being sold with no upward chain. Located with great access to local schools, the property ..."
A fantastic opportunity to acquire this beautifully renovated and modernised three bedroom semi-detached property with driveway and detached garage in the ever popular location of Allestree.
"A truly impressive and rarely available unique thatched character cottage, located in the most sought after village of Littleover. This charming and deceptively spacious cottage is believed to date back as far as the 15th century and enjoys a Grade II Listed status, making it the oldest property ..."
"The Mayfair is a detached four-bedroom home that offers an open-plan kitchen/breakfast/family room alongside separate living and dining rooms. Upstairs, the master bedroom enjoys an en suite and there’s a bright family bathroom for the other three bedrooms. Bedroom four could be used as an office."
"BEAUTIFUL VILLA - A most attractive and spacious, period bay-fronted, four bedroom home offering around 1400 square feet of living accommodation and DRIVEWAY to the rear. The property occupies this much sought after position in the highly regarded position on Kedleston Road and this love..."
"* £11,000 CASHBACK * 15ft lounge, 18ft DINING KITCHEN with French doors, LAUNDRY ROOM, principal bedroom with EN-SUITE and GARAGE."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** Extended detached family home located in the highly sought-after area of Allestree. The property has been modified and improved over a number of years and benefits from owned solar panels providing the property with electricity and an income, underfloor heating to the con..."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** A beautifully presented, modestly improved and thoughtfully arranged four bedroomed detached family home, occupying an excellent end of cul-de-sac plot in one of Littleover's most sought-after positions. The property has the benefit of uPVC double glazing, gas central he..."
An attractive and classic three bedroom semi-detached property having been much improved and with a large garden located on the tree lined Broadway close to the city centre and beautiful parks.
The Manford is a spacious four bedroom ideal for growing families with a useful study for the grown ups
Most impressive and completely refurbished and extended three bedroom bay fronted detached bungalow in sought after residential location - No Upward Chain
"ECCLESBOURNE SCHOOL CATCHMENT. Stylish yet practical home with 18FT lounge, open plan kitchen/diner, LAUNDRY ROOM, EN-SUITE to principal bedroom, bedroom 3 ideal STUDY."
"A STUNNING FAMILY HOME BOASTING GOOD SPACE THROUGHOUT, STYLISH INTERIOR AND A DESIRBLE LOCATION. THE CURRENT OWNERS HAVE DONE A SUPERB JOB WITH THE REFURBISHMENT MADE TO THE PROPERTY SO FAR, THERE IS STILL SCOPE FOR FURTHER IMPROVEMENTS FOR THOSE WHO WANT TO ADD THEIR OWN TOUCH. YOU MUST SEE THIS!!"
"Hall & Benson are delighted to bring to market this wonderfully presented, four bedroom detached home situated on this highly sought after residential area. The property has been extremely well maintained by the current owner and an internal inspection is highly advised."
NO CHAIN - A spacious FIVE BEDROOM detached family home located on the new Boulton Moor development offered for sale with no onward chain.
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** Occupying an excellent plot in one of Chellaston's sought-after cul-de-sac locations is this well maintained and deceptively spacious three bedroomed chalet-style bungalow, which has the benefit of uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, excellent off road parking, a de..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this beautifully presented and spacious 4 bedroom detached family home. Situated on the highly sought after Highfields development, Ashby Close provides easy access to local amenities, travel networks. Internally the property comprises of Entrance ha..."
"***PREMIER PROPERTY*** This beautifully presented and substantially extended five-bedroom home is set back from Chaddesden Lane and enjoys views over Chaddesden Park to the rear elevation. The well-proportioned accommodation benefits from a superbly appointed, contemporary refitted living kitch..."
INVESTMENT PROPERTY - HMO - LET AT £2750 PCM - An excellent opportunity for an investment buy to acquire a large six bedroom HMO located close to Derby City.
"The Old Police House - An individual detached property benefiting from a delightful garden plot extending to approximately one quarter of an acre, situated in this very convenient position close to Markeaton Park. Excellent potential to improve / extend (subject to planning permission). This spa..."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** This most spacious, extended and well presented home offers versatile accommodation and is located in the most sought-after suburb of Chellaston. The property stands on a generous plot and has the benefit of ample off-road parking to the driveway and lawned gardens. B..."
"Hall and Benson are delighted to bring to the market this spacious, detached four bedroom property in a sought after location. Briefly comprising 4 double bedrooms, large family bathroom, living room, dining room and further reception room, drive and large rear garden. Viewing are highly recommended"
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this spacious Four/Five Bedroom Detached property and is also offered with NO CHAIN!
This property in short compromises of; Entrance Hallway, Two Lounge Areas, Kitchen, Conservatory, Study, Bedroom Three and shower room to the ground floor.
To the fir..."
"Occupying a prime position within the Littleover Community School Catchment Area, is this extended family home, which boasts spacious accommodation to include an open-plan lounge/dining room, fitted breakfast kitchen with range-style cooker, four excellent sized bedrooms, ample off road parking a..."
"Tastefully presented modern four bedroom detached family home located in a sought after residential area close to amenities including shops and schools. The house is well presented throughout and briefly comprises of an entrance hallway, downstairs cloakroom, the lounge and a spacious open plan k..."
"The Scrivener has four bedrooms - one of which has an en suite - a well-equipped family bathroom, an open-plan kitchen, dining and family area, and a separate living room. Completed by a single garage and off road parking."
"A very well presented five bedroom home offered with no upward chain. Dressing room and En-suite to the master bedroom. Downstairs WC and Utility room, Two reception rooms, private rear garden, and modern family bathroom. Driveway parking for two vehicles. Garage and views overlooking parkland. N..."
*EXCELLENT FAMILY HOME* This good-sized detached new build home was constructed to a high standard and is set within the popular village of Chellaston within the catchment area for Holmfields Primary School and Chellaston Academy. The accommodation comprises: an entrance hall...
"FOR SALE BY TIMED AUCTION Powered by SDL Auctions. GREAT FAMILY HOME situated at the head of this very quiet cul-de-sac ON THE EDGE OF THE CITY, making the perfect base for a busy family. "
"STYLISH PERIOD HOME - An attractive period bay-fronted, FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM, three storey property of style and character, that has undergone a comprehensive scheme of improvements and occupies this much sought after position in the highly regarded 'Six Streets' area located off Kedleston Road. <..."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** NO UPWARD CHAIN *** This modern, well presented and spacious detached home is located on a popular development in one of Derby's most sought-after areas. With a beautiful breakfast kitchen, three reception rooms and master en suite, it would make the ideal family home. O..."
"OPEN 7 DAYS A WEEK - HOPKINS & DAINTY of TICKNALL bring to the market this most impressive and beautifully presented, detached family residence. Set in a convenient location for access into Derby Centre, the Ring road and train station. The accommodation has been beautifully updated by the presen..."
"A traditionally designed home, the Trusdale is a spacious four bedroom family home. You can add your stamp by personalising on our Options portal too"
"A traditionally designed home, the Trusdale is a spacious four bedroom family home"
"***PREMIER PROPERTY*** Ideally located to offer easy access to all the amenities and highly regarded schools that Mickleover has to offer, this beautiful extended home has a fantastic open plan living/dining/kitchen and a most generous garden. Benefiting from uPVC double glazing and gas centra..."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** A charming, three-storey, period property situated in the desirable location of Littleover, offering spacious living accommodation and boasting many original features throughout including high ceilings, Minton tiled flooring and fireplaces. The property has been improved ..."
"A beautifully presented, spacious detached home occupying a generous corner plot in a sought-after cul-de-sac location in Chellaston. With a generous lounge, recently refitted dining kitchen with integrated appliances and feature mood lighting, conservatory, four good sized bedrooms and master en..."
"**** AVAILABLE IMMEDIATLEY **** FLOORING AND TURF INCLUDED **** The Trusdale is a well presented family home offering an entrance hall, guest cloakroom, lounge, fitted dining kitchen with utility room. Four first floor bedrooms, master with en suite shower room and a family bathroom. Side drive a..."
**DETACHED HOUSE**LARGE CORNER PLOT**THREE BEDROOMS**EXCELLENT LOCATION TO LOCAL SCHOOLS**SCOPE FOR FURTHER MODERNISATION**
ECCLESBOURNE SCHOOL CATCHMENT AREA - Extended detached property with garage and pleasant gardens occupying a prime position within the heart of Darley Abbey Village close to Walter Evans Primary School and Darley Park. The property is within a short walk to the vibrant Derwent Valley Mil...
"Situated in the heart of Allestree, within the Eccelsbourne School catchment area, this is a well presented four bedroom detached house which benefits from gas central heating, double glazing, gardens, driveway and garage."
"A well presented detached family home, offering four bedrooms, open plan lounge diner, fitted kitchen, conservatory, modern family bathroom, ample parking, garage and enclosed garden. The property benefits from gas central heating and double glazed windows. As you enter there is a welco..."
"This spacious family home is ideally located on West Avenue North with easy access for local amenities, including shops, doctors, schools and excellent road and public transport links to Derby, Chellaston, the A50 and beyond. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, WC, dining room, sitting ..."
"An extended, traditional, bay-fronted family home located in the highly desirable area of Mickleover and located close to the Royal Derby Hospital. The property has been extended, improved and updated by the current owners over a number of years, with re-plastering, re-wiring, upgraded heating sy..."
"FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOME SET ON A CORNER PLOT IN A QUIET CUL DE SAC. With four good size bedrooms, off road parking and open view to front. For sale with no upward chain."
This modern detached family home occupies a cul-de-sac position and enjoys pleasant countryside views. The property is being offered for sale with no onward chain and features two reception rooms and four bedrooms and has a driveway and garage.
"Scoffield Stone are delighted to offer for sale this stylish, detached four bedroom Persimmon home which is ideally placed for the growing family. The property is immaculately presented throughout and benefits from a number of key features to include, but not limited to; driveway parking; detach..."
"A substantial, five-bedroomed, three-storey, period property ideally situated for Derby City Centre and the Derby Royal Hospital. The beautifully maintained accommodation boasts charm and an abundance of character, with a mixture of modern and original period features and has been superbly maint..."
"FABULOUS PROPERTY - Positioned in the highly sought after “Six Streets” area of Derby is this impressive and spacious mid terraced period property benefitting from three receptions rooms, three double bedrooms, large bathroom and separate first floor utility room offered for sale with no upward c..."
**NO CHAIN** LOVELY PLOT - DETACHED BUNGALOW ** MUST BE SEEN** **LOUNGE** KITCHEN**UTILITY**THREE BEDROOMS**SHOWER ROOM****DRIVE AND GARAGE** ATTRACTIVE GARDENS
An extended and beautifully presented four bedroom detached family house situated within the sought after location of Littleover popular with families for schools and local amenities
An impressive modern detached family home situated in this highly sought after locality offering light and spacious high specification accommodation which must be viewed to be appreciated. Immaculately presented throughout and benefitting from gas central heating together with UPVC double glazing...
A beautifully presented fully renovated and extended four double bedroom detached dormer bungalow in the Littleover School Catchment area.
A quite superb traditional semi detached family home occupying a large well tended mature plot and located close to the Royal Derby Hospital and Mickleover Village centre. This delightful well cared for property has been improved and extended over the rears and offers the discerning purchaser the...
"Hall & Benson are delighted to market this superbly presented, three/four bedroom semi-detached property situated on the sought after, Western Road, Mickleover. This home offers plenty of space, internally and externally so would be perfect for any families looking to live in this popular location."
"Having undergone a comprehensive scheme of upgrades throughout, this four bedroom home offers space and specification without compromise. The current vendors have made significant energy saving enhancements including an air source heat pump and EV charging point. Call today to avoid disappointment"
"Extended detached family home offering a ground floor bedroom with wet room, three first floor bedrooms, two reception rooms, conservatory, enclosed garden, driveway and garage. Ideal for an extended family and located on a corner plot, the property benefits from gas central heating and partial ..."
LITTLEOVER SCHOOL CATCHMENT - A fantastic opportunity to acquire this four bedroom link detached property with large driveway in the ever popular location of Derby.
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** This spacious, extended and well positioned family home is located in the heart of the popular area of Spondon, close to local amenities including highly regarded schools. Offering two generous reception rooms, a spacious open plan kitchen/diner and a good sized garden, i..."
"Scoffield Stone are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom, semi-detached family home positioned in a much sought after location. The property is very well presented and has a number of key features to include, but not limited to; double driveway; extensive, private garden to rear; famil..."
"A superb three bedroom semi detached home, situated in the heart of Mickleover Village and a short distance from Derby City Centre and a range of local amenities. Linked to great transport links A38/A50. The property benefits from having an impressive open plan kitchen diner, formal living room, ..."
"*EXCELLENT FAMILY HOME* This good-sized detached home is set within a cul-de-sac position in the popular village of Chellaston. The accommodation comprises: an entrance hallway, bright & airy lounge, modern kitchen/diner, conservatory, side lobby and a cloakroom/W.C. First floor: master bedroo..."
"Apartment 7 - A truly special top floor penthouse apartment with two bedrooms and two en-suites, open plan living kitchen, separate utility and private internal staircase with feature lighting - Nutwood Court is a prestigious collection of just seven luxury apartments located in one of Derby’s mo..."
"An excellent opportunity arises for a growing family to purchase this, three bedroom detached property located in the highly sought after area of Allestree. Offering spacious living accommodation throughout, the property benefits from gas central heating, double glazing, an enclosed rear garden ..."
"Wow, look at the space this semi detached family home has to offer! This is a great opportunity to purchase this five bedroom family house within the popular area of Derby"
" Three bedroom detached bungalow situated in a desirable location backing on to open fields at the rear. The property is gas centrally heated via a combination boiler, which was installed along with new pipework throughout. There is a large, superb quality UPVC double glazed conservatory to the ..."
"BEAUTIFUL FOUR BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME. Tastefully decorated throughout and with an open kitchen/dining room, large garden and driveway parking for multiple cars this is a rare opportunity and one not to be missed! "
"*QUIET CUL DE SAC POSITION* This THREE BEDROOMED DETACHED BUNGALOW WITH GARAGE AND OFF ROAD PARKING is perfectly located for local ammenities! A look inside reveals an entrance hallway, a naturally bright living room, separate dining room, fitted kitchen with an adjoining utility room, cloakro..."
"This detached bungalow is located close to the heart of Chellaston village and is being offered for sale with no onward chain. The property is well presented throughout and is ready to move straight in to. There are two reception rooms, three bedrooms, garage and enclosed rear garden."
"This traditional character property is located close to Derby City Centre and would make a great investment opportunity. The property features two reception rooms, two double bedrooms and front and rear gardens. There are excellent road links and Derby University is close by."
"Purplebricks are excited to bring to market this two bedroom, detached family bungalow bursting with potential. This home has full central heating and is double glazed throughout. In brief the property comprises of lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen, conservatory, two bedrooms and bathroom to th..."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** This most spacious, well presented and extended traditional bay-fronted detached home occupies a generous plot and has the added benefit of a two-storey brick garage with separate living space/office/snug. There is also excellent potential to extend further (subject to n..."
Set in the grounds of Mickleover Manor is this generous three bedroom property. Accessed via a sweeping driveway through the beautiful grounds.
"IDEAL FAMILY HOME - Superbly presented recently modernised three bedroom semi-detached property, enjoying a popular location"
**WELL PRESENTED DETACHED HOUSE**THREE BEDROOMS**STUDY/PLAYROOM**EXCELLENT LOCATION**
"** PREMIER PROPERTY ** A modern, three-storey family home offered to the market with no upward chain and is ideally located close to the Derby Royal Hospital, Mickleover, the A38 and provides easy access to the City Centre. The property benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, owne..."
"Opportunity to buy a nearly new family home with loads of extras! Including tiled flooring in hall, dining kitchen dressing room and landscaped garden with Gazebo ideal for entertaining. Situated on the prime Taylor Wimpey development off the Derby Bonney Price Island."
ECCLESBOURNE CATCHMENT AREA - SUNNY WEST FACING GARDEN - NOT OVERLOOKED - Situated on the highly popular Kedleston Grange Development is this superbly presented and appointed semi detached property. The property occupies a pleasant plot with views from the first floor across fields in th...
"Situated in a popular location on a good sized plot is this extended, five bedroomed, semi-detached family home which offers ample living spacious - ideal for a growing family. The property benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating via a combination boiler, a generous rear garden, a..."
"A superbly presented and much-improved, four-bedroom detached family home, available with no onward chain in the sought after Derby suburb of Oakwood. The accommodation briefly comprises; Entrance hallway, lounge, family dining kitchen, conservatory extension, WC and utility room, all to the gr..."
ECCLESBOURNE CATCHMENT AREA - Beautifully presented three bedroom detached home set within the highly sought after Kedleston Grange Development. This property was built to Miller Homes 'Tiverton' design and offers stylish presentation and contemporary fittings throughout and has the bene...
"WOW, is it possible to have it all? With this extended house the answer is yes! This extended three bedroom bay fronted semi detached house is located on the well known Jackson Avenue in Mickleover, ideal for schools such as Wren Park School and Littleover. The Royal Derby Hospital is also close by"
"Scoffield Stone are delighted to offer for sale this nearly new Strata home (The Sorrento) situated in an attractive position next to Richmond Green. The property is immaculately and stylishly presented throughout and benefits from a number of key features to include, but not limited to; drivewa..."
Hall & Benson are delighted to bring to market this wonderfully presented four bedroom detached home situated on this highly sought after residential area. The property has been extremely well maintained by the current owner and an internal inspection is highly advised.
"Sold with vacant possession and no upward chain, we are pleased to present this four bedroom detached house in sought after Allestree Village. Benefitting from off road parking, a garage and rear garden this property would be perfect for a family."
"A deceptively spacious, double-fronted detached bungalow located on a good sized corner plot and offering potential to extend (subject to planning permission). The bungalow has had a grand scheme of refurbishment and offers a modern finish and boasting high ceilings, uPVC double glazing, gas cent..."
IMMEDIATE POSSESSION - NO UPWARD CHAIN - FREEHOLD - COUNCIL TAX BAND C - ENERGY RATING D - A thoughtfully extended and comprehensively upgraded modern detached family home occupying a landscaped south facing mature plot and situated in this highly aspirational locality. A full inspection will r...
"This beautiful extended home offers a simply outstanding dining kitchen, a spacious lounge and is well presented throughout. Located in the sought after area of Allestree - it must be viewed! Benefiting from uPVC double glazing and gas central heating, the accommodation in brief comprises: Ent..."
This is an excellent opportunity to acquire this family detached residence located in an ideal position for Derby City Centre and the Derby Royal Hospital.
"**PREMIER PROPERTY** A modern and stylish home having been finished to a very high standard throughout. The property has undergone a grand scheme of refurbishment and has been superbly updated by the current owner, to include a refitted combination boiler, re-plastering, re-decoration, new floori..."
"A spacious detached family home, located within the popular village of Allestree. Offering four bedrooms, fitted kitchen, spacious lounge, conservatory, family bathroom, ample parking and low maintenance garden. The property benefits from double glazing, gas central heating and is being sold..."
This is an excellent opportunity to acquire this three bedroom detached home located on the popular development of 'Highfields'. Viewing is essential.
"Situated within the ready-made community of Kingsway in Derby, Albany Lodge is a modern Retirement Living development designed exclusively for the over 55's, with a beautiful collection of 10 one-bedroom and 54 two-bedroom apartments available for sale or for rent."
"A spacious and immaculately presented three storey semi detached family home offering all the internal and external space needed for a modern family, with three double bedrooms, en-suite to the master bedroom, dining kitchen, two reception rooms, driveway, garage and garage. Located with great a..."
"SUPERB DETACHED BUNGALOW - A beautifully modernised detached two double bedroom bungalow, occupying this delightful end of cul-de-sac position off Inglewood Avenue, offering easy access to Mickleover's first class range of local amenities. The property has been comprehensively re-modelled and upg..."
"Enjoying beautiful gardens, this is a detached bungalow with garage located close to the many amenities found at the Park Farm shopping centre, offered for sale with no upward chain."
"** PREMIER PROPERTY ** An early viewing is highly recommended of this modern and stylish detached family home built by Radleigh Homes, located in a small and popular development and would be ideal for the growing family. Offering a spacious layout with dual aspect lounge and kitchen/diner, three ..."
CHAIN FREE - LITTLEOVER SCHOOL CATCHMENT AREA - Scoffield Stone are pleased to offer for sale this extended three bedroom detached family home located within a much sought after residential location within the Littleover Community School catchment area. This well presented property benefits from...
Bringing to the market is this beautifully presented 3 bedroom semi-detached family home which is superbly situated in Mickleover.
"A spacious extended semi-detached family home, in the popular location of Littleover. Offering three bedrooms, two reception rooms, spacious kitchen diner, downstairs shower room and bathroom, ample off street parking and generous garden. The property benefits from gas central heating and double ..."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** This superbly presented, traditional terraced home offers spacious accommodation and is finished to the highest of standards. With a wealth of character features including beautiful fireplaces and surrounds and a modern fitted breakfast kitchen, this well located home mus..."
"Superbly positioned three bedroom detached residence occupying a highly convenient location on Carsington Crescent close to Park Farm and Markeaton Park in Allestree - No Upward Chain. Allestree Woodlands catchment area, with Lawn and Portway primary schools within walking distance. Offers off..."
"Offered with no chain is this modern three storey semi-detached family home situated on an quiet cul-de-sac with four generous sized bedrooms, en-suite to the master bedroom, kitchen diner, driveway and enclosed rear garden. Located with great access to the A6, M1 and also close to local schools ..."
"A spacious and versatile detached chalet bungalow offering three bedrooms, two reception rooms, conservatory, driveway, garage and enclosed private rear garden, being sold with no upward chain. The property is located a short walk from the village centre and within the Littleover community schoo..."
**OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** Surprisingly spacious three bedroom chalet style detached residence occupying a larger than average plot in the sought after location in Mickleover.
A superb and exclusive development of four stylish and masterfully constructed three bedroom townhouses conveniniently positioned between Derby train station and city centre.
Hall & Benson are delighted to bring to market this wonderfully presented three bedroom detahced home situated on this highly sought after residential area. The property has been extremely well maintained by the current owner and an internal inspection is highly advised.
"Rosedale Avenue really is truly the perfect family home, This heavily extended four bedroom semi detached has the beautiful style of a 1930's home while offering two reception rooms and a fantastically sized kitchen diner with a master bedroom that will rival the best"
"A great opportunity to acquire this modern and spacious family home, situated in the popular location of Stenson Fields and available with no upward chain to consider. The property has been recently updated & improved and offers 4 spacious bedrooms, a modern fitted bathroom, large modern kitchen,..."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** An enviably located three double bedroomed detached family home, with spacious living and bedroom accommodation, brimming with potential. The property - originally designed as a four bedroom home - has the benefit of uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, ample off ro..."
"OPEN 7 DAYS A WEEK - HOPKINS & DAINTY of TICKNALL are pleased to offer this spacious and EXTENDED, four bedroom semi detached family home. Set in the popular suburb of Littleover, this property has been very well maintained by the current owners and offers versatile family living accommodation."
"Occupying a corner plot on a pleasant cul-de-sac in the sought-after suburb of Allestree is this detached, three-bedroom family home which benefits from gas central heating, uPVC double glazing, off road parking, an attached garage, a good sized rear garden and is offered for sale with no upward ..."
"A beautiful *FOUR BEDROOM* semi detached home with accommodation split over three floors. The property boasts an entrance hall, cloakrooms/WC, open plan kitchen/dining/living, bedroom four/study, a lounge, a master bedroom with an en-suite and two further bedrooms to the second floor along with t..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this spacious Four Bedroom Property!
In short the property compromises of; Entrance Hall, Lounge, W.C, Living Room, Conservatory and Spa Room to the ground floor. To the first floor there are four good sized bedrooms and Family Bathroom. Outside of..."
"** PREMIER PROPERTY ** A deceptively spacious family home located close to Spondon village, having been extended, modified and improved over a number of years to create a fabulous home. The property is ideal for the discerning buyer looking to purchase a home set within a sizeable plot together w..."
"Located in the desirable area of Mickleover in Derby. This property is a rare gem, perfect for families, investors, and anyone looking for a spacious and convenient home. Upon entering, you will be greeted by a spacious entrance hall leading to the two reception rooms, ideal for entertaining g..."
Requires Modernisation and Updating - Traditional bay fronted three bedroom detached residence in a popular location on the outskirts of Allestree close to attractive parkland - No Upward Chain
"A pair of new build three bedroom, two bathroom, three toilet detached properties situated within easy reach of Derby city centre, Alvaston Village, local schooling, good transport links and nearby open space. Due for completion early 2023. With Howdens fitted kitchen, Armitage Shanks sanitarywa..."
"Compared to other three bedroom semi detached homes this offers a remarkable level of luxury and comfort within its walls. Finished to a high standard, this is a home with real kerb appeal, with the roofed porch adding to the fine first impression. Inside, the layout is kept simple yet elegant..."
"High spec hmo fully let. £28,500 per year rental income. 9.6% gross yield"
"A VERY GOOD INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY THIS HIGHLY APPEALING, CHARACTER, FOUR-BEDROOMED MID-PALISADE RESIDENCE, within the Historic Strutts Park Conservation Area, with the additional benefit of parking spaces to the rear, and located just minutes walking distance of the Cathedral Quarter and Derby c..."
"Superior double fronted detached family home, built by Messrs Bloor Homes to their high standards, situated in this highly sought after enclave . This delightful light and spacious high specification family home offers modern and stylish living accommodation throughout and must be viewed interna..."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 6 MONTHS^*** The Spinner, is a 3-bedroom home that extends across three floors and features an open-plan kitchen, living and dining area, two en suite shower rooms and a stylish family bathroom. Completed by a single garage and off road parking."
The Byford is a three bedroom detached home with driveway parking and garage
"A fantastic, double-fronted, detached family home located on a new estate in Mickleover. Benefiting from a master en-suite, single garage & driveway, this family home provides modern and stylish living accommodation throughout and must be viewed internally to fully appreciate the size and standar..."
"Located within an end of cul de sac position, this modern detached family residence offers a high standard of interior accommodation within the popular area of Oakwood, Derby. The home is gas centrally heated and uPVC double glazed throughout and opens with a welcoming reception hallway, guest cl..."
"Enjoy the best of modern living in this popular three-bedroom home which benefits from a stylish open-plan kitchen/diner with French doors leading into the garden. The Hatfield's bright front aspect living room, separate utility room, handy storage cupboard and downstairs WC make this a great home."
"The Byford is a three bedroom detached home, with integrated appliances and turfed rear garden"
"The Clayton Corner features an open-plan kitchen diner and impressive living room with French doors opening into the garden, a utility room, WC and storage cupboard. Upstairs you'll find three bedrooms, including a large en suite bedroom one, a family-sized bathroom and handy storage cupboard."
"*** NO CHAIN *** Offering modern living accommodation is this deceptively spacious detached family home, located in a pleasant position in the popular residential area of Littleover. The property has the benefit of gas central heating, uPVC double glazing, off road parking, a detached garage and..."
"Located on the popular Highfields estate is this modern three storey three bedroom town house, perfect for a first time buyer or family. Viewing is strongly advised to appreciate the deceptively spacious living accommodation on offer inside and out. The property is set back from the road with dri..."
"Spread over three floors, this expansive period property offers four double bedrooms, two single bedrooms, a spacious family bathroom and an additional ground floor bathroom. Benefiting from gas central heating and off road parking, the accommodation in brief comprises: Entrance porch; hallway..."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** NO UPWARD CHAIN * Located in the most sought after Five Lamps/Six Streets area of Derby, this spacious, traditional period home offers two reception rooms, three bedrooms, an additional spacious loft room and is offered for sale with no upward chain. Benefitting from u..."
"This well presented, spacious and extended detached bungalow stands in a sought-after area close to local amenities and transport routes and offers two reception rooms and a modern fitted kitchen. Internal viewings essential. Benefiting from uPVC double glazing and gas central heating, the acc..."
"Must view property! We are delighted to bring to market this 4 bedroom, detached dormer bungalow being sold with no upward chain. The property benefits from having a large open plan living area, four bedrooms and a spacious rear garden. Call us to arrange your viewing."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** This stunning, detached, period cottage boasts impeccable presentation and whilst it has been tastefully modernised and fully refurbished throughout, it still retains plenty of wonderful character and period features, such as the revealed beams throughout the ground floor..."
"In the sought after Strutts Park conservation area, we are proud to bring to market this newly refurbished three bedroom mid terraced property. The house benefits from being in a popular location and requires no work. View now!"
"A beautifully presented, three-storey, semi-detached townhouse. The property was built in 2018 and still maintains the architectural guarantees. Having been lovingly maintained over the previous years, the property benefits from off road parking including a detached garage, uPVC double glazing, ..."
"Ideally located in the sought-after area of Allestree, offering a beautiful rear garden and offered for sale with no upward chain - this semi detached home must be viewed.   Benefiting from uPVC double glazing and gas central heating, the accommodation in brief comprises: Entrance hall; s..."
"An attractive and spacious four bedroom with en suite, detached family home enjoying a pleasant position on a private driveway and featuring a modern kitchen, conservatory and a recently landscaped garden."
This attractive 3 bedroom terraced property is nestled in a sought-after area and is well-placed for easy access to local amenities (including reputable primary and secondary schools) whilst having excellent transport links. This impressive and beautifully proportioned property offers ope...
A modern four bedroom family home having been built by Avant completed in July 2022. The property is being sold due to a change of circumstances by the current family and it is now a great chance for the new owners to purchase and just move straight in
"A substantial six bedroom semi detached family house situated within a popular area of Derby close to schools, public transport and local amenities"
"**PREMIER PROPERTY** This extended family residence is found within the sought after area of Mickleover & has been through a scheme of refurbishment and improvements including; re-wire, re-plastering, redecorating and has been modified to create a fabulous and most spacious open plan living kitch..."
Offered for sale with no onward chain is this spacious detached property in a sought after location close to Mickleover Village.
"IF YOU ARE LOOKING FOR A SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME HOME WITH THE WOW FACTO THEN LOOK NO FURTHER! THIS EXCEPTIONAL BAY FRONTED HOME WILL BLOW YOU AWAY... THE PROPERTY BENEFITS FROM THREE BEDROOMS, THREE RECEPTION ROOMS, TWO WORKSHOPS AND OFF ROAD PARKING! THIS HOME WILL BE SURE STEAL YOUR HEART."
"SPACIOUS THREE STOREY HOME - A beautifully presented, 'Persimmon Built' four bedroom semi-detached home offering around 1140 square feet of living accommodation, occupying this popular modern development on the edge of Chellaston. This well presented three storey home was built in 2017 a..."
ECCLESBOURNE SCHOOL CATCHMENT AREA - Extended detached property with private garden located in the heart of Darley Abbey Village and close to Darley Park. The property is within a short walk to the vibrant Derwent Valley Mills including a fine dining restaurant and popular wine bars. The...
** SUPERBLY PRESENTED DETACHED PROPERTY - MODERN KITCHEN DINER - REFITTED SHOWER ROOM ** Situated in close proximity to local shops and schooling is this well presented three bedroom detached property occupying a pleasant elevated position and in brief comprises: Entrance hallway and lo...
**NO CHAIN** 1930'S BUILT DETACHED HOUSE** LOUNGE**DINING KITCHEN**UTILITY****BATHROOM**TWO BEDROOMS**ADDITIONAL W.C.** OFF ROAD PARKING**ESTABLISHED GARDEN**VIEWING RECOMMENDED
**NO CHAIN**AMPLE SCOPE FOR MODERNISATION** LOUNGE WITH ARCH TO DINING**KITCHEN** THREE BEDROOMS* SHOWER ROOM**LOVELY SIZE GARDENS**DRIVE AND GARAGE**
"This well proportioned, extended and deceptively spacious four bedroomed home is available for sale with no upward chain and provides versatile accommodation to create an ideal family home. The property is set back from Oregon Way and benefits from gas fired central heating (via a combination ..."
"Detached dormer bungalow which is situated on Kennedy close in Chaddesden. Offering a good amount of living space, A viewing of this home is highly recommended in order to fully appreciate the accommodation on offer."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** Located along one of Chellaston's most sought-after tree lined avenues, this well presented, extended and modernised three bedroomed detached family home offers a beautiful open-plan fitted dining kitchen, uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, a generous garden and am..."
"An early viewing is absolutely essential to appreciate this most attractive, particularly well appointed and presented detached bungalow offering deceptively spacious accommodation. The beautifully presented and refurbished accommodation boasts a modern and stylish interior throughout and is set ..."
"A HIGHLY APPEALING CHARACTER, COTTAGE RESIDENCE, forming part of a small, select development of similar properties, in the desirable suburb of Mickleover, within walking distance of local amenities. The delightful, well-proportioned interior boasts many character features, and has been the subje..."
"The Leicester is a four-bedroom practical family home. It features an open-plan kitchen/dining room, a light-filled living room with French doors leading into the garden. The first floor has three good-sized bedrooms and a family bathroom. On the top floor, bedroom one has the bonus of an en suite."
"Acquire Properties are pleased to present this sought after four bed house located on a quiet road in Chellaston. Built by Persimmon Homes and spread over three floors, the property briefly comprises of entrance hallway giving access to downstairs WC, living room and large kitchen/diner. Stairs t..."
"Hall & Benson are delighted to bring to market this wonderfully presented bay fronted, three bedroom detached home situated on this highly sought after residential area. The property has been extremely well maintained by the current owner and an internal inspection is highly advised."
"***PREMIER PROPERTY*** Largely extended and offering a stunning open plan living dining/kitchen with bi-fold doors opening to a most generous rear garden, this beautiful home must be viewed! Benefiting from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating and underfloor heating to the living/dining/ki..."
"**NO UPWARD CHAIN** Situated within the Chellaston Academy catchment area, this good-sized three-bedroomed end terrace is well worth viewing and includes off-road parking, a single garage and a landscaped rear garden."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to Market this immaculately presented Three Bedroom Detached Bungalow.
The property in short compromises of: Entrance Porch, a extremely Large and Spacious Lounge, Kitchen, Master Bedroom, Bedroom Two which is also a double room, Bedroom 3/Dining Room and Famil..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to present this 'must see' three bedroom bungalow to market available with no chain. Inside the property there are three generous sized bedrooms, a utility/bathroom, a separate shower room and a large kitchen/diner which then leads to the lounge which looks out onto th..."
NO CHAIN - A fantastic opportunity to acquire this three double bedroom semi-detached property with original features and rear parking in the ever popular location of Alvaston.
"OPEN 7 DAYS A WEEK - HOPKINS & DAINTY bring to the market this beautifully presented, three bedroom detached bungalow. Set in the popular area of Spondon, convenient for access into Derby/Pride Park via the nearby A52 and falling within the West Park School catchment. Standing on a generous garde..."
"A WONDERFUL opportunity to acquire this DETACHED FAMILY home with HUGE POTENTIAL located close to DERBY HOSPITAL, CITY CENTRE, the A50 and A38! In need of repair, Viewing is a must to appreciate the location and space on offer!"
"A recently refurbished detached bungalow providing spacious accommodation which is situated at the head of a much sought after cul-de-sac location and an early viewing is highly recommended. The property benefits from gas fired central heating (via a combination central heating boiler), replac..."
"***PREMIER PROPERTY*** Located in a Cul-De-Sac in the sought after area of Oakwood, this family home not only offers well presented accommodation, but has the added additions of a ground floor shower room and well fitted utility room. With an enclosed garden and ample driveway, it offers all the ..."
A spacious three bedroom traditional semi-detached property in Littleover offering extended accommodation ideally suited to family living. VIEWING ADVISED
"This well-presented detached family home is situated in a popular location and benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, solar panels, off road parking, an integral garage and a good sized rear garden. In brief the accommodation comprises: Entrance hallway; spacious bay-fronted..."
A unique opportunity to acquire this extended four double bedroom three storey renovated property in an ever popular location.
"Located at the head of a cul-de-sac this extended semi detached home would be great for the growing family and is ready to move straight in to. The property features five bedrooms, plenty of parking and is close to a wide range of shops, school and amenities."
Stunning end town house set on a corner plot providing off-road parking for several vehicles as well as an integral garage. The rear garden is a real feature with a circular lawn and spacious patio area. Easy access to both A50 and M1 transport links it's an ideal commuter location whilst ...
"A beautifully presented townhouse, located on a quiet gated development in the sought after location of Mickleover. The property is set over three floors offering a versatile layout and benefits from uPVC double glazing throughout, gas central heating (replacement boiler 2021), refitted kitchen..."
A fantastic opportunity to acquire this two bedroom detached bungalow with on and off driveway in the ever popular location of Oakwood.
"This beautifully presented detached bungalow is located in the sought after area of Chaddesden and would make a great family home. The property has a converted attic and features four bedrooms, two bathrooms, study area, UPVC conservatory, generous rear garden and off road parking."
"Sold with vacant possession and no upward chain is this well maintained three bedroom detached home set on a good sized plot with a driveway providing parking for multiple vehicles, garage and a mainly laid with paving rear garden."
**DETACHED BUNGALOW**TWO BEDROOMS**EXCELLENT LOCATION**
"Enjoying a pleasant cul-de-sac position and occupying a large and beautifully maintained garden is this traditional two bedroom detached bungalow offering excellent potential for improvement, extension and personalisation (STPP.)"
"Offering excellent accommodation and positioned within a private gated development in this much sought-after area, is this modern, well presented and ideally located three bedroomed detached bungalow. Benefitting from uPVC double glazing and gas central heating, the accommodation in brief comp..."
"*** CHAIN FREE *** FOUR BEDROOMS *** THREE STOREY *** Lovely Four bedroom, modern three storey town house situated in a quiet location backing on to Fullens Park Great access to the A6, M1 and close to local schools.And ready to move in to! CALL TODAY, TO VIEW"
Apartment 6 - A luxury two bedroom first floor apartment featuring a private Juliette balcony and loft space storage - Nutwood Court is a prestigious collection of just seven luxury apartments located in one of Derby’s most sought-after locations. Developed by Elmhurst Homes to an exacting specif...
"This family home cannot be faulted for the space it has to offer. With four double bedrooms, all with fitted wardrobes, as well as an en-suite to the master bedroom, there is plenty of space for the whole family as well as it having a driveway and garage. It is in an immaculate condition ready fo..."
"*Ideal for first time buyers* Contemporary kitchen, open plan LIVING/DINING room with French doors, EN-SUITE to principal bedroom, parking spaces."
Plot 105 * Prominent end CORNER position * Save up to 63% on your annual utility bills when you buy new build * Driveway parking for 2 cars * Modern OPEN PLAN kitchen / dining * Stylish en suite to master bedroom * Short commute to Derby city centre *
"This versatile three-storey family home situated within the popular Highfields development features a modern layout and benefits from uPVC double glazing and gas central heating. The property also boasts three bedrooms, en-suite, family bathroom, off road parking and a single garage. The accom..."
"Offering bags of potential and suitable for anyone looking to undertake a scheme of improvement, is this traditional bay-fronted property, which is brought to the market with no upward chain and benefits from spacious living accommodation with two bay-windowed reception rooms, three bedrooms, off..."
"ATTENTION INVESTORS - GENERATE INSTANT INCOME ON THIS FULLY LICENSED HMO YIELDING ALMOST 8% NET! Luxury six bedroom, three bathroom HMO offered fully furnished - don't miss out and enquire today."
A very smartly presented three bedroom extended family home with long south facing rear garden close to all local facilities in this sought after location.
"Offered to the market with no upward chain is this spacious, traditional semi detached home, occupying a generous corner plot. Having ample room for further development (subject to planning and permissions), the property features a full central heating system provided by a Worcester Bosch combina..."
** FOR SALE VIA ONLINE AUCTION DATE THURSDAY 23rd MARCH 2023** ** Buyers Fee of 1500 + VAT is payable upon exchange of contracts ** IDEAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - A most and imposing period semi-detached property that offers an interesting investment opportunity that comprises f...
Being situated within a family friendly cul-de-sac estate is this lovely three bedroom link-detached family home. Being situated in the popular location of Oakwood viewing is highly recommended to appreciate the deceptively spacious living accommodation on offer. Being best suited to a couple or ...
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** Situated in a prime position on the extremely popular Bonnie Prince Estate in Chellaston, an excellent opportunity arises to acquire this beautifully presented and maintained, four bedroomed, three-storey town house.  The property enjoys views over neighbouring field..."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** This simply outstanding period property has been completely renovated by the current owner to the highest of standards. From the feature Minton tiled flooring in the entrance hall to the spacious and stunning, extended dining kitchen - it simply must be viewed! Benefit..."
"Sold with no upward chain, we are pleased to bring to market this very well presented three bedroom detached house. Being built in 2018, the property benefits from being a modern build with a lot of space."
" ***GUIDE PRICE £270,000 - £280,000*** Early viewing of this spacious townhouse is recommended, a delightful 4-bedroom house set in a quiet cul de sac location with a balcony overlooking a bridle path. The accommodation comprises: Entrance hallway, ground floor bedroom 4 / ga..."
"This spacious, three-bedroomed home on a great sized plot has the unique added benefits of a generous loft room and a large detached double garage (with power and lighting) which is currently used as an office/business unit. Located to offer easy access to local amenities, the property benefit..."
A modern three bedroom three storey town house situated within the highly regarded area of Highfields in Littleover
"LITTLEOVER SCHOOL CATCHMENT - SPACIOUS PERIOD HOME WITH DETACHED BRICK BUILT STUDIO/GYM - A most spacious Victorian three storey home, offering FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS and over 1400 square feet of living accommodation. This well presented and substantial period home retains many original and interes..."
"Scoffield Stone are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom, semi-detached bungalow, ideally located in a cul de sac position at this popular address. The property, though dated is very well presented and maintained and has a number of key features to include, but not limited to; generou..."
"A deceptively spacious and attractive two bedroom, detached bungalow benefiting from off-street parking and a large private garden with delightful patio area being south-facing with sun throughout the afternoon. The property is constructed of brick to the external elevation under a pitc..."
"THREE BED DETACHED HOUSE WITH FANTASTIC SIZED ROOMS, DRIVEWAY PARKING AND A GOOD SIZED GARDEN, THIS HOME MAKES A GREAT HOME FOR A FIRST TIME BUYER OR SMALL FAMILY! With a great sized kitchen diner, lounge and WC downstairs and three generous bedrooms, a family bathroom and en-suite upstairs, this..."
**DETACHED BUNGALOW** LOUNGE** KITCHEN**CONSERVATORY**TWO BEDROOMS****SHOWER/WETROOM** ATTRACTIVE GARDENS**CARPORT**GARAGE**WORKSHOP
"Plot 177 * A stylish & ENERGY EFFICIENT new home with a SOUTH FACING garden, modern open plan kitchen / dining area & good sized bedrooms with EN SUITE to the master bedroom *12 months ENERGY BILLS CONTRIBUTION *"
Plot 102 * 12 months ENERGY BILLS contribution * Good sized WEST FACING garden * Driveway parking * Perfect for first time buyers * EN SUITE to master bedroom * Stunning open kitchen / dining with french doors & separate utility * Development selling fast! *
A traditional and spacious bay fronted detached bungalow occupying a larger than average plot and with excellent potential to develop/extend subject to necessary planning permission.  Occupying a sought after location adjacent to Chaddesden Park and offered for sale with no upward chain an...
Home2sell are delighted this well-presented and maintained semi-detached bungalow in the much sought after location of Breadsall Village and having a generously proportioned garden to the rear. The accommodation benefits from gas central heating and double glazing and in brief comprises of an ent...
"FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND D We are delighted to offer to the market this stunning 4-bedroom semi-detached house Embleton Way, Chellaston offering no upward chain. The property offers a well-adapted layout, offering comfortable accommodation supporting a wide array..."
An excellent opportunity to purchase a spacious three bedroom semi-detached property in the sought after suburb of Allestree ideally suited to a first time buyer or growing family.
"We are delighted to bring to market this 4 bedroom, Victorian terraced property located in the popular Five Lamps area. Sold with no upward chain - call us to arrange your viewing!"
"This ideally located, spacious detached home occupies a good sized plot in the ever sought-after and most popular area of Spondon. Offering generous accommodation, driveway with scope to create additional off road parking, if required, a mature and good size south facing rear garden and is avail..."
"A modern, well maintained and proportioned detached home set back within a cul-de-sac of only three properties and benefits from four/five bedroomed accommodation, ideal for the growing family and an early viewing is recommended.   Being supplemented by gas fired central heating, UPVC dou..."
"*** FOR SALE BY NATIONAL AUCTION ON 23rd FEBRUARY 2023 ON BEHALF OF HANNELLS, ALLESTREE *** A spacious and extended three bedroom detached family home located in a sought after area of Derby. The property, which sits on a good sized plot, benefits from two reception rooms, fitted kitchen, uPVC d..."
A traditional bay fronted three bedroom semi-detached property enjoying a quiet and convenient position within walking distance of the City Centre - No Upward Chain
"Scoffield Stone are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom, semi-detached family home. Set within a quiet cul-de-sac location, this property has been beautifully maintained throughout and benefits from additional upgrades including house alarm and Cctv. The property is found on the sought..."
A recently renovated one bedroom character property with vaulted ceilings and exposed timber beams. The property is situated in a secure location within a short walk of the village centre of Borrowash within a gated community including off road parking in front of the property. The superb accommo...
"** PREMIER PROPERTY ** Located in the most sought after area of Spondon and featuring a refitted breakfast kitchen with integrated appliances, spacious through lounge diner, large conservatory and an additional study/home office - this three-bedroomed detached home is ideal for the growing family..."
"A modern and attractive, detached family home occupying an established cul-de-sac location and offered for sale with no upward chain. The well-presented accommodation has been extended to the rear elevation and benefits from gas fired central heating, UPVC double glazing and would be ideal for t..."
"An early viewing is absolutely essential to appreciate this attractive, much improved and well appointed, semi detached home occupying a sought after location set back from Chaddesden Lane. There are two composite outhouses to the rear of the property which would be of particularly interest to t..."
"Ideal for first time buyers - 3 BEDROOMS, contemporary fitted kitchen, open plan LIVING/DINING room with French doors to garden, EN-SUITE to master bedroom, parking spaces."
"SPACIOUS AND WELL-PRESENTED DETACHED BUNGALOW, enjoying a well-established and sought-after cul-de-sac position off Moorway Lane, in the popular suburb of Littleover, well served by a range of local amenities. Available with IMMEDIATE VACANT POSSESSION, the highly adaptable interior has the bene..."
"This deceptively spacious and extended, detached bungalow is set back from Arundel Drive and has the benefit of ample off road parking, an attached garage and a pleasant, enclosed garden which enjoys a degree of privacy. The property offers versatile two/three bedroomed accommodation and viewing..."
"***VIEWINGS FROM FEBRUARY 2023*** STUNNING FAMILY HOME... Prepare to be impressed with this substantial three-bedroom property benefitting from an extension in order to create a property that any family would be lucky to call their forever home. Internally, the property benefits from a r..."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** A well presented and generously proportioned, three bedroomed link detached family home, occupying an excellent position in the ever popular Derbyshire suburb of Chellaston. The property has the benefit of upvc double glazing, gas central heating, an enclosed rear garden..."
Occupying a larger than average well tended south facing plot in this sought after locality is this smart and stylish modern semi detached family home sited in a delightful off road position overlooking a green area. This well cared for high specification property benefits from gas central heatin...
"*** NO UPWARD CHAIN *** This two double bedroom bay-fronted detached bungalow could not be better located to offer easy access to the Park Farm Shopping Centre. Offered for sale with no upward chain and benefitting from uPVC double glazing and gas central heating, the accommodation in brief co..."
"Sold with vacant possession and no upward chain is this well maintained two double bedroom detached bungalow set on a good sized plot with a driveway providing parking for multiple vehicles, garage and a mainly paved rear garden."
"Being sold with no onward chain this spacious town house has a lot to offer with flexible living across three floors. The home benefits from an internal garage, enclosed garden and brilliant local amenities within driving or walking distance."
A beautifully renovated three bedroom semi-detached property with garage in the highly desired location of Mickleover on Ladybank Road.
A brilliant four bedroom semi detached house situated within the well known and desirable modern development. This property is a great home which upon viewing you will truly appreciate the space it has to offer
"**To be sold via online auction on THURSDAY 30TH MARCH AT 10AM. The auction will run for 30 minutes. Register to bid today. ** Set within this extremely sought after development, occupying a spacious plot, is this well presented 4 bedroom semi-detached home. "
A superb opportunity to acquire a three-bedroom semi-detached family residence located in the well-favoured residential area of Allestree & convenient for local amenities & schools of all grades. Ideal for a growing family. Description The ground floor comprises of an entra...
This lovely home is well presented and finished to a high standard throughout. The kitchen is modern and highly functional with NEFF built-in appliances and plenty of storage space thanks to the wall and ground-mounted units. The open-plan kitchen/diner is perfect for modern lifestyles. The li...
LITTLEOVER SCHOOL CATCHMENT - NO CHAIN - A spacious three bedroom detached property in a sought after location in the Littleover School Catchment area offered for sale with no onward chain.
"**OPEN 7 DAYS** HOPKINS & DAINTY of TICKNALL are delighted to bring to the market this well presented three bedroom detached house located on the ever popular Newton Village development, close to amenities and good communication links and also ideally situated for local walks in the countryside o..."
"GENEROUS MATURE SOUTH FACING GARDEN - A well presented and well proportioned three bedroom detached family home, occupying this stunning mature garden south facing plot, located close to excellent local amenities in Spondon village, whilst also offering easy access to the A52 with swift access to..."
"THE LATEST ADDITION TO THE VILLAGE... This two bedroom detached new build is complete with Category 5 cables in every room built in with high wall mounted sockets, electric car charger and a double drive which will ramp up to the front door. This property is in a quiet area within reach ..."
"A traditional detached bungalow occupying a popular location within the Cherry Tree Area of Chaddesden and benefits from solar panels, mature and good size rear garden, off road parking and office/study. The property benefits from gas fired central heating, UPVC double glazing and briefly comp..."
"Hall and Benson are delighted to present this three bedroom detached bungalow in the popular suburb of Littleover, close to local amenities the bungalow would be suitable for both families and those looking to downsize in the area. Call us on arrange your internal inspection."
"***PREMIER PROPERTY*** Spacious, modern and located in a sought after new development with views over open fields to the rear, this well presented home must be viewed. Benefiting from uPVC double glazing and gas central heating, the accommodation in brief comprises: Entrance Hall; Cloakroom wi..."
"New to the market this THREE bedroom detached property, providing good access to all local amenities. The property is deceptive and finished to a high standard. An internal inspection is recommended by the agent to appreciate the property on offer. The property comprises of entrance hall, downsta..."
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* Very well presented, five bedroom, detached family home located on a private corner plot in a quiet cul de sac in Alvaston. Boasting a 19ft living room, four double bedrooms, a further fifth downstairs bedroom with its own shower room, ideal for elderly or disabled access, along..."
"Scoffield Stone are pleased to offer for sale this three bedroom modern semi-detached property enjoying a favoured and popular location in Mickleover, being offered for sale with the benefit of gas central heating, open plan living and off road parking to the rear including a detached garage. An ..."
"A spacious three storey, four bedroom town house offering large family living space which benefits from gas central heating and double glazing. NO CHAIN."
"SEMI DETACHED HOUSE WITH LOUNGE, DINING ROOM, KITCHEN, THREE BEDROOMS, BATHROOM, OFF ROAD PARKING, DRIVEWAY, GARAGE, AND GARDEN TO REAR"
"The Rufford is a three-bedroom family home. The open-plan kitchen/dining room has French doors leading into the garden. The front porch, inner hallway, downstairs cloakroom and cupboard take care of everyday storage. This home also has an en suite to bedroom one, family bathroom and integral garage."
"**PREMIER PROPERTY** This stunning family home boasts a wealth of charm and character having been extended and upgraded to an excellent standard whilst retaining plenty of original features. The property offers spacious accommodation throughout and boasts an impressive kitchen, fantastic conserva..."
"Guide Price £255-260,000 - A two double bedroom detached bungalow found on a generous corner plot. Selling with no upward chain the accommodation has been well maintained and benefits from gas central heating and double glazing. In brief comprises of a conservatory, hall, lounge, kitchen, two b..."
"5 BED HMO WITH POTENTIAL ANNUAL INCOME OF CIRCA £30,000. Acquire Properties are pleased to present this brilliant opportunity to purchase this 5 bed HMO, with all rooms having their own private ensuite. Offered with vacant possession, it is located in a prime area for working professionals ..."
INVESTORS ONLY An extremely interesting opportunity to acquire a piece of the city centre. This three storey terraced property has been sub-divided to create two apartments both currently rented generating approximately £14k PA.
A fantastic opportunity to acquire this three bedroom detached property boasting character and space with the added extra of a very large rear garden and driveway to front.
"New to market is this very well presented and spacious, three-storey mid town house, offering versatile living accommodation to include full uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, a low maintenance rear garden, off road parking for 2 cars and a garage which has been converted into a bedroom. ..."
Delighted to market this deceptively spacious three bedroom semi-detached property situated within a desirable cul-de-sac location. Viewing is strongly advised to truly appreciate the potential that this lovely home has to offer. Upon viewing you will also be able to appreciate the fantastic outd...
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** An extended family home offering spacious living accommodation throughout. Located in the popular area of Littleover and benefitting from a CCTV home security alarm system, uPVC double glazing, gas central heating via a combination boiler, off road parking, a detached si..."
"Situated in this highly sought-after location, close to Littleover Village and all of its amenities, stands this superb, deceptively spacious chalet-style bungalow. The property has three reception rooms offering a versatile layout and has been upgraded and improved by the current owners with re-..."
This is an excellent opportunity to acquire this well maintained three bedroom semi detached house located on the popular Silverhill Estate having the benefit of a single garage.
A home to be proud of! If you are searching for that next step up the ladder as you need that extra bedroom or more space then we are pleased to say your search is over!
"A stunning, refurbished detached bungalow located in the highly sought-after area of Shelton Lock and offered to the market with no chain. The property has undergone a scheme of refurbishment from re-plastering, re-wiring, newly installed central heating system, oak doors and has been superbly fi..."
Three Bedroom Detached. New Decor And Flooring throughout . Garage. Refitted Family Bathroom. Downstairs Cloakroom. Generous Private Rear Garden. NO CHAIN*
"Recently refurbished semi detached property, located in the sought after area of Mickleover. The property benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating via a combination boiler and off road parking to the rear with a detached garage and allocated parking space. Having been lovingly ma..."
"This two bedroom detached bungalow sits on a popular street in Allestree and benefits from having off road parking, a garage and being located on a corner plot. The property requires some modernisation but would make for a lovely home."
"*** BRILLIANT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY *** This spacious, three-bedroomed mid-terraced property is currently configured to provide four rental rooms with a separate living room, dining room, kitchen and two shower rooms. An ideal investment opportunity - the property is offered for sale with tenan..."
"This spacious, three double-bedroomed, semi-detached dormer bungalow is set back from the road within a sought after cul-de-sac location and is offered for sale with no upward chain. The well maintained accommodation is supplemented by gas fired central heating, double glazing, ample off road pa..."
"This stunningly well presented and recently modernised detached bungalow has been completely redecorated and offers a wonderful open plan dining kitchen, modern high specification shower room and a simply beautiful, landscaped rear garden. Benefitting from gas central heating and uPVC double g..."
"A particularly well maintained presented detached bungalow occupying a sought after no through road location close to Spondon village and benefits from pleasant gardens, block paved driveway, carport and detached garage.   The property benefits from gas central heating system with combina..."
"Extended four bedroomed detached home offering versatile accommodation to the ground floor and occuping an established cul-de-sac location. The property benefits from gas fired central heating, UPVC double glazing, block paved driveway, detached garage and solar panels. Ideal for the growing ..."
"DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS BUNGALOW IN SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION. Well presented, two bedroom semi detached bungalow, with large and private rear garden, two bedrooms and driveway."
Well-positioned two bedroom detached bungalow within a quiet cul-de-sac location in Allestree - No Upward Chain
"A modern and extended property located in a quiet cul-de-sac in the sought after area of Mickleover. The property is ideal for first time buyers, families or would make a fantastic investment opportunity. The property benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, owned solar panels pro..."
Versatile and well presented two/three bedroom dormer style semi-detached home in a quiet cul-de-sac location in the popular village of Littleover
Hall & Benson are delighted to bring to market this wonderfully presented three bedroom semi-detached home situated on this highly sought after residential area. The property has been extremely well maintained by the current owner and an internal inspection is highly advised.
"This 3-bed detached house located in Derby is in need of some TLC. The house is situated in a quiet residential area, close to local amenities and transport links. On the ground floor, there is a spacious, kitchen, a good-sized lounge/diner, and a separate utility area. Upstairs, there are thr..."
"An excellent opportunity to acquire this deceptively spacious traditional bay fronted detached bungalow having been extended to the rear elevation and occupying a larger than average plot with a mature south facing garden to the rear elevation. The property has been re-roofed, gas fired centra..."
A perfect canvass for any growing family looking to make a home their own! The property is also situated on a slightly larger than average plot meaning it has potential to further extend
A modern three family house having been built CIRCA 2018 and has also had the additional upgrades paid for by the current owners such as Granite work surfaces. The property is located on the highly regarded Langley Country Park
"YOPA are thrilled to welcome to the market this well presented three bedroom semi - detached home in the sought after Highfields location in Littleover. Benefitting from an en - suite off the master bedroom, off street parking for two cars and a generous plot size. This would be a great family home!"
STUNNING HIGH SPEC NEW BUILDS IN SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION... This new build property would make an ideal purchase for any family buyers looking for their forever home. This property is currently under construction and will be finished to an extremely high standard throughout whilst boastin...
An attractive three bedroom semi-detached modern property on this popular new homes development of larger than average proportion inside and out featuring a spacious living room opening on to a large garden with long side driveway.
"Acquire Properties are pleased to bring this three bedroom semi detached house to the market. Ideally located on a well sized plot in Shelton Lock, giving excellent access to major road links, schools and shops. The property briefly comprises of entrance hallway giving access to the dual aspect l..."
A modern three bedroom detached property in a sought after cul-de-sac location in Boulton Moor offered for sale with no onward chain.
NO CHAIN - A great opportunity to acquire a three bedroom detached property with loft room and with driveway for multiple cars with detached garage to rear in the ever popular location of Chaddesden.
LOCATION DETAILS Bagshaws are pleased to bring to the market this two bedroom detached property on a generous corner plot in the sought after suburb of Mickleover.
"This spacious and recently refurbished three bedroom detached property offers everything needed in a family home, style, size and location. Offered for sale with no upward chain, come and have a look in person"
"IMMEDIATE POSSESSION - NO UPWARD CHAIN. Substantial modern semi detached bungalow occupying a rarely available west facing mature plot in this highly sought after cul de sac, situated within easy walking distance of Mickleover Village. This light and spacious thoughtfully extended home benefits f..."
Attractive double fronted two bedroom detached bungalow occupying a popular and convenient location on Chaddesden Park Road in Chaddesden - No Upward Chain
"Three bedroom semi detached family home, falling within the Wren Park Primary School and Littleover Community School catchment areas and offered to the market with no upward chain. The property benefits from double glazing, gas central heating, spacious extended kitchen/diner, a good sized rear g..."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 6 MONTHS^*** The Tailor is a 3-bedroom home with an open-plan kitchen and dining area, a front-facing living room, a modern family bathroom, and an en-suite shower room to bedroom 1. Completed by off road parking for two cars."
"Are you looking for three bedroom family home? Then this lovely home on Hollybrook Way, Littleover is a must see for you!"
"CHAIN FREE - Scoffield Stone are pleased to offer for sale this two bedroom, detached bungalow located in a good position within this popular area and ideal for a retiring couple, or even a first time buyer. The property is very well presented throughout and has a number of key features to inclu..."
"*VIEWING SLOTS ONLY AVAILABLE FROM APRIL  Strike is pleased to present this property in Derby. This is a STUNNING, very appealing THREE-bedroomed detached house occupying a sought-after position close to popular local schools and all local amenities. PERFECT FAMILY HOME!! Th..."
"A very well presented Three bedroom Semi Detached property in a popular area of Spondon with excellent transport links via car, foot or bus with a driveway, south facing rear garden and master bedroom with en-suite. A viewing is highly recommended to appreciate the accommodation on offer!"
"An extended, double-fronted bungalow situated in the popular and sought after suburb of Littleover and occupying a pleasant location. The bungalow has been extended to create a wonderful spacious living area and offers two/three bedrooms, a modern bathroom, off road parking, uPVC double glazing,..."
A fantastic opportunity to acquire this extended four bedroom semi detached home within a quiet cul de sac within Oakwood. The wow factor is evident as you enter the open plan kitchen diner and only upon viewing you will you appreciate this!
"Leaders Estate Agents are delighted to present this spacious, traditional three bedroomed semi-detached family home located in the ever popular area of Littleover. Entering into the property is the hallway with feature window and understairs storage, access to the lounge with bay window, second r..."
"This two double bedroomed detached bungalow has been subject to a comprehensive scheme of modernisation/improvement and an early viewing is absolutely essential to be appreciated. The property benefits from being rewired, newly installed gas central heating system with combination boiler and has..."
"FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND C We are delighted to offer to the market this stunning 3-bed semi-detached house on Trowels Lane, Derby. The property offers a well-adapted layout, offering comfortable accommodation supporting a wide array of individual or collective fa..."
"IMMEDIATE POSSESION - NO UPWARD CHAIN - FREEHOLD - COUNCIL TAX BAND B - ENERGY RATING D - SIZEABLE MATURE PLOT CLOSE TO SHOPS, BUS ROUTES AND AMENITIES - TWO BEDROOMS - UPVC DOUBLE GLAZING - GAS CENTRAL HEATING - DETACHED BRICK GARAGE - EXCELLENT POTENTIAL TO IMPROVE / EXTEND (SUBJECT TO LOCAL ..."
"A well-presented, modern, three-storey, three-bedroom family home occupying an excellent position in a private cul-de-sac location in the ever popular suburb of Oakwood. The accommodation on offer briefly comprises; Entrance hallway, lounge, dining kitchen, internal hallway and WC, all to the gr..."
"Hall & Benson are delighted to bring to market this wonderfully presented, three bedroom semi detached home situated on this highly sought after residential area. The property has been extremely well maintained by the current owner and an internal inspection is highly advised."
"This modern family home is located on the highly desirable Regents Place development within Chellaston. The property benefits from a cul-de-sac location, NHBC guarantee, a gas central heating system, uPVC double glazing throughout, off-road parking and an enclosed rear garden. The internal acc..."
"This beautifully presented semi detached home occupies a cul-de-sac position in the sought after area of Stenson Fields and would make a great family home. The property is ready to move straight in to and is close to local schools, shops and amenities and offers excellent road links."
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** Offering a fantastic open-plan kitchen/diner and a superb, fitted family bathroom is this modern detached home, ideally situated on a popular modern development. Benefitting from uPVC double glazing and gas central heating, the accommodation in brief comprises: Entranc..."
"Wow, look at the attention to detail in this beautifully upgraded two bedroom detached bungalow situated within a quiet cul de sac in Oakwood"
"A lovely three bedroom semi-detached home, enjoying a lounge and separate dining room. Fitted kitchen and shower room. Ample off-road parking and well maintained rear garden. Brunswood Park is located at the end of the cul de saq. Viewing highly recommended."
"***PREMIER PROPERTY*** Stunningly well presented, upgraded and renovated to a very high standard and offering a beautiful open plan kitchen/diner, this high specification home is offered for sale with no upward chain. This spacious three bedroom home stands on a corner plot and has been subjec..."
"A modern, immaculate and superbly presented family home located in the sought after area of Derby, being in a prime location for the Royal Derby Hospital and City Centre. The property has been extended and modified to create this fabulous home which includes a stunning, modern living kitchen/dine..."
"A beautifully appointed, larger than average, two bedroom semi detached property which benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and professionally landscaped gardens to the rear."
"A well looked after spacious three bedroom detached bungalow, standing on an elevated plot within a popular and established residential cul de sac location. G.c.h., ample off-street parking, detached garage and enclosed rear garden. Close to good road networks such as the A52 for Derby and Nott..."
"This is a very attractive property with minimal work required to /bring it to its full potential. As such, it represents a great opportunity for any buyer seeking an excellent investment. A lovely semi-detached home in the sought-after suburban village of Mickleover, the property offers a pletho..."
"Abode are pleased to present to the market this traditional three bedroom semi detached home. Located in the popular Littleover area and convenient for access to the Royal Derby hospital The property comprises: entrance hallway, lounge with a feature fireplace and log burner. Open plan kitchen..."
"Deceptively spacious three double bedroom semi detached bungalow. Found to the end of a quiet cul-de-sac, this well maintained property benefits from full uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, off road parking including an attached garage and low maintenance gardens to the front and rear. ..."
"Three bedroomed DETACHED family home in the POPULAR area of Chaddesden! Conservatory, Private Driveway and Enclosed Rear Garden! TWO DOUBLE Bedrooms!"
"An extended, well presented and appointed bay fronted semi detached home occupying a mature corner plot position with gardens to front, side and rear elevations together with off road parking and an attached garage. The property is offered for sale with no upward chain and an early viewing is re..."
"A modern, well-presented, three-bedroom, semi-detached home occupying an excellent plot in the sought after Lime Tree Court development in Oakwood. The accommodation briefly comprises; Entrance hallway, generous lounge, open plan dining kitchen and a cloakroom, all to the ground floor. To the fi..."
OPEN 7 DAYS A WEEK - HOPKINS & DAINTY of TICKNALL are pleased to be marketing this very well presented and maintained two bedroom detached bungalow. Set in this popular residential location with a pleasant garden plot and Westerly rear outlook. The property is offered with NO UPWARD CHAIN an...
"OPEN 7 DAYS A WEEK - HOPKINS & DAINTY of TICKNALL are pleased to be marketing this traditional three bedroom home. Convenient for access to the Royal Derby hospital, ring road and falling within the Littleover Community school catchment area. The property is set in a pleasant cul-de-sac and comp..."
"This well presented, spacious, semi-detached family home is located in the sought after area of Chellaston, set back from the road and features uPVC double glazing, gas central heating by way of a combination boiler, full alarm system, and off road parking, leading to a good size covered storage ..."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this two bedroomed detached bungalow, set in the top corner of a pleasant cul-de-sac, benefitting from a larger than average plot offering potential building space subject to relevant planning permissions. (see aerial view photo). The bungalow itself needs a ..."
"An extremely well looked after two bedroom semi detached bungalow situated in a quiet cul de sac location being brought to the market with the benefit of NO UPWARD CHAIN. With gas central heating from combi boiler, double glazing, off-street parking, detached garage to the rear, and enclosed low..."
"Offering spacious living accommodation throughout, with a modern open plan dining kitchen, family bathroom, en suite and allocated parking to the front - an early viewing is essential to avoid disappointment. The internal accommodation briefly comprises: Entrance hallway; ground floor cloakro..."
A well-presented two bedroom detached bungalow in a sought after cul-de-sac location in Darley Abbey.
"The Sunderland is a thoughtfully-designed two-bedroom home. The ground floor consists of an open plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading into the garden, a WC and storage cupboard. Upstairs, there are two good-sized bedrooms, a family bathroom and further storage."
"Situated within the ready-made community of Kingsway in Derby, Albany Lodge is a modern Retirement Living development designed exclusively for the over 55's, with a beautiful collection of 10 one-bedroom and 54 two-bedroom apartments available for sale or for rent. "
"A smartly presented three bedroom end-townhouse featuring a large open plan living room, private garden and garage, enjoying a pleasant position within this ever popular location."
"A spacious and immaculately presented corner plot property briefly comprising; lounge, kitchen diner, rear lobby/utility to the ground floor and three bedrooms and family bathroom to the first floor. The property also boasts gardens to the front and rear, detached garage and large drive for 5+ cars."
"Hall and Benson are delighted to offer to the market this immaculately presented three bedroom semi detached house benefiting from living room, kitchen, dining room, utility room, three bedrooms and family bathroom. Viewings are highly recommended."
"Situated in the heart of Spondon, close to the beautiful Locko Park, this is a three bedroom semi detached house which benefits from double glazing, gas central heating, garden, driveway and garage."
"**TENANTS IN SITU - INVESTMENT ONLY** This traditional mid terrace property is being sold with tenants in situ and would make an great investment opportunity. The property features two reception rooms, three bedrooms and enclosed rear garden. Derby City Centre is close by."
"A well-presented and nicely positioned, three-bedroomed, semi-detached family home with uPVC double glazing, an attached single garage and a private rear garden. The accommodation on offer briefly comprises; Entrance hallway; lounge; dining kitchen; ground floor cloakroom/WC. First floor lan..."
This 2017 three bedroom home is built to a great specification and is a must viewing. It is within the Regents Place development at Chellaston.
"This traditional extended semi detached home is located in the heart of Chaddesden Village and is beautifully presented throughout. The property would make a great home for the growing family and features two reception rooms, four bedrooms, off road parking and low maintenance rear garden."
"An extended, cosmetically refurbished and immaculately presented semi detached property with views over open fields to the rear, offering two double bedrooms, two reception rooms, new kitchen, new bathroom, new ground floor cloakroom, off street parking and enclosed rear garden, being sold with n..."
"Wow, A beautiful home on an even better plot! If you are searching for the next step on the ladder with a garage and a bigger garden then you must come and see this beautiful home in Spondon"
A fantastic opportunity to acquire an extended three bedroom semi-detached property in the sought after location of Alvaston.
"An excellent opportunity arises for a growing family to purchase this three bedroomed semi-detached property, located in the highly sought after area of Littleover. Brought to the market with no upward chain, the property benefits from gas central heating, part double glazing, spacious living acc..."
"COMMERCIAL. End terraced property, currently rented out as a restaurant premises"
"A well presented, modernised and improved detached bungalow set back from Oregon Way and is available for sale with no upward chain. The property enjoys the benefit of ample off road parking, garage and maintenance free gardens. The accommodation benefits from gas fired central heating (via a..."
The property is deceptively spacious and offers excellent living accommodation in a popular residential area. Offers a great sized large diner and kitchen with three great size bedrooms and recently renovated bathroom. Great purchase for a first time buyer or family to purchase this lovely home.
"*** EXTENDED LIVING ACCOMMODATION *** This traditional extended family home is located in the much sought after area of Chellaston. The property is in need of some modernisation but is packed with potential and benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, off road parking and a garage...."
Offered for Sale with NO UPWARD CHAIN! This THREE-bedroom Town House is located in Popular CHESTER GREEN! 
"Ideal for first time buyers or the discerning purchaser looking for their next step on the property ladder! A modern, well presented three-storey town house, located situated on the popular Buttercup Leys estate, close to both Chellaston and Alvaston and all of the local amenities they have to o..."
"A well presented and recently upgraded three bedroom semi-detached home, occupying an excellent plot in the ever popular Derbyshire suburb of Oakwood. The accommodation on offer briefly comprises; Entrance hallway, lounge, recently refitted dining kitchen and conservatory all to the ground flo..."
NO CHAIN - A fantastic and rare opportunity to acquire this Grade II listed three bedroom terrace property built in the 1800's situated in Derby.
"GREAT LOCATION - CLOSE TO ALL LOCAL AMENITIES - NO UPWARD CHAIN. This well presented two bedroom link detached bungalow sits in a pleasant cul-de-sac location with an elevated position overlooking a pleasant green. Within short walking distance of a range of local amenities including doctors, opt..."
Plot 104 * ENERGY BILLS PAID for a year * Ideal for FIRST time buyers * Stylish new home with two parking spaces * Modern OPEN kitchen / dining area with separate utility space * Perfect for commuters working in Derby city * Generous DOUBLE bedrooms with EN SUITE to master bedroom *
"OPEN 7 DAYS A WEEK - HOPKINS & DAINTY of TICKNALL are delighted to bring to the market this spacious DETACHED BUNGALOW located on a cul de sac within a highly popular location. The property has gas central heating, double glazing and DETACHED BRICK GARAGE and comes to the market with NO UPWARD CH..."
"Ideal for a small family/professional couple is this well presented three bedroom, three storey modern townhouse enjoying a highly convenient position - No Upward Chain"
"Property number 42276.
Fully Refurbished semi detached property having fully decoration, new carpets though out , New modern Kitchen. The property is located towards the top of Oakwood, close to the schools and 30 metres to the bus route . The property has a fully enclosed private garden."
"An immaculate Modern Three Bedroom Townhouse, with spacious open plan lounge/diner, modern kitchen, downstairs cloakroom, three bedrooms the master having a dressing room and En-suite, private landscaped rear garden, and garage and parking."
"Bagshaws Residential are delighted to offer this distinctive chalet-style Three Bedroom Semi-Detached property. Located in the popular location of Mickleover ideal for the first time buyer or a growing family. The property is within easy access to local road links, bus routes, shops and ameni..."
EXCELLENT POTENTIAL TO EXTEND (Subject to Planning Permissions) - Well positioned three bedroom semi-detached occupying a larger than average plot
YOPA are calling all cash investors to this Grade II listed building in the heart of Derby. This property has planning permission granted for three flats and benefits from being a real project in the City Centre. This is not to be missed and must be viewed to appreciate the opportunity on offer.
NO CHAIN - A spacious two bedroom mid terrace property in a popular cul-de-sac location offered for sale with no onward chain.
"** Great Family Accommodation *** A modern three storey, four bedroom end town house positioned within a popular cul de sac location having the benefit of uPVC double glazing and gas central heating throughout. The home is being sold with a tenant in occupation with an excellent payment hist..."
"A well maintained and presented detached bungalow offered to the market with no upward chain and benefiting from part double glazing, gas fired central heating, off road parking and a detached brick built garage. In brief the property comprises:- Side reception hallway hallway, lounge with fi..."
"Scoffield Stone are delighted to offer for sale this two bedroom semi-detached Miller Homes property located in the popular Highfields development in Littleover. This property benefits from a number of key features to include, but not limited to; Boasting a modern and stylish interior throughout ..."
"We are proud to present this Three Bedroom Detached Bungalow – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £225,000 - £250,000*"
"Sold with vacant possession and no upward chain is this well maintained three bedroom detached bungalow set on a good sized plot with a driveway providing parking for multiple vehicles, garage and a mainly lawned rear garden."
A superbly presented three bedroom modern end terrace in sought after location in Boulton Moor ideally suited to a growing family or first time buyer.
A well-presented two bedroom semi-detached home in a sought after location within a walking distance of Littleover Community School with off-road parking and landscaped private garden. The property benefits from UPVC double glazing and has accommodation briefly comprising to the ground floor:- En...
"Ideal first home with open plan LIVING/DINING with French doors to the garden, contemporary KITCHEN, 2 bedrooms & parking spaces."
An extended three bedroom semi detached family home having been recently redecorated creating a home you can move straight into!
"Ideal for a first time buyer or investor is this well presented, three bedroomed semi-detached property, which is located on the sought after development of Buttercup Leys, Boulton Moor. The property benefits from extended living accommodation, gas central heating, uVPC double glazing and off ro..."
"This Property is located in a highly regarded position with Derby close to the Royal Derby Hospital and City Centre, A52,A38 AND A50. The property itself comprises of in brief: Entrance , hallway, reception rooms, kitchen and a utility area. To the first floor there are three bedrooms, family ..."
"A modern and well presented THREE BED TOWNHOUSE having driveway parking for two cars, kitchen, spacious lounge/diner. downstairs guest WC, three DOUBLE bedrooms with the master having the use of an en-suite, enclosed rear garden, Gas central heating. To the rear is a low maintenance garden with ..."
** More Information Coming Soon ** We have the pleasure of offering you this opportunity to purchase these three flats which is a great investment opportunity
Period Home. Three Double Bedrooms. Two Reception Rooms. Cellar. Three Piece Bathroom. Garage.
"Deceptively spacious five bedroom family home benefiting from double glazing, gas central heating, bay fronted lounge, breakfast kitchen, separate dining room, and low maintenance rear garden."
"Offering potential for further development (subject to planning) is this extended family home, situated in popular location and benefitting from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, ample off road parking and a generous rear garden. The property is ideal for a growing family and the accom..."
"END TERRCE COMMERCIAL PROPERTY IN POPULAR LCOATION. End terrace property on Burton Road, ideal investment opportunity."
"*** DOUBLE GARAGE *** A fantastic opportunity to acquire the exquisite two double bedroom semi-detached cottage. Finished and maintained to an excellent standard, this home offers all the charm and character you would expect of a cottage situated in the heart of Spondon Village."
Gardeners Dream! If you are looking to downsize and enjoy gardening then this is the only bungalow you need to view! This is a two bedroom detached bungalow offered for sale with No Upward Chain
"Beautifully presented semi detached home, found a short distance from Mickleover centre and having been recently refurbished to a high standard. The property would ideally suite first time buyers, buy to let investors and those looking to downsize to a ready to go property. In brief the prope..."
LITTLEOVER SCHOOL CATCHMENT! - A fantastic opportunity to acquire this three bedroom semi-detached property in immaculate condition with the added benefit of brick built office in the rear garden in an ever popular location of Derby.
"This spacious and well presented traditional terraced home is located in the sought after and historic area of Chester Green and overlooks a pleasant green space. Offering three bedrooms, two reception rooms and two bathrooms, an internal inspection is highly recommended. Benefiting from UPVC..."
"No Upward Chain – Fantastic, thoughtfully extended, semi-detached bungalow, located on a superb plot in the highly popular area of Alvaston. The property sits back from the road offering ample driveway parking and has been modernised throughout by the current owner. This property simply must be v..."
"Delighted to presented this well presented three bedroom semi-detached townhouse. Viewing is strongly advised as upon personal inspection you will be able to appreciate the spacious living accommodation on offer. Offer convenient access to local ammenities, popular schools and useful transport li..."
"*** NO UPWARD CHAIN *** An attractive, traditional bay-fronted family home standing on a good sized plot and offering the potential to extend (subject to planning permission). The property benefits from gas central heating, uPVC double glazing, bay-fronted lounge, open plan kitchen/diner, three b..."
"A well presented and nicely situated three bedroom semi detached family home, enjoying a generous rear garden and great cul-de-sac location. The accommodation on offer briefly comprises; Entrance Hallway, ground floor WC, generous lounge and an open plan dining kitchen with French doors to th..."
"YOPA are delighted to welcome to the market this well presented three bedroom end of town house in the sought after location of Boulton Moor. Benefitting from an open kitchen/diner, an en - suite off the master bedroom and two allocated parking spaces. This would make a great first time buy!"
"A particularly well presented semi detached home occupying a popular cul-de-sac location, ideal for the first time buyer or growing family and an early viewing is recommended. The property benefits from a pleasant rear garden and a driveway for two vehicles. The accommodation is supplemented ..."
"NO CHAIN - A spacious and well-presented detached bungalow in a popular location in Littleover offered for sale with no onward chain. The accommodation benefits from gas central heating and double glazing and in brief comprises a hallway, lounge, two good size bedrooms, kitchen and bathroom."
"ROBERT ELLIS ARE DELIGHTED TO BRING TO THE MARKET WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN THIS BAY FRONTED THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE SITUATED WITHIN SPONDON, BEING A POPULAR AND ESTABLISHED LOCATION. With accommodation over two floors, the ground floor comprises entrance hall, bay fronted living r..."
"*** Ecclesbourne School Catchment Area *** Situated at the end of a cul-de-sac in the highly sought after area of Allestree is this well maintained, three bedroomed semi-detached property, which benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, off road parking together with a garage and a ..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to Market this spacious Three Bedroom Property in the Popular Location.
In short the property compromises of; Entrance Hall, Lounge, Kitchen/Diner, Utility and W.C to the ground floor. To the first floor there are three good sized bedrooms and shower room.
Thi..."
"A spacious and well presented detached bungalow with views over Derby offering three bedrooms, lounge diner and surrounding gardens. Located with good access to the city centre, the property benefits from gas central heating and double glazing. There is a large welcoming hallway with useful clo..."
"Buttercup Leys is situated in Boulton Moor, a sought-after suburb on the southern edge of Derby. The immediate area offers all the ingredients for a great lifestyle - the nearby village of Elvaston has a beautiful Country Park, Alvaston boasts several schools along with a picturesque riverside..."
"OPEN 7 DAYS A WEEK - HOPKINS & DAINTY of TICKNALL are pleased to offer this beautifully presented, three bedroom semi-detached home. Set in a popular residential location, convenient for access into Derby, the Ring Road and nearby Chellaston which connects to the A50. The property has a plea..."
PERFECT FIRST TIME BUY - A stunning collection of one and two bedroom luxury apartments forming part of the unique Nightingale Quarter development by Wavensmere Homes.
OPEN 7 DAYS A WEEK - HOPKINS & DAINTY of TICKNALL are delighted to bring to the market this spacious two bedroom semi-detached bungalow benefitting from a re-fitted kitchen/diner and low maintenance rear garden with a feature cabin. The accommodation benefits from gas central heating and double g...
"This particularly well presented home is available with no upward chain and would ideally suit the first time buyer or growing family and an early viewing is highly recommended. The property benefits from a block paved driveway for three vehicles, a larger than average garage and a south facing ..."
"A well-presented, semi-detached bungalow located in a cul de sac in the sought after area of Mickleover. The property benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, two bedrooms, shower room, conservatory, off road parking including a detached garage and is offered to the market with no..."
"An early viewing is recommended to appreciate this attractive, three-bedroomed, traditional semi-detached home having been subject to a comprehensive scheme of modernisation/improvement and offering well-presented accommodation ideal for the growing family. The property benefits from gas fired c..."
** OFFERED WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Attention all buyers - Goodmove have pleasure to launch this spacious three bedroom end of terrace home. It is situated on Powell Street which is scattered with similar properties and is within good reach of the local amenities. Enter the pro...
"AUCTION SALE 13 March 2023 - FOR SALE VIA BAGSHAWS RESIDENTIAL AUCTIONS IN ASSOCIATION WITH BARNARD MARCUS AUCTIONS ON MONDAY 13TH MARCH 2023 AT 9.30AM AT THE DE VERE GRAND CONNAUGHT ROOMS, 61-65 GREAT QUEEN STREET, COVENT GARDENS, LONDON WC2B 5DA. YOU CAN ALSO REGISTER FOR ONLINE BIDDING"
"GUIDE PRICE £215,000 - FOR SALE VIA BAGSHAWS RESIDENTIAL AUCTIONS IN ASSOCIATION WITH BARNARD MARCUS AUCTIONS AVAILABLE POST AUCTION. CONTACT: Bagshaws Residential Derby, 32 – 34 Cornmarket, Derby, DE1 2DG option 3)"
"An excellent opportunity for a first time buyer or family to purchase this well-presented, three-bedroomed, semi-detached property located in the highly sought-after area of Stenson Fields. Situated on a pleasant cul-de-sac, the property benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, an..."
"YOPA are delighted to offer to the market this exceptionally well presented three bedroom semi detached home in the sought after location of Boulton Moor. With an en - suite off the master bedroom, an open kitchen/diner and ample off street parking. This would make a great family home!"
"An ideally located three bedroom semi detached property overlooking public greenspace and occupying an excellent end of cul-de-sac location. The accommodation on offer briefly comprises; Entrance Hallway, ground floor WC, double aspect lounge with feature fireplace, and a generous dining kitc..."
"Just released . £500 monthly mortgage contribution for 12 months . .Plot 265As you enter this fabulous new home, you'll find a contemporary fitted kitchen with a dining area. There's also a spacious lounge with French doors leading to the garden and a downstairs W.CUpstairs there's..."
VIEWINGS AVAILABLE SEVEN DAYS A WEEK AND BEYOND THE NORMAL 9-5 WORKING HOURS WITH YOUR LOCAL EXP REPRESENTATIVE Ready to move straight in! A fantastic two large double bedroom home offers refurbished and well presented accommodation throughout. The accommodation breifly compr...
"PERFECT FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS OR INVESTORS! Hall & Benson are delighted to bring to market this very well presented, two bedroom mid-terraced property located on the sought after Highfields estate in Littleover. Arrange your viewing with us before it goes!"
"Hall & Benson are delighted to bring to market this wonderfully presented, two bedroom end terraced home situated on this highly sought after residential area. The property has been extremely well maintained by the current owner and an internal inspection is highly advised."
"Offered for sale with no upward chain is this modern, deceptively spacious three-bedroom townhouse which is situated on a pleasant cul-de-sac on the popular Bonnie Prince Estate. The property benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating and off road parking with access to the rear gard..."
"Refurbished and spacious bay fronted terraced house offering three double bedrooms, new kitchen diner, new bathroom, hallway, two reception rooms and enclosed garden being sold with no upward chain. This ideal family home or buy to let investment benefits from new electrics, new plumbing, new bo..."
"This modern three storey town house is located in the sought after City Point area of Derby close to Pride Park. The property is well presented throughout and features lounge, three bedrooms, family bathroom and en-suite shower room. There are excellent road links and access to Derby City Centre."
"LARGE TERRACED PROPERTY IN POPULAR LOCATION. Extended, mid terrace home with three double bedrooms, loft room and two reception rooms."
"**CORNER PLOT ** DRIVEWAY** GARAGE** CONSERVATORY** Leaders Estate Agents are delighted to bring to market this traditional three bed semi detached house situated on an extensive corner plot and is ideally located within walking distance to a variety of local amenities. Upon entering, t..."
"YOPA are delighted to welcome to the market this spacious two bedroom detached bungalow. Benefitting from easy access to amenities and transport, as well as offering ample off street parking. This well presented home is not to be missed and would make a great family home or retirement property."
"This deceptively spacious, two-bedroomed, modern townhouse is tucked away in a pleasant cul-de-sac on the popular ""Bonnie Prince"" estate in Chellaston. Being well-presented throughout, the property benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, off road parking and an enclosed rear garde..."
A spacious and superbly presented three bedroom mid terrace in Chester Green offered for sale with no onward chain.
"A traditional bay fronted 1930's semi detached home having been extended to provide deceptively spacious accommodation ideal for the first time buyer or growing family. Available with no upward chain and having off road parking, garage/workshop, four bedrooms and two bath/wet rooms. The prop..."
"An extended, well appointed and presented traditional semi detached home having been extended to the rear elevation. The property is available with no upward chain and viewing is recommended. The property benefits from UPVC double glazing and briefly comprises:- entrance porch, inner hallwa..."
"Offered for sale with no upward chain and occupying a cul-de-sac position in the sought-after suburb of Littleover, this two bedroomed bungalow has the benefit of uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, ample off-road parking and a good sized rear garden. The accommodation in brief comprises..."
"Looking for a family home? This is a great home that you do not want to miss! A three bedroom semi detached house situated in Chester Green popular for schools, access into Derby City Centre, Chester Green Park and Derwent Park"
Semi Detached * Three Bedrooms * Fitted Kitchen * UPVC Double Glazing * Gas Central Heating * Rear Garden * Driveway * NO UPWARD CHAIN
"*** PREMIER PROPERTY *** Recently refurbished spacious home offering a most generous lounge/diner, beautiful refitted dining kitchen, spacious loft room and offered for sale with no onward chain. Benefiting from uPVC double glazing and gas central heating, the accommodation in brief comprises:..."
"Sumptuously appointed, stylish two-bedroom apartment enjoying a favoured location within the city centre of Derby, close to enviable facilities."
Ideal for a Professional Couple or Small Family - Modern three bedroom semi-detached property in a convenient position within easy reach of local amenities
A spacious mid terrace property in a popular location close to Derby City Centre ideally suited to a growing family or investor looking for HMO potential.
"This well-presented, two-bedroom townhouse boasts a modern and stylish interior throughout and is located close to The Royal Derby Hospital. Ideal for any first time buyer, investor or family, the property benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating and off road parking. In brief t..."
"Offered for sale with no upward chain, this spacious detached bungalow could not be better located in the sought after area of Darley Abbey. Benefiting from uPVC double glazing and gas central heating, the accommodation in brief comprises: Entrance hall; spacious lounge; kitchen; two bedrooms;..."
A spacious and well proportioned home offering ideal accommodation for the first time buyer or growing family and an early viewing is recommend. The property occupies an established corner plot position with ample off road parking and mature gardens. The property is supplemented by gas fired...
"This new property to the market offers a lot! Downstairs you have a good size kitchen which has a semi separate utility room, and leads straight into your conservatory. A large separate lounge to the right. To the left of the downstairs was previously set up as a downstairs bedroom with an en su..."
This traditional mid terrace property is being offered for sale with no onward chain and would make a great first home or investment. The property well presented throughout and ready to move straight in to. Derby City Centre and Royal Derby Hospital are close by.
"A rarely available, semi-detached bungalow, located in the most popular and sought after suburb of Chellaston within a short walk of the village amenities. The property benefits from uPVC double glazing, off-road parking, a garage and a good-sized rear garden. The accommodation in brief compr..."
An opportunity to acquire a two bedroom semi-detached bunglalow with garage and large driveway.
"Sold with vacant posession and no upward chain is this detached 2 bedroom bungalow located in a sought after location, on a good sized plot with a driveway providing parking for multiple vehicles, garage and a mainly laid to lawn rear garden."
" Modernised and extended two bedroom detached bungalow situated in a cul-de-sac location within a level walk of a wealth of local amenities and bus routes. The property is UPVC double glazed, has a gas central heating system fueled by a combination boiler and a superb kitchen diner with granite ..."
"Home of the Week - Reserve for free flooring throughout. .Plot 257, the Meadowsweet. Downstairs you will find a spacious lounge upon entrance, followed by a W.C and a contemporary dining kitchen with French doors that lead to the garden. Upstairs you will find a principal bedroom with an en suite..."
An exciting opportunity to reserve a stunning two bedroom apartment forming part of the sought after Nightingale Quarter development in the centre of Derby. The apartments should appeal to professional couples and first time buyers looking for city living at its finest. Call Ashley Adams for details
A fantastic opportunity to acquire to acquire this three double bedroom bay fronted terrace located in an ever popular location of Derby.
An opportunity to acquire this beautiful and characterful three bedroom semi-detached property in the highly sought after location of Alvaston.
CALLING ALL FIRST TIME BUYERS! A well maintained well proportioned three bedroom semi-detached property in the ever popular location of Chaddesden.
"A traditional bay fronted semi detached family home offered to the market with no upward chain, ideal for the growing family or the first time buyer. The property benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, larger than average south facing rear garden and off road parking. In bri..."
"A three bedroom semi detached brand new 75% shared ownership property in a popular Kedleston Grange development in Allestree. The property briefly comprises of an entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen/diner, cloakroom, three bedrooms an upstairs bathroom, driveway and a rear garden."
"AUCTION SALE 6TH FEBRUARY 2023 - FOR SALE VIA BAGSHAWS RESIDENTIAL AUCTIONS IN ASSOCIATION WITH BARNARD MARCUS AUCTIONS ON MONDAY 6TH FEBRUARY AT 9.30AM AT THE DE VERE GRAND CONNAUGHT ROOMS, 61-65 GREAT QUEEN STREET, COVENT GARDENS, LONDON WC2B 5DA. YOU CAN ALSO REGISTER FOR ONLINE BIDDING."
"GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - FOR SALE VIA BAGSHAWS RESIDENTIAL AUCTIONS IN ASSOCIATION WITH BARNARD MARCUS AUCTIONS ON MONDAY 6TH FEBRUARY 2023 AT 9.30AM AT THE DE VERE GRAND CONNAUGHT ROOMS, 61-65 GREAT QUEEN STREET, COVENT GARDENS, LONDON WC2B 5DA. YOU CAN ALSO REGISTE..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £250,000. AUCTION SALE 13TH MARCH 2023 - FOR SALE VIA BAGSHAWS RESIDENTIAL AUCTIONS IN ASSOCIATION WITH BARNARD MARCUS AUCTIONS AT THE DE VERE GRAND CONNAUGHT ROOMS, 61-65 GREAT QUEEN STREET, COVENT GARDENS, LONDON WC2B 5DA. YOU CAN ALSO REGISTER FOR ONLINE BIDDING."
A beautifully presented two double bedroom semi-detached property with private rear garden and parking to the side for two cars in the exclusive Chevin Homes Development in Littleover.
A brilliant opportunity to purchase this three bedroom family home having been maintained by the current family to an exceptional standard and is now ready for a new family to move in
"* £4,000 towards extras * Stylish TWO BEDROOM apartment, open plan 21ft LIVING/DINING/KITCHEN, contemporary bathroom, allocated parking."
"**BEING SOLD TENANTED ACHIEVING £900 PCM MAKING IT A 5.4% YIELD*** Leaders Estate Agents bring to the market this three double bedroom, traditional mid terrace property located in the highly popular historic residential area of Chester Green and is ideal for any first time buyer ..."
"MUST VIEW! We are delighted to market this well presented, unique property in a sought after location in Derby. The Semi-detached property benefits from being located on a quiet cul-de-sac with a front and rear garden, as well as a separate garage."
"This extended semi detached bungalow located in a quiet cul de sac location and is close to local amenities in Mickleover. The property requires some modernisation however does benefit from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, extended lounge/diner, wet room, a low maintenance garden, off ro..."
"NO UPWARD CHAIN - OFF ROAD PARKING AND GARAGE TO THE REAR - This three storey, deceptively spacious and recently redecorated house offers the perfect home for the first time buyer or growing family and viewing is recommended. In brief, the gas fired central heated and double glazed accommoda..."
"A spacious two/three bedroom semi detached bungalow in a popular location with easy access to local shops, the A52 and Derby City Centre. The property briefly comprises of an entrance hallway, lounge, sitting room, two double bedrooms, bathroom, kitchen, conservatory and gardens to the front & rear"
A fantastic opportunity to acquire a three bedroom semi-detached property with driveway and good size rear garden in the ever popular location of Alvaston.
INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - TENANTED SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW GROSSING £7500.00 PER ANNUM. VACANT POSSESSION AVAILABLE IF NEEDED FROM 25TH AUGUST. A superbly positioned gas centrally heated and Upvc double glazed semi detached bungalow occupying a cul de sac position close to shops and local amenities...
Ideal for first time buyers or a growing family this three bedroom home comprises good size kitchen diner and spacious lounge which benenfits from French doors opening onto the garden. To the first floor there is a large master bedroom and a further two good size bedrooms. A family bathroom compl...
IDEAL FOR PROFESSIONAL PERSON - A charming home situated within the heart of the highly sought after location of Darley Abbey Village and close to Darley Park - NO CHAIN INVOLVED. The cottage is within a short walk to the vibrant Derwent Valley Mills including a fine dining restaurant an...
"BEING SOLD WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN is this three bedroom semi detached property with driveway and enclosed rear garden in a very popular location close by to Rolls Royce & Bombardier.In brief the property comprises of entrance hallway with access to living room, fitted kitchen and dining room to the..."
Apartment 2 - A luxury one double bedroom ground floor apartment - Nutwood Court is a prestigious collection of just seven luxury apartments located in one of Derby’s most sought-after locations. Developed by Elmhurst Homes to an exacting specification each apartment benefits from wet underfloor ...
"A well presented, generously extended, two bedroom semi-detached home, occupying an excellent plot and offered with no onward chain. The accommodation on offer briefly comprises; Entrance hallway, spacious lounge, dining kitchen, a conservatory extension, and a further extension to the side o..."
" Located close to the Royal Derby Hospital this property would be ideal for first time buyers or investment opportunity. The property briefly comprises of entrance hallway, ground floor cloakroom, lounge, modern fitted kitchen diner with French doors leading out to the rear lawned garden. To..."
This is an excellent opportunity to acquire this recently redecorated and carpeted two bedroom end town house with GARAGE located in this popular location.
"NO CHAIN - A fantastic opportunity to acquire this larger than average three double bedroom terrace property with an abundance of parking, two detached garages, workshop and space to the side and rear."
"An early viewing is absolutely essential to appreciate this particularly well presented and recently modernised semi detached home, excellent for the first time buyer and occupying an established residential location. Available with NO UPWARD CHAIN and situated within the PARK VIEW SCHOOL CATCHME..."
"A fabulous two bedroom end of terrace property with a very nice level rear garden and off road parking for two vehicles on a block paved driveway in front of the property. The location is excellent, situated in open surroundings opposite a recently planted orchard and within a stones throw of the..."
"A perfect example of modern living close to a city centre. This property boasts two double bedrooms, kitchen, lounge/diner, family bathroom, ensuite shower room and a downstairs cloakroom W/C. The property is beautifully presented throughout, offering all modern amenities. The property also comes..."
TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME IN SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION. For sale with no upward chain and requiring modernisation
"* £4,000 towards upgrades * Stylish TWO BEDROOM second floor apartment, open plan 21ft LIVING/DINING/KITCHEN, contemporary bathroom, allocated parking."
An excellent opportunity to purchase a generous three bedroom mid terrace property in a sought after location off Broadway - NO CHAIN
GENEROUS MATURE REAR GARDEN - Offered for sale with no upward chain is this spacious three bedroom bungalow situated in this ever popular location off Chaddesden Park Road close to a range of local shops and amenities. The property does require some of modernisation but offers exciting potential ...
Set within the popular location of Mickleover is this semi-detached bungalow. The bungalow is within close proximity to local shops and amenities.
"Being sold with no upward chain is this deceptively spacious three bedroom semi-detached property situated within the popular location of Chaddesden. Personal inspection is highly recommended to appreciate the spacious living accommodation on offer inside and out, with well proportioned rooms and..."
"** More Information Coming Soon ** No Upward Chain, a substantial three bedroom family home situated in a sought after location within Chaddesden on a larger than average plot"
"SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY IN POPULAR LOCATION. Well presented, three bedroom family home with driveway and large rear garden."
"YOPA are pleased to welcome to the market this spacious three bedroom terraced home in the heart of Rose Hill in Derby. Offering two generously sized reception rooms, a private rear yard and living accommodation for the whole family. This would make a great family home!"
NO CHAIN - A traditional semi-detached property benefiting from a rear extension and large rear garden offered for sale with no onward chain.
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a property with huge potential. A substantially extended semi-detached house in Alvaston, with the former shop now being changed into a residential home. Offering three bedrooms, two reception rooms, kitchen, fitted bathroom, off street parking and enclosed gar..."
"YOPA are pleased to welcome to the market this spacious three bedroom end of terrace in the sought after location of Mickleover. Benefitting from three generously sized bedrooms, an enviable corner plot, and easy access to amenities, with a bit of TLC this would be a great family home!"
"All Agreed are pleased to bring to the market this two bedroom detached bungalow enjoying a corner plot position in Sinfin, Derby. The property has been re-decorated, re-carpeted and had new kitchen units fitted. Outside there is a driveway proving off street parking and front, side and rear (cont.)"
"**LUXURIOUS APARTMENT** FIRST FLOOR** CENTRAL LOCATION** SECURE GATED COMPLEX** Located within the prestigious and mature residential setting of Duffield Road and the renowned Darley Park it is within walking distance of the City Centre, university, schools, and supermarkets. Externally, Fiv..."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain and having been recently improved and updated by the current owners, this well presented, spacious, two bedroomed detached bungalow is located in the highly popular residential area of Sinfin. With re-fitted carpets, replacement window glass panels, upgraded..."
"A spacious and immaculately presented corner plot property briefly comprising; lounge, kitchen diner to the ground floor and two bedrooms and family bathroom to the first floor. The property also boasts gardens to the front and rear. An early internal viewing is highly recommended,"
A fantastic opportunity to acquire this three bedroom end terrace with loft room in an ever popular area of Derby.
"Full description This well-presented 2 bedroom semi-detached house is an ideal first home or buy-to-let property. In brief the accommodation comprises of a hallway with stairs rising to first-floor landing and door to downstairs accommodation. Lounge (13'9"" x 12'6""..."
"This modern first floor apartment is located in the highly sought after location of Belper Road and is being offered for sale with no onward chain. The property features generous lounge, two bedrooms, bathroom and en-suite shower room. Outside there is allocated secure gated parking."
Sold with vacant possession and no upward chain is this three bedroom detached home in this highly sough after residential area. An internal inspection is highly advised.
"This semi detached home is located in the sought after area of Allenton and is well presented throughout. The property would make a great home for the family and features two reception rooms, three bedrooms and front and rear gardens. Rolls Royce is close by and there are excellent road links."
"Modern semi detached home ideal for first time buyers, families or buy to let investors, as could achieve approx.£825 PCM. The property benefits from uPVC double glazing throughout, gas central heating via a combination boiler, two double bedrooms, tandem parking, a good sized rear garden a..."
"Located at the end of a cul-de-sac within the sought-after area of Chellaston is this detached bungalow, which benefits from gas central heating, double glazing, off road parking, a garage and lawned gardens. The accommodation in brief comprises: Entrance hall; spacious lounge/diner; fitted ki..."
Take a look at Stunning Strutt House! 
A well presented three bedroom semi-detached home with garage occupying this delightful position overlooking a pleasant green within the ever popular residential suburb of Mackworth.
This is a traditional bay fronted semi detached home situated in this established residential area on the outskirts of Derby. The property is being sold with the benefit of NO UPWARD CHAIN and provides the opportunity for a new owner to stamp their own mark on their next home. Being entered thr...
"This two bedroomed linked, semi detached home is ideal for first time buyers or buy-to-let investors. Located in a pleasant cul-de-sac in this sought-after area. The property is offered with no upward chain and benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating via combination boiler, an enc..."
Two Bedroom Terrace property offered for sale with No Upward Chain in the Sought After Location of Oakwood would make an ideal First Home or Buy to Let Property. The property benefits from a new boiler fitted last year. 
"A three bedroomed modern end town house occupying a cul-de-sac location overlooking an open green to the front elevation. Ideal for the first time buyer and benefits from gas central heating, double glazing, driveway for two vehicles and gardens to front and rear. In brief the accommodation c..."
"* IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS & NO UPWARD CHAIN * Well presented, three bedroom, semi-detached home, located in a popular area of Alvaston and benefitting from a modern kitchen, bay fronted reception room, a good sized garden and driveway parking. Call now to book your viewing! The property ..."
SHOW HOME LAUNCH 18TH MARCH A stunning collection of one and two bedroom luxury apartments forming part of the unique Nightingale Quarter development by Wavensmere Homes.
"A well presented two bedroom Semi Detached Bungalow situated in a quiet cul-de-sac and located in the popular area of Littleover. This property benefits from a full refurbishment having a modern kitchen, contemporary shower room, UPVC double glazing, new Worcester boiler, low maintenance rear gar..."
"Very well presented and spacious, three bedroom, end-terrace family home situated in the popular location of Alvaston. The property benefits from a fantastic corner plot offering a substantial front with plenty of off street parking, a modern kitchen and shower room, low maintenance garden, a con..."
A spacious mid terrace property in a sought after location in Chester Green with an open outlook over the green itself offed for sale with no onward chain.
"***IDEAL 3-BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME*** This perfect 3-bedroom semi-detached home is located within the highly area Normanton, Derby. Situated in a great location in close proximity to a range of amenities, including nearby schools, supermarkets, leisure facilities, pubs and restaurants. The ..."
"A delightful property of deceptive appearance enjoying a pleasant residential positon certain to appeal to first time buyers, downsizers and buy to let investors."
"This well presented mid town house is located in this popular area and would make a great first home. The property features kitchen/diner, three bedrooms and enclosed rear garden. There are shops, schools and amenities close by and excellent road links."
Ideal for the Investor - Currently Tenanted - Tastefully decorated and extended three bedroom traditional semi-detached property - ideal for the growing family
Situated on a fantastic plot larger than normal this is an excellent opportunity to purchase an ideal family home in a very popular location.
"A traditional, two double-bedroomed, semi-detached home occupying a popular location and available for sale with no upward chain. The property benefits from UPVC double glazing, gas central heating (via a combination central heating boiler fitted in 2021), off road parking and a south facing rea..."
"A well-presented and excellently located, two-bedroom, semi-detached home occupying a great plot on one of Oakwood's sought after cul-de-sac streets, and available immediately with no onward chain. The accommodation on offer briefly comprises; Lounge and breakfast kitchen to the ground floor..."
Fantastic Investment Opportunity!
Well presented modern two bedroom semi-detached enjoying a cul-de-sac position
Room For All The Family! We have the pleasure of marketing this three bedroom plus loft space bay fronted family home situated on the popular Clarence Road
"Superbly well presented and with no upward chain, this two bedroom semi-detached property is ideal for first time buyers and in a pleasant cul-de-sac in a popular area of Alvaston. The property offers ample living space, a modern fitted kitchen/diner, a conservatory, well maintained garden and a ..."
"OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN! A two bedroomed semi-detached bungalow benefitting from a generous plot, off road parking and the potential to create a lovely home. The accommodation in brief comprises: Entrance porch; hallway; lounge/diner; kitchen/breakfast room; two bedrooms; showe..."
"A well presented corner plot end of terrace house, positioned on a quiet cul-de-sac. Offering three spacious bedrooms, two reception rooms, fitted kitchen, fitted shower room and large garden. The property benefits from gas central heating, double glazed windows and is being sold with no onw..."
NO CHAIN - A fantastic opportunity to acquire this extended three bedroom semi-detached property with driveway in the ever popular location of Alvaston.
"Ideal for a first time buyer or family, is this three bedroomed semi-detached property located in a popular area of Derby. Offering spacious living accommodation, the property benefits from uVPC double glazing, gas central heating and a private, enclosed rear garden. In brief, the accommodati..."
"Ideally located to offer easy access to the University Of Derby Kedleston Road campus, this traditional two bedroom terraced home is ideal for the first time buyer or investor. Benefitting from uPVC double glazing and gas central heating, the accommodation in brief comprises: Dining room with ..."
NO CHAIN - A beautifully presented two/three bedroom traditional terrace property in an idyllic location overlooking Chester Green.
"Introducing this lovely two bedroom semi-detached property situated within the popular location of Oakwood. Being the ideal first time buyer home, viewing is highly advised to appreciate the well presented living accommodation on offer inside and out. Offering great access to local ammenities, an..."
"This semi detached home is located in this popular area and would make a great family home. The property features three bedrooms, UPVC conservatory, lovely rear garden and driveway for off road parking. Rolls Royce is close by and Derby City Centre is easily reached."
A fantastic opportunity to acquire this three bedroom property with larger than average rear garden situated in the ever popular location of Alvaston.
"This modern semi-detached home is offered to the market with no upward chain. The property is offered on a SHARED OWNERSHIP basis. On a 50% purchase at £92,500, the monthly rental would be £211.98, plus a monthly service charges of £12.79. The property provides accommodation arr..."
A very well presented three bedroom semi-detached family home enjoying a large rear garden certain to appeal to families.
A recently constructed ground floor apartment forming part the sought after Nightingale Quarter development in Derby City offered for sale with no onward chain.
"In need of renovation and offered for sale with no onward chain, this spacious and extended, three bedroomed semi-detached family home is packed with potential. The property occupies a good sized plot allowing for further extensions if needed (subject to the relevant planning and permissions). ..."
"Being Sold by YOPA Online Auction. Starting Bids from £180,000. Buy it now option available Please call or visit YOPA Online Auctions for more information"
"A SPACIOUS home in Spondon, available CHAIN FREE with TENANTS in situ, welcoming INVESTORS only. Call to enquire! Bettermove are delighted to welcome to the market this charming two bedroom end terrace house in Spondon, available with no forward chain. The property is t..."
"***** NO UPWARD CHAIN***** Highlights include: Three well proportioned bedrooms, entrance hall, Guest W.C. spacious living room, conservatory, kitchen and family bathroom. Outside there is off road parking to front, side access leading to the rear garden. The property is conveniently located w..."
"Offering easy access to Derby City Centre, this extended, well presented and spacious traditional terraced home offers two generous reception rooms, a beautiful modern fitted kitchen, ground floor shower and a spacious first floor bathroom. Benefiting from uPVC double glazing and gas central h..."
"For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Parcel of Freehold land, extending to approximately 11 Acres (4.45 Hectares) or thereabouts, which may have potential for various uses subject to obtaining any necessary planning permission and any other necessary consents."
This traditional three bedroomed terraced home is ideally located in the sought after area of Chester Green opposite picturesque playing fields. Offered for sale with no upward chain and having easy access to the City Centre - a viewing is highly recommended. Benefitting from uPVC double glazi...
"A spacious semi-detached house, located within the popular village of Chellaston within a short distance to shops and main access roads. Offering two double bedrooms, open plan kitchen diner, lounge, ample parking and enclosed garden. The property benefits from gas central heating, double gl..."
"A spacious and well presented property briefly comprising; lounge, kitchen, dining room, conservatory to the ground floor and three bedrooms and family bathroom to the first floor. The property also boasts gardens to the front and rear. An early internal viewing is highly recommended,"
"A spacious family home located in the popular residential location of Mackworth and offered to the market with no upward chain. Requiring some modernisation, the property benefits from uPVC double glazing, two reception rooms, a generous rear garden, off road parking and offers potential to exten..."
"A newly renovated semi-detached bungalow, located within the popular village of Chellaston. Offering two double bedrooms, lounge diner, modern kitchen, modern bathroom, parking, garage and enclosed garden. The property benefits from re-plastered walls, new flooring, double glazing and new ga..."
"A traditional, two bedroomed semi-detached home occupying a corner plot position with scope to extend the current accommodation, subject to necessary planning permission or potential to create off road parking/garage again subject to necessary consent. Viewing recommended. The property is avai..."
"Two bedroom semi detached property, ground floor extended to rear, GCH. Part double glazed. Off road parking and car port. Garden to rear. Updating and modernising required. Vacant possession and no upward chain."
"DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS BUNGALOW IN CONVENIENT LOCATION. Well presented two bedroom detached bungalow, with kitchen/diner, two double bedrooms. For sale with no upward chain."
NO CHAIN NEW KITCHEN & BATHROOM- A traditional two bedroom end terrace bungalow occupying a private corner plot with detached garage in the ever popular location of Chellaston.
A spacious three bedroom end terrace property situated on a generous corner plot located close to Derby City and the Kedleston Road area.
"Guide Price £175 000 - £185 000 WHAT A LOCATION !!!! Set within a CUL DE SAC within the immediate proximity of open fields leading to Canal Walks to surrounding areas. Convenient also for the A50, local amenities and a regular bus route into the City Centre. Early viewing strongly recomme (cont.)"
"An ideal property for a first time buyer, family or alternatively as a fantastic investment, this property occupies a corner plot in a popular residential location. In need of some modernisation, the property benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, a kitchen/diner, three bedrooms..."
"This top floor apartment is being offered for sale with no onward chain and would make a great first time buyer or investment purchase. The property is within easy access of Derby City Centre and the wide range of shops, amenities and leisure facilities on offer."
"Are you looking for a perfect step onto the property ladder, or potentially a ready to let investment purchase, then look no further"
"A three bedroom semi detached house which has been renovated and offers spacious accommodation. Selling with no upward chain the accommodation benefits from gas central heating and double glazing and in brief comprises of a hall, living room, dining room, re-fitted kitchen and ground floor showe..."
"- VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE - WELL PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM TERRACE PROPERTY WITH OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER, MODERN SHOWER ROOM, ENCLOSED GARDEN AND OFF ROAD PARKING - SMARTMOVE HOMES are delighted to bring to the market this beautiful family home in Alvaston briefly comprising of an entrance hallway, sp..."
"*** THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS *** A well presented, three bedroomed mid-terraced house located in Sinfin, boasting sizeable accommodation and having the benefit of an open plan lounge/diner/fitted kitchen, ground floor cloakroom/WC, a family bathroom, a low maintenance garden and an allocated parkin..."
"Overlooking an open green and situated on a cul-de-sac location in a sought-after area of Chellaston, is this well presented and spacious two bedroomed mid-terraced home, which has the benefit of gas central heating, uPVC double glazing and a garage within the nearby block. The accommodation ..."
A well maintained and beautifully presented three bedroom bay fronted family home situated in a popular family area of Derby. This spacious home is offered for sale with No Upward Chain
"FRESHLY DECORATED TRADITIONAL Mid Terrace with NEW FITTED KITCHEN, NEW CARPETS THROUGHOUT, TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS and LARGE ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN offered for sale with NO UPWARD CHAIN! Close to the City Centre, Chester Green Park and Darley Park. This property would make a wonderful FIRST TIME BUY..."
"Sold with vacant possession and no upward chain is this well maintained two double bedroom semi-detached bungalow set on a good sized plot with off street parking, and an enclosed rear garden."
"If you are seeking a straightforward refurbishment project on the outskirts of Derby, this property should be at the top of your list. Featuring three good-sized bedrooms, one bathroom, one generous reception room, along with a conservatory and a lovely garden, this terraced home has a great dea..."
"** MORE PHOTOS PENDING** This stunning home is well presented and finished to a high standard throughout. On the ground floor, the open-plan kitchen/diner is perfect for modern lifestyles and has plenty of storage from the base and wall-mounted units. The living room has plenty of natural..."
"A CHAIN FREE, deceptively spacious, three bedroom semi-detached property situated in the popular suburb of Chaddesden that would make the perfect, move-in-ready family home"
"OPEN 7 DAYS A WEEK - HOPKINS & DAINTY of TICKNALL bring to the market this traditional semi-detached home, in a popular residential location. Convenient for access to the nearby A38 and Markeaton Park, along with the Royal Derby hospital and roads into the city centre. The property is currently ..."
"This well presented two bedroomed bungalow has the benefit of a spacious lounge/diner, a fitted kitchen and an enclosed rear garden. Offered for sale with no upward chain, an internal inspection is highly recommended. Benefiting from uPVC double glazing and gas central heating, the accommodati..."
"* Cash buyers only – due to construction type * A very well presented, three/four bedroomed family home featuring extended, deceptively spacious accommodation throughout. The property enjoys a fantastic corner plot with a larger than average garden, ample driveway parking, an annexe with a ..."
"This deceptively spacious, mid-terrace property is set back from Wiltshire Road and offers spacious accommodation having the benefit of a ground floor extension and attic conversion with bedroom and en-suite bathroom. The property benefits from gas fired central heating, UPVC double glazing a..."
"This traditional two bed mid-terrace is ideally suited to investors or first time buyers. The property does require some modernisation, however does retain some of it's characterful, traditional features. Call to arrange your viewing!"
"** BEING SOLD WITH TENANTS IN SITU ** Leaders Estate Agents bring to the market this three bedroom semi-detached property located in the popular residential area of Sinfin, Derby. Briar Lea Close lies close to a range of local amenities to include various shops, well regarded schools and a r..."
"A modern and spacious semi-detached family home, offering three bedrooms, off street parking and generous rear garden. The property has been refurbished to a high standard with new electrics, new gas central heating and new double glazing. To the ground floor there is a welcoming hallway wi..."
A spacious and well-presented two double bedroom mid terrace property in a popular location close to the Ashbourne Road area of the City ideally suited to a first time buyer or buy to let investor.
"**GROUND FLOOR ** 983 YEARS ON LEASE** ALLOCATED PARKING** GARDEN AREA ** SERVICE CHARGE £1000 PER ANNUM ** IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT** Leaders Estate Agents are delighted to present this spacious, high specification ground floor apartment conveniently located within walking d..."
"Sold with vacant possession and no upward chain is this well maintained two bedroom semi detached house, situated on this highly sought after residential area, set on a good sized plot and offering a mainly lawned rear garden."
"A recently redecorated and newly carpeted, semi-detached home ideal for the growing family or first time buyer and available for sale with no upward chain. The accommodation is supplemented by gas fired central heating, double glazing, off road parking and an enclosed rear garden. Occupyin..."
"Fantastic, two bedroom, semi-detached property offering ideal accommodation for a first time buyer. Having two double bedrooms, a modern bathroom, neutral decoration throughout, driveway parking for two cars, a garage and a well maintained garden - this is one not to be missed! Having the ben..."
"A two bedroomed mid terrace cottage situated within the heart of Spondon village, ideal for the first time buyer and available with no upward chain. The property has been recently subject to a range of improvements and benefits from gas fired central heating (via a combination boiler), UPVC doubl..."
NO CHAIN - A fantastic opportunity to acquire this two bedroom terrace property in an ever popular location in Derby.
"This traditional semi detached home is located in this sought after area of Chaddesden and is being offered for sale with no onward chain. The property is ready to move straight in to and features a generous kitchen/diner, UPVC conservatory and a generous rear garden."
"Well presented, two bedroom semi-detached property, ideal for first time buyers and in a pleasant cul-de-sac in a popular area of Alvaston. The property offers ample living space with a converted garage offering additional office space, ample driveway parking and well maintained gardens - it will..."
TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMED Mid Terrace sold with NO UPWARD CHAIN. This property would make an IDEAL INVESTMENT! Situated in the POPULAR CHESTER GREEN area.
"***REFURBISHMENT PROJECT*** ***CALLING DEVELOPERS*** ***NO CHAIN *** ***VIRTUAL TOUR***   For sale with no chain, on a corner plot - requiring a scheme of Refurbishment Located within a cul-de-sac in the popular suburb ..."
"** £740 PER CALENDAR MONTH - TO BE SOLD WITH TENANT IN SITU ** A modern and well presented two bedroom mid townhouse located in the popular area of Spondon. The property has the benefit of allocated parking for one vehicle, gas central heating, a low maintenance rear garden and upvc double ..."
NO CHAIN - A fantastic opportunity to acquire this two double bedroom terrace property in the ever popular location of Oakwood.
***Investor only*** This high spec brand new development is completing in 2024 and offers a flexible payment plan for investors where you can invest with £2000 reservation fee and makes a perfect buy to let investment. Expected to generate Up to 7% yields. Please contact us for ...
"Standing on an unexpectedly large plot is this traditional, spacious, three-bedroomed terraced home which offers excellent access to the City Centre. Well presented and modernised throughout, an internal inspection is highly recommended. Benefitting from uPVC double glazing and gas central hea..."
"A beautifully presented semi-detached family home, positioned in the popular location of Alvaston, being sold by Modern Method of Auction. Offering three double bedrooms, spacious lounge diner, modern fitted kitchen diner, cloakroom, family bathroom, ample off street parking and generous private ..."
"A great opportunity to acquire a spacious three double bedroomed terraced home which has undergone a full scheme of refurbishment and extension. Offering three double bedrooms, new extended kitchen, new downstairs bathroom, hallway, two spacious reception rooms, three double bedrooms, newly fitte..."
**ATTENTION INVESTORS & FIRST TIME BUYERS** A Two bed End Terrace property situated in the ever popular Oakwood. Enter the property into an entrance hallway which provides access to all downstairs accommodation. To the front elevation is the lounge and to the rear elevation is the kitchen/din...
"Are you looking for a spacious and airy penthouse within walking distance of city centre, a property that can offer you modern living, secure parking and views of the city. Then look no further"
"This attractive and well-presented, mid-townhouse occupies an established cul-de-sac location, offers two double-bedrooms and would ideally suit the first time buyer. An early viewing is recommended to fully appreciate the standard of accommodation on offer. The accommodation is supplemented b..."
A fantastic opportunity to acquire this two double bedroom semi-detached property situated in the ever popular location of Chaddesden.
"Purple bricks is pleased to present; BURSTING WITH CHARACTER... This ground floor loft style apartment boasts a wealth of beautiful original features perfectly combined with modern home comforts including high ceilings, exposed beams, engineered wood flooring and much more making it the perfect..."
"This mid town house is located in this sought after area and would make a great first home for those looking to get on the ladder. The property is well presented throughout and features driveway and garage, enclosed rear garden and there are excellent links to major road networks."
"A well presented, four bedroom, mid terrace family home located in a popular area of Alvaston and available with no upward chain. The property enjoys an open plan living/dining space, four spacious bedrooms, driveway parking along with a good size garden and ample storage. Call now to arrange you..."
"This 3-bedroom terraced house in Derby is a great opportunity for someone looking for a home renovation project. The house is in need of some TLC but has huge potential. The house has a good-sized living room and kitchen, 3 bedrooms, and a family bathroom. The house is located in a popular ..."
"**TOP FLOOR ** 983 YEARS ON LEASE** ALLOCATED PARKING** FULLY FURNISHED** SERVICE CHARGE £1000 PER ANNUM ** IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT** Leaders Estate Agents are delighted to present this spacious, high specification top floor apartment conveniently located within walking dist..."
"A well presented three bedroom semi detached house, ideal for a family offering three bedrooms, kitchen diner, off street parking and generous garden, located in a cul de sac. The property benefits from gas central heating and double glazing. To the ground floor there is a welcoming hallway, lo..."
"A beautiful character first floor, two bed apartment in the sought after Friar Gate development is offered for sale with No Upward Chain. Conveniently located within walking distance to the City Centre, The Cathedral Quarter, Markeaton Park and providing easy access to major road links the A38..."
"* IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS * This superbly well presented, two bedroomed semi detached property is located in a quiet cul-de-sac and boasts a fantastic garden, ample driveway parking and is within walking distance of the shops and amenities of Alvaston. The property benefits from uPVC doub..."
"Superbly presented, three bedroomed semi-detached family home located within a popular residential area, offering ideal accommodation for first time buyers or a growing family. The property benefits from a fantastic, modern kitchen/diner, a recently re-fitted bathroom, a generous rear garden, gas..."
"Offered for sale is this detached bungalow with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The property features lounge, fitted kitchen and two bedrooms, generous rear garden and is within easy reach of the wide range of shops and amenities in Derby City Centre."
"*** Option For A Cash Buyer To Purchase 50% Equity Share *** Located just off Ashbourne Road, close to Derby University and Derby City Centre, is this two bedroomed home offered for sale with no upward chain. The property would make a fantastic first home and benefits from uPVC double glazing, g..."
"An opportunity to acquire a mid terrace property forming part of six properties within the Stoney Cross area of Spondon and occupying a mature no through road location via a private lane. The property is supplemented by gas fired central heating, UPVC double glazing and briefly comprises:- lou..."
"A three bedroom semi detached house in a cul de sac location offering no chain. The property briefly comprises of an entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen, downstairs bathroom, three bedrooms, driveway, garage, two outhouses and a large rear garden. Internal viewings are highly recommended."
A great opportunity to acquire a two double bedroom semi-detached property in an ever popular location of Derby.
A refurbished three bedroom mid-town house in a popular cul-de-sac location offered for sale with no onward chain.
A spacious three bedroom mid-town house in a popular location close to Derby City ideally suited to a growing family or buy to let investor.
"BEING SOLD CHAIN FREE is this beautiful GROUND FLOOR apartment in one of Derby City Centres best gated developments with its own private entrance PRIVATE ENTRANCE.In brief the property comprises of entrance hallway with utility area, bathroom, two bedrooms with en suite shower to master and gener..."
NO CHAIN - A spacious and well-presented two bedroom ground floor apartment in a sought after development close to Littleover Village.
"A fantastic opportunity arises for a first time buyer, investor or family to purchase this superb two bedroom, semi detached property located in the popular area of Alvaston. Brought to the market with no upward chain, the property has been modernised throughout and benefits from uPVC double glaz..."
"* CASH BUYERS ONLY DUE TO CONSTRUCTION TYPE * NO UPWARD CHAIN * A very well presented, three bedroom family home featuring extended, deceptively spacious accommodation throughout. The property enjoys a fantastic corner plot with a larger than average garden, ample driveway parking, a garden room ..."
"** IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT ** Offered to the market with no upward chain this two bedroom Mid Townhouse in the ever popular residential area of Oakwood. The property would make an ideal first time buy or investment purchase and benefits from gas central heating, upvc double glazing,..."
"*** CASH BUYERS ONLY ** A spacious detached bungalow available for sale with no upward chain and is set back from Newark Road with having a driveway, garage and gardens. The accommodation benefits from gas fired central heating (via a combination central heating boiler), UPVC double glazing, n..."
TWO BEDROOMED GROUND FLOOR FLAT **NO CHAIN** GATED BUILDING****ALLOCATED PARKING** IDEAL FOR CITY CENTRE**
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* well presented, three bedroom, semi-detached family home located within a popular residential area, offering ideal accommodation for either a BTL investor, first time buyer, or a growing family. The property benefits from a spacious kitchen/diner, a conservatory, a generous rear..."
** IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT** Leaders are proud to present this two bedroom mid town house set in a cul de sac location in the ever popular village Alvaston. Upon entering the property directly into the lounge having an open staircase rising to the first floor landing. To the rear eleva...
"Nicholas Humphreys are pleased to bring to the sales market this spacious and well-presented first floor apartment in a sought after development located close to the Friar Gate area of the city. The accommodation benefits from an entrance hallway accessed via secure communal areas, kitchen/diner ..."
"We are pleased to bring to the market this TWO DOUBLE Bedroom Apartment, located conveniently close to the CITY CENTRE and UNIVERSITY. Offered for Sale with NO UPWARD CHAIN; this apartment would make an IDEAL INVESTMENT or FIRST TIME BUY! "
A spacious two bedroom semi-detached property in a sought after location in Mackworth offered for sale with no onward chain.
A modern two bedroom top floor apartment within the well known and sought after Riverside complex. This two bedroom apartment has been decorated and presented to an exceptional standard by the current owners
"A WONDERFUL opportunity to acquire this Two double bedroom mid terraced house, with NEW ROOF and FRESHLY DECORATED throughout.  Being Sold with No Upward Chain! "
TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS - NO CHAIN - A spacious mid terrace property in a popular location close to Derby City offed for sale with no onward chain.
NO CHAIN - LARGE GARDEN - A larger than average mid terrace property in a popular location close to Derby City offered for sale with no onward chain.
A modern ground floor apartment in the popular Strutts Park area of the city offered for sale with no onward chain. The accommodation would ideally suit a first time buyer or buy to let investor.
"DECEPTIVLY SPACIOUS TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME. Well presented property with two bedrooms, off road parking and enclosed rear garden. No upward chain."
This traditional palisaded mid terrace property is being offered for sale with no onward chain and would make a great first home. The property features two reception rooms and three bedrooms and is within easy reach of the wide range of shops and amenities on offer locally.
NO CHAIN - A fantastic opportunity to acquire a two double bedroom semi-detached bungalow in an ever popular location.
"** IDEAL FOR INVESTORS AND FIRST TIME BUYERS ** Leaders are delighted to offer to the market this fantastic two bedroom, semi-detached property located in Derby. Upon entering the property, an entrance hall provides access to all downstairs accommodation and stairway rising to the first floor lan..."
Hannells Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this excellent development opportunity! The proposed land has planning permission granted for a four bedroomed detached dwelling with a double garage accesed via a shared driveway. Architect drawings and further information regardi...
** IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT** Leaders are proud to present this two bedroom mid town house set in a cul de sac location in the ever popular village Alvaston. Upon entering the property into the entrance hall with door leading to the lounge having an open staircase rising to the first fl...
"Single plot of land in this sought after location convenient for access to City Centre, measuring approximately 416 square meters, 4447 square feet or thereabouts. Planning Permission from Derby City Council granted for 4 Bedroomed Detached property including Reserved matters on 20/01/2023 under..."
Offered for sale with no upward chain is this well presented and spacious three double bedrooms semi detached house
"Set in an excellent location for Derby city centre and the train station. This two bedroom apartment is ideal for first time buyers, first time investors or seasoned investors. Very spacious rooms and the apartment itself is set in a lovely building with history and a handful of character."
"This most spacious and well presented three bedroomed apartment is located in the sought after area of Littleover and offers a generously proportioned modern interior with lounge, kitchen and separate dining room.  This beautiful home is deceptively spacious and benefits from uPVC double gla..."
"Modern and stylish ground floor apartment sitting a short distance from the Derby ring road and ideally suiting buy to let investors, first time buyers and those looking for excellent access to the nearby major road links and the Royal Derby Hospital. Having been maintained to a high standard, t..."
"Offered for sale with no upward chain is this charming period property, ideally located in the heart of Littleover and offering easy access to local excellent local amenities within Littleover Village. With a beautiful feature fire surround, two bedrooms and a fitted bathroom, it would make an i..."
"Great investment opportunity, being sold with no upward chain is this well presented, two double bedroom end terraced property which offers great access to Derby city centre. The property is currently being sold with sitting tenants making this perfect for anyone looking for an instant rental inc..."
"A two double-bedroomed, mid townhouse, ideal for the first buyer or investment purchaser and occupies an established cul-de-sac location. The property benefits from gas fired central heating, double glazing, allocated parking spaces and an enclosed rear garden. The property is also available wit..."
"*No Upward Chain* Fantastic opportunity to purchase this three bedroom, well presented semi detached property, ideal for the first time buyer or investment purchaser and available for sale with no upward chain. The property boasts a modern kitchen, downstairs W.C, two reception rooms and a good s..."
** LONG LEASE 981 YEARS REMAINING ** **** BEING SOLD WITH TENANTS IN SITU PAYING £750 PER MONTH MAKING IT A 6% YIELD **** A stylish two double bedroomed second floor apartment located within walking distance to Derby City Centre and the cosmopolitan Friar Gate area of Der...
**NO UPWARD CHAIN** OVER 55'S APARTMENT WITH FLEXIBLE CARE FACILITIES* TWO BEDROOMS ** SPACIOUS LOUNGE WITH KITCHEN AREA** SHOWER ROOM** LOTS OF ON SITE AMENITIES** ATTRACTIVE LOCATION **
"Brighton & Beck are delighted to offer to the market this spacious and well presented modern apartment. The property is ideally situated on the fringe of the city and would make an ideal home for first time buyers, or professionals looking for easy access to the hospital or the city centre whilst..."
***IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT***A fully REFURBISHED traditional two bedroom mid terrace property ideal for a first time buyer or buy to let investment. Entering the property into the hallway with access both receptions rooms and door leading down to the cellar. From the second recep...
"We re delighted to market for sale this well presented three bedroom semi-detached property with off road parking. To the ground floor there is a modern kitchen, a spacious living room and a downstairs toilet. On the first floor there are three well-proportioned bedrooms, and a family bath..."
NO CHAIN - An excellent opportunity for a first time buyer or investor to purchase a recently renovated two double bedroom end terrace property in an ever popular area of Derby.
Key Features:   Ground floor apartment with doorway leading to private garden  Off street parking for up to three cars  Open plan living area  One double bedroom  Double glazed throughout Council Tax Band A  Cul de sac position  Sought after ...
"This first floor apartment is being offered for sale with no onward chain and would make a great first time buyer or investment purchase. The property is within easy access of Derby City Centre and the wide range of shops, amenities and leisure facilities on offer."
Sold via Secure Sale online bidding. Terms & Conditions apply. Starting Bid £145.000
**ONE BED GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT WITH GARDEN**NO CHAIN**GOOD LOCATION FOR CITY CENTRE AND DERBY ROYAL HOSPITAL**
"*Investors Only* An excellent modern development for tenants looking for premium living. These new apartments will be perfect for investors. To receive more information, please contact us directly. Comprising of modern fixtures and fittings, each apartment will feature state..."
"A stylishly appointed one bedroom, freehold, ground floor apartment offering highly impressive spacious accommodation featuring a private courtyard and cellar."
"Situated in the heart of Derby, within easy reach of the vibrant city centre, this is a beautifully appointed two bedroom terrace house which benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and on street permit parking."
NO CHAIN - A fantastic opportunity two acquire a three double bedroom terrace property in an ever popular location.
"AUCTION SALE 13TH MARCH 2023 - FOR SALE VIA BAGSHAWS RESIDENTIAL AUCTIONS IN ASSOCIATION WITH BARNARD MARCUS AUCTIONS ON MONDAY 13TH MARCH AT 9.30AM AT THE DE VERE GRAND CONNAUGHT ROOMS, 61-65 GREAT QUEEN STREET, COVENT GARDENS, LONDON WC2B 5DA. YOU CAN ALSO REGISTER FOR ONLINE BIDDING."
"A well presented spacious terrace house, located within a short distance to the city centre and Royal Derby Hospital. Offering two double bedrooms, two reception rooms, modern kitchen, four-piece suite bathroom and enclosed garden. The property benefits from gas central heating, double glaz..."
"Located in the sought-after area of Chellaston is this spacious two bedroomed coach house, brought to the market with no upward chain. Ideal for a first time buyer or investor, the property benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, an ample amount of storage and two allocated parki..."
"This modern double bedroomed town house would be ideal for the first time buyer or investment purchaser and is offered for sale with no upward chain. Occupying a popular cul-de-sac location close to Oakwood Centre and benefits from an allocated parking space, conservatory with glass roof and gar..."
"A fantastic opportunity arises to acquire this modern two bedroomed first floor apartment, which is located in a highly desirable and sought after location. Offered for sale with no onward chain and at a competitive asking price, an internal inspection is a must in order to fully appreciate the ..."
"***TENANTS IN SITU CURRENTLY PAYING £625PCM*** An opportunity for an investor looking to acquire this TWO DOUBLE bedroom mid town house with PARKING to the rear, situated in the popular and convenient residential location of Chaddesden. The property is within easy reach of local amenit..."
"Are you looking to benefit from the immediate return offered from an established buy to let property? Then this well presented two bedroom house could be perfect. Currently let to a family for £800 PCM, but with the future potential of becoming a lucrative student let, call today!!"
"A modern top floor apartment, located in Chester Green with great access to main roads, shops and parks. Offering two double bedrooms, open plan lounge kitchen diner, two bathrooms and a spacious garage. The property benefits from gas central heating, double glazed windows and is being sold ..."
"Offered for sale with no upward chain is this two bedroomed bungalow situated on a purpose-built over 60's development, standing in well maintained communal gardens and grounds and is within easy walking distance of the excellent local amenities on offer including doctors, dentist, opticians, che..."
"**OPEN 7 DAYS A WEEK** HOPKINS & DAINTY of TICKNALL offer to the market this three bedroom property located within a highly popular and convenient area, within ease of access to Derby city centre and Rolls Royce. Benefitting from gas central heating and double glazing the accommodation has to off..."
"DECEPTIVLY SPACIOUS TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME. Well presented property with two bedrooms, driveway parking and enclosed rear garden. No upward chain."
YOPA are delighted to welcome this three bedroom property in need of renovation in the sought after location of Alvaston. This home offers a generous plot size with easy access to Alvaston Town Centre and is in close proximity to Transport Routes. With a bit of TLC this would be a great family home!
A light and spacious apartment with beautiful river views located in the heart of the City Centre offered for sale with no onward chain.
"*Investment Only* An excellent modern development for tenants looking for premium city centre living. To receive more information, please contact us directly. Comprising of modern fixtures and fittings, each apartment will feature state-of-the-art designs and fixtures, and t..."
"An excellent opportunity arises for a first time buyer or investor to purchase this well presented, two double bedroomed ground floor apartment located in the sought after area of Chellaston. Brought to the market with no upward chain, the property benefits from uPVC double glazing, one allocate..."
Hall & Benson are delighted to bring to market this well presented two bedroom mid-terraced home situated on this highly sought after residential area. The property has been well maintained by the current owner and an internal inspection is highly advised.
"This well presented two bedroom duplex maisonette is situated in a lovely position on this highly sought after development in Mackworth. Accessed via its own front door on the ground floor, stairs then lead up to the living accommodation. The property has an allocated car parking space."
"A three bedroom semi detached brand new 50% shared ownership property in a popular Kedleston Grange development in Allestree. The property briefly comprises of an entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen/diner, cloakroom, three bedrooms an upstairs bathroom, driveway and a rear garden."
"A spacious bay fronted mid terraced house offering two double bedrooms, hallway, two reception rooms and low maintenance garden, being sold by modern method of auction. This ideal first time buy or buy to let investment opportunity is located with good access to the city centre, the property ben..."
"SPACIOUS SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT IN POPULAR LOCATION. With two double bedrooms, large open plan lounge, bathroom and ensuite, currently with tenant in situ."
"Sold with vacant posession, Hall and Benson are proud to market this well located two bedroom terraced property, close to Derby City Centre. A great opportunity for investors! Call to make your appointment to view!"
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this Two Bedroom Apartment. This property in short features; Entrance Hall, Kitchen/Living Room, Family Bathroom and Two Double Bedrooms.
The property also offers secured off road parking.
This property is located within Derby City and is perfect for..."
"Dwellings Estate Agents are delighted to present to the market this two-bedroom property. Meynell Street is situated within walking distance of a wide range of local amenities on offer in Normanton. This traditional mid-terrace property offers two reception rooms, a fitted kitchen, two g..."
"A luxury two double bedroomed third floor apartment with stunning views over the River Derwent. The apartment has the benefit of double glazing, spacious living accommodation and lovely views over Derby. In brief the property comprises of entrance hallway, spacious lounge, kitchen area, two doub..."
"IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT - A beautifully appointed and most spacious one bedroom mews apartment, set in this most convenient and sought after location just a few minutes walk away from the Royal Derby Hospital and also offering easy access to Derby City Centre and Rolls-Royce. ..."
"This spacious and extended two double bedroomed traditional terraced home is ideally located to offer easy access to the City Centre. Offering two receptions rooms and a modern fitted kitchen, viewing is highly recommended. Benefitting from double glazing and gas central heating, the accommoda..."
"A spacious mid terrace house, located within a walking distance to the city centre and with great access to Royal Derby Hospital, Derby University and main access roads. Offering two double bedrooms, two reception rooms, fitted kitchen, fitted bathroom and enclosed garden. The property benef..."
"This traditional apartment is fabulously presented throughout and would make a fantastic first home. The property enjoys a central location and offers excellent access to Derby City Centre, Train station, Pride Park and has excellent road links. There is allocated parking available."
"Apartment 20 West Point, Brook Street, Derby, DE1 3TE PUBLIC NOTICE We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £123,000 Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contracts take..."
"****GUIDE PRICE £130,000 AUCTION SALE 13TH MARCH 2023 - FOR SALE VIA BAGSHAWS RESIDENTIAL AUCTIONS IN ASSOCIATION WITH BARNARD MARCUS AUCTIONS AT THE DE VERE GRAND CONNAUGHT ROOMS, 61-65 GREAT QUEEN STREET, COVENT GARDENS, LONDON WC2B 5DA. YOU CAN ALSO REGISTER FOR ONLINE BIDDING."
"This ground floor apartment is being offered for sale with no onward chain and would make a great first time buyer or investment purchase. The property is within easy access of Derby City Centre and the wide range of shops, amenities and leisure facilities on offer."
"MUST VIEW! Hall & Benson are delighted to bring to market this very well presented, mid terrace, located on a popular street close to Derby City Centre. The property has been tastefully redecorated throughout and benefits from having a rear garden. Perfect for first time buyers & investors!"
"Offers in the region of £130,000. Royston and Lund offer this two bedroom terrace property to the sales market. The property is currently tenanted and the income is £550 pcm. The property enjoys a convenient position being just a few minutes walk away from local schools and open..."
A spacious modern two-bedroom first floor executive apartment with garage set in one of Derby’s most sought after developments in the Friar Gate area of Derby and within walking distance of the City centre amenities. Set within a secure gated environment with electric security gates the apartmen...
A fantasic opportunity to acquire a two bedroom ground floor retirement apartment with parking in the newly developed Kingsway Boulevard.
"Sold via Secure Sale online bidding - Terms & Conditions apply - Starting Bid £125,000 - This property will be legally prepared enabling any interested buyer to secure the property immediately once their bid/offer has been accepted. Ultimately a transparent process which provides speed, security ..."
"*80% SHARE* A two bedroom over 55's bungalow on The Beeches in Spondon. Breifly comprising lounge, kitchen, two bedrooms and shower room with allocated parking and communal gardens outside. Offered to the market with no onward chain, an early internal viewing is highly recommended."
Ideal Investment opportunity Two bedroom period end terrace enjoying a popular and convenient location - Full refurbishment required. This period end of terrace offers an excellent opportunity for an investor as the property does require a full scheme of refurbishments throughout. The ...
"A surprisingly spacious two double bedroom, first floor apartment. Enjoying an enviable and convenient location close to Derby city centre and the Royal Hospital."
***TO BE SOLD TENANT **** THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS**** DINING ROOM ***** FRONT RECEPTION ROOM **** GARDEN ***** ON STREET PARKING **** CENTRAL HEATING*** GROUND FLOOR BATHROOM
"*INVESTMENT* Offered for sale with no upward chain and to be sold with tenants in situ, is this well presented and improved two bedroom terraced property, occupying an excellent plot in one of Derby's most conveniently located cul-de-sac positions. The property has the benefit of uPVC double gla..."
"A mid-townhouse requiring modernisation, offering three bedrooms, kitchen diner, generous sized rear garden and off street parking, being sold with no upward chain. The property benefits from electric storage heaters, double glazing and is a non-standard construction with unity PRC. "
"For sale on 30 March 2023 The National Property Auction will be broadcast live on our website and open to remote bidding online, on the phone and by proxy. Registration for bidding will close at 5pm the day before the auction. The auction will commence at 10:00."
This modern two bedroom ground floor apartment is offered for sale with no upward chain and is ideally located to offer easy access to both the City Centre and the A38/M1 road networks. The property is well positioned within the historic area of Chester Green and benefits from uPVC double glazin...
"*80% SHARE* A two bedroom over 55's bungalow on Gascoigne Drive in Spondon. Breifly comprising lounge, kitchen, two bedrooms and shower room with allocated parking and communal gardens outside. Offered to the market with no onward chain, an early internal viewing is highly recommended."
** IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT ** Offered to the market this two bedroomed GROUND FLOOR apartment located in the popular residential area of Chester Green having access through a secure gate to Darley Park. Upon entering the property the entrance hallway provides access to all accommodati...
"INVESTORS ONLY - Situated in the heart of Derby, only a short walk from the vibrant city centre, this is a well appointed two bedroom mid-terrace property which benefits from gas central heating and double glazing."
"VACANT PROPERTY COUNCIL TAX BAND A We are pleased to present to the market this well-presented, three bedroom terraced house in Derby which is of non-standard Unity PRC construction. The property is being offered to the market with no upward chain and requires som..."
"A spacious mid terraced house offering three bedrooms, hallway, kitchen diner, ground floor bathroom, first floor washroom and enclosed garden, being sold with a tenant in situ or with vacant possession. The property benefits from gas central heating and double glazed windows. To the ground flo..."
"Goodmove present this 2 bedroom mid terrace house for QUICK sale on Harrington Street, Derby, DE24. Harrington Street is very conveniently located close the shops and amenities of Allenton, good local schools and excellent access to public transport and the City Centre. Call to book your viewing ..."
"A stunning two bedroom, two bathroom chain free ground floor apartment in a period conversion! Benefiting from private gated parking, high ceilings, large double glazed windows and en suite to master. It is also very conveniently located with easy access to town centre, amenities and all road lin..."
"** IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT ** Offered to the market with no upward chain and situated in the popular town of Derby City, this two bedroom traditional End Terrace. Internally the house comprises of two reception rooms and family bathroom. Stairs rise to the first floor givin..."
"Ideal for first time buyers, families or investors and offered for sale with no upward chain is this spacious, two double-bedroomed, traditional mid-terraced property which is situated close to the local shops and amenities. The accommodation benefits from uPVC double glazing, gas central heating..."
"***REDUCED TO £120,000 STARTING BID*** Two bedroom end terraced BEING SOLD BY MODERN AUCTION, driveway parking for two vehicles, good sized rear garden, refitted modern first floor bathroom, two double bedrooms, gas central heating."
"SPACIOUS THIRD FLOOR APARTMENT WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN. Two bedroom apartment, with allocated parking space, currently tenanted."
PARKING & GARDEN - CASH BUYERS ONLY A superbly presented first floor maisonette in a sought after location in Oakwood ideally suited to a first time buyer or buy to let investor.
NO CHAIN - A great opportunity to acquire this two bedroom terrace property in a highly popular location in Derby.
Family home for sale within a popular area within Derby close to local amenities and offers fantastic space internally and in the garden. The property is also offered for sale with no upward chain
** IDEAL INVESTMENT OR FIRST TIME BUY ** Leaders are delighted to present this two bedroom End Terraced property which is ideally located within walking distance of the city centre. Upon entering the property into the lounge located to the front elevation. To the rear elevation is a kitchen havin...
"This is an excellent opportunity to acquire a beautifully presented, delightful 1 bedroom Georgian period cottage with spacious rooms and a harmonious layout, with no onward chain. A full scheme of refurbishment has been carried out in recent months to a high standard. The property is located ..."
"Being Sold via Secure Sale Online Bidding. Terms & Conditions Apply. Starting Bid £120,000. This property will be legally prepared enabling any interested buyer to secure the property immediately once their bid/offer has been accepted. Ultimately a transparent process which provides s (cont.)"
"***INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY FOR CASH BUYERS ONLY*** This Victorian mid-terrace house has been converted into two self-contained flats and would suit a buy-to-let investor looking to invest in the Derby property market. Based on the most recent lettings figures, the Property attracts a gross yield o..."
"** Sold With A Tenant In Situ** Situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac is this fantastic, one bedroom quarter house overlooking a lovely green space and being very well maintained throughout. Call now to book your viewing as this property will not be around for long! In brief, this fantastic prope..."
Offered with no upwards chain and in need of modernisation is this 2 Double bedroom Victorian mid terraced property located close to Normanton and Derby city centre. The property will attract both first time buyers and buy to let investors.
**PERFECT HOME FOR A FIRST TIME BUYER OR INVESTMENT** TWO Bed Room **TRADITIONAL MID-TERRACE **Central Heating **Dining Room**Double Glazed**REAR GARDEN**Lounge**FAMILY BATHROOM**FITTED KITCHEN**ON STREET PARKING**Close to City Centre
"Situated in the heart of Derby, a short walk from the vibrant city centre, this is a top floor one bedroom apartment ideal for a first time buyer or investment purchaser."
"YOPA are delighted to welcome to the market this well presented and spacious two bedroom third floor apartment in Allenton. Benefitting from an open plan kitchen/diner, an en - suite off the master bedroom and an allocated parking space. This would make a great first home or buy to let!"
"*** IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT *** NO UPWARD CHAIN *** TWO RECEPTION ROOMS *** This traditional mid-terraced property is situated in a popular location and is ideal for first time buyers or buy-to-let investors. The property benefits from two reception rooms, two bedrooms, uPVC double gl..."
"A fantastic TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED home situated in Boden Street offering SPACIOUS ACCOMODATION, with TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, The property is well presented and would make an ideal home for an INVESTMENT OR FIRST TIME BUYER."
***TO BE SOLD TENANTED ***** TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM S**** DINING ROOM ***** FRONT RECEPTION ROOM **** GARDEN ***** ON STREET PARKING **** CENTRAL HEATING***
"A one bedroom modern apartment, with modern fitted kitchen and bathroom, lounge with Juliet balcony and secure gated parking."
Fantastic one bedroom apartment that offers the ideal purchase for either main residency or investment. The apartment is well equipped with allocated parking behind the secure gates along with the secure communal areas which upon viewing are clearly maintained to a high standard.
"* No Upward Chain * Very well presented and spacious, modern first floor two bedroomed apartment located on the most popular City Point development close to Pride Park in Derby. Ideal for both investors and first time buyers, the property benefits from electric heating and uPVC double glazing, ..."
NO CHAIN - A traditional mid terrace property in a popular location close to Derby City offered for sale with no onward chain.
A traditional two bedroom mid terrace property in a popular location close to amenities ideally suited to a first time buyer or investor.
A valuable investment property realising a gross income of £7500.00 per annum. This smart and stylish spacious apartment is situating in the popular 'Burgess Mill' conversion on Manchester Street which is ideally located within easy reach of the University of Derby together with the Friar Gate qu...
"A modern and spacious first floor apartment, located within the city centre. The property offers a double bedroom, spacious open plan lounge diner kitchen, modern bathroom and utility cupboard. The apartment benefits from gas central heating and double glazed windows. As you enter there is a..."
A well presented two bedroom house situated within the popular area of Normanton with access to local amenities and public transport leading into the Derby City Centre
Enjoying a nice position at the rear of this city centre apartment development is a two bedroom second floor apartment with spacious living room and fitted kitchen with modern shower room.
"A spacious semi-detached family home, offering three bedrooms, two reception rooms, kitchen, off street parking, enclosed garden and being sold by modern method of auction. The property benefits from double glazed windows, it is located with good access to the city centre, local shops and re..."
"With minimal modernisation required, this ideally situated apartment presents a great opportunity for anyone planning to add value to a superb property in the heart of Derby, or to add their own personal stamp to their new home. Its new owners will benefit from the use of two good-sized bedroom..."
Two bedroom traditional mid-terrace in a popular and convenient location - No Upward Chain
"A spacious mid terrace house, within a short distance of the city centre and main access routes, being sold by Modern Method of Auction. The property offers two double bedrooms, spacious loft room, two reception rooms, large family bathroom and enclosed garden. The property benefits from gas..."
"This well presented ground floor apartment is offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN and would make a fantastic investment buy, The property enjoys excellent access to Derby City Centre, bus routes, train station and road links."
"CASH BUYERS ONLY. Fantastic Refurbishment Project With No Upward Chain - This two double bedroom mid terrace home is brought to the market offering spacious living accommodation, a modern combi boiler, a good size garden and driveway parking. Offering excellent potential this is one not to be mis..."
A fantastic opportunity for a first time buyer or investor to acquire this beautifully maintained apartment in a highly popular location in Derby.
"* NO UPWARD CHAIN * Well presented and spacious, modern, ground floor two bedroomed apartment located on the most popular City Point development close to Pride Park in Derby. Ideal for both investors and first time buyers, the property benefits from electric heating and uPVC double glazing, an a..."
"A spacious, well presented two bedroom apartment in a city centre location. The property benefits from electric heating and double glazed windows. You enter the property into the hallway which provides access to the bathroom, bedroom one and open plan lounge/kitchen. Off the kitchen is bedroom tw..."
"** BEING SOLD WITH TENANTS IN SITU ** Leaders are pleased to bring to the market this one bedroom ground floor maisonette available on the outskirts of Derby City Centre. The property has neutral décor throughout, fitted kitchen and bathroom, double bedroom and an easy to maintain ga..."
"***TENANT IN SITU *** CURRENTLY PAYING £525 IN CONTRACT UNTIL DECEMBER 2023 *** Offered to the market with no upward chain is this one bedroom town house set in the ever popular Alvaston, Derby. Upon entering the property into a small entrance hallway with access to the bathroom and op..."
"Recently converted, well appointed one bedroom first-floor apartment finished to a high standard. Enjoying a highly convenient location within Allestree"
"PUBLIC NOTICE: Apartment 3 Brook House 19 Brook Street, Derby, DE1 3PF We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £105,000. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contracts..."
"** CURRENTLY RENTED OUT FOR £675 PER MONTH MAKING IT AN 8.1 % YIELD ** Ideally located in Derby City Centre, this two bedroom, sixth floor apartment is offered to the market with no upward chain. This property would make an ideal first time buy or investment as it is currently rented out at..."
"A well presented, fourth floor apartment in a popular city centre location, offering two bedrooms, open plan living, kitchen with integrated appliances and modern white three piece bathroom. The property benefits from electric heating, double glazed windows and no upward chain. The property has b..."
A spacious two double bedroom second floor flat in a sought after and convenient location close to the Kedleston Road area of the City.
A wonderfully positioned one bedroom first floor apartment offered for sale with no chain in this highly sought after village location.
This third floor flat is being offered for sale with no onward and would make an excellent first time buy or investment opportunity. The property offers bright and neutral accommodation throughout and is ready to move straight in to. There are two bedrooms and modern kitchen and bathroom.
"** OVER 55's DEVELOPMENT - NO UPWARD CHAIN ** A well presented two bedroomed, ground floor apartment being conveniently situated for access to the Park Farm Centre with its wide range of shopping facilities and offered for sale with no upward chain. The property is pleasantly located within a sma..."
"AUCTION SALE 13 March 2023 - FOR SALE VIA BAGSHAWS RESIDENTIAL AUCTIONS IN ASSOCIATION WITH BARNARD MARCUS AUCTIONS ON MONDAY 13TH MARCH 2023 AT 9.30AM AT THE DE VERE GRAND CONNAUGHT ROOMS, 61-65 GREAT QUEEN STREET, COVENT GARDENS, LONDON WC2B 5DA. YOU CAN ALSO REGISTER FOR ONLINE BIDDING."
"Well presented ground floor one bedroom flat, ideal for first time buyers or buy to let investors. Offered to the market with no upward chain, the property benefits from uPVC double glazing throughout, gas central heating via a combination boiler, communal gardens to the rear and communal parking..."
"A spacious terrace house, located with good access to the city centre. Offering two double bedrooms, open plan lounge diner, modern fitted kitchen, fitted bathroom and enclosed garden. The property benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and is being sold with modern method of auct..."
"A tenanted first floor studio apartment within a Grade II listed building over looking the market place in the city centre, providing a ready made investment opportunity. This recently converted apartment benefits from secondary glazed windows and electric heating. The property is let on a fixe..."
"CLOSE TO CITY CENTRE - Currently Tenanted - A superb opportunity to acquire this realistically priced one bedroom apartment located just off Ashbourne Road within easy reach of Derby city centre, University of Derby and Markeaton Park"
"******** 7.8 % YIELD *********** ** CENTRAL LOCATION ** TOP FLOOR ** IDEAL INVESTMENT POTENTIAL RENT £650 PER CALENDAR MONTH ** NO UPWARD CHAIN** This two bedroom top floor apartment is offered to the market with no upward chain, and would make an ideal Investment. Upon entering ..."
"Situated within easy reach of Derby city centre and the inner ring road, this is a unique opportunity to acquire a second floor, two bedroom apartment which benefits from electric storage heating, double glazing and lift. The property also benefits from a loft space and good bus route. The proper..."
"IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR INVESTMENT - Offered for sale with no chain is this modern two bedroom, first floor apartment situated in this ever popular location conveniently positioned close to major employment opportunites including Rolls-Royce, Alstom Trains and also offering easy access to the Cit..."
"******GUIDE PRICE £99,950 TO £109,950******Purplebricks are delighted to offer for sale this well maintained and spacious 3 bedroom detached park home. Ideally suited for over 45s looking for modern and convenient living. Situated with the heart of Alvaston, Nagivation home park is ideally situ..."
"***IDEAL STARTER HOME OR RENTAL/AIR B&B INVESTMENT**** ONE BEDROOM THIRD FLOOR APARTMENT | EPC RATING = B | SECURE UNDERGROUND ALLOCATED PARKING | LIFT ACCESS | IMMEDIATE ACCESS TO AMENITIES | WALKING DISTANCE TO CITY CENTRE | CLOSE TO BUS & TRAIN STATIONS | SWIFT ACCESS TO A52, A38, A6 |"
"Spacious gas centrally heated and UPVC double glazed one bedroom first floor apartment which has its own front door at street level with an entrance porch and staircase leading up to the accommodation. The property has a good size double bedroom with a recessed wardrobe over the stair well, a nic..."
"A spacious, well presented two bedroom apartment in a city centre location. The property is situated on the 2nd floor, and benefits from electric heating, and double glazed windows. You enter the property into the hallway which provides access to the bathroom, bedroom one and open plan lounge/kit..."
"Offered for sale with NO UPWARD CHAIN! First Floor, Two Bedroom Apartment close to the CITY CENTRE with ALLOCATED PARKING! Ideal for First Time Buyers or Investors! "
A fantastic ONE BEDROOM STUDIO STYLE APARTMENT with a NET YIELD of approx. 7% and a TENANT IN SITU this offers a great investment opportunity. WELL POSITIONED in a popular TOWN CENTRE location with excellent access to a VARIETY OF AMENITIES.
"Public Notice - Apartment 29, Centro West, Searl Street, Derby, Derbyshire, DE1 1BW We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £100,000. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of c..."
"Attention Landlords: This property is to be sold tenanted, currently producing £575 PCM. Occupying an incredibly convenient position off Ashbourne Road is this top floor two double bedroom characterful apartment offered for sale with no upward chain."
"Highly convenient apartment within in a converted granary mill in the Strutts conservation area, this is a superb opportunity for a first time buyer/investor to acquire a two bedroomed second floor apartment which is situated in the heart of the city centre."
"City Centre Living  Will suit First Time Buyer or Landlords. Current Rental is £650pm This two bedroom property in Derby City Centre briefly comprises; an entrance, bathroom, two bedrooms and a open plan kitchen lounge with integrated oven, hob, washing machine and f..."
"OPEN 7 DAYS A WEEK - HOPKINS & DAINTY of TICKNALL are pleased to be marketing this VERY WELL PRESENTED flat, in a convenient location for Derby City Centre, Inner Ring Road and the nearby Darley Park. Overlooking the river Derwent, this lovely home would make an ideal first purchase or buy t..."
"SPACIOUS GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT IN CONVENIENT LOCATION. With two double bedrooms, large open plan kitchen/lounge, bathroom and ensuite, currently with tenant in situ."
"This second floor flat is located in this sought after area and is available for investors only as is being sold with tenants in situ. The property features two bedrooms, communal parking and gardens and is close to Derby City Centre and Royal Derby Hospital."
"Offered to the market with no upward chain is this modern, duplex apartment laid over two floors and ideally located for Derby City Centre. This apartment has been tastefully decorated, boasts a range of modern fixtures and fittings, uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, fitted kitchen, alloc..."
"BEING SOLD WITH TENANTS IN SITU ** ACHIEVEING £565 WITH A 7.5% YIELD ** Leaders are delighted to bring to the market this one bedroom, second floor flat set within close proximity to Derby City Centre, Pride Park and the A52. The accommodation briefly comprises: An intercom syst..."
LAND FOR SALE
"A well presented and spacious ground floor flat, located in the city centre offering two bedrooms, kitchen diner, residents permit car park, being sold with a tenant in situ. The property benefits from gas central heating and double glazing. Located on the ground floor the flat has a hallway w..."
"****GUIDE PRICE £90,000 AUCTION SALE 13TH MARCH 2023 - FOR SALE VIA BAGSHAWS RESIDENTIAL AUCTIONS IN ASSOCIATION WITH BARNARD MARCUS AUCTIONS AT THE DE VERE GRAND CONNAUGHT ROOMS, 61-65 GREAT QUEEN STREET, COVENT GARDENS, LONDON WC2B 5DA. YOU CAN ALSO REGISTER FOR ONLINE BIDDING."
"EPC RATING TBC TENANT IN SITU We are delighted to offer to the market this well-presented 2-bedroom fifth floor apartment on Gower Street Derby. This property is a well-proportioned apartment with plenty of space to be utilised, comprising an entrance hallway le..."
AVAILABLE NOW***FIRST FLOOR FLAT*** ENTRANCE HALLWAY*** TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS ***LIVING ROOM***PARKING*** CENTRAL HEATING ***DOUBLE GLAZED***VERY SECURE***CLOSE TO CITY CENTRE****DERBY ROYAL HOSPITAL. FURNISHED.
INVESTORS ONLY - A opportunity for a buy to let investor to purchase a spacious ground floor flat with long term tenants in situ currently let at £400 PCM.
"A spacious, two bedroom apartment in a city centre location. The property benefits from electric heating and double glazed windows. You enter the property into the hallway which provides access to the bathroom, bedroom one and open plan lounge/kitchen. Off the kitchen is bedroom t..."
Good sized one double bedroom ground floor apartment set within sought after retirement McCarthy & Stone development
"A beautifully appointed, ready for immediate occupancy, one bedroom third floor flat with balcony and superb open plan living dining kitchen. An ideal buy to let or first time buy. No Chain."
"***** This property is for sale by Modern Method of Auction and viewer/bidder information will be shared with the Auctioneer, IAM-Sold. A non-refundable Reservation Fee of 4.2% of the purchase price inc VAT, subject to a minimum of £6,000 inc VAT is payable by the winning bidder ***** ..."
A valuable investment property realising a gross income of £5940.00 per annum. This smart and stylish spacious apartment is situating in the popular 'Burgess Mill' conversion on Manchester Street which is ideally located within easy reach of the University of Derby together with the Friar Gate qu...
"Well presented fifth-floor apartment, situated within an apartment complex in the Park Farm area of Allestree. This one bedroomed apartment provides a communal entrance hall with intercom system, lift and stairs leading to the different levels and is offered for sale with no upward chain. The..."
"3Keys Property are delighted to present to the open sales market this 2 bedroom semi detached property in Sprotbrough, Doncaster.  Well presented throughout and sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN, the property briefly comprises of: front facing lounge with feature fireplace, modern kitchen/diner w..."
Historic Residential Equestrian Estate
"Fine combination of substantial stone farm house, ancillary annexe, courtyard, equestrian facilities, all secluded in an enclave bordered by mature woodland, in all approx. 312 acres, "
"A superb contemporary home of exceptional quality offering spacious accommodation, a wide range of cutting edge technology and is situated in an idyllic location."
"GUIDE PRICE - £1.75 MILLION - £1.85 MILLION This is a quite magnificent family dwelling, enjoying one of the finest, unspoilt plots in the Doncaster area. The site, amounting to around 1.5 acres, enjoys a high degree of privacy, whilst the property itself offers an impressive 7,000 sq ft plus..."
A truly enviable detached family home offering extensive living accommodation boasting an abundance of natural light and displaying exquisite grandeur from every corner. The property has been meticulously finished to the highest standard throughout with no expense being spared. Much original c...
"An elegant detached country house with substantial gardens, grounds, tennis courts, annexe and multiple outbuildings"
"A truly outstanding five bedroom individually designed detached family home located in one of Doncaster's most prestigious settings. Internally, the property is presented and appointed to extremely high standards whilst providing over 4,300 sq ft of accommodation over three floors and an annex."
"Set within privately enclosed landscaped gardens, a hugely characterful 19th century property, sympathetically restored resulting in a magnificent family home; the grounds approaching 2.5 acres including south facing gardens, a triple garage and a self contained leisure suite.  
"
"Standing within magnificent, secluded grounds, amounting to around 0.75 acre, an outstanding family residence positioned close to the heart of Sprotbrough village. The property offers approaching 4,000 sq ft of living space, and briefly comprises of reception hall, 4 generous reception rooms, fit..."
"RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT SITEMANOR FARM, BARNSLEY ROAD (A635), MARR, DONCASTER, DN5 7AXThe main body of the site extends to approximately 1.5 acres (0.606h.a.) and is extremely convenient for access to the motorway network."
"STUNNING FAMILY HOME WITH INDEPENDENT ANNEXE POSITIONED IN THE HEART OF THIS SOUGHT AFTER VILLAGE Ideally located within easy reach of the motorway and rail networks, and close to a host of amenities, an absolutely outstanding detached family home, presented and appointed to the highest of st..."
"Accessed via a private gated driveway, within one of Doncaster's most exclusive settings, an exceptional detached family home with an immaculate interior providing extensive family accommodation of the highest quality. Ground floor: reception hall, cloakroom, separate WC. Family room / Formal din..."
"GUIDE PRICE : £1.1 million - £1.3 million Located in what is without doubt one of the areas most exclusive settings, this superb, individually designed detached home is effectively a 'new build' with only the 'shell' remaining from the original dwelling. Having been totally redesigned, ..."
"Possibly the most illustrious address in the region, No.1 Yorkshire is a fine, Grade II listed three storey town house constructed of red brick in Flemish bond with a pantile roof. The property dates from the late C18 with a later two storey extension to the rear, and has been sympathetically ..."
"A SUBSTANTIAL FIVE BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME SET IN APPROX. TEN ACRES WITH AN OPTION TO PURCHASE AN ADDITIONAL APPROX. FOUR ACRES. FANTASTIC LEISURE SUITE, AND RANGE OF OUTBUILDINGS IN A RURAL, SECLUDED LOCATION ..."
"Guide price £975,000 - £1,000,000. A truly enchanting and beautifully appointed period property forming the principal part of the original manor house circa 1868. Undeniably one of the finest homes to come to market within Doncaster, this stunning property lies secluded amongst 1.5 acres of mat..."
"Positioned in over an acre of private lawned grounds, a substantial detached family home, affording easy access to the excellent facilities within the sought after town of Bawtry. Set well back from the 'Great North Road', and accessed via a private driveway, the property has plenty of scope to f..."
"**UNIQUE OPPORTUNITY** To become the owner of the historic OLD RECTORY and RECTORY COTTAGE in the rural village of FINNINGLEY. A GRAND GRADE II LISTED property, steeped in history. **CLICK NOW!**"
"SIMPLY STUNNING. High quality large bungalow set in 4 acres with two 22m x 15m Barns, Four Stables, Kennels and Double garage with gym. Immaculate throughout. Superb location with a rural feel but close to facilities and M18/M62 access. VIEWING ESSENTIAL."
A traditional well-appointed detached family home set within private mature gardens in an extremely sort after location. The expansive living accommodation is set over two floors and extends to around 3000 SQFT in all. An abundance of natural light gives a feeling of space throughout. 
" An extremely exciting, and rare opportunity to purchase a substantial period property in the heart of Bawtry with the addition of planning permission for two detached dwellings within the grounds with the provision for a new access. The Poplars is an imposing, six bedroom property..."
"A WONDERFUL BUNGALOW OFFERING ACCOMMODATION FOR TWO FAMILIES! This property is a must see to appreciate the land, outbuildings and the size of property on offer. This extended and modernised detached bungalow benefits from an attached two bedroom self contained annex. The main residence compris..."
"A 5 bedroom, 5 bathroom property arranged over 2 floors. The internal layout can be altered to best suit the buyers needs. Offering many innovative environment and energy saving solutions a site visit is a must to understand the research behind this futuristic property. Features such as drain..."
"**HOME FARM** IDYLLIC FARMHOUSE IN WAITING There’s a perfect imperfection about Home Farm. Mixing quirky farmhouse character with family home practicality, this Grade II Listed five-bedroom property located in the South Yorkshire Saxon village of Burghwallis truly is one of a kind. D..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£325,000-£335,000. Bound to impress is this four bedroom detached family home which is situated on a corner plot and benefits from a double garage and two driveways. There is an open plan lounge diner and a study/playroom providing a range of family living space."
"We are pleased to present this three-bedroom, terraced, period property located in Doncaster. The property consists of – Living room, Diner, Kitchen, Three bedrooms and a Bathroom This property offers light-filled, spacious family accommodation on three floors. With much potential this fa..."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website..."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website..."
"Well proportioned family home with annex, boasting spacious accommodation throughout, Only by an internal inspection can you fully appreciate the the spacious accommodation on offer book your viewing now."
The Pentlands is a spacious five bedroom detached family home offering generous yet versatile living accommodation set within large mature gardens including a detached one bedroom annex. The property is extremely well presented with contemporary fittings.
"An outstanding family home offering vast living accommodation with potential for self contained annex. Occupying a substantial private plot at the beginning of this small development just off Grange Road. Grange Court lies within easy reach of reputable primary and secondary schools, Lakeside l..."
"An absolutely stunning, extended 7 bedroom detached home. Properties of this calibre are rare to the market, with high specification fixtures and fittings and beautifully presented throughout. Set on a generous plot & including a double garage."
"A fine modern detached individually built house, substantially built with a gabled front elevation, stone sills and headers under a pantiled roof. The property stands with landscaped garden areas and a paddock to the rear. A substantial range of brick built outbuildings comprises a detached games..."
This five bedroomed detached property lies on a generous corner plot in the entrance to the much sought after Oaklands Estate in Bessacarr which lies on the outskirts of the city of Doncaster with motorway links to the M18 and A1M. The property would benefit from a programme of modernisation but...
"Middlecroft is a superbly extended and restored period cottage, offering versatile accommodation full of charm and character.  The original cottage dates from 1901 although the property has now been extended by linking a detached barn to the house and converting it into additional accommodatio..."
"**PERFECT FAMILY HOME** On offer: a FIVE-BED DETACHED PROPERTY on a c. 1.5 ACRE PLOT in a POPULAR LOCATION with a KITCHEN, FOUR RECEPTION ROOMS, THREE BATHROOMS, MATURE GARDENS and MORE. *CLICK NOW!*"
"GUIDE PRICE-£700,000-£720,000. This immaculately presented executive style detached five double bedroom, four bathroom/shower room family home is situated on a private cul-de-sac on Bawtry Road. The property stands on a generous enclosed plot with ample off road parking and good sized gardens."
"+++ GUIDE PRICE £700,000 - £750,000 +++ Finished to a very high standard throughout | Architecturally designed | Stunning unique five bedroom detached residence | Large private rear garden"
"Offers invited on this FORMIDABLE FIVE DOUBLE BEDROOM detached property offering generous and versatile family living accommodation with BESPOKE FEATURES AND FITTINGS THROUGHOUT. This enviable one off family home briefly comprises of ; reception hall, sitting room, formal dining room, boot roo..."
"You can move straight in to this spacious and very well presented five double bedroom, four reception rooms and two bathroom detached family home with views over open countryside. Individually designed and built in 2003 to a high standard and recently upgraded to include a private and enclosed, ..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £700,000 - £725,000 ** Occupying a generous size plot, this superbly appointed six bedroom detached property provides spacious and versatile accommodation throughout. Boasting kitchen diner with utility off kitchen diner with utility off, two reception rooms, study, two en suites,..."
"4 beds, 2 BATH/SHOWEROOMS & TRIPLE garage is only the start of what this bungalow offers. Large and stunning detached bungalow situated in this IDYLLIC village, having large BEAUTIFUL gardens and views. Clayton has the beauty of being a quite rural area but is an easy commute to Doncaster..."
"A stunning FIVE BEDROOM BUNGALOW presented to the market at £660,000 boasting a rural surrounding, en suite bathroom, DOUBLE GARAGE and PLENTY OF LIVING SPACE! AN OASIS OF CALM AND BEAUTY! Viewing can not come highly recommended enough to fully appreciate all this property has to offer!"
"A rare opportunity to acquire this charming and characterful Grade II listed period detached home with coach house/double garage including beautiful and large rear gardens situated in Tickhills most exclusive location of Lindrick. Comprises; reception hallway, double aspect lounge with log burner..."
"MUST BE VIEWED A stunning 5 bedroom executive family home occupying a corner plot on this ever popular residential road. Boasting over 2,800 sq ft of living space arranges over two floors this beautiful home offers versatile layout conducive with modern day living. Lying within walking distance..."
"***STUNNING EXTENDED DETACHED FAMILY HOME***SPACIOUS & CONTEMPORARY THROUGHOUT***FOUR BEDROOMS, MASTER WITH ENSUITE***TASTEFUL & STYLISH DECOR ***OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING & FAMILY AREA***HOME OFFICE/STUDY***LUXURY BATHROOM***UTILITY ROOM***TV ROOM*** Simply Stunning property!! Providing a fabulo..."
"A UNIQUE OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE THE FAMILY HOME OF WILLIAM BRADFORD, ONE OF THE PILGRIM FATHERS"
"This stunning ""New"" Energy efficient 4 double bedroom detached home comes equipped with ground source heat pump, solar panels, rainwater harvesting, stylish open living kitchen with numerous appliances, ensuite, double garage and large south facing rear garden. The property comprises ..."
SIMPLY STUNNING - This spacious DETACHED DORMER BUNGALOW has been SIGNIFICANTLY UPGRADED and finished to a HIGH SPECIFICATION. The accommodation is both VERSATILE & GENEROUS. Ideal central BAWTRY LOCATION - Cannot be appreciated via a kerbside viewing!
"This three bedroom semi detached home includes an open plan kitchen with a dining area and French doors to the garden. A spacious lounge and a cloakroom completes the ground floor.
Upstairs you'll find an en suite main bedroom, a further double bedroom, a single bedroom and a family bathroom.
SEE..."
"Guide price £625,000 - £650,000 A beautiful family home located on a small prestigious cul-de-sac of 4 properties. Built in attractive stone featuring ornamental gardens with mature trees offering privacy. Lying within easy reach of local schools, bus routes, motorway networks and amenities clo..."
"A SPACIOUS DETACHED FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME SET ON A ONE ACRE CORNER PLOT WITH SMALL PADDOCK, STABLING, TACK/FEED ROOM AND AMPLE PARKING"
"FULLY REFURBISHED & EXTENDED - Absolutely stunning family home in sought after BAWTRY. Sitting within a GENEROUS GARDEN PLOT with upgraded accommodation throughout. FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS, an IMPRESSIVE KITCHEN and so much more! Call to view today!"
"A stunning and large five bedroom detached family home boasting two lantern roof sitting rooms, ensuite to the main bedroom, gas heating, UPVC double, glazing and private rear gardens. Comprises; hallway, lounge, sitting room, breakfast kitchen with dining area, utility, downstairs wc, study, lan..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£600,000-£650,000. Situated in this highly sought after location and on a double width plot is this stunning converted four bedroom farm house and benefits from having a range of spacious living accommodation throughout."
"**THE LAURELS** SETTLE IN SPROTBROUGH There’s a lot to admire when you arrive at the door of The Laurels. Boasting characterful 1930’s charm, picturesque outdoor areas and spacious interiors for the family, this four bedroom home set in its sought after village surroundings real..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase a unique four bedroom semidetached house with the addition of a two bedroom detached annex. Located in a desirable village and offering the potential of additional rental income, this property must be viewed to appreciate what is on offer. Call now to arrange a view..."
"3D Virtual Tour Available - See when this property is available to view, and reserve your appointment quickly and easily via our website!"
"A superb 4 bedroom detached bungalow standing in extensive grounds, providing deceptively spacious accommodation, stables, beautiful farmland views, ideal equestrian, plans drawn for permitted development, gas heating and UPVC double glazing. The property comprises of ; hallway, spacious lounge,..."
"3D Virtual Tour Available-During the 30 years we have lived here we have enjoyed the convenience of both primary and secondary schools and close by bus stop. We have enjoyed the quiet, enclosed garden .We love that we can look across it from the raised patio, sheltered by the glass balustrade...."
"A superb 4 bedroom detached home coupled with a private gated plot on the corner of Cantley Lane and St Eric’s Road. Lying within easy reach of motorway networks, reputable schools and local amenities this property provides an ideal family home. The versatile accommodation includes 2 reception ..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£585,000-£610,000. Exceptional individually designed self-built home! This five bedroom four bathroom executive style detached family home with three en-suites, a Jack and Jill bathroom, a walk-in dressing room. a cinema room over 23 FT in length and an exceptional stylish kitchen diner."
"SIMPLY STUNNING! Take a look at this BEAUTIFUL, HIGH SPECIFICATION, THREE BEDROOM, TWO BATHROOM, STONE-BUILT BARN CONVERSION with GROUND FLOOR BEDROOMS and FIRST FLOOR LIVING ACCOMMODATION which is PERFECT for FAMILY PURCHASERS or PROFESSIONAL COUPLES and is READY TO WALK STRAIGHT IN. VIEW NOW!"
***UNIQUELY DESIGNED***SIMPLY STUNNING***SPACIOUS DETACHED FAMILY HOME***FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS***MASTER WITH ENSUITE***CONTEMPORARY OPEN PLAN KITCHEN LIVING SPACE***KITCHEN WITH ISLAND***FEATURE STAIRCASE***LANDSCAPED REAR GARDEN***DOUBLE GARAGE*** GARDEN ROOM*** Stunning Four bedroom detached fa...
"A most impressive four bedroom detached property having been sympathetically renovated and extended to create an imposing and luxurious family home situated in a wonderful sought after position with generous front and rear gardens. The property comprises of ; reception hall, sitting room, cloakr..."
"3D Virtual Tour Available - See when this property is available to view, and reserve your appointment quickly and easily via our website! This house has been the perfect family home, the location is so convenient to all local amenities & yet is so private & peaceful being s..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £575,000 - £595,000 *** Prime residential location, a beautifully extended 4 bedroom detached house with a contemporary open plan layout and a large rear garden (approx. 350’0/ 105m long) finished to an exceptionally high standard."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website...Quite neighbourhood with ample parking , corner plot , open plan living area and no fighting over..."
***SIMPLY WOW!!***STUNNING DETACHED FAMILY HOME***RENOVATED TO A HIGH STANDARD***STYLISH & SPACIOUS***FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS***MASTER WITH ENSUITE & DRESSING ROOM***CONTEMPORARY KITCHEN/DINER WITH ISLAND & SPACIOUS FAMILY AREA***LANDSCAPED GARDENS FRONT & REAR***HIGHLY DESIREABLE VILLAGE LOCATION**...
Join us between 10.30am and 5.30pm on Saturday 18th March for our exclusive “let us help you move” event. We'll have an experienced independent financial adviser and an experienced local estate agent on hand to offer expert advice and desktop valuations throughout the day.
"Located in this ever sought after location, within easy reach of extensive amenities, a well proportioned detached family home, with double garage and plenty of further parking. Briefly comprises; porch, reception hall, large lounge / dining room with access to Conservatory. Open plan living, din..."
****VIEWING IS ESSENTIAL TO FULLY APPRECIATE WHAT THIS PROPERTY HAS TO OFFER****Set within the charming and picturesque village of Clayton is a rare opportunity to purchase this exceptionally spacious bright and airy three/four bedroom detached bungalow with large detached garage set within fabul...
"GUIDE PRICE-£550,000-£600,000. This exceptionally spacious four bedroom detached family home with versatile living has three reception rooms, Three reception rooms, an open plan kitchen diner with focal island and a double garage. Situated on a generous plot with a detached studio."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... Lovely spacious family home situated in a popular area of Bessacarr, This property has a ..."
"A surprise package. A five bedroom home with over 2000 square feet of space. Ultimate flexibility for homeworking, lifestyle kitchen and beautifully intimate bedrooms. The standout feature is a 22 foot long lounge."
"Situated in this premier residential setting, with vehicular access from both Melton Road and Park Drive, a substantial detached bungalow with huge scope for further development (subject to planning). The site, amounting to 0.22 acre, offers private, mainly lawned gardens, with extensive parking ..."
" Strike is pleased to present this spacious  5 bedroom property on a  secluded south facing plot approaching  1/4 acre, in the village of Norton .  A private driveway  and double detached garage provide ample parking  for  several cars. The entrance hall give..."
"Guide Price £525,000 - £550,000. haart Doncaster welcomes to the market this beautiful three double bedroom detached family cottage in the very heart of Hickleton. This home sits on a spacious plot, with stunning views at rear, ample parking for multiple vehicles and fully exposed beams throughout"
"Occupying an enviable corner position on this sought after roadway within Sprotbrough village is this immaculately presented three bedroom detached bungalow. The property in brief comprises; reception hallway, dual aspect lounge with feature fireplace, stunning open plan kitchen/dining room with..."
This four bedroomed detached property located in the much sought after Green Park estate has been extended by the current owner and now offers two en suite facilities to three Bedrooms and is an ideal family home lying close to the town centre of Bawtry off Tickhill Road and with woodland walks t...
A beautifully renovated four bedroom period property set within extremely private mature grounds located in the desirable town of Bawtry. 
"Pasture View - A new build five bedroom, four bathroom detached house with garage in a private gated development of four executive homes."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... ""This is a lovely spacious family home with a great size garden. The kitchen has been the hub of..."
Currently under offer but still available for viewings due to chain. A one of a kind individually designed executive style home over four floors providing a touch of class with a double garage. The property is beautifully located in a conservation area facing Regent Square and has No Onward Chain!
"Corn View - A new build five bedroom, four bathroom detached house with garage in a private gated development of four executive homes."
"GUIDE PRICE-£500,000-£525,000. This stunning and individually designed three bedroom family home provides a range of living accommodation throughout and has a beautiful entrance and hallway. Tucked away on an exclusive position and benefits from having an open living kitchen diner."
Blundells are pleased to bring to the market this unique and immaculately presented rural detached property located in the outskirts of Moss is the perfect family home. An internal inspection is essential to truly appreciate the contemporary high specification of decor and the rural outlook that...
"*** GUIDE PRICE £500,000 - £525,000 *** Standing in approx. 1/4 of an acre private gardens, on the fringe of Sprotbrough Village, a lovely 4 bedroom detached house with a detached garage and gym."
"This is an absolutely outstanding detached family home, renovated and re fitted to exceptional standards throughout, and enjoying the benefit of a substantial plot. The accommodation briefly comprises of; elegant reception hall/study, lounge with feature fireplace, spacious formal dining room wit..."
"A stunning fivecbedroom detached family home with private driveway offering spacious, well-designed family accommodation which provides relaxing rural living with stunning views."
"SIMPLY STUNNING - Family homes don't get much bigger or better than this, with FIVE bedrooms and THREE bathrooms this is a quality home. Sought after residential area. Large driveways and substantial lawned gardens. NO CHAIN. Easy M18/M180/M62 motorway links. Viewing Essential. "
*** SIMPLY STUNNING *** *** MUST BE VIEWED TO APPRECIATE THE ACCOMMODATION ON OFFER *** ***SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION WITH CANAL AT BOTTOM OF GARDEN*** *** THREE RECEPTION ROOMS *** *** DOWNSTAIRS BATHROOM *** *** GARDEN ROOM *** *** BAR/GAMES ROOM AREA *** *** IDYLLIC LOCATION *** *MOORING RI...
"HEAVEN IS A PLACE ON EARTH! Standing proud in this prestigious court off of Minneymoor lane, arguably one of Conisbrough's most sought after roads - Newlands House really does have the wow factor. Bursting with elegance & a high specification throughout - an internal viewing is simply a must!"
An individual Detached 3 Bedroomed House (including option of first floor self contained suite)
IMPRESSIVELY PROPORTIONED FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM DETACHED - GENEROUS PLOT PROVIDING BEAUTIFUL ESTABLISHED GARDENS - DELIGHTFUL OUTLOOK OVER THE VILLAGE - IMPRESSIVE BASEMENT WORKSHOP AND TANDEM GARAGE - POTENTIAL FOR APPROXIMATELY 1000 SQ FT ADDITIONAL ACCOMMODATION AT BASEMENT LEVEL - EXCELLENT ...
"We are pleased to present this two-bedroom terraced house located in the town of Mexborough, Doncaster. The property consists of – Lounge, Dining Room, Kitchen, 2 Bedrooms and a Bathroom. This property is a charming, terraced house with modern features, located close to local sh..."
"GUIDE PRICE - £500,000 - £515,000 , NO CHAIN - A stunning 4/5 bedroom detached family property offering ready to move into accommodation. Located on this prestigious Bawtry Road the property is ideally placed for walking distance of schools and shops. Briefly comprises: elegant hall with churc..."
"View now to avoid disappointment stunning detached home set in sought after village location, with five double bedrooms, en-suite to bedroom one, three reception rooms and modern fitted kitchen with utility. Low maintenance gardens, ample parking and large detached garage."
"An impressive and spacious stone built five bedroom detached property situated in a superb position on the sought after Sunderland Street. This imposing home boasts many stunning features such as a high quality breakfast kitchen dining room with appliances, and feature inglenook fireplace, spacio..."
"Only by viewing this unique property in popular village of Hatfield, with almost ONE ACRES OF land can you appreciate all the extra's you acquire with the main residence ie Bar, Hot Tub Spa area with sliding roof, workshop, kitchen/office. Multiple business prospects and opportunity to keep li..."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website...  ""We have loved living here. The house is particularly spacious and accommodating – with r..."
"105% PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE ON THIS HOME*
Now available to view! Please call to arrange an exclusive tour of The Dunstanburgh today. Don't miss out on this beautiful home!
The Dunstanburgh is a th"
"This exceptional five bedroom detached family home situated over three floors with four reception rooms, three en-suites/jack and Jill, a Juliet balcony and dressing room. Situated on grounds of its own with a detached double garage, a South facing rear garden and office/garden room."
Sure to appeal to many is this spectacular seven bedroom detached residence sitting in the peaceful village of Kirk Bramwith and benefiting from stunning countryside views. This home has been heavily extended and benefits from an attached but private annexe with two large bedrooms! Viewing required.
"A unique opportunity to purchase a truly stunning barn conversion offering well proportioned and immaculately presented accommodation throughout. The property in brief comprises; entrance hallway, lounge with feature dual fuel burning stove, dining room, kitchen/breakfast room, utility room, show..."
"An exclusive development of Six 3 and 4 bedroom sympathetically restored barn conversions in a courtyard setting. Prices from £495,000"
"Imagine an old village post office, then dial forward 100 years or so, and now you this large extended, contemporary styled 5 bedroom, 3 bathroom detached house set in beautiful gardens with a double garage and a garden studio…….."
"This beautifully presented four bedroom detached characterful home is situated in the sought after location of High Melton with spacious living accommodation. The property has a well-presented enclosed rear garden, a driveway and garage."
"YOPA Doncaster present this gorgeous, contemporary and stylish home which must be viewed to be appreciated. Sure to wow all potential purchasers; this home has been fully renovated to the highest standard throughout with even the smallest details thought about. Contact YOPA to arrange a viewing."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... We've had an amazing time growing our family in this lovely home. Now is the time to move on and let ..."
A TRULY STUNNING FAMILY HOME featuring a DOUBLE STOREY EXTENSION to the rear coupled with a generous garden. Lying within an extremely popular residential suburb on a sough after road benefitting from 2 reputable primary schools nearby as well as a host of local amenities at the Nostell Place. ...
"A rare opportunity to purchase a well presented four double bedroom executive detached house. The property in brief comprises; inviting entrance hallway, lounge, formal dining room, stunning open plan kitchen/dining room with a range of integrated appliances, family room, utility room and cloaks..."
"We are proud to offer this Four Bedroom Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.GUIDE PRICE - £480,000-500,000"
"PERFECT HOUSE, PERFECT LOCATION. Situated in this picturesque village location whilst still being well placed for schools, country walks & restaurants - this detached home will wow you the moment you step through the door. Ticking all the boxes of family living - CALL US NOW!"
"An extremely rare opportunity has arisen to acquire this unique EXTENDED FIVE bedroom family home with WATERFRONT position, MOORING and stunning COUNTRYSIDE VIEWS. Call Your Move for a viewing or take a virtual tour."
"GUIDE PRICE £475,000 - £500,000 *** SUPERB PROPERTY *** *** STANDING ON A GOOD SIZED PLOT *** *** STONE BUILT DETACHED PROPERTY *** *** IMMACULATELY DECORATED THROUGHOUT *** *** MASTER BEDROOM WITH EN-SUITE FACILITIES *** *** REMOTE CONTROL GATES *** *** SET IN THIS IDYLLIC LOCATION *** *..."
A large well appointed 6 bedroom detached house standing in equally large mature gardens offering exceptional contemporary styled family living.
"A stunning 4 bedroom barn conversion offering deceptively spacious accommodation whilst occupying a pleasant spot within the village of Wadworth. Appointed to a high standard the family home comprises: hall, cloaks/wc, sizeable study, formal dining room and attractive lounge with feature gas fir..."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website...Sold with no forwarding chain is this spacious detached three bed bungalow.  The property ..."
"Occupying an enviable elevated position on approximately 0.5 acres is this spacious, well presented four bedroom detached bungalow. The property in brief comprises; reception hallway, large triple aspect lounge/dining room, kitchen/dining room, sitting room/formal dining room, master bedroom wit..."
"MIRROR MIRROR ON THE WALL, WHO IS THE FAIREST OF THEM ALL! Prepared to be wowed from the moment you step through the door of this absolutely stunning stone built character property. Words simply don't do justice of the sheer elegance, size & stunning views this family home offers."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £475,000 - £495,000 *** A very spacious contemporary styled 4 double bedroom, 3 bath detached house with a detached double garage in prime residential Bessacarr close to all the amenities and school."
This three-bedroom detached Dorma bungalow is being offered to the market with no chain complications and early viewing is strongly advised to avoid disappointment. Having a large garden to the rear there is scope to extend the property further with suitable planning permissions whilst the accomm...
"*3 SHOWHOMES NOW OPEN* The Sandringham features a light and airy kitchen with skylights and bi-folding doors leading to the rear garden, a separate utility, spacious lounge with French doors and a dining room that could be used as a snug or home office. Upstairs are 5 double bedrooms."
"This beautifully presented four bedroom detached family home is situated in a cul-de-sac location with ample off street parking and a generous rear garden. The property has a modern kitchen diner, two reception rooms, an en-suite to the master bedroom and a double garage."
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN MUST BE VIEWED, MOVE IN READY *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! STUNNING 4 BEDROOM EXECUTIVE DETACHED FAMILY HOME, NOT TO BE MISSED, IDEAL FOR GROWING FAMILIES, spacious accommodation, BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED, gas central heating, double gla..."
"Situated on a small, select cul de sac, off Thorne Road, a most impressive, larger style detached family home, presented and appointed to exceptional standards throughout. Enjoying a generous plot, with double garage, and further driveway providing plenty of off road parking. Briefly comprising;..."
VIEWING ESSENTIAL to appreciate the size of this FIVE bedroom DETACHED house with double garage located in a small hamlet. With flexible accommodation this would make great family home with generous sized rooms.
"Hunters are delighted to offer to the market this well presented four bedroom detached property in a quiet cul de sac location in the Village of Finningley. Finningley lies on the A614 between Bawtry and Thorne and is six miles south east of Doncaster with amenities including Doctors Surgery, Po..."
"*** £465,000 *** THIS IS A RARE OPPORTUNITY TO OWN A SIX BEDROOM PROPERTY IN THE CENTRE OF HATFIELD!! With a beautifully presented interior, a tree lined shared drive way, enclosed gardens and ample living space VIEWING CAN NOT COME HIGHLY RECOMMENDED ENOUGH"
*3 SHOWHOMES NOW OPEN* 5% DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION IN MARCH. The Ganton is the perfect family home! The Master bedroom fills the entire second floor and is complete with DRESSING ROOM and EN-SUITE.
"An impressive and spacious four bedroom detached family home boasting beautiful and consistant presentation throughout with generous gardens, large conservatory and detached double garage. The property briefly comprises of ; reception hall, cloakroom, study, breakfast kitchen, utility room, sepa..."
"A superb 4 bedroom detached family home situated in this lovely position along Dadsley Road with countryside views, large living accommodation, breakfast kitchen, gas heating, double glazing, excellent decoration and fronted views towards a paddock. The property briefly comprises of ; entrance p..."
"This sizable five double bedroom detached family home offers spacious, well-presented accommodation throughout. The property has off road parking, front and rear gardens, paddock and stables to the rear and additional outbuilding."
"GUIDE PRICE - £450,000 - £475,000 - Stunning five bedroom property | Quality fixtures and fittings | Tastefully decorated throughout | Close to local amenities | A short walk from the train station which is on the main Leeds - Doncaster Line | Nearby ""Good"" Ofsted Schools"
A truly stunning property both internally and externally. Recently renovated and largely extended this 4 bedroom family home is appointed to the highest of specifications coupled with tasteful interior decor and lies within the idyllic village of Barnburgh offering views of the church. The acco...
"Hunters are delighted to offer this modern four bedroom detached property in a cul de sac estate location in the Village of Finningley, which lies on the A614 between Bawtry and Thorne and being six miles south east of the city of Doncaster. The village has amenities including Doctors Surgery, P..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £450,000 TO £475,000*** This very well presented bungalow is located Bawtry rwithin easy reach of a wide range of amenities including various wine bars and restaurants, individual shops and boutiques, convenience stores, doctors surgery and a reputable primary ..."
"This deceptive detached bungalow is nestled in a prime position in the sought after Bessacarr area of Doncaster and is sure to impress on your visit. Boasting generous sized rooms throughout, with so much on offer we strongly advise a full inspection."
"A rather rare and unique opportunity awaits the buyer of this period detached house standing in approx 3/4 of an acre which includes a pony paddock, stables, plus an attached outbuilding which is commercially let to a veterinary practice."
"A rare opportunity to purchase an immaculately presented 4 bedroom detached house occupying an enviable position on this sought after roadway within Bessacarr. The property in brief comprises; entrance hallway, cloaks/WC, dual aspect lounge with feature fireplace, family room, study/bedroom 5, c..."
"Occupying a delightful village position; presented to an exceptional standard throughout resulting from a recent renovation programme, the building offers exceptional proportions which includes a stunning three bedroom apartment."
"The four bedroom Kingham is an ideal family home, with generous rooms, a practical layout and integral garage."
"Occupying a delightful village position; presented to an exceptional standard throughout resulting from a recent renovation programme, the building offers exceptional proportions which includes a stunning three bedroom apartment.
"
"GUIDE PRICE £450,000 - £475,000 -TAKE ME TO CHURCH! This is a stunning family home set in the highly sought after village of Harlington - a beautiful place to call home! Boasting stunning living areas throughout & formal gardens surrounding with an extensive driveway & garage! CALL NOW!"
This substantial FIVE BEDROOM detached family home set over three floors with a garage and off road parking. The property is situated in the highly desirable village of Bessacarr.
"Deceptively spacious 3 bedroom extended detached bungalow, situated within the popular residential area of Bawtry. Comprising of an En-Suite, Superb four piece bathroom, kitchen diner, lounge, study. generous gardens, driveway detached garage. Viewing Advised EPC Rating C."
"**MUST SEE** On offer: a THREE-BED PROPERTY on a 3-ACRE PLOT with a KITCHEN-DINER, TWO RECEPTION ROOMS and SEVERAL OUTBUILDINGS including STABLES. Enjoys OPEN FIELD VIEWS. *CLICK NOW!*"
"**PRIVATE GATED PLOT!!** FIVE DOUBLE BEDROOM detached home now on the market offering spacious living, attached garage and off street parking. Situated on the popular Dominion estate and sold with NO CHAIN. **CLICK NOW!!**"
"This four bedroom detached property is located in a quiet cul de sac estate location in the popular village of Finningley and demands an EARLY INSPECTION to appreciate the family home on offer. The property benefits from additional features including solar panels, gas central heating and double ..."
"This spacious 3-bed detached property is certainly one not to be missed, offered with no chain. Situated in the extremely sought-after location of Old Campsall, close to all local amenities, transport links, schools, and colleges.  This property was previously the old police house and sti..."
"Spacious family home with annex set in sought after village location with superb canal views and on a generous sized plot, book your viewing now to fully appreciate this wonderful home."
A great opportunity to purchase a 4 bedroom modern family home situated on this modern development. This spacious property offers a layout conducive with modern day family living coupled with quality fixtures and fittings.. Comprises: entrance hall with a herringbone detailed Karndean floor cove...
*3 SHOWHOMES NOW OPEN* The Belfry features bi-folding leading to the garden. The kitchen has a central island and there is a separate utility and study. Upstairs the luxurious master suite has a dressing room and ensuite. *5% deposit contribution when you reserve any home at The Meadows in March.
*3 SHOWHOMES NOW OPEN* The Belfry features bi-folding leading to the garden. The kitchen has a central island and there is a separate utility and study. *5% DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION WHEN YOU RESERVE IN MARCH
"Tucked away in a secluded position, just off Sunderland Street, a uniquely styled barn conversion offering well proportioned accommodation throughout. Enjoys a great deal of original charm and character whilst being complemented with a modern interior. Single garage, further private parking, low ..."
"Standing in delightful private grounds, amounting to around one third of an acre, this well proportioned detached bungalow has been individually designed and constructed to a high specification. Although in need of some upgrading, there is huge potential to further improve and create a fantastic ..."
NEW TO MARKET... MUST VIEW... A well proportioned detached family home offering flexible living accommodation finished to a high standard throughout.
"VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED on this extended large family home, the property benefits from good size living and benefits from 4 bedrooms, ensuite, 2 living rooms, dining room and conservatory. There is also a driveway, garage and good sized, well presented rear garden. Close to local amenities. "
"A SPACIOUS and MODERN home in Cantley, available CHAIN FREE ideal for EXECUTIVES or GROWING FAMILIES. Call for details!Bettermove are proud to present this 4 bedroom end of terrace house in Cantley, Doncaster available with no forward chain. The property benefits from double..."
Luxury four bedroom detached property available with the wow factor!  Call our Thorne Office now to arrange viewing!
"An truly stunning family home appointed to a high specification offering vast accommodation arranged over 3 floors. Ideally situated with access to the A1 motorway networks, local amenities, nurseries and schools closeby. The fantastic accommodation comprises: hallway with storage, cloaks/wc, i..."
"Substantial FIVE bedroom, THREE bathroom detached family house. Stunning living/kitchen/dining room, Lounge, Utility/study, Gym and large garage. Generous rear garden. Internal viewing essential to appreciate size and immaculate accommodation."
"A deceptively spacious detached family home offering well proportioned living accommodation set over two floors. The property occupies an enviable elevated position and is located within the heart of the desirable rural village of Braithwell, giving excellent commuting links via both road and ..."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website...Beautiful large family home in a secluded cul de sac ideally positioned and within a fantastic sc..."
"NO UPWARD CHAIN.......Enjoying a lovely cul-de-sac position within the village, a very substantial 4 double bedroom detached bungalow with a lovely South-Westerly facing rear garden and a detached double garage."
"Located a short walk into central Tickhill, in a secluded position adjacent to the church, a charming two bedroom cottage offering excellent first time buyer accommodation or potential Investment opportunity!. Briefly comprises; lounge / dining room, fitted kitchen with walk in store. 1st floor; ..."
This exceptional four bedroom detached family home is ideal for an extended or growing family situated on a generous plot. The property has a superb range of family living space.
Stonehaven is a spacious three bedroom detached bungalow offering an ideal opportunity for redevelopment along with the potential for development within the grounds subject to the necessary planning consents.
RESERVE TODAY - READY SOON!!!!!! Tucked away BEHIND Hatfield's Church you will find these two hidden gems. These are HIGH SPEC EXECUTIVE  Brand New FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS floor Family Homes are arranged over THREE FLOORS accessed via a private block paved road with all the nearby attraction...
"GUIDE PRICE-£425,000-£450,000. Situated in the Saxon village of Burghwallis is this charming and deceptive five bedroom three storey unique and characterful cottage which enjoys a delightful and generous rear garden on 1/2 an acre with superb elevated views to the rear over open countryside."
"A vastly extended five bedroom detached family home situated on this ever popular residential development. Deceiving from the exterior, only through internal viewing can the size of this property be truly appreciated. Appointed to an extremely high standard together with an open plan layout this..."
"Guide Price £425,000-£450,000. Situated in Bessacarr on this highly sought after Warren Park Charles Church development is this five bedroom executive style detached family home. The property is tucked away on a cul de sac location with a beautiful landscaped rear garden."
"A rare opportunity to acquire a Victorian house, which has been sympathetically renovated and now provides a stunning family home with scope to improve. Located in a sought-after area of Doncaster, close to the city centre and its wide range of amenities, transport links and close proximity to DRI. "
"A great opportunity to purchase a fantastic family home occupying an enviable position on this sought after residential road, Brought to the market with no chain and featuring a sizeable extension to the ground floor this property must be viewed to appreciate the accommodation on offer. Compris..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000 *** Located in the heart of the Old Village a large stone built 5 bedroom, 2 bathroom detached house with a large 28’0 x 14’0 garage and a South facing rear garden."
"Offers in the Region of £420,000 This is an outstanding family home, located in an ever popular location, with easy access to Doncaster, the motorway network and local amenities. Briefly comprises; entrance hall, cloaks /WC, lounge, sitting room(office or playroom), formal dining room, qualit..."
We are proud to present this Four Bedroom Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.
A truly stunning 4 bedroom executive family home occupying a convenient position within walking distance of local schools and amenities including bus stop nearby. Built in 2021 this property has a show home feel with several upgrades and boasts ready to move into accommodation. Set within a pop...
"GUIDE PRICE £415,000 - £425,000 Occupying an enviable cul de sac position is this stunning five bedroom detached family property which has been renovated to a high specification throughout. The property in brief comprises; entrance hallway, cloaks/WC, lounge, formal dining room, bedroom..."
Enjoying a substantial plot in a prime location this large three bedroom detached bungalow has plenty to offer buyers and is beautifully presented throughout. The property is set back from the main road boasting a very long driveway large enough for several vehicles. Upon entry you are greeted by...
"An outstanding six double bedroom, three storey luxury home offering impressive and versatile family living accommodation. With stylish and modern fixtures and fittings, boasting a modern dining kitchen with built in appliances and open plan access to the summer room. Matching utility room, wal..."
"VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED* Guide Price £400,000 - £415,000 - A simply stunning family home both aesthetically speaking and in the versatility, and size. It's not everyday you get to own the fairy-tale house with stunning views, private outdoor space, and oodles of charm and char..."
"William H Brown Thorne are proud to present to the market this one of kind four bedroom detached bungalow in the heart of Thorne!! Boasting spacious living throughout, an acre (approx.) of land, off-street parking & double garage! Viewing by appointment only, essential to appreciate this property!!"
"GUIDE PRICE-£410,000-£430,000. Tucked away within an exclusive development overlooking local countryside. This four bedroom stunning barn conversion perfect for those seeking idyllic countryside lifestyle with a wrapped around garden positioned on a corner plot with picturesque views."
"An outstanding and extended four double bedroom detached family home boasting a sensational bespoke summer room opening into larger than average sun trap gardens. Comprising ; reception hall, cloakroom wc, sitting room, dining kitchen with open plan summer room, utility room, first floor landing..."
"Fantastic Four bedroom detached family home with stunning garden and integral double garage. Located on a quiet cul-de-sac only a short distance from excellent schools, local amenities, and transport links. Arranged over two floors, this property is an ideal family home briefly compr..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£410,000-£430,000. This superb four bedroom detached family home is tucked away within a peaceful cul-de-sac in the popular location of Cadeby. The property has a generous rear garden, a double driveway and a double garage."
"5 bedroom home. DESIGN-LED OPEN PLAN living. 2 LARGE BEDROOMS with EN SUITES and FULL HEIGHT TILING. DESIGNER KITCHEN, INTEGRATED APPLIANCES. "
"The Merion has a wonderful open plan kitchen/diner with central island, integrated Bosch appliances and French doors leading to the rear garden. There is a spacious lounge with bay window. * 5% DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION WHEN YOU RESERVE ANY HOME AT THE MEADOWS IN MARCH"
"We are proud to offer this Four Bedroom Detached House - all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. *GUIDE PRICE - £405,000 - £430,000*"
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website...Lovely family home with plenty of space for all to enjoy.   The property is situated ..."
"*3 SHOWHOMES NOW OPEN* * The Merion has a wonderful open plan kitchen/diner with central island, integrated Bosch appliances and French doors leading to the rear garden. There is a spacious lounge with bay window and a separate, handy utility. "
"This gated four bedroom architect designed stone built detached family home is situated within grounds of its own with a range of spacious accommodation, an en-suite, a beautiful open plan living kitchen diner, a gated driveway and a double garage."
If you're looking for space and versatile accommodation in a highly desirable area then look no further! Early viewing highly recommended to avoid disappointment.
*FOR SALE BY CONDITIONAL AUCTION ENDING 27th March 2023 at 2pm* GREAT BUILDING AND DEVELOMENT POTENTIAL. Approx. 3.25 acres in total. - Three bedroom detached bungalow with two wide road frontages. Sought after village. 
"**FANTASTIC** On offer: a WELL-PRESENTED FOUR-BED PROPERTY with GREAT OUTSIDE SPACE in a POPULAR LOCATION. Comes with TWO RECEPTION SPACES, an OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN-DINER and more. **CLICK NOW!**"
"GUIDE PRICE-£400,000-£425,000. A fabulous spacious four bedroom detached family home which is located in the popular location of Campsall. The property enjoys an enviable position on this desirable cul-de-sac and has pleasant views of the village church."
"NEW Guide Price £400,000 - £410,000 A rare opportunity to purchase a spacious family home set within generous and secure grounds, a short drive from schools, shops and restaurants in the towns & villages of Bawtry, Tickhill and Harworth. "
"3Keys Property are delighted to present to the open sales market, this deceptively spacious 4 bedroom family home in Bessacarr, Doncaster.  This modern family home must be viewed to be appreciated and there is further scope for development as planning permission has been granted for a 2 s..."
SUPERB EXTENDED DETACHED PROPERTY WITH LARGE POOL ROOM OVERLOOKING THE GARDEN. This is the perfect property for a family who like spacious living accommodation and it has the WOW factor with the large extension on the rear of the house providing an L-shaped versatile space perfect for entertainin...
Nestled in the popular village location of Norton is this beautifully presented four bedroom detached dorma bungalow with ample off street parking and a double garage.
"## Immaculate Four Bedroom, Two Bathroom Detached Bungalow with a self contained Annexe ## You can move straight into this spacious, extended and beautifully presented four bedroom, two bathroom detached bungalow that is offered with no chain and is located in this quiet street with Quarry Park..."
"A beautiful detached family home set in a quiet cul-de-sac location in Edenthorpe. This bespoke home benefits from five bedrooms, a spacious family dining kitchen and a stunning garden that is a winner of the Doncaster in Bloom Awards. This is a truly unique home and early viewing would be recomm..."
A unique three/four bedroom detached family home which is situated in approximately 1/3 of an acre (not measured) in the sought after village of Barnby Dun.
"£400,000-£425,000. VILLAGE LIFE AT IT'S FINEST! Situated in this highly sought after village, this four bedroom detached makes the perfect family home. Boasting beautifully presented accommodation throughout yet still bursting with character & charm - Words simply don't do this justice - CALL NOW!"
"**GREAT FAMILY HOME** On offer: a SPACIOUS FOUR-BED HOUSE in a POPULAR VILLAGE with THREE RECEPTION SPACES, THREE BATHROOMS, a REAR GARDEN and more. HIGHLY RECOMMENDED: **CLICK NOW!**"
"GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £425,000 - This large family home has AMPLE SPACE with OPEN PLAN Kitchen/Living and WALNUT FLOORING. 2 EN-SUITES, 2 Bathrooms and a downstairs WC. Front garden with DOUBLE WIDTH DRIVEWAY and Integral Garage. ENCLOSED SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN, wraparound deck and HOT TUB. Ne..."
"Reeds Rains are delighted to market for sale with NO CHAIN, this superb 5 bedroom detached family home, situated at the head of the cul de sac, in the popular residential area of Auckley. Three storey living, south facing rear garden, JUST MOVE IN CONDITION. Double garage, double driveway. EPC Ra..."
"This fabulous extended four bedroom detached family home is located close to a wide range of local amenities and excellent transport links. The property offers spacious well-presented living accommodation throughout, off road parking, an enclosed open aspect rear garden and a garage."
Reeds Rains are delighted to offer for sale with No Onward chain this three bedroom detached property which sits on a good sized plot located on a private cul-de-sac in the popular area of Conisbrough. EPC Rating D.
Superb Opportunity - SPACIOUS FOUR bedroom DETACHED dormer bungalow with substantial former CAR/MECHANIC GARAGE sold as a whole. FREEHOLD. Prominent main road position. VIEWING STRICTLY BY APPOINTMENT ONLY.
"A large 6 bedroom 3 storey detached family home having been stylishly presented with breakfast kitchen, spacious lounge, ensuite to the main bedroom, gas heating, double glazing, cul de sac position. The property briefly comprises ; hallway, downstairs wc, bay window lounge, dining room, breakfa..."
"An extremely well presented and spacious three bedroom detached bungalow with generous landscaped gardens and double garage, situated in a desirable and impressive location. The property briefly comprises of entrance hall, breakfast kitchen, sitting room, formal dining room, conservatory, three ..."
"We are pleased to welcome this two bedroomed stone built end terrace cottage, briefly comprising - living room, kitchen, two bedrooms and family bathroom. The outside offers a rear yard and patio area."
An impressive five bedroom detached home. A kitchen dining space made for entertaining. Combined with three floors of unapologetic luxury.
This property is around 400 years old so Early 1600's. Plot size circa 3/4 acres and has a swimming pool and 5 car garage. This property is NOT listed in any way! But would escalate in value if listed after thorough refurbishment!!*
"A deceptively spacious four bedroom semi-detached property having been renovated and extended to create a lovely family home. The property benefits from ample private parking, lawned gardens and seating areas along with a detached double garage."
" Offered for sale with No Onward Chain is this Beautifully Presented Detached Family Home set within the desirable and semi-rural village location of Braithwell. Occupying a generous corner plot position, this property has further potential to extend, with planning permission being previously gr..."
The Pinehurst features a stunning open plan kitchen/diner complete with bi-folding doors leading to the garden and a large lounge with bay window. Upstairs are 4 double bedrooms. 
"With over 200 square meters of accommodation on offer, this entirely renovated and extended property enjoys a large plot with non-overlooked views and a secluded feel. This property ticks all the boxes in a prestigious position on Station Road. "
"GUIDE PRICE-£390,000-£400,000. Situated in the desirable location of Bessacarr, this five bedroom double fronted semi-detached family home is positioned on a substantial plot with a privately enclosed generous rear garden, ample off road parking and a double garage. Available with no onward chain."
"3D Virtual Tour Available-Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website..."
"Guide Price £390,000 - £400,000. A fantastic opportunity to purchase a large style 4 bedroom detached family home. Offering generous accommodation on a sizeable plot and lying within easy reach of local shops, schools and motorway networks this property must be viewed. Comprising; hall with cl..."
"Guide Price £390,000 - £400,000 If you are looking for the next step up the property ladder this fabulous EXTENDED detached home would be perfect. Located in the ever popular area of Campsall. The property offers bags of space and would be ideal for a growing family. Call now to view"
"Guide Price £390,000-£420,000. Situated on a substantial plot in the prime location of Green Lane, this three bedroom detached bungalow has spacious living accommodation throughout. The property is immaculately presented to include a beautiful kitchen living/diner over 32 feet with bi-folding doors."
"A well presented 4 bedroom family house in the sought after village of Tickhill, Lying within walking distance of reputable schools the accommodation benefits from downstairs cloakroom, spacious lounge leading into conservatory overlooking the rear garden, recently fitted dining kitchen. There a..."
"THE PINEHURST features a stunning open plan kitchen/diner complete with bi-fold doors leading to the garden and a large lounge with bay window. Upstairs are 4 double bedrooms, en-suite and 4 piece bathroom. "
"Reeds Rains are delighted to offer For Sale this superb, extended three bedroom detached bungalow located within the popular area of Green Lane, Scawthorpe. Modern and immaculately presented throughout, briefly comprising of an entrance hall, open plan kitchen/living/diner, en-suite shower room,..."
"A spacious and much improved four bedroom detached bungalow, extended to create superb family living accommodation within a sought after corner plot position with double driveway and detached garage. Comprising ; entrance hall, dining kitchen, lounge, conservatory, four bedrooms, ensuite and bat..."
"3Keys Property are delighted to offer this immaculately presented, 4 double bedroom detached property to the open market. Situated on this highly sought after development in Auckley, Doncaster, this property has open aspect views to the front and offers everything for the growing family. To vi..."
5% DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION IN MARCH. This plot comes includes floor tiling to wet rooms and is READY TO MOVE IN THIS SPRING* The Hamilton is a spacious home with 2 bay windows in the open plan kitchen/diner and French doors from the lounge leading to the rear garden. 
5% DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION WHEN YOU RESERVE ANY HOME IN MARCH* THE HAMILTON features a spacious open plan kitchen/diner with 2 bay windows and integrated Bosch appliances included as standard
WOW FACTOR! Looking for a large detached new build home ready to move into then this gorgeous property is for you. Sitting on a small complex of only 5 properties Plot 1 benefits from the highest quality fixtures and fittings throughout. Contact YOPA Doncaster for further information.
"This charming and characterised four bedroom detached family home benefits from having a kitchen diner, spacious living accommodation, en suite and home office. The property is tucked away with an exclusive private road situated in the heart of Auckley village."
"SUPERB DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH FABULOUS FIELD VIEWS AND BEAUTIFUL PRESENTATION THROUGHOUT. This lovely property benefits from stunning views and is positioned in a quiet location, perfect for a family in search of a more rural lifestyle. Accommodation is spread over three floors and offers fant..."
We are proud to offer this Three Bedroom Detached Chalet Bungalow – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.
"GUIDE RPICE £380,000- £425,000 - An exceptional 4 bedroom period semi-detached property located central to Doncaster centre with a host of amenities on the doorstep including, cafes, restaurants, schools, bus and train links. Having recently undergone a full renovation project this property has ..."
"This is a fantastic opportunity to make an excellent investment in a much sought-after property type. A beautifully proportioned detached bungalow, located near the centre of the village of Braithwell, this property will make the perfect project for any buyer seeking to add significant value to t..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase a deceptively large four bedroom detached house sitting in a quiet Cul-de-Sac in a very popular area of Doncaster. Located close to good local amenities, excellent commuter routes and schools."
***SIMPLY STUNNING***UNIQUELY DESIGNED***EXTREMELY ENERGY EFFICIENT RATING B***OWNED SOLAR PANELS ***SPECTACULAR VIEWS***CONTEMPORARY LIVING***NEWLY FITTED FLOORING THROUGHOUT***FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM DETACHED MEWS***MASTER BEDROOM & BEDROOM TWO WITH ENSUITE***LUXURY BATHROOMS***CONTEMPORARY KITCHEN...
"WOW AN ABSOLUTE MUST VIEW! Sitting in a gated community away from the road, on the popular Dominion Estate is this immaculate four double bedroom detached home ideal for growing families. Sitting within walking distance of local shops, eateries and schools this home is perfectly placed for all."
4 bedroom home featuring EXCLUSIVE designer kitchen. Open plan living with FRENCH and BIFOLD doors. Main bedroom includes EN SUITE with TILING.
"*** GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £395,000 *** A beautiful period styled 1 1/2 storey double fronted bungalow with a large rear garden and garage on this highly regarded and very desirable residential roadway."
"CHAIN FREE.......Situated at the end of a private lane, a gorgeous individually built 11/2 storey, 3 bedroom detached bungalow with a double garage/workshop and private gardens."
"An outstanding four double bedroom stone built detached property situated in a very pleasant position boasting superb presentation throughout with corner plot gardens. Comprising of; Reception hall, sitting room, snug, ground floor cloakroom, open plan dining kitchen family room, first floor la..."
"A superbly spacious property which has original features throughout. We were blown away as soon as we entered this property and you can immediately feel the grandness of it. Over three floors, the top being originally purposed as the servants quarters, there is so much to see. This is a very p..."
"FOR SALE BY ONLINE AUCTION ON 4TH MAY2023. ALL INTERESTED PARTIES ARE ADVISED TO DOWNLOAD A COPY OF THE LEGAL PACK FROM THE AUCTIONEERS regionalpropertyauctioneers.co.uk. ONLINE BIDDING WILL ALSO BE VIA regionalpropertyauctioneers.co.uk GUIDE PRICE £375,000+ A freehold development site of appox..."
"A spacious and well presented two/three bedroom detached bungalow situated in a highly regarded cul de sac position with sun trap rear garden, garage and off road parking. The property briefly comprises of ; entrance hall with storage, breakfast kitchen and entrance lobby, sitting room, three be..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £385,000 ** A great opportunity to purchase this attractive four bedroom detached home which must be viewed to fully appreciate how much is on offer. Located in the picturesque village of Braithwell and available with no upward chain this one will not be around for long."
SUPERB FAMILY HOME LOCATED ON A SOUGHT AFTER STREET IN WHEATLEY HILLS OFFERING EXCELLENT ACCOMMODATION THAT IS BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED. A stunning home on Crossways that has been sympathetically updated and modernised and should be viewed to be fully appreciated. The house is well proportioned and ...
"**GREAT LOCATION** Three bedroom detached bungalow offering a detached garage, spacious living and a private rear garden. Located in the sought after market town of Bawtry close to many amenities, services and transport links. **CLICK NOW!!**"
"Looking for a brand new, affordable, energy efficient home? Then look no further. This fantastic new development built by Campbell Homes Ltd offers luxury family living offering five detached properties. Plot 4 is an impressive detached family home with garage offering a range of extras!"
"***A TRADITIONAL, SPACIOUS, STUNNINGLY PRESENTED SEMI DETACHED HOME***CORNER PLOT***FOUR BEDROOMS***ONE WITH ENSUITE***THREE RECEPTION ROOMS***MODERN BATHROOM & MODERN KITCHEN***DOWNSTAIRS WC/CLOAKROOM & UTILITY***LANDSCAPED PRIVATE REAR GARDEN***SHED FOR EXTERNAL STORAGE***HEAVY DUTY IRON GATES*..."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... Well presented family home with nothing to do, just bring your belongings and move straight into. The..."
"WILD THING - YOU MAKE MY HEART SING! Standing proud on this highly sought after modern development is this absolutely stunning five bedroom detached family home. Ticking all the boxes of family living with 2 en-suites, a drive, garage & a delightful lawned rear garden -NO CHAIN CALL US NOW TO VIEW!"
"Looking for a rare opportunity to purchase a fantastic detached new build property on a private development of only 5 properties? Look no further, this stunning detached home offers four double bedrooms, open plan kitchen/dining space and a range of stunning extras. Call to view or book online 24/7."
This well presented traditional period detached property in the village of Finningley demands early inspection to appreciate its features and benefits. Finningly lies on the A614 between Bawtry and Thorne and is six miles south east of Doncaster. The village has amenities including Doctors Surg...
"GUIDE PRICE-£370,000-£380,000. Viewing is essential to appreciate this spacious accommodation offered to the market. Situated in the sought after village of Norton is this four bedroom detached family home which is close to local amenities and transport links."
"3D Virtual Tour Available-Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... Excellent family home in a ideal location for local amenities and schools. Corner plot location w..."
"William H Brown Thorne are proud to present to the market this recently renovated home on an extremely sought after street in Thorne! Benefitting from stunning finishes throughout, off-street parking for multiple cars & integral garage, large private rear garden & much more! Viewing Essential!"
"Reeds Rains are delighted to offer for sale with No onward chain this well presented three bedroom detached bungalow located in the most desirable area of Bessacarr. With double garage, driveway and mature gardens. EPC Rating D. Viewing Advised."
"3D Virtual Tour Available - See when this property is available to view, and reserve your appointment quickly and easily via our website! Scotsman Drive is a beautiful home in the sought after location of Scawthorpe, on a very quiet estate with local shops and a school within walking dist..."
Families will adore this four bedroom detached family home with integral garage and classic design features. The large welcoming hallway has stylish double doors leading onto the luxurious living room with feature bay window that floods the room with light. There is a useful downstairs cl
"We are proud to offer this Four Bedroom Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £365,000 - £400,000*"
***HMO WITH COMMERCIAL PREMISES*** A fantastic opportunity has arisen with this nine bed hmo complete with commercial premises. If you are looking for the perfect investment that has been maintained to a high standard with many long term tenants is situ then look no further. 
"A fantastic 2 bedroom detached bungalow, renovated to a high specification and offering well-designed accommodation"
A striking five bedroom home over three floors. Quality and space throughout with a large lifestyle kitchen and garden views from a fabulous lounge. The master bedroom suite is simply awesome.
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase an immaculately presented and substantially extended four bedroom detached house situated close to reputable schools and local amenities. The property in brief comprises; entrance hallway, cloaks/wc, lounge with feature fireplace, dining room, conservatory, fa..."
"Occupying an enviable cul de sac position on this sought after roadway within Tickhill is this deceptively spacious and extended three bedroom detached bungalow. The property in brief comprises; entrance porch, shower room/WC, hallway, open plan kitchen/dining room, side porch, lounge, sitting r..."
"This charming, four bedroom detached home with integral garage is perfect for modern family living with space, style and quality throughout.
The large, welcoming hallway leads to the light and airy, luxuriously appointed living room, while at the heart of the property is an impre"
"A most impressive and beautifully presented four bedroom detached property situated in an extremely pleasant position at the entrance to this sought after residential area in Auckley. Offering spacious living accommodation with outdoor entertaining area, detached garage and off road parking. Com..."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... A stunning, detached, family home ideal for entertaining in the large open kitchen area, with se..."
"An EXCELLENT EXTENDED traditional three bedroom semi detached family home situated within the popular residential area of Bessacarr., briefly the home comprises of an entrance hall, dining room, extended lounge, downstairs WC/shower room and an extended kitchen, three good size bedrooms and famil..."
"A particularly high quality 3 bedroom detached bungalow, positioned on a good sized, private plot, within this ever sought after location. Briefly comprises; reception hall, well proportioned lounge, fitted dining kitchen with a range of integrated appliances, master bedroom, bedroom 2, third bed..."
"Guide Price: £350,000 - £360,000 .... Looking for the WOW FACTOR? Luxurious & stylish family accommodation on one level and ready to move into..."
"GUIDE PRICE- £350,000 - £375,000 This rare find four double bedroom detached family home provides spacious living accommodation throughout with mature and generous front and rear gardens, ample off road parking by an open drive and two garages. Ideal for a growing or extended family."
"REDUCED £350,000 - An opportunity to purchase a delightful 3 bedroom detached bungalow occupying a pleasant position on this sought after residential road. Appointed to a high specification and lying within easy reach of local recreational walks aswell as motorway connections this property must..."
"Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website...This beautiful high specification modern detached four bed property with privacy and versatile indoor/outdoor living can be found..."
"A traditional FOUR BEDROOM detached property offering huge potential to the new owners, providing spacious family living accommodation situated in a attractive position with GENEROUS GARDENS AND OPEN FARMLAND VIEWS. Comprising of ; entrance porch and lobby, sitting room, dining room, breakfast k..."
"A deceptively large four bedroom detached cottage located in the sought after village of Norton, close to schools, parks and excellent commuter links. Call now to arrange a viewing."
An absolute must view offering more than meets the eye! This beautifully presented three double bedroom family home sits in a private and secluded position nestled away from neighbouring properties. Benefiting from modern kitchen/breakfast room and large open plan living space with log burner.
"***OFFERS IN THE REGION OF £350,000***HILLSIDE- A LARGE EXECUTIVE DETACHED FAMILY RESIDENCE! A superb five bedroom detached family home located within delightful grounds on arguably one of Mexborough's most sought after roads! Viewing essential to appreciate this truly impressive property! CALL NOW!"
"A very attractive detached property with minimal work required to achieve an enviable level of modernisation throughout, this home is situated Conisbrough on the outskirts of Doncaster & Sheffield. Benefitting from endless peace and quiet, the property’s four bedrooms are beautifully appointed. ..."
"Sitting on this desirable road within this fantastic rural setting is this deceptively spacious detached bungalow with scope for extension! Sitting in approximately a third of an acre this property has private, enclosed rear gardens and a large detached garage with ample off street parking."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... We have thoroughly enjoyed living in this large bright home for nearly ten years. Ou..."
A rare opportunity has arisen to obtain this attractive self-build property located on a quiet cul-de-sac in the picturesque rural village of Braithwell. Beautifully presented both inside and out with a high specification finish and no upward chain. Early viewings are highly recommended.
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a traditional three bedroom semi detached house offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The property in brief comprises; entrance hallway with under stairs storage cupboard, open plan lounge/dining room and kitchen, three good sized bedrooms and family bathroom ..."
This beautiful three bedroom detached bungalow has been extensively renovated throughout and offers modern and stylish living which would suit a variety of different buyers. Viewings are absolutely essential to appreciate this deceptively spacious and immaculate accommodation. Call today to view!
"Offered with no forward chain this three bedroom detached bungalow offers generous family living accommodation with detached garage, garden office and impressive gardens with off road parking. The property comprises of ; reception hall, sitting room, breakfast kitchen, formal dining room/snug, co..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £350,000-£360,000 *** 3Keys Property are delighted to present to the open sales market, this immaculately presented, 4 double bedroom family home in Bessacarr, Doncaster.  Located just off Warnington Lane, the property boasts spacious living accommodation, a pr..."
This fabulous extended four bedroom detached family home is situated in this sought after location close to a wide range of local amenities and excellent transport links. The property benefits from having a good sized garden which is ideal for dining and entertaining.
****NEW TO THE MARKET...... A stunning three bedroom stone cottage in a picturesque village location.**** If you are looking to escape the hustle and bustle and are looking for a character property this charming cottage is a definite MUST SEE!! This quirky three bedroom stone cottage is situate...
"A truly stunning 3 bedroom extended bungalow appointed to an extremely high standard located on this ever popular residential road amongst neighbouring bungalows. Lying within easy reach of recreational walks, motorway access, Lakeside leisure complex and local shops this bungalow MUST BE VIEWED..."
"A stunning 4 bedroom detached family home having contemporary fixtures and fittings, beautiful garden room, open dining kitchen, double garage and fabulous outdoor living space. Comprises ; entrance hallway, downstairs wc, lounge, open dining kitchen with numerous appliances, garden room, study,..."
"This executive style four bedroom detached family home situated on the head of a cul-de-sac facing a communal green and situated on a generous plot. There is spacious living accommodation with a ground floor wet room and a first floor bathroom, off road parking and a garage. No chain."
"A detached dormer bungalow located on the popular Tree estate in Bawtry. With scope for modernidation, there is plenty of generous accommodation. The property is situated on a sizeable plot with plenty of off road parking & a garage. Offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN this property is not to be missed!"
An absolute must view! This deceptively spacious four bedroom detached family home occupies a huge plot on this quiet cul-de-sac and must be viewed to be appreciated. Having undergone a complete renovation from top to bottom with no stone left unturned this home is ready to move straight into.
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a charming detached cottage occupying an enviable position within the sought after suburb of Bessacarr. The property in brief comprises; entrance porch, lounge with feature log burning stove, formal dining room, fitted kitchen/breakfast room and shower room/WC..."
"9 INDIVIDUAL FLATS CURRENTLY GENERATING £46,920.16 PER ANNUM IN INCOME - Offered for Sale by Unconditional Online Auction opening 27 February 2023 - for more information visit auctionhouse.co.uk/lincolnshire"
"The Kirkdale is a popular 4 bedroom home, designed for modern family living. Discover a bright open-plan kitchen, with dining and family areas and French doors to the garden. You'll also benefit from a separate utility room. There's also bay-fronted lounge providing great space to relax. Upstair..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£350,000 - £360,000. This impressive and immaculately presented four bedroom detached family home provides spacious living accommodation throughout and an impressive enclosed south facing rear garden with ample off road parking and a garage."
"GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £360,000 LET YOUR FAMILY GROW! This delightful detached home offer space in abundance and would be ideal for a growing family. With the added extras of six bedrooms, conservatory, en-suite, good sized gardens and much more. NO ONWARD CHAIN"
Located in the rural village of Burghwallis with excellent access to the motorway networks such as the A1 and M18 is this spacious and well-presented three bedroom detached property with stunning open rural views. The property has been completely renovated by the current owners and is...
"Detached bungalow ccupying a delightful rural position on the fringe of the villages of Hatfield and Hatfield Woodhouse is this outstanding, family-sized extended three-bedroom, detached dormer bungalow. The property occupies a corner plot position with ample off-road driveway parking and a range..."
"The beautifully converted barn is the perfect family home offering ample space inside and out. The property also boasts beautiful periodic features such as wooden beams throughout. This home is situated in the extremely sought-after rural location of Skellow, close to all major transport links an..."
"""You know you've made it if you can get a house on The Sycamores"" is a phrase we have heard several times when speaking about this fantastic family home! This is a fantastic little estate which is like a little family or community itself, such a warm and welcoming, well kept family home and area...."
"## ATTENTION INVESTORS ## This substantial building has been converted into three, one bedroom and one, two bedroom self contained apartments with reliable tenants in-situ producing an income of £23,016pa with potential to increase this. Located close to the heart of this historical market town..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000 ** ****ARE YOU LOOKING FOR THE PEFECT FAMILY HOME .....Then this property is a MUST SEE....**** This five bedroomed family home is contemporary in design and immaculate throughout and one can move straight in. Perfectly positioned on this popular development i..."
"PRICE GUIDE £350,000-360,000. Four bedroom detached property located in an highly desirable location and providing ideal accommodation for a growing family"
Beautiful six bedroom detached property | Conservatory | Ample off street parking | Private garden to rear
"£1,000 monthly mortgage contributions paid for a whole year!. Available to view. Great location overlooking the lake. Includes Garage and Parking Space. Includes Intergrated appliances. Includes flooring package. Turf to rear garden. Window Blinds package. £1,000 towards legal fees PLUS MORE FREE..."
"Take a look at this 2 Bedroom Park Home, favourably positioned on this sought after site, with driveway, garage , 2 double bedrooms, bathroom and separate en suite, ready to move into..."
"A deceptively spacious 3 double bedroom detached dorma bungalow having quality fixtures and fittings, situated along this popular roadside, gas heating, double glazing, garage and gardens to the front and rear with a driveway. The property comprises of ; entrance hallway, dual aspect lounge, din..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £345,000 - £365,000 *** EXPECT THE UNEXPECTED….from the front it looks like an ordinary semi detached house, but from the back it’s exceptional…..with a large two storey rear extension and an adjacent 2 storey detached garden building this property needs to be viewed."
This beautifully presented two bedroom detached bungalow which is situated in the sought after location of Old Edlington. The property has spacious living accommodation throughout with fantastic views.
"*** VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED *** This spacious 4-bed detached property is certainly one not to be missed, Situated in the extremely sought-after location of Sprotborough, close to all local amenities, transport links and fantastic schools and colleges  Entering the property you step ..."
Includes 12 month mortgage contribution worth £6000! 4 bedroom home features OPEN PLAN living with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and BI-FOLDS. Main bedroom with EN SUITE.
"An abundance of space awaits you inside this ENERGY EFFICIENT, superior, exquisite, EXTENDED three / four bedroomed detached house. Completely remodelled and renovated to exacting standards and has magnificent kerb appeal!Ensconced in the heart of Hatfield, with it's elective of rural s..."
"This Stunning Detached Family Property has been extensively extended and completely renovated throughout. Creating a fantastic open plan family living and social area to the ground floor, perfectly complimenting the abundance of outdoor space also on offer. Providing the increasingly coveted “ins..."
"Wonderfully presented 4 bed detached house located in Doncaster, with a ground floor annex offering a 5th bedroom and separate living space Comprises of: Warm and welcoming entrance hallway Well-appointed kitchen with base and wall units Spacious and cosy living room wit..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £340,000 - £360,000** - Early viewings are recommended of this well-presented and deceptively spacious Dormer Bungalow located in the ever sought after village of Braithwell. Having attractive views from the first floor, fantastic gated driveway and offered with no upward chain."
"The Radleigh offers bright and spacious downstairs rooms that are ideal for socialising with friends and family. From entertaining guests in the LARGE OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/ DINING ROOM to enjoying a book in the STUDY, you’ll love our multi-purpose rooms that adapt to your needs. 
With FOUR SPACIOUS ..."
"RARE OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A BEAUTIFUL DETACHED HOME ON A LARGE PLOT WITHIN BARNBY DUN. This fabulous property offers excellent spacious accommodation over two floors. A unique family home that simply must be viewed to be fully appreciated and the sought after village location sells itself, wit..."
"UNEXPECTEDLY BACK TO MARKET ** GUIDE PRICE £340,000-£350,000 **In this sought after location in Branton is this well presented four bedroom detached family home which is close to local amenities and transport links."
"The open-plan layout of this 4 bedroom Radleigh home makes it ideal for socialising. An airy kitchen/diner with sitting area, French doors to the rear garden and separate utility room makes a fantastic space. A spacious lounge and handy study complete the ground floor. Head upstairs and find fou..."
Need impressing? This home features LIVING ROOM with bay. KITCHEN with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and dual aspect BI-FOLD doors. Main bedroom with EN SUITE.
"Includes 12 month mortgage contribution worth £6000! 4 bedroom home features OPEN PLAN living, BI-FOLDS. Main Bedroom includes EN SUITE BATH & SHOWER ROOM. Plus GARAGE. "
"The Chedworth ticks all the boxes. The open-plan kitchen/family room is perfect for family time. There’s a living room, dining room, downstairs cloakroom and a utility room with outside access. Upstairs there are four bedrooms - bedroom one has an en suite - a family bathroom and a storage cupboard."
"Absolutely immaculate four bed detached enoying a lovely plot on a much sought after area of Cusworth. This beautiful and spacious home has an impressive frontage with new windows, and a stylish new composite door and garage door. Internally the property is wonderfully presented and has a separat..."
"Fantastic Four bedroom detached family home with private driveway and good-sized garden. Only a short distance from excellent schools, local amenities, and transport links."
A superb family detached home in a sought after location giving access to a good range of amenities. We were impressed by the fantastic space on offer in this deceptive family home. Book your viewing as soon as you can so as not to miss out.
"*** GUIDE PRICE £335,000 - £350,000 *** Occupying a corner plot, including a long front garden a spacious 4 bedroom detached dormer style bungalow with ample parking and 3 garages."
"** COUNTRYSIDE VIEWIS** Located on the outskirts of Edlington is this stone built FAMILY HOME. Briefly comprising of; an entrance hallway, lounge, dining room, study, w/c, kitchen and utility to the ground floor. To the first floor is a family bathroom and four double bedrooms one with en-suite. ..."
"GUIDE RPICE £335,000 - £350,000. This truly exceptional family home MUST BE VIEWED. Appointed to an exceptional standard, the property has been tastefully renovated with an eye for detail and occupies a sizeable corner plot. Located in the sought after semi-rural village of Harlington the pro..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £335,000 - £350,000 *** Beautifully positioned on the old village High Street, with fantastic elevated views over open countryside a 3 bedroom detached bungalow and detached double garage."
"*	4 Double bedrooms with 1 ensuite shower room *	Excellent location*	Popular and well regarded village*	Short walk to the co-op, mill-dam and village amenities*	Large single Garage and off road parking"
"This is the type of property you would normally see in a glossy magazine, in fact it wouldn’t look out of place on grand designs……a truly exceptional detached cottage in the heart of Warmsworth old village."
A four bedroom home with a welcoming first impression. A large kitchen dining space and a snug that wraps around you like a warm hug.
"The stylish Windsor, a four bedroom detached home with integral garage offers the best in modern day living for families that want luxury and style.
On entering this beautiful property there are stylish double doors that lead into a bright and spacious lounge, making it th"
This exceptional property in a prestigious street enjoys a very private and significantly sized plot. There is a large winding driveway large enough for several vehicles and the attractive frontage of the property enjoys a good degree of privacy allowing seating both to the front and rear of the ...
"GUIDE PRICE-£330,000-£340,000. Looking to upsize for a growing family? Look no further. This five bedroom detached family home with three en-suite shower rooms and an open plan kitchen diner. Situated on this highly sought after development with a delightful enclosed rear garden."
"Northwood Doncaster are proud to present this beautifully presented modern four bedroom detached house in the very popular area of Lakeside Doncaster, having great motorway links and a great array of amenities within walking distance.Viewing highly recommended, as this property wil..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £330,000 -£350,000 *** Immaculately presented 4 bedroomed detached house lying within the beautiful village of Wadworth. The property must be viewed to appreciate the accommodation consisting of 4 bedrooms, separate shower room plus family bathroom, dining room, utility room, lou..."
"If you are looking for an abundance of space and a welcoming home you can move straight into to then look no further. This superb property really has it all along with perfect, stylish presentation. This is sure to go very quickly so please book your viewing so as not to miss out."
"This stunning 3 bed terrace property is certainly not going to be around for long situated in the sought after location of Hatfield close to all local amenities, transport links, schools and colleges.    The downstairs comprises a large open plan lounge diner complete with log burne..."
"VILLAGE LIFE AT ITS FINEST! Tucked away off of the beaten track in this highly sought after village location, this spacious three bedroom detached oozes with style & class throughout. Boasting stunning views to the front & rear, a drive & a summer house- this makes the perfect family home -CALL NOW!"
"This impressive four bedroom detached family home with en-suite shower room benefits from a range of spacious living accommodation with two reception rooms, utility room, conservatory and ground floor WC. There is a gated drive providing off road parking and a garage."
Strike is pleased to present this property in Doncaster.
Well presented four bedroom detached home in the highly desirable area of Lakeside. Early viewing recommended. Call Your Move today!
"An excellent and modern 4 bedroom detached family home built by ""Harron Homes"", having contemporary fixtures and fittings, gas heating, UPVC double glazing and lovely gardens. The property briefly comprises of ; entrance hallway, downstairs wc, double doors opening into the bay window ..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£325,000-£350,000. Situated in the sought after village of Campsall is this spacious two double bedroom detached bungalow which occupies a generous corner plot with gardens to front, side and rear. The property benefits from off road parking and a garage. Available with no onward chain!"
"3D Virtual Tour Available-Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... This Lovely 4 double bedroomed detached house features a spacious kitchen, dining, living area plus se..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £325,000 *** Sitting on one of the largest plots, with a private tree lined backdrop this extended 3 bedroom detached bungalow must be viewed."
"GUIDE PRICE-£325,000-£3250,000. This period and charming six bedroom semi-detached home is ideal for an extended or growing family. Situated over three storeys with three reception rooms, a ground floor bathroom, a first floor shower room and cellars providing useful additional storage."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a deceptively spacious and well presented three bedroom detached bungalow ideally located within the popular suburb of Tickhill and offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The property in brief comprises; entrance porch, L'shaped lounge/dining room, fitted kitc..."
Located on a popular residential estate in the sought after area of Bessacarr is this spacious and well-presented five bedroom detached family home which is presented to a high specification and is ready for any prospective buyer to move into. The property comprises of a stunning kitc...
"GUIDE PRICE-£325,000-£335,000. This impressive four bedroom detached family home with en-suite shower room benefits from a spacious kitchen diner, a generous rear garden, ample off road parking and a garage. Situated close to a range of highly sought after schools, amenities and supermarkets."
"Sold with tenant in situ paying £475pcm. This two bed mid terrace property has had extensive renovation work, including a new kitchen, new floor coverings to all rooms and is newly decorated."
"Occupying an enviable plot on this sought after roadway is this spacious three bedroom detached dormer bungalow. the property in brief comprises; entrance hallway, lounge to the rear elevation, formal dining room/bedroom 2, fitted kitchen/breakfast room, utility room, shower room, conservatory, ..."
"A characterful 3 storey, plus basement, period style semi detached house offering substantial family living in this highly regarded residential suburb."
"***SPACIOUS DETACHED FAMILY HOME*** BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT***THREE/FOUR BEDROOMS***UTILITY ROOM & DOWNSTAIRS WC***LARGE PRIVATE GARDEN***DETACHED GARAGE***DESIRABLE LOCATION*** Fantastic spacious three/ four bedroom detached property in Bessacarr, beautifully presented throughout. Lo..."
ABSOLUTELY STUNNING - This amazing two double bedroom with two en-suite duplex apartment is situated in the much sought after residential area of Bessacarr. The apartment is situated behind secure gates with stylish living accommodation throughout. The property has a stunni...
"*O.I.T.R.O £325,000 * This STUNNING FIVE BEDROOM property located in the sought after village of Dunsville is a rare opportunity! Suitable for a variety of buyers with flexible living space and with in close reach of local schools, transport links and amenities. CALL NOW TO BOOK YOUR VIEWING!"
"GUIDE PRICE-£325,000-£340,000. Enjoying a pleasant position is this fabulous spacious extended four bedroom detached family home which has been upgraded to provide a stunning living dining kitchen/garden room. The property is situated close to Cusworth park and a host of local amenities."
A gorgeous contemporary styled 4 bedroom detached family house in the heart of Cusworth with a stunning open plan living/ dining/ kitchen.
"Guide Price £325,000 - £335,000 WHAT A PLOT! This stunning detached home stands in a corner plot and would be perfect for a growing family. With a stylish dining kitchen, study, two en-suites, good sized garden and much more. Call not to view"
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... This three bedroom property can be found on a quiet road with spacious light rooms, and a substantial..."
"Beautifully Presented 4 Bedroom Bungalow located in Conisborough, Doncaster. Consists Of: Open plan well-appointed kitchen / dining room with base and wall units Bright and spacious lounge Two light and airy double bedrooms Two further well-proportioned bedrooms"
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website..Lovely family home in a popular area of Doncaster.  Within walking distance of the property..."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... Being sold with this no forwarding chain this spacious four bedroom detached house can be found in th..."
3 INDIVIDUAL TWO BED APARTMENTS THE ULTIMATE INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY! OFFERING A TOTAL REAL RETURN ON INVESTMENT OVER TEN YEARS OF APPROX 120.5% !!
"**GUIDE PRICE 325,000 - 350,000** Situated in the sought after area of Bessacarr, on the outskirts of Doncaster comes this beautifully presented 3 bedroom detached family home occupying a larger than average plot in this popular suburb within walking distance of local school, bus services..."
"Having being internally re designed to provide attractive, contemporary styled family living, a 4 bedroom detached property, located in this ever sought after location. Briefly comprises; entrance hall, superb open plan living space, including lounge with feature fireplace, dining area and recen..."
"Includes 12 month mortgage contribution worth £6000! 3 storey, 4 bedroom home. OPEN PLAN living. Master with EN SUITE. DESIGNER KITCHEN, integrated appliances."
"Lakeside location. Includes 2 Parking Spaces. Includes Intergrated appliances. Includes flooring package. Turf to rear garden. £1,000 towards legal fees. Subject to mortgage lender criteria and T's&C's.COME AND TAKE A LOOK AT CYGNET, LAKESIDE, DONCASTER.DON'T MISS OUT."
"Lakeside location. Includes Garage and Parking Space. Includes Intergrated appliances. Includes flooring package. Turf to rear garden. £1,000 towards legal fees. Subject to mortgage lender criteria and T's&C's.STUNNNG LOCATION OVERLOOKING THE LAKE.SHOWHOMES OPEN! FREE MORTGAGE ASSISTANCE"
"A RARE OPPORTUNITY HAS ARISEN THIS SPACIOUS THREE STOREY MID TERRACE. FULL OF CHARACTER, HIGH CEILINGS & CHARM. NO CHAIN - QUOTE SH0316
"
This superb family home has been finished to an exceptional standard and extended to create an abundance of living accommodation for any family. The impressive and striking frontage has a gated driveway large enough for several cars and as you enter the property you are greeted with an opulent a...
A three bedroom family home located in the sought after and popular town of Bawtry. Sitting on an enviable and elevated plot with sizeable outdoor space as well as plenty of off road parking. This is a fantastic opportunity to add your own touch with the property having scope for modernisation.
"*** MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! STUNNING 4 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME, NOT TO BE MISSED, IDEAL FOR GROWING FAMILIES, spacious accommodation, BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED, gas central heating, double glazing, MODERN KITCHEN DINER / UTILITY, sit..."
"A property with real WOW factor! A stunning 4 bedroom detached home in the popular village of Edenthorpe, this property must be viewed to appreciate the size and quality of accommodation on offer.With an integral garage, utility room, downstairs WC, 4 double bedrooms and a quiet cul- de..."
"We are please to welcome this two bedroomed stone built mid terrace cottage, briefly comprising - living room, kitchen, two bedrooms and family bathroom. The outside offers a rear yard and patio area."
"Located on a popular residential estate in the sought after area of Bessacarr is this spacious four bedroom detached family home which is presented to a high specification and is ready for any prospective buyer to move into. The property comprises of a stunning kitchen/diner, utility ..."
This stunning beautifully presented extended four bedroom detached family home is situated in this sought after location close to a host of local amenities and excellent transport links. The property has front and rear gardens off road parking and a garage.
Beautiful family home available with no upward chain..
"Occupying an enviable cul de sac position on a sought after modern development within Rossington is this immaculately presented four bedroom detached house. The property in brief comprises; entrance hallway, clams/WC, through lounge/ dining room, contemporary fitted kitchen/breakfast room with a ..."
Old Post Cottage is a stunning restored three bedroom cottage lying in the historic village of Burghwallis. This popular village location sits within a conservation area with walking distance to local pub and sitting a stones throw from motorway link roads. Contact YOPA to schedule a viewing 24/7.
A simply stunning 3 bedroom detached property offering ready to move into accommodation boasting over 2000 sq ft of living space (including outbuildings). Featuring a ground floor extension the beautifully appointed interior comprises; entrance hall with built in study area and underfloor heatin...
"A stunning bungalow in an idyllic village setting. Three bedrooms and a garden to make Alan Titchmarsh envious this property is quite simply ready to move in. Spacious to the interior and exterior, opportunities to buy such a lovely home don't come around often... EWE should come and take a look!"
"GUIDE PRICE-£320,000-£340,000. Situated in this sought after modern development is this immaculately presented five bedroom detached family home which provides spacious accommodation throughout. The property has a landscaped rear garden, a double driveway, garage and a pleasant outlook to the front."
This stunning FOUR DOUBLE bedroom family home in the popular village of Rossington is sure to grab attention so book your viewing today or take an online virtual tour.
"Guide Price £320,000 - £330,000 This stunning extended four bedroom detached family home is located in this ever popular area and would be ideal for a growing family. With stylish lounge, separate dining room, kitchen diner and extra sitting room. Landscaped garden and much more. Call now to view"
"Lakeside location. Includes Garage and Parking Space. Includes Intergrated appliances. Includes flooring package. Turf to rear garden. £1,000 towards legal fees. Subject to mortgage lender criteria and T's&C's.PLOT 25 INCLUDES GARAGE PLUS PARKING SPACE.GREAT LOCATION OVERLOOKING THE LAK..."
"Lakeside location. Includes Garage and Parking Space. Includes Intergrated appliances. Includes flooring package. Turf to rear garden. £1,000 towards legal fees. Subject to mortgage lender criteria and T's&C's.FREE MORTGAGE ASSISTANCE AVAILABLE.DON'T MISS OUT."
***SUPERIOR EXTENDED DETACHED FAMILY HOME***BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT***FRONT PORCH ENTRANCE***SPACIOUS OPEN PLAN LIVING***FOUR BEDROOMS***DOUBLE ASPECT MASTER WITH ENSUITE***MODERN KITCHEN & BATHROOM***UTILITY ROOM***GARAGE***LANDSCAPED GARDEN***HIGHLY DESIRABLE QUIET LOCATION***EXCELLENT...
"BEAUTIFUL PROPERTY WHICH BOASTS SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION WITH LOFT CONVERSION AND REAR EXTENSION. This must be viewed to be fully appreciated, as it offers both excellent living space and bedroom space over two floors. It has been delightfully decorated and presented throughout to provide the perfe..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£315,000-£325,000. Situated in this sought after location close to local amenities and excellent transport links is this fabulous spacious three bedroom bungalow which has been upgraded by the current vendor. The property stands on a generous corner plot with off road parking and garage."
"A superb two double bedroom detached bungalow offered with no forward chain, situated in a desirable position with larger style gardens, garage, summer house and off road parking. The property comprises ; of; entrance hall, kitchen, dining sitting room, inner hallway with storage, two double be..."
"A stylish 4 bedroom detached family home nestled within the cul de sac with open field views to rear and woodland making this a very private setting, stylish fittings, contemporary decoration and double garage. Comprises ; hallway, downstairs wc, lounge with sliding patio door, dining room, brea..."
"An impressive and attractively presented four bedroom detached family home offering generous living accommodation with an additional summer room situated in a desirable position with open farmland views to the rear. The property briefly comprises of; entrance hall and inner hallway, sitting room..."
"Guide Price £315,000-335,000 Located in the sought after area of Barnby Dun with stunning views over the canal is this spacious five bedroom detached character property which has the potential to be the perfect family home in a desirable location. The property offers..."
"WHAT A PLOT! Standing on a corner plot this stunning detached home would be perfect for a growing family. With the added extras of two reception rooms, conservatory, en-suite and much more. Call now to view"
"The Devonshire is an imposing 4 double bedroom property that boasts an integral garage. Its large sociable kitchen, dining and family area is ideally complemented by a separate utility room. Two bedrooms also feature en-suite facilities with the master including fitted wardrobes as standard."
"The cleverly designed four-bedroom, three-storey Richmond is perfect for families, big or small.Downstairs, this home's family-focused features are clear to see. From the hallway, the kitchen/diner with family snug is a brilliant social area that's for so much more than simply cooking a..."
"If you are looking for something with that little bit extra than a normal end of terrace property then this is definitely for you. This property has a garage, generous gardens to the front and rear, spacious lounge and a kitchen and on top of that you will also find a downstairs shower room as we..."
"3Keys Property are pleased to present this 2 double bedroom detached bungalow situated within the highly desirable village of Sprotbrough, Doncaster. This property is offered in good condition with a fully fitted kitchen and bathroom, spacious lounge and dining room and has no onward chain. Th..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£310,000-£320,000. Occupying an elevated position in the sought after village of Campsall is this well-presented four bedroom detached family home. The property offers spacious accommodation throughout and benefits from fabulous gardens, off road parking and a garage."
4 Bedroom detached property in this highly desirable development within the popular area of Armthorpe. The property stands within a good-sized plot and offers spacious and versatile accommodation.
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... This Lovely well looked after three bedroom bungalow comprises, a kitchen, lounge dining room and sho..."
"Guide Price £310,000 - £320,000 WHAT A BUY! This stunning EXTENDED detached home would be perfect for a growing family and is for sale with no onward chain. With two reception rooms, two en-suites and much more. Call now to view"
"The four bedroom Hollinwood is a spacious detached home with lots of room for all the family. On the ground floor, an open-plan kitchen with dining/family area is the ideal place for entertaining or for family mealtimes. In the warmer months, the French doors leading to the garden can be left op..."
"Proud to market for sale, this modern extended four bedroom detached family home. Situated within the popular village of Sprotbrough. Viewing highly recommended. EPC TBC"
**ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE INCLUDED** A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED two bedroom FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT with SOUTH FACING Juliet balcony within a desirable McCARTHY STONE Retirement Living Development for the over 60's in the market town of BAWTRY.
"GUIDE PRICE £310,000 - £320,000 This delightful semi detached home is located in this ever popular area and would be perfect for a growing family. Having gone through extensive refurbishment the property has a stunning dining kitchen, attractive bathroom and good sized gardens"
An open plan four bedroom home with two en-suite bathrooms.
"Property located in Buttermere Crescent, Lakeside, Doncaster"
Experience exceptional. This extraordinary home features OPEN PLAN living with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and FRENCH doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE.
This traditionally designed 4 bedroom exceptional home has a dual aspect kitchen and family room with separate utility. The property has bi-fold doors leading out into the garden offering a peaceful space in which to relax. The separate dining room gives flexibility and can easily be transforme...
"£250 a month towards your mortgage payments for 12 months+ PLUS free flooring package, get in touch for more details
The Grainger - a beautiful four-bedroom home effortlessly combining family living with sophistication. In the spacious central hallway, turn right into the living ro..."
"This 2-storey, 4-bedroom Pembroke could accommodate a large, lively family, and with room to spare. Enter the hallway and to your left find the sizeable study - ideal for those who work from home, the living room to your right, a staircase straight ahead, and a convenient downstairs cl..."
"Viewing is a must on this STYLISH 4 bedroom detached family home which has a DOUBLE garage. Contemporary fixtures and fittings and comprises: entrance hallway, downstairs wc, bay window lounge, dining room, study, breakfast kitchen, utility, 4 bathrooms, modern ensuite, bathroom, gardens to the ..."
"*5% DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION WHEN YOU RESERVE ANY HOME AT THE MEADOWS IN MARCH. The Ashridge has a wonderful open plan kitchen/diner with central island, integrated Bosch appliances and French doors leading to the rear garden. Upstairs are 3 double bedrooms"
A well proportioned four bedroom home with integral garage and open plan kitchen diner.
"GUIDE PRICE-£300,000-£325,000. This impressive three bedroom detached bungalow is situated within a pleasant cul de sac setting on a corner plot with wrapped around gardens. The property benefits from an ample range of off road parking via drive and garage and landscape front and rear gardens."
"Price guide £300,000- £310,000. EARLY VIEWING ESSENTIAL. This beautiful three bedroom detached bungalow is ready to move straight into. Offering three reception rooms and well equipped kitchen, three bedrooms (one with en suite shower room) and family bathroom. Private rear garden and single garag"
"GUIDE PRICE-£300,000-£310,000. Occupying an enviable corner position on this sought after development is this well-presented four bedroom detached family home with good sized gardens, off road parking and a garage. The property is close to local amenities and excellent transport links."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 *** CHAIN FREE. Enjoying a prime position with an attractive open aspect, a modern 4 bedroom detached family house on this sought after Edenthorpe estate."
"An immaculate 4 bedroom, 2 bathroom detached house with a fantastic landscaped garden offering ready to move into living."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website...We purchased this property from new as our family needed the extra space. As our family is now older t..."
A great investment opportunity for any potential landlords. This fantastic modern home is being sold with a sitting tenant and currently achieves a PCM rent of £1350 and has a yield of 5.23% (if purchased at the asking price) Get your viewing booked today so as not to miss out.
"
***DORMA BUNGALOW***CUL DE SAC LOCATION***FULLY REFURBISHED***DETACHED GARAGE***AMPLE OFF ROAD PARKING***FOUR BEDROOMS***TWO GROUND FLOOR BEDROOMS***TWO UPSTAIRS BEDROOMS BOTH WITH ENSUITES***MODERN BREAKFAST KITCHEN***CONTEMPORARY GROUND FLOOR BATHROOM***CONSERVATORY***PLENTY OF STORAGE***PRIVA..."
"A most impressive and characterful three double bedroom stone built end barn conversion providing generous living accommodation with stunning fixtures and fittings, garage and off road parking, fully enclosed landscaped rear garden. The property briefly comprises of; entrance hall, attractive ki..."
"A stylishly presented 2 double bedroom detached bungalow having quality fixtures and fittings, vaulted living room, gas heating , UPVC double glazing, off road parking and lovely gardens. Comprises ; stunning kitchen, beautiful lounge and separate vaulted ceiling living room, two double bedrooms ..."
"This EXECUTIVE STYLE detached home is nestled on an EXCLUSIVE DEVELOPMENT and is offered at a VERY LOW START BID via the modern sale method where you can simply VIEW, BID AND BUY straight away!!! (call office for details)."
"Take a look at this fabulous house. You will not be disappointed!! This excellent FOUR BEDROOM detached executive style home has it all, from spacious interior to a fabulous garden with bar for entertaining. DONT MISS THIS!!"
SUPERB DETACHED BUNGALOW ON DONCASTER ROAD IN HATFIELD WITH THREE SPACIOUS BEDROOMS AND LARGE GARDEN. This beautiful home is now offered for sale and provides deceptively spacious accommodation that should be viewed to be fully appreciated. Beautifully presented throughout the bungalow briefly co...
Located on a private and a quiet residential cul-de-sac in the sought after area of Norton with excellent access to local amenities is this spacious and well presented four bedroom detached family home. The property is presented to a high specification and provides ample living space. ...
"NO CHAIN……….Enjoying a large corner plot with a huge amount of potential, this 3 bedroom detached bungalow is sure to appeal."
"Guide Price £300,000-£310,000. Situated in Rossington is this exceptional three bedroom detached family home which is ideal for an extended or growing family. The property has a high standard finish throughout, landscaped front and rear gardens and ample off road parking via a driveway."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... Lovely family home in a sought after location with access to local amenities, the house can be found ..."
"Welcome to The Haven!! A beautifully presented DETACHED family home in an enviable position. Filled with character, and ready for its next family. It could be yours!"
"Unexpectedly back on the market. Reeds Rains are proud to offer For Sale this modern extended two bedroom detached bungalow located within the popular residential area of Sprotbrough. Superb open plan kitchen / living / diner, separate lounge, four piece bathroom, two bedrooms en- suite gardens..."
"A well presented 4 bedrooms detached property in the popular countryside village of Austerfield. Features include 2 reception rooms, a conservatory, a newly fitted kitchen and a double garage. The property is being sold with NO UPWARD CHAIN. Tenure - Freehold Description The..."
A large family friendly 4 bedroom detached house in the PEFECT location. Boasting a large back garden and situated in a highly regarded Area.
"This impressive four bedroom detached family home is ideal for a growing or family looking to upsize. There is spacious living accommodation throughout. The property briefly comprises: FOUR BEDROOMS with and EN SUITE to the master, and a family bathroom, lounge, dining room, kitchen, UTILITY and..."
"We are proud to offer this Four Bedroom Semi Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £300,000 - £320,000*"
"GUIDE PRICE-£300,000-£310,000. This impressive four bedroom semi-detached family home is ideal for a growing or extended family with spacious living accommodation which includes two reception rooms. There is off road parking, a garage and a generous South facing lawned rear garden."
"ONCE A FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE, THIS FABULOUS HOME NOW BENEFITS FROM THREE SPACIOUS BEDROOMS AND A LUXURY BATHROOM. The property can only be fully appreciated via an internal inspection and offers any purchaser the WOW factor with numerous alterations and upgrades by the current owner, to pro..."
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - Land of approximately 2.67 acresOn the outskirts of a village."
"Simply too good to miss!!! Superb detached property set in sought after location, with no onward chain available for sale via the MODERN METHOD OF SALE, book your viewing today before its too late, fantastic opportunity for anyone looking for a superb family home or investment!!!"
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... Lovely bungalow occupying a large corner plot with a main south facing garden that enjoys sun al..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£200,000-£210,000. This spacious, well-presented three storey three double bedroom two en-suite plus family bathroom end townhouse is situated in this sought after location. The property has off road parking, an integral garage and a good-sized enclosed garden to the rear."
"A stunning and extended three bedroom semi detached home having stylish and contemporary fixtures and fittings, modern kitchen with numerous appliances, large rear family gardens and an excellent standard of internal presentation. The property comprises of; entrance, lounge, dining kitchen, sitt..."
"Offering excellent potential is this Three Bedroom Detached Bungalow situated in the sought after residential location of Bessacarr and being positioned on a generous size Corner Plot. Lying within easy reach of recreational walks, motorway access, Lakeside leisure complex and local shops The A..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £350,000 *** With a frontage onto South End, Thorne this plot offers an excellent opportunity for a builder/ speculator/ investor. Where outline planning has been passed for 3 new detached dwellings and the demolition of the existing dwelling."
LAND of approximately 2.67 acres to the outskirts of Doncaster. The current vendors have used the plot as paddock land and any alterations would need to be investigated further. PERMITTED DEVELOPMENT to convert barn to B2 Industrial use - Planning Number - 20/02232/PRIOR.
"Guide Price £300,000 - £310,000 MORE THAN MEETS THE EYE! This impressive and spacious detached home would be ideal for a growing family and is located in this ever popular area. With two reception rooms, four double bedrooms and much more. Call now to view"
"A stunning four bedroom detached family home with private driveway offering spacious, well-designed family accommodation, built within the last 12 months!"
"*** Offers in the region of £300,000 *** IF YOUR LOOKING FOR A STUNNING FAMILY HOME LOOK NO FURTHER! Norman Road is a beautifully presented four bedroom detached property in the sought after village of Hatfield, boasting modern kitchen, a good sized lounge, four bedrooms and a detached garage!"
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... "
"A stunning 3 bedroom detached home (formerly 4) having contemporary fixtures and fittings, beautiful kitchen, ensuite and bathroom, gas heating, UPVC double glazing, south westerly facing rear gardens with nice views to the Town Fields and town centre. The property briefly comprises of ; entranc..."
"We are pleased to present this four-bedroom, detached property located in Braithwell. The property consists of – Lounge, Kitchen, Dining room, Conservatory, Additional room, Four bedrooms (one en suite), a Bathroom and a WC. This property offers light-filled, spacious family acc..."
"* 5% DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION WHEN YOU RESERVE ANY HOME AT THE MEADOWS IN MARCH. Plot 25, the Goodwood, is a lovely 3 bedroom detached home. Both the lounge (with French doors), and dining/kitchen run the full depth of this desirable home. Upstairs there are 3 double bedrooms. "
"Located on this beautiful suburban roadway, close to the town, a large period style 4 bedroom semi detached house offering spacious family living with an equally good sized gardens, and ample parking."
"3D Virtual Tour Avaialble-Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website...Larger than average modernised 3 bed detached home in a quiet cul de sac location with a private rear g..."
"The Alderney is a practical and spacious family home. You can enjoy letting the outdoors in via FRENCH DOORS in both the oPEN-PLAN kitchen and dual-aspect lounge, which flood the home with sunlight.
Embrace the multi-purpose function of a separate dining room which can be utilised to fit in with ..."
"£1,000 monthly mortgage contributions paid fora whole year. Was £303,995 NOW £298,995 - Saving £5,000. Available to view. Includes Intergrated appliances. Includes flooring package. Turf to rear garden. Window Blinds package. £1,000 towards legal fees PLUS MORE FREE EXTRAS!. Subject to mortgage l..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £295,000 - £310,000 *** Built David Wilson Homes, this 3 double bedroom detached, former show house still looks stunning, just like a 'show house' today and therefore an early viewing is essential."
"If you are looking for an abundance of space and a welcoming home you can move straight into to then look no further. This superb family home really has it all with superb lounge with feature vaulted ceiling, situated in sought after location, this is sure to go very quickly so please book your v..."
"A fantastic detached family home benefiting from four double bedrooms, family bathroom and master en suite. The property is well presented and has off road parking, a garage and outside bar. This is an absolute must see to appreciate the front open aspect - call us now to arrange your viewing!"
"A HOME TO MAKE YOUR OWN - Great sized END OF TERRACE HOUSE with a generous garden on POPULAR MARTIN LANE. With lots of SCOPE FOR MODERNISATION, this is a home you can put your own stamp on! Call today to view."
SOUGHT AFTER AREA - Large THREE double bedroom detached bungalow set within a large lawned plot in a quiet cul-de-sac. Spacious open plan living accommodation. Would make an ideal family home with great potential. Excellent M18/M62 motorway access. NO UPWARD CHAIN INVOLVED.
Deceptively large TWO bedroom plus LOFT ROOM terrace with rear car access to gardens and PARKING. Lounge and open plan sitting/dining room with modern kitchen. Large bathroom. UPVC double glazed. Gas central heating. NO UPWARD CHAIN INVOLVED.
ANNEXE FACILITIES & VERSATILE ACCOMMODATION - WORK FROM HOME SPACE. Easy access for wheelchair users. Money saving solar panels and NO CHAIN. Central to Bawtry with a short walk to a wide range of amenities. Viewing via the agent.
"An impressive four bedroom home featuring an integral garage and an open plan kitchen, with dining and family area."
A fantastic opportunity has arisen to purchase this deceptively spacious 4 bedroomed detached family home situated on a generous sized plot.This property is incredibly versatile and has the potential to be converted into flats as there is plumbing for white goods and a working kitchen on the firs...
"A substantially extended and impressive four bedroom detached bungalow providing spacious and versatile family living accommodation within a desirable position on the fringe of Rossington. The property comprises ; entrance hall with storage, sitting room, dining room, kitchen, generous bedrooms,..."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... Burtonlees Court can be found in a quiet cul de sac in the sought after location of Bessaca..."
"SUPERB VILLAGE LOCATION, ELEVATED POSITION WITH FAR REACHING VIEWS, DETACHED BUNGALOW, THREE/FOUR BEDROOMS AND HIGH STANDARDS THROUGHOUT! PLANNING PERMISSION FOR FURTHER BEDROOM ABOVE EXISTING GARAGE! REF: 19/00153/FUL"
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... Take a look at this charming, three bedroom, semi-detached house in a super popular part of Bess..."
This fabulous reconfigured four bedroom detached family home is situated on this sought after development in Rossington close to local amenities and excellent transport links. The property benefits from having an open plan living kitchen and a separate dining room.
"A spacious four bedroom detached property situated in a wonderful cul de sac location offering beautifully presented family living accommodation with attractive front and rear gardens, garage and open field views. The property comprises ; entrance hall, open plan lounge, dining room, conservatory..."
"Guide Price £290,000-£320,000 - Situated in the sought after area of Tickhill with excellent access to local amenities is this stunning and spacious three bedroom, traditional semi-detached property which is an ideal family home. The property has been presented to a high s..."
Extended five bedroom corner plot with south west facing garden and views over historical Thorne park! Call now to book your viewing. 
"Guide price £290,000- £300,000. This substantially extended detached property offers kitchen diner, two reception rooms plus conservatory, five bedrooms and family bathroom. Private rear garden and off street parking. Located in this popular area"
"PRICE GUIDE £290,000-300,000. This four/ five bedroom detached property is beautifully presented throughout and offers and extremely generous living space for a growing family. Viewing is essential"
"GUIDE PRICE £290,000 TO £300,000. A viewing is essential on this deceptively spacious double story and rear extended detached dwelling which over the years has been a loving family home. The open plan kitchen / lounge and diner offers a great entertaining space with ample natural light provid..."
FABULOUS SPACIOUS DETACHED FAMILY HOME***BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT***FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS***MASTER BEDROOM WITH ENSUITE BATHROOM***FAMILY BATHROOM***UTILITY ROOM***STUDY/HOME OFFICE/PLAYROOM***SEPERATE DINING ROOM***INTEGRAL GARAGE***LOW MAINTENACE LANDSCAPED REAR GARDEN***DESIRABLE LOCATI...
"Fantastic Four bedroom detached family home with open plan ground floor living, private driveway and good sized garden. Only a short walk from Conisbrough train Station, and local amenities. Arranged over two floors, this property is an ideal family home briefly comprising of: Gro..."
"A wonderful larger style three bedroom detached bungalow attractively positioned within a sought after development boasting generously proportioned rooms, superb gardens, garage and off road parking. The property comprises of entrance hall with storage cupboards, sitting room, dining room, kitche..."
"
***FABULOUS FAMILY HOME***BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT***FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS***MASTER WITH ENSUITE SHOWER ROOM***CONTEMPORARY KITCHEN/DINING ROOM***UTILITY ROOM & WC/CLOAKS***MODERN FAMILY BATHROOM***INTEGRAL GARAGE*** DOUBLE DRIVEWAY***CULDESAC LOCATION*** This fabulous family home, beaut..."
"PRICE GUIDE £290,000-£300,000. Beautifully presented family home offering two reception rooms, four bedrooms and a private rear garden in this highly desirable residential location"
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... Located in a very popular part of Bessacarr this 3 bed link detached family home certainly ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £290,000-£310,000. Fantastic opportunity! This long standing five bedroom detached family home in the heart of Doncaster close to the town centre, Townfields and the Doncaster Race Course. The property benefits from a driveway providing off road parking for several vehicles and a garage."
"Sitting on a large plot nestled away in the corner of a quiet cul-de-sac location on a popular family estate is this fantastic four bedroom detached property which benefits from a detached garage, off street parking and ample living space. The rear garden is sure to impress and viewings are advised!"
"The Roseberry is a detached home with an integral garage and a living room with double doors leading to an open-plan kitchen/diner. There’s a utility room, cloakroom and three very useful storage cupboards. Bedroom one is en suite and the landing leads on to three further bedrooms and a bathroom."
"GUIDE PROCE £150,000 - £160,000 LET YOUR FAMILY GROW! Located in this ever popular area this delightful extended semi detached home would be perfect for a growing family. This is not one to miss out on. Call now to view"
"3Keys Property are delighted to offer for sale this extended 3 bedroom detached house situated in the heart of Bessacarr, Doncaster. This central location gives fantastic access to local amenities and schools, most within walking distance. This property, situated on an enviable corner plot at ..."
"Oozing character , quirkiness and charm this astonishing period 5 bedroomed family home is a property that requires internal inspection to appreciate the extraordinary historic features this home has retained. The history of this home reaches as far back as 350 years and is a large part of Be..."
"With its charming kerb appeal and desirable features this well presented detached bungalow is not going to be around for long. Having been renovated throughout with-in the last 18 months this really is a turn key home and would be ideal for all lifestyles , whether it be a growing family home , a..."
"3 bedroom home. DESIGN-LED OPEN PLAN living. Main Bedroom with EN SUITE and FULL HEIGHT TILING. DESIGNER KITCHEN, INTEGRATED APPLIANCES."
This four bed detached property in an estate location in the village of Harworth was built in 2018 and will make an ideal family home for the next owners. Harworth is a village situated four miles to the west of the market town of Bawtry and ten miles south of the city of Doncaster. It has good...
"Looking for a stunning new build home brimming full of extras including landscaped gardens, under counter lighting and tiled bathrooms? Then look no further. Benefiting from 8 years remaining NHBC warranty this home must be viewed to appreciate its spacious accommodation. Contact YOPA today to view."
"Offered with no forward chain is this beautiful 3 bedroomed family bungalow. This deceptively spacious home is a real WOW factor property and would be suitable all lifestyles , whether it be a growing family home , a forever home for an retired couple or a working family.Situated on a generou..."
****NEW TO MARKET**** If you are looking for the perfect family home where you can move straight in then this could be the one. This three storey four bedroom detached property is immaculately presented throughout and one can move straight in. it is been sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN for ease of pu...
"Looking for a quirky and characterised feature home? Look no further. This three bedroom semi-detached unique cottage is bound to impress with three reception rooms with period features, a utility room, a ground floor WC and a variety of spacious living accommodation."
"Occupying an enviable cul de sac position within the sought after village of Bessacarr is this extended 4 bedroom detached house. The property in brief comprises; entrance hallway, lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen, integral garage, four good sized bedrooms and family bathroom. Outside; front..."
"Spacious detached family home situated in sought after location on popular development, available with no onward chain viewing comes most highly recommended so book your viewing now as this will not be on the market long."
Spacious four bedroom detached house in the desirable village of Rossington with double garage. Contact Your Move for your viewing today!
"FANTASTIC DETACHED FAMILY HOME THAT IS BOTH SPACIOUS AND BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED. This superb property is positioned on a sought after residential estate in Edenthorpe, within walking distance of local supermarket and has excellent access to other local amenities/transport links. This house is sure..."
"A superb 3 bedroom semi-detached property occupying a sought after location within Sprotbrough village on a prime residential road. Offering ready to move into accommodation coupled with amenities on the doorstep including reputable schools, this property is brought to the market with no chain. ..."
This recently renovated three bedroom semi detached property is positioned on a corner plot in a very popular location. The property is walking distance from the vibrant Bawtry high street with all its shops bars and restaurants. The ground floor of this semi detached home offers a warm spacious...
"*3 SHOWHOMES NOW OPEN* Split over two and a half stories, THE ELLERSTON is a perfectly balanced town house. The kitchen has a bay window and the lounge/diner at the back of the home is light and airy with French doors and skylights in the ceiling. "
"The Ripon is a stunning 4 BEDROOM DETACHED HOME with a SINGLE INTEGRAL GARAGE. On the ground floor you'll find a spacious lounge, OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN and dining area with FRENCH DOORS leading to the back garden, a UTILITY ROOM and a downstairs WC. On the first floor you'll find the main bedroom wi..."
Situated in the popular area of Harworth on the outskirts of Doncaster comes this spacious three bed detached property that would be perfect for growing families. This property has recently been renovated and is ready to move into!
Unique three bedroom detached house ideally located for canal side walks and Thorne town centre. Call Your Move today or take an online virtual tour!
"Guide Price £280,000 - £290,000 THIS IS A TREAT! This delightful spacious semi detached home offers bags of space and is located on this ever popular and modern development. This is not one to miss out on call now to view"
"3D Virtual Tour Available-Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... Previously a 2 bedroom, one bathroom property, this bungalow has been extended and modernised and now ..."
"Offers in the region of £280,000. A substantially extended five bedroom, two bathroom property offering plenty of space for a growing family. Private rear garden and ample off street parking. An early viewing is highly recommended"
"Guide Price £280,000 - £290,000 WHAT A HOME! This stunning detached home stands in a cul de sac and would be ideal for a growing family. With a stylish kitchen, conservatory, en-suite and much more. Call now to view"
"We are proud to offer this Four Bedroom Detached House – *Guide Price £280,000 - £300,000*"
"A RARE OPPORTUNITY HAS ARISEN. Offered for sale with a no vendor chain is this desirable three bedroomed detached bungalow, situated in a quiet area of the village were properties seldom appear on the open market. The property is within walking distance to all local amenities, schools and bus ro..."
"GUIDE PRICE **£280,000 - £290,000** Finished with a wraparound extension to the side and rear, plus a conservatory, this now very large 3 bedroom detached house is perfect for a growing family."
"An outstanding traditional style semi detached property within the heart of Tickhill, boasting 4/5 bedrooms having been substantially extended to the side and rear to create a large and flexible family home with quality fixtures and fittings, off road parking and enclosed rear garden with worksho..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£280,000-£300,000. This three bedroom detached bungalow is situated in this location of Bessacarr and benefits from ample off road parking and front and rear gardens. A not to be missed opportunity!"
SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - Standing on a generous corner plot this THREE bedroom DETACHED bungalow offers great potential and would make a fabulous family home. With generous gardens and double garage there is also NO UPWARD CHAIN. Viewing Essential.
**STUNNINGLY PRESENTED** Two double bedroom detached bungalow now on the market offering a large corner plot and vast gardens. This property offers a large driveway and a garage all tucked inside a walled and gated premise. **CLICK NOW!!**
PERFECT FAMILY HOME available on this sought after estate in Rossington. Great transport links for commuters via the new link road to the M18. Call Your Move for your viewing or take an online virtual tour today!
PERFECT FAMILY HOME!! Four bedroom detached house on LARGE corner plot is a must for a viewing just to appreciate the size of the property inside and out!!CALL NOW ON ...
"ONE A SCALE OF 1-10, THIS IS AN 11! We have no words for this stunning 3 bed PLUS loft room semi det other than WOW. Be prepared to be blown away the moment you step through the door - you really can tell the vendors heart & soul has gone into this - words simply don't do any justice - CALL US NOW!"
"Northwood Thorne are extremely proud and privileged to bring to the market this unique, one of a kind opportunity to own and reside in the very first Robin Hood themed housing development in the world.   "
"3D Virtual Tour Available-Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... One of a kind, very attractive 3 bedroom detached bungalow, occupying an enviable position down a..."
"5% DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION* The Goodwood is a lovely 3 bedroom semi detached home. Both the lounge (with French doors), and dining/kitchen run the full depth of this desirable home. Upstairs there are 3 double bedrooms, with the master bedroom featuring an en-suite shower room."
"*3 SHOWHOMES NOW OPEN* Split over three storeys, the Ellerston is a perfectly balanced town house. Downstairs is a fully integrated kitchen and an airy, spacious lounge/diner with Velux windows and French doors leading to the rear garden. "
†Home Exchange is available on selected homes only. Acceptance is at our sole discretion and not all properties are suitable. We reserve the right to refuse to agree to Home Exchange of your current home and we are under no obligation to give reasons why. Home Exchange may ...
"£10k price reduction, £1.4k towards your legal fees PLUS upgraded Premium kitchen and integrated appliances And FREE Flooring package, get in touch for more details...This superb 4-bedroom property set over two storeys and with its' own allocated parking space, offers masses of spa..."
"3Keys Property are delighted to offer to the open sales market this well presented 3-bedroom detached family home in a quiet cul de sac in Blaxton, Doncaster. This property benefits from 3 double bedrooms and has a spacious lounge with separate dining room and a large well maintained conservat..."
"Sitting within walking distance of all local amenities, schools and shops is this large detached family residence sitting on a fantastic sized corner plot offering so much potential for a variety of buyers to add their own stamp. Benefiting from a double garage, off street parking and four beds!"
"Families will adore this modern, double fronted, three bedroom detached home with charming style, space and high quality throughout. The large, welcoming hallway leads to the light and airy, luxuriously appointed living room, while at the heart of the property is an impre"
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... This lovely bungalow has been loving looked after over the years and can be found in the sought after..."
"WARRANTING AN INSPECTION, a completely REFURBISHED and EXTENDED 3/4 BED SEMI DETACHED HOUSE with GARAGE and WORKSHOP.SUMMERHOUSE, located in the old Village of Sprotborough."
"Unique Opportunity to build your own home inTickhill. Modern Open Plan living with three double bedrooms all with ensuite and the master having a dressing room. Semi rural plot with good sized gardens and plenty of parking, a viewing is highly recommended to appreciate the setting."
"THIS LOVELY DETACHED BUNGALOW IN THE SOUGHT AFTER VILLAGE OF NORTON OFFERS THREE SPACIOUS BEDROOMS. A beautiful detached home that has been updated to a fabulous standard with stunning kitchen and shower room fittings. The property in brief comprises of entrance hallway, L-shaped open plan living..."
"Springbok Properties offers this attractively priced detached bungalow to the market, With plenty of off road parking and lovely decor this is a must view! "
This impressive three bedroom bay fronted detached bungalow is situated in an elevated position with ample range of off road parking by a double gated driveway and garage. Positioned in this highly sought after area with an enclosed rear garden and benefiting from a range of privacy and screening.
"Beautifully decorated 4 bedroom semi-detached family home, extended to provide a wonderful open space living area on the ground floor."
"This immaculately presented spacious and deceptive three double bedroom three storey semi-detached family home with integral garage provides spacious living accommodation with a first floor lounge with Juliet balcony, open plan kitchen living diner and en-suite shower room."
"This beautifully presented three bedroom detached bungalow is situated on an generous plot in a quiet cul de sac location and benefits from having front and rear gardens, an ample driveway providing off road parking and is available with no onward chain."
"Hunters are delighted to bring this well-presented detached bungalow to market with NO CHAIN located in the Village of Blaxton situated to the north of Finningley on the A614 , with amenities including shops, garden centre, parks, public houses and is close to Doncaster Robin Hood airport and th..."
"***£275,000*** A well presented THREE BEDROOM DETACHED property in the desirable village of Hatfield! Comrpising of an en suite, ample of road parking, plenty of light and airy living space all with in easy reach of local amenities and transport links! CALL NOW FOR MORE INFO!"
New to the market is this spacious four bedroomed detached family house offered for sale with a no vendor chain and being the neighbour to St Peters Church which we believe is the oldest building in South Yorkshire dating back to the 8th Century. Situated within the conservation area of Conisbro...
"Light flows into this bright, airy family home through oversized windows. The LARGE OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN is ideal for modern living with a dining area that has FRENCH DOORS leading to the SOUTH FACING GARDEN and a separate utility room. A spacious lounge is the perfect place for all the family to re..."
"This very spacious and well presented four double bedroom, two bathroom, non estate detached family home is offered with no onward chain and has panoramic views to the front over open countryside. Agents Note: Internal photos to follow with the first viewings to take place from Tuesday 3rd May a..."
Modern shaker style kitchen | Close to local amenities | Family bathroom with roll top bath | Modern shaker style kitchen
INTERNAL VIEWING ESSENTIAL to appreciate the SPACE AND STYLE of this attractive 3/4 bedroom detached chalet styled house.
SIMPLY STUNNING EXTENDED FOUR BEDROOM HOME ON ADLARD ROAD WITHIN THE SOUGHT AFTER WHEATLEY HILLS. A superb house that has been much improved and extended over the years by the current owner to provide a beautiful spacious family home which you will fall in love with as soon as the property is vie...
"2 Bedroomed Detached Bungalow Gas Fired Central Heating and PVCu Double Glazing Brick built single Garage Pleasant cul-de-sac location within this very popular and well regarded market town Good selection of facilities within Tickhill, access to the A1/A1(M) approximately 4 miles drive "
Approx 4.5 acres - Set amongst a mix of both residential and commercial properties this plot of land was previously attached to a horticultural business and was utilised by the vendors. A site visit is recommended to appreciate the area & the surroundings. Great Motorway Links for a business venture
"*** PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE ON THIS PROPERTY - call for further details*** READY FOR IMMEDIATE OCCUPANCY, TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK*** FREE MORTGAGE ADVICE AVAILABLE ON THIS PROPERTY *** LOVELY 3 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME, NOT TO BE MISSED, spaciou..."
"Reeds Rains are delighted to market for sale, this wonderful three bedroom detached family home, situated within the popular residential area of Bessacarr. GCH DG Gardens Viewing Highly recommended EPC Rating D."
"The Windermere is a fabulous FOUR BEDROOM detached home with an INTEGRAL GARAGE. The property features a spacious lounge leading through to a dining room with FRENCH DOORS. You will find an OPEN-PLAN kitchen with a separate utility room attached. 
On the first floor you will find four double bedr..."
"**PERFECT FAMILY HOME!!** Four double bedroom detached home now on the market located in a sought after part of Doncaster. This property includes a private rear garden, garage, conservatory and several receptions rooms. **CLICK NOW!!**"
"5% DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION WHEN YOU RESERVE ANY NEW HOME AT THE MEADOWS IN MARCH* Plus, this home is available with the DEPOSIT UNLOCK SCHEME, enabling you to buy your new home with just a 5% deposit!**"
A modern home with a layout perfectly suited to busy family life. Enjoy family meals in the open-plan dining kitchen with French doors leading out to the garden. Tucked away there is a separate utility space and downstairs cloakroom. Upstairs there are 4 double bedrooms including the main with en...
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... This lovely three bedroom detached home has views across fields and is close to local amenities ..."
"This incredibly bright and spacious family home is only 18 months old, with four double bedrooms, a great kitchen diner and 2 reception rooms and that all important garage . Located off the Great Yorkshire way and easy access to the M18 & A1."
"Guide Price £270,000-290,000 Located on a spacious corner plot is this stunning 18th century period property which provides ample living space both internally and externally and has the potential to be a stunning family home. The property comprises of an entrance hal..."
A BRAND NEW three bedroom semi detached family home is being built for you!! Call us now for more details and to secure this excellent opportunity
"GUIDE PRICE-£270,000-£280,000. This four bedroom detached home is bound to impress, positioned within the upcoming sought after park edge development. The property provides a range of stylish living accommodation and a landscaped rear garden."
"GUIDE PRICE £270,000-£280,000.This well presented three bedroom detached family home which has a pleasant outlook to the front and a larger than average garden to the rear. The property benefits from a garage, close to local amenities and is a perfect family home."
"3 Bedroom semi-detached property within the popular village of Braithwell. The property stands within a good-sized plot and offers spacious and versatile accommodation with great views to the rear. The location allows easy commuter access to the Yorkshire region with a full range of amenities, facil"
"WOW!! DO NOT MISS OUT ON THIS THREE BEDROOM DETACHED HOME OFFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO CHAIN!! A beautiful family home which is completed to the highest standard throughout with a modern and welcoming interior! Comprising in brief; Entrance hallway, integrated garage, large open- plan..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£270,000-£280,000. This spacious three bedroom detached bungalow is ideal for ground floor living and retirement living. Situated on a generous plot with a South-East facing rear garden, ample off road parking by a gated drive and garage. Available with no onward chain."
"We are proud to present this Four Bedroom Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £270,000 - £290,000*"
"***FABULOUS DETACHED FAMILY HOME***CONTEMPORARY LIVING***FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS***MASTER WITH ENSUITE SHOWER ROOM***ACCOMMODATION OVER THREE STOREYS***SPACIOUS LOUNGE/DINER***STUNNING KITCHEN WITH INTEGRATED APPLIANCES***GARDEN ROOM*** Built in 2017, with 5 years remaining on the NHBC certificate...."
"GREAT LOCATION ON STATION ROAD IN HATFIELD, THIS DETACHED DWELLING OFFERS A BEAUTIFUL FAMILY HOME. Positioned in a sought after location within DN7, an internal inspection of this property is highly recommended to fully appreciate the accommodation. Stylishly presented throughout, the property in..."
Originally a two double bedroom detached bungalow which has been totally refurbished and reconfigured to create a stunning and unique one bedroom bespoke property offering brand new high quality fixtures and fittings throughout. (It could easily be converted back to a 2 bed) Comprising of: ent...
"***GUIDE PRICE £270-280,000*** ***Superb Detached Bungalow***Perfect for Retirees or Families ***
***Three Bedrooms***Lounge/Dining Room***Kitchen/Breakfast Room***Fitted Bathroom***
***Front and Enclosed Rear Garden******Detached Garage***Easy access to The A1*** Detached three bedroom bungalo..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£270,000-£280,000. This four bedroom semi-detached family home benefits from a breakfast kitchen, three reception rooms and an en-suite to the master bedroom. The property has a generous enclosed rear garden and a superb block paved driveway providing ample off road parking."
"VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED on this well presented 4 bed detached property sat on a corner plot in a quiet cul de sac position. The property has had a large extension and the garage has also been converted. It benefits from separate living and dining rooms, a second reception room, play room, ensu..."
"GUIDE PRICE £270,000-£280,000. This spacious four bedroom detached family home is situated in the heart of Finningley village and is ideal for growing families. The property has front and rear gardens, off road parking and a garage."
FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY... READY TO BE VIEWED - Must be seen to realise the PLOT SIZE and POTENTIAL within this already EXTENDED FAMILY HOME. Sought after location within popular BAWTRY. Offered with NO CHAIN.
"Reeds Rains are delighted to market for sale with NO CHAIN, this partially upgraded 3 bedroom detached family home, standing on an enviable corner position within in own walled gardens, situated in the popular residential area of Arksey. EPC Rating D."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... ""We have only lived here for 18 months but felt at home as soon as we arrived. It's a lovely fam..."
"4 Bedroom detached property in this highly desirable development within the popular village of Armthorpe. The property stands within a good-sized plot and offers spacious and versatile accommodation. The location allows easy commuter access to the Yorkshire region with a full range of amenities, fac"
"Situated in a pleasant position this larger style four bedroom semi detached property offers generous living accommodation, sizable gardens, a large and impressive garden studio, garage and additional out building. The property comprises ; reception hall, dining breakfast kitchen, utility room, ..."
"Three Bedroom detached property in this highly sought after area. The property stands within a good-sized plot and offers spacious and versatile accommodation. The location has a full range of amenities, facilities and schools close by, as well as the wonderful Lakeside Lake."
"A stylish and modern 3 double bedroom 3 storey mid town house having open dining kitchen, ensuite to the main bedroom, contemporary decorative, gas heating, double glazing and garage. The property comprises of an entrance hallway, downstairs wc, open dining kitchen, study, first floor, lounge wi..."
5% DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION IN MARCH. THE TROON is a spacious 3 bedroom semi-detached home with an open plan kitchen/diner with french doors leading to the garden. Upstairs are 2 double bedrooms and a further single which could be used as a home office.
"The canopy entrance gives this attractive 3 bedroom family home an instant mark of distinction. The entrance hall becomes the heart of the home leading to the large kitchen diner with French doors and a separate L-shaped living room offering ample space and comfort.
The first floor boasts three ..."
"Stunning three bed detached property in a popular location with plenty of off road parking, huge garden and beautiful ground floor extension. The property, set back from the Road has a lovely private frontage and a long driveway large enough for several vehicles. There is a modest porch at the fr..."
A modern and spacious detached family home benefiting from a gorgeous rear garden and good sized bedrooms providing easy family living accommodation. The property is situated perfectly for commuters or those working from home. There are great amenities closeby so this property really must be viewed!
"This beautiful four bedroom detached property in Cusworth is perfect for a growing family and ticks all the boxes including downstairs WC, en suite, four bedrooms and lovely enclosed garden offering privacy. As well as substantial living accommodation the property also has off road parking and ga..."
DELIGHTFUL SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW WITH LOFT CONVERSION AND FOUR BEDROOMS. This beautiful property has been much improved and extended over the years to now provide a spacious bungalow that would ideally suit a family. A sought after position in Edenthorpe with plenty of local amenities and school...
"*** GUIDE PRICE £265,000 - £280,000 *** PRESENTED WITH AN ABSOLUTELY IMMACULATE INTERIOR, a nicely extended 3 bedroom detached house sat in an attractive cul-de-sac, close to the centre of Cusworth."
Situated in this popular location is this fabulous four bedroom detached family home which occupies a corner plot with spacious well-presented accommodation throughout. The property must be viewed to appreciate.
"TRADITIONAL SEMI located to popular TICKHILL. An opportunity to purchase this lovely FAMILY HOME, with scope to modernise. PLENTY OF OUTDOOR SPACE along with with a generous DRIVEWAY and a spacious garden. SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION."
"This 4 bedroom detached home benefiting from no onward chain. The accommodation in brief comprises of, hallway, downstairs WC, lounge, separate dining room, kitchen, utility room, family bathroom, master with En Suite shower room, front garden with driveway parking, single garage, rear garden."
"Reeds Rains are delighted to offer For Sale this superb, three bedroom, semi detached family home located within the popular and much sought after village of Cadeby. Beautifully presented throughout with views over fields to the rear. A viewing is very highly recommended to appreciate the accom..."
This deceptively spacious four double bedroom detached bungalow is offered with no onward chain and is located in this quiet street of similar properties. Occupying a good sized plot the property would be ideal for retirement or a family home. The bungalow is perfect for entertaining with a open...
EARLY VIEWING is recommended for this modern bungalow which has been improved and extended by the current owner with the addition of a Garage and a Conservatory amongst other internal refinements. Situated in a quiet cul de sac off the main road through Austerfield the property briefly comprises...
"The Windermere is a fabulous FOUR BEDROOM detached home with an INTEGRAL GARAGE. This home features a spacious lounge leading through to a dining room with FRENCH DOORS to the SOUTH EAST FACING GARDEN. You will find an open-plan kitchen with a separate utility room attached. 
On the first floor y..."
"***DETACHED FAMILY HOME***BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT***THREE BEDROOMS***CONSERVATORY***SEPARATE DINING ROOM***LUXURY FAMILY BATHROOM***MODERN KITCHEN***DETACHED GARAGE & PARKING***LANDSCAPED REAR GARDEN***SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION*** Fabulous detached family home, beautifully presented through..."
"A stunning 3 bedroom semi detached home with contemporary fixtures and fittings, blending traditional style features. The accommodation with not fail to impress and comprises of a traditional entrance hallway with quarry tiled floor, downstairs wc, lounge/diner, breakfast kitchen, study/office, l..."
"This 4 BEDROOM HOME includes a spacious OPEN-PLAN kitchen/ diner with FRENCH DOORS to the garden.  A bright and airy lounge, cloakroom and extra storage space complete the ground floor.  Upstairs you'll find an EN SUITE main bedroom, a second double bedroom, 2 single bedrooms and a family bathroom."
"This stylish, three bedroom detached home offers the best in modern day living for families that want comfort and style.
The welcoming hallway leads to the light and airy, luxuriously appointed living room, while at the heart of the property is an"
"5% DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION IN MARCH. The Newport features an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN DINER with patio doors leading to the TURFED REAR GARDEN, separate lounge, 2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS with ensuite to the master and a single bedroom. "
"Introducing The Hadley, a semi-detached 3 bedroom home popular with young families and downsizers alike. 
Step inside and you'll be greeted by a bright entrance hall with handy WC. To your left you'll find an open-plan kitchen diner with a utility room and French doors to the garden. On the right..."
Stunning four bedroom detached property available!  Call our Thorne Office now to arrange a viewing. 
"Guide Price £ 260,000 - £270,000 LET YOUR FAMILY GROW! This stunning extended detached home would be perfect for a growing family. With a stunning kitchen, sun room, en-suite and much more. Call now to view"
"*PRICE GUIDE £250,000 - £260,000* NO CHAIN. Four bedroom detached home in Mexborough. THREE RECEPTION ROOMS,are three double bedrooms, with en-suite to the master,along with a single bedroom and family bathroom. Gated parking to the front and enclosed rear low maintenance SOUTH FACING GARDEN"
"GUIDE PRICE-£260,000-£270,000. This impressive three bedroom triple fronted detached bungalow is ideal for retirement or ground floor living with spacious living accommodation throughout including two reception rooms. The property has ample off road parking and is available with no onward chain."
"Guide Price £260,000- 270,000. Situated in this highly sought after development. is this Venice style four bedroom detached family home has an open plan kitchen diner with a rear aspect lounge. The property benefits fro French doors leading out to the landscaped and beautifully designed rear garden."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... Twigg Crescent is a beautiful family home, one which we are very sad to be leaving. It is spacious an..."
"Situated on a corner position in the sought after village of Finningley is this spacious two/three bedroom detached bungalow which is offered to the market with no onward chain. The property has gardens to the front, side and rear, off road parking and a garage."
"Guide Price £260,000-£270,000. This stunning tucked away two bedroom detached family bungalow is situated on a corner plot. The property has a superb open plan kitchen with a focal island and breakfast bar, a stylish lounge and a spacious bespoke double shower room ."
"4 Bedroom detached property in this highly desirable development within the popular village of Balby. The property stands within a good-sized plot and offers spacious and versatile accommodation. The location allows easy commuter access to the Yorkshire region with a full range of amenities, facilit"
"Available chain free. A four bedroom detached property, situated in a quiet Cul-De-Sac in the popular area of Rossington, close to local amenities, schools and excellent commuter links. Call now to arrange a viewing."
"This family home offers a LARGE KITCHEN with dining area and FRENCH DOORS leading to the garden, ideal for entertaining. You’ll also find a handy W.C, a spacious lounge perfect for getting cosy on those dark nights and plenty of storage space on the ground floor.
Upstairs, the stylish main bedroo..."
SPACIOUS FOUR bedroom DETACHED dormer bungalow with private gardens and gated driveway. Spacious lounge plus dining room and kitchen. En-suite shower and family bathroom. Close to shops and facilities. Ideal family home. 
"Guide Price £260,000 - £270,000 LET YOUR FAMILY GROW! Located in this ever popular area this EXTENDED semi detached home would be perfect for a growing family. This is not one to miss out on call now to view"
This well-presented three bedroom semi-detached family home is situated in the sought after location in Sprotbrough village close to local amenities and transport links. The property is situated on a generous plot with front and rear gardens and off road parking.
3 bedroom fully furnished ex-show home sold as seen. OPEN PLAN living with DESIGNER KITCHEN and BI-FOLD doors. Main bedroom includes EN SUITE with FULL-HEIGHT tiling.
"Includes 12 month mortgage contribution worth £6000! Experience exceptional living with The Lockbridge! With INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and BIFOLD doors. The main bedroom includes an ENSUITE SHOWER ROOM. More home to begin with, more of what you really want to be included in the price."
"This attractive 4 bedroom townhouse nestled in a quiet new build estate would be ideal for first-time buyers. It is well placed for access to local amenities whilst having excellent transport links. This beautifully proportioned property offers a gas central heating system, ..."
"One of our signature types. It attracts those that love design and life. It's exciting, atmospheric and has a jaw-drop master loft suite."
"You can move straight into this beautifully presented four bedroom, two bathroom modern detached family home that's offered with no onward chain. This house type 'Paris' was only completed in 2019 by Strata Homes and therefore has 7 years left on its building guarantee. The property benefits fr..."
"***OPEN DAY*** Monday 13th March 2023 - 10:00 - 12:00
Please register you interest online ***LARGE PLOT***EXTENDED DETACHED FAMILY HOME***FOUR BEDROOMS***EXTENDED REAR GARDEN***DETACHED GARAGE***AMPLE OFF ROAD PARKING***CUL DE SAC LOCATION***CONTEMPORARY CONSERVATORY***MASTER BEDROOM WITH ENS..."
TICKHILL....READY TO MOVE INTO.....LOVELY GARDEN.....OFF STREET PARKING.........Call us to book your viewing!
"A modern, bright and airy design makes this a widely popular home. Step inside and the open-plan living space starts with your lounge and leads through to the kitchen diner with French doors to the south east garden. A handy utility room with WC adds a practical element to the home. Upstairs you'..."
"We are delighted to offer this well-presented three bedroom detached bungalow located in the Village of Blaxton situated to the north of Finningley on the A614 , with amenities including shops, garden centre, parks, public houses and being close to the motorway network. Briefly the property com..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £255,000 - £265,000** 3Keys Property are delighted to offer for sale this spacious 3 double bedroom detached bungalow, situated in the village of Finningley, Doncaster. In addition to 3 double bedrooms, the property has a spacious lounge and conservatory. The garage h..."
“You have just entered the territory of Robin Hood and his Merry Men” ~ Robin Hood
"If you are looking for an abundance of space and a welcoming home you can move straight into to then look no further. This superb family home really has it all with its larger than average plot in sought after location, this is sure to go very quickly so please book your viewing so as not to miss..."
"Step inside this popular home and the OPEN-PLAN LIVING space starts with your lounge and leads through to the kitchen/ diner with FRENCH DOORS to the SOUTH FACING GARDEN. A handy utility room and WC completes the ground floor. 
Upstairs you'll find 3 SPACIOUS DOUBLE BEDROOMS, an EN SUITE to the m..."
"Guide price £250,000-£260,000 and offered with NO CHAIN, this stunning Three bed detached property must be one to look at!! Situated in the sought after location of Conisborough close to all local amenities, transport links and fantastic schools and colleges"
"Beautifully presented 3 Bedroom semi-detached property, with off-street parking for multiple vehicles. Standing in a good sized plot with good sized gardens and spacious and versatile accommodation. The location allows easy access to a full range of amenities, facilities, and schoo..."
"***ONLINE AUCTION ENDING 29TH MARCH AT 1PM*** ***LOW START BID FOR THIS FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE!!!*** This amazing home is offered at a low start bid via the modern sale method (call office for details) where you can simply VIEW, BID AND BUY with no hassle or fuss!!! Read the full descri..."
"**GREAT FAMILY HOME!!** Four bedroom detached property now on the market offering a private rear garden, spacious living and a blank canvas perfect for your own preference. Located in Harworth & Bircotes. **CLICK NOW!!**"
"Modern and spacious detached family home set over three floors with 4 bedrooms, 3 bathrooms, large garden, extended detached garage and immaculate presentation throughout. This family home is ready to move into! Call us now on to arrange a viewing today!! "
"Perfect for families wanting a little more space to grow or for guests, the Denby is a three bedroom detached home. The spacious lounge is ideal for relaxing in following a busy day, and leads seamlessly into the open-plan kitchen and dining area. French Doors lead into the garden, whilst a do..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £250,000 *** An attractive 3 bedroom detached house with private front garden, ample driveway and a garage enjoying a lovely central position within Edenthorpe."
"New to the market is this fantastic four bed detached family home. Having lots of space inside, from the great bedroom sizes to the kitchen / diner at the rear, it is perfect for the growing family! Just off the A1 J38 at Redhouse and within a short drive from several shopping centres includin..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - £270,000 *** Extended 3 times, this now large 4 bedroom 2 bathroom semi detached house really does need to be viewed to be appreciated."
"Take a look around this well presented property using our unique 3D Virtual Tour, book a viewing now to avoid disappointment. This family home is situated in the popular village of Hatfield, situated close by to local amenities, schools and public transport. The property itself is spacious and..."
"Occupying an enviable corner position on this popular roadway within Rossington is this four bedroom detached family home. The property in brief comprises; entrance hallway, cloaks/wc, lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen/breakfast room, four good sized bedrooms and family bathroom. Outside; fro..."
"Alston Road - a semi detached, three bedroom and one bathroom family home that's located on one of the finest addresses Doncaster has to offer..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£250,000-£260,000. This is a unique opportunity! This three bedroom detached family home has planning permission granted for the erection of a four bedroom detached dwelling with an integral garage following the demolition of the existing eight garages. Available with no onward chain."
"This three bedroom detached family home is likely to impress any prospective purchaser. Having the benefit of driveway with off road parking, the former garage has been converted into a playroom, rear garden, good location and finished to the highest of standards. BE QUICK CALL TODAY TO BOOK..."
"Guide Price: £250,000 - £260,000 - An exceptional, newly refurbished detached bungalow, offering the benefits of that new home feel, in a mature property located in an established neighbourhood. "
Wonderfully presented 5 bedroom semi-detached home in Conisborough Comprises of: Warm and welcoming entrance hallway Modern and well-appointed kitchen diner with good space for dining Opens into bright and airy living room Utility room with good space for appliances...
"Occupying a substantial private plot on a quiet cul de sac within Armthorpe is this spacious detached bungalow which is priced to allow for some further modernisation. The property in brief comprises; entrance hallway, lounge, dining room/bedroom three, kitchen/breakfast room, two good sized bedr..."
"** VIEWINGS TO COMMENCE FROM FEBRUARY 15TH **  A detached three-bedroom cottage set within a sought-after village location yet convenient for the A19, M18 & M180 motorway links. The property offers scope to further develop with adjoining outbuildings and a barn. Offering plenty o..."
"Step inside this popular home and the OPEN-PLAN LIVING space starts with your lounge and leads through to the kitchen diner with FRENCH DOORS to the SOUTH FACING GARDEN. A handy utility room and WC completes the ground floor. 
Upstairs you'll find 3 SPACIOUS DOUBLE BEDROOMS, an EN SUITE to the ma..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£250,000-£260,000. This spacious well-presented three bedroom detached bungalow is situated in this sought after location. The property has front and rear gardens, off road parking and a garage."
A deceptively spacious two double bedroom detached bungalow situated in the village of HarworthThe property is conveniently situated within a short distance to an array or local amenities and excellent motorway links. 
Occupying a corner plot in this sought after location in Blaxton is this beautifully presented two bedroom detached bungalow. The property has been reconfigured to provide a spacious living dining kitchen to the rear.
"Guide Price £250,000 - £260,000 WHAT YOU HAVE BEEN WORKING FOR! This stunning EXTENDED detached bungalow is for sale with no onward chain and is close to all the amenities. Call now to view"
Perfectly located In Doncaster Town Centre. Potential Investment opportunity. STNPP. Close to all local amenities and transport links. Conditional/ Unconditional Opportunity
"Wanting to live The Good Life. Reeds Rains are delighted to market a three bed mid terrace home, situated within Dunscoft. This property comes with approx 1.25acres with the potential to rent further land. Including 9 stables with power and light, menage, paddocks, tack room, feeding room,15 Kenn..."
"Guide Price £250,000 - £260,000 WHAT A BUY! This stunning detached property is located on this ever popular area and would be perfect for a growing family. With the added extras of a stunning dining kitchen, conservatory, double bedrooms, en-suite and much more. Call now"
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... This three bedroom semi detached house comes with off road parking, separate garage, cellar, conserva..."
"This very well presented three double bedroom, two bathroom detached modern home benefits from separate reception rooms and occupies a good sized corner plot that is located in the ever popular Woodfield Plantation Estate. The accommodation comprises: Entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen ..."
"Reeds Rains are delighted to market for sale with NO CHAIN, this wonderful four bedroom, three level, semi detached spacious family home, situated within the popular residential area of Wheatley Hills. Benefits include GCH DG gardens driveway and a garage. Viewing Highly recommended EPC Rating C."
"This outstanding period property is modernised to a high standard situated in this popular location within walking distance to local amenities and Bentley train station. The property benefits from three reception rooms, a downstairs WC and an en-suite shower room."
"CHAIN FREE.... Located in this well regarded and sought after position, a detached 2 bedroom bungalow with an enclosed garden to the rear offering views over school playing fields beyond."
"3D Virtual Tour Available-Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... This has been an amazing family home to us, in a quiet cul-de-sac, over the last 5 years. It is c..."
"Don't delay, call us today!! A beautiful family home, this 2/3 bedroom bungalow in the village of Blaxton is ready to move into! With ample off road parking, front and rear gardens, a large living room with cosy fireplace and an attached garage, this home is great for those looking..."
"This impressive three bedroom detached double fronted family home is a rare find situated in a highly sought after location with close links to Doncaster Racecourse, Lakeside and Townfields. There is spacious living accommodation with a through lounge, a separate dining room and a breakfast kitchen."
"William H Brown Thorne are proud to present to the market this beautifully presented three bedroom dormer bungalow located in a popular area in Thorne! Boasting ample off-street parking, detached garage. VIEWINGS ESSENTIAL!!"
"This lovely, modern 4 bedroom detached property is situated in a lovely area surrounded by lots of green spaces, parks and local shops. It is also a great location for access to local attractions such as The Yorkshire Wildlife Park. All windows have been replaced within the last 12 months and ..."
"A stylish two bedroom detached bungalow having spacious lounge/dining room, breakfast kitchen, gas heating, UPVC double glazing and a good standard of internal presentation and decoration. The property comprises of a hallway, large lounge/dining room, breakfast kitchen, two bedrooms (both with w..."
"VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED on this 3 bed detached property situated in this popular location of Mexborough. This good sized family home benefits from 3 double bedrooms, ensuite, downstairs WC, conservatory, extended garage and summer house in the garden. Situated close to local amenities and scho..."
"A deceptively spacious traditional semi-detached property occupies a pleasant position on this ever-popular road. With an impressive garden and a good amount of living space, this 3 bedroom house is the perfect opportunity for first-time buyers and young families, ..."
A lovely spacious 2 double bedroom detached bungalow enjoying a fantastic cul-de-sac location with a SW facing rear garden.
THREE bedroom DETACHED home features a DESIGNER KITCHEN with BIFOLD doors leading into the rear garden. The main bedroom includes an ENSUITE shower room with CONTEMPORARY sanitaryware. Three DOUBLE bedrooms.
Open plan living is at the very heart of this 3 bedroom detached home. Its charm is encapsulated by the amount of light flooding into the ground floor thanks to the bi-folding doors leading out to the rear garden. The impressive features continue on the first floor with the master bedroom boast...
"Step inside this popular home and the open-plan living space starts with your lounge and leads through to the kitchen diner with French doors to the rear garden. A handy utility room and WC completes the ground floor. 
Upstairs you'll find 3 spacious double bedrooms, an en suite to the main bedro..."
"Located in Hyde Park on a popular residential estate is this perfect starter home or investment opportunity which is ready to move into. This two bedroom semi-detached property is a perfect step on to the property ladder and comprises of an spacious open plan kitchen, downstairs cloak..."
"Modern, 3 storey OPEN-PLAN 3 bed home including BI-FOLD doors, DESIGNER kitchen, tiling and much more."
"Modern, 3 storey OPEN-PLAN 4 bed home including BI-FOLD doors, DESIGNER kitchen, tiling and much more."
Well presented FOUR bedroom detached house with DOUBLE GARAGE in the popular village of Harworth. Call Your Move for your viewing today!
"This THREE BEDROOM Morseby home is popular with downsizers and families. The OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN diner is a great place for everything from a relaxing mid-week breakfast to entertaining friends. Open the FRENCH DOORS and enjoy your WEST FACING GARDEN.
Upstairs there are two double bedrooms, the mai..."
"The Moresby is a spacious three bedroom home ideal for growing families. On the ground floor you will find a spacious lounge and open-plan kitchen and dining area with French doors leading to the rear garden.
Upstairs there are two double bedrooms, the master with en suite shower room. On the fir..."
"CHAIN FREE…….A 3 bedroom detached ‘true’ bungalow in this lovely roadway just off Sprotbrough Road, close to amenities and the town."
"The Kingsville is a bright and FLEXIBLE FOUR BEDROOM, THREE-STOREY HOME, perfect for modern family living.
On the ground floor discover an OPEN-PLAN kitchen-diner with room for a TV area. There's also a ground floor bedroom which doubles as the perfect workspace.
On the first floor you’ll find th..."
"Step inside this popular home and the OPEN-PLAN LIVING SPACE starts with your lounge and leads through to the kitchen diner with FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden. A handy UTILITY ROOM AND WC completes the ground floor. 
Upstairs you'll find 3 SPACIOUS DOUBLE BEDROOMS, an EN SUITE to the main bedro..."
"A modern, bright and airy design makes this a widely popular home. Step inside and the OPEN-PLAN LIVING space starts with your lounge and leads through to the kitchen diner with FRENCH DOORS TO THE SOUTH FACING GARDEN. A handy utility room with WC adds a practical element to the home. 
Upstairs y..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a delightful and extended 3 bedroom detached property occupying an enviable position on this popular residential roadway. This immaculately presented and well maintained home is ideally placed for shops, schools and local bus routes ideal for modern day family..."
"EARLY VIEWING RECOMMENDED, CHAIN FREE……. A contemporary styled 4 bedroom 2 bathroom detached house with an integral garage on this sought after development."
"A modern 3 storey home, the Kingsville offers 3-4 bedrooms, with the 4th being able to be utilised as a study or bedroom depending on your lifestyle and family needs. The free-flowing kitchen with family & dining areas is a great space for entertaining and the French doors leading into the rear g..."
"A modern 3 STOREY HOME, the Kingsville offers 3-4 BEDROOMS, with the 4th being able to be utilised as a study or bedroom depending on your lifestyle and family needs.
The FREE-FLOWING KITCHEN with family & dining areas is a great space for entertaining and the FRENCH DOORS leading into the rear g..."
"This stylish and spacious three bedroom semi-detached home is perfect for growing families and couples alike.
The light and airy living room is luxuriously appointed, while at the heart of the property is an impressive, high specification kitchen with dining area, ideal fo"
"3D Virtual Tour Available- This 4 bedroom link-detached family home is found in a quiet cul-de-sac position, featuring a spacious grand room with plenty of space for gatherings. The kitchen has plenty of modern units and an integrated double oven. Off the kitchen, you have a generous size util..."
Excellent Transport Links! Available to view today with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this three bedroom semi-detached in Warmsworth Doncaster. The ideal property for a family to move in and make it their own!
"The Moresby is a bright three bedroom, detached home with plenty of space for a couple or a growing family. Head to the left from the hallway and you'll discover the comfortable lounge. Alternatively, on the the other side, you'll find the open-plan kitchen diner with French doors which lead in..."
"Guide Price: £240,000 - £250,000 - Stunning semi-rural village location, with countryside walks and village pubs in close proximity."
"This three bedroom Morseby home is popular with downsizers and families. The open-plan kitchen diner is a great place for everything from a relaxing mid-week breakfast to entertaining friends. Open the French doors and enjoy your east facing garden. Upstairs there are two double bedrooms, the ma..."
No summary available.
This well presented three bed detached home is situated on a popular residential estate in Mexborough and has fantastic living space throughout the property! With a driveway to the front and a garage! The property would be perfect for a growing family! CALL BEECROFT ESTATES TODAY TO BOOK YOU...
"This significantly spacious property enjoys a large corner plot and oozes individuality and character. There are three reception rooms, a large kitchen and a downstairs WC on the ground floor all accessed via an impressive entrance hall. Upstairs there are four bedrooms, with three of them being ..."
Beautifully presented four bedroom semi situated upon this new development in New Rossington. This lovely family home is ready to move straight into and is close to local amenities
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a deceptively spacious three bedroom detached house offering a wealth of charm and character. The property in brief comprises; entrance hallway, cellar, lounge, formal dining room, kitchen, master bedroom with dressing room, two further good sized bedrooms and..."
"Situated in this popular location of Bentley is this superb and spacious four bedroom detached family home. The property has a fabulous open plan layout to the ground floor, two en suite shower rooms and a stunning top floor master bedroom. The property has a landscaped south facing rear garden."
"Guide Price £250,000 - £260,000 WHAT A BUY! This stunning EXTENDED detached home is for sale with no onward chain and would be perfect for a growing family. With two reception rooms, conservatory, multipurpose room, en-suite and much more. Call now to view"
"Absolutely immaculate three bed detached property with beautiful garden, double driveway and an en suite to the master bedroom. This fabulous property in a popular residential area is beautifully presented throughout and would make a perfect family home. Built in 2017, this contemporary property ..."
"Guide Price: £240,000- £250,000. This three bedroom detached home is situated in the sought after location of Bessacarr with spacious living accommodation throughout, a driveway and garage."
"Guide Price £250,000 - £260,000 LET YOUR FAMILY GROW! This detached property is located on the modern development and would be perfect for a growing family. With three good sized bedrooms, en-suite, good sized garden and much more. Call now to view"
Detached bungalow with beautiful large gardens available!  Call our Thorne Office now to arrange a viewing. 
The Teal - Detached - Four Bedroom - Two Bathroom - Garage - New Build
"Four-bedroom detached family home with private driveway, offering spacious, well-designed family accommodation."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website...Being sold with no forwarding chain this bungalow has been recently decorated with neutral d&eacu..."
"3 Bedroom home, 3 storey home. South facing rear garden. Showhome available to view. Only £235,995. 2 Parking spaces. Flooring package. Integrated appliances package. Turf to rear garden. £750 towards legal fees. Free Mortgage assistance available. .FREE MORTGAGE ASSISTANCE AVAILABLEYOU COULD BUY..."
If you are looking for an abundance of space and a welcoming home you can move straight into to then look no further. This superb property really has it all. This is sure to go very quickly so please book your viewing so as not to miss out. 
"A rare opportunity to purchase an extended and deceptively spacious three bedroom detached house. Offering excellent potential & occupying an enviable corner cul de sac position with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The property in brief comprises; Entrance porch, hallway, fitted kitchen, spacious dual aspect..."
This deceptively spacious detached bungalow must be viewed to be appreciated. Having been renovated throughout and having a recently landscaped rear garden this home is ready to move straight into. Sitting in the popular village location of Barnby Dun viewings are essential!! Call YOPA today.
"This stunning 4-bed semi-detached property will certainly not be around for long, situated in the sought-after location of the new Rossington close to all local amenities, transport links and fantastic schools and colleges.  The ground floor consists of a large open-plan kitchen and diner..."
"Situated on this popular residential roadway within the sought after village of Sprotbrough is this extended three bedroom semi detached house. The property in brief comprises; entrance hallway, lounge, modern kitchen/dining room, study/playroom, sitting room, three good sized bedrooms and famil..."
"VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED on this 4 bed detached property situated in this popular location of Doncaster. The property benefits from balcony, 3 reception rooms, double driveway and 2 allocated parking spaces and it has easy access to Doncaster Racecourse and the Dome. Close to local amenities."
"A superb three bedroom detached property located in the ever popular suburb of BESSACARR Located within walking distance to shops, bus routes into Doncaster Town Centre and great primary and secondary schools. The property comprises of entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/diner, first floor landing, ..."
"Reeds Rains are delighted to market for sale with NO CHAIN, this dorma style three bedroom semi, situated within Park drive Sprotbrough Village. Comprising of a lounge, dining room, kitchen, downstairs bathroom and En-Suite shower room. Viewing advised. EPC Rating D."
"New build property! Call now to register your interest and for more information! Located on the outskirts of Hatfield, Radnor Place is an exclusive development of three four bedroom properties, and two three bedroom properties, located close to local amenities and transport links."
SUPERB DETACHED BUNGALOW WITH SOLAR PANELS AND POSITIONED ON A LOVELY QUIET ROAD IN DN7. This delightful home has been much improved and still offers plenty of potential with a current attic room utilised for just storage purposes. Deceptively spacious property offering fantastic well proportione...
"OFFERED WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN... a spacious DETACHED FAMILY HOME located to popular Harworth. Having a beautiful ENCLOSED GARDEN, OFF STREET PARKING and great access to local amenities. MOTIVATED VENDOR BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT! CALL US NOW TO VIEW!"
Situated on a popular quiet residential area of Conisbrough on the outskirts of the village and close to open countryside. A VIEWING IS HIGHLY RECOMMENDED TO APPRECIATE THE ACCOMMODATION ON OFFER This extended three bedroomed Stone built semi-detached house benefits from gas fired central heating...
Located in Askern and available with no chain is this spacious three bedroom mid terrace property with excellent access to local amenities and the transport networks such as the motorway links. The property provides ample living space and is perfect for a first time buyer or an invest...
"Having been a family home for many years, this extended Semi Detached Property is a must see. Delightful gardens and great access to all the amenities Bawtry has to offer. NO CHAIN & VACANT POSSESSION - CALL NOW TO VIEW, as a kerbside look does not suffice."
"GUIDE PRICE: £235,00-£240,00. This two bedroom detached bungalow is situated within a cul-de-sac location in the popular location and is available with no onward chain. The property has off street parking, a garage and well-presented front and rear gardens."
 An ex-show home sold as seen with furniture and furnishings included. LIGHT and BRIGHT OPEN spaces and CONTEMPORARY specification. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE shower room.
Experience DESIGN-LED living today with DESIGNER KITCHEN and BIFOLD doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE shower room. Detached home with off-street parking and rear garden.
"The bright open-plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading to the garden is perfect for entertaining and family meals. The front porch, downstairs cloakroom and two fitted cupboards take care of everyday storage. There’s an en suite to bedroom one, a family bathroom and an integral garage."
A generous three bedroom home with open plan living for those who love to entertain.
"3 bedroom home. DESIGN-LED OPEN PLAN living. EXCLUSIVE DESIGNER KITCHEN, with BI-FOLDS. Bathroom with DESIGNER TILING. "
A fantastic 2 bedroom semi-detached bungalow offering well-designed accommodation.
"This beautifully presented 3 bedroom semi detached family home, sits in this well regarded avenue in Scawthorpe."
"This spacious very well presented three double bedroom, two bathroom modern town house is located in this quiet cul-de-sac, close to all local amenities and offered with no onward chain. The accommodation comprises: Entrance hall, downstairs wc, kitchen with integral appliances including double ..."
EARLY VIEWING ESSENTIAL of this good sized 3 bedroom detached family house with integral garage offering spacious living.
"guide price £230,000 and over . 3 Bedroom detached property within the popular village of Edenthorpe. The property stands within a good-sized plot and offers spacious and versatile accommodation."
"The Kingsville is a bright and flexible FOUR BEDROOM, THREE-STOREY HOME.
Perfect for family living, on the ground floor discover an OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINER with room for a TV area. There's also a ground floor bedroom which doubles as the perfect workspace.
On the first floor you’ll find the relax..."
"The Kingsville is a bright and flexible four bedroom, three-storey home.
Perfect for family living, on the ground floor discover an open-plan kitchen-diner with room for a TV area. There's also a ground floor bedroom which doubles as the perfect workspace.
On the first floor you’ll find the relax..."
"The Kingsville is a bright and flexible four bedroom, three-storey home. Downstairs is a stylish kitchen with family and dining areas and the fourth bedroom, which can be used as a study. On the first floor you’ll find the relaxing lounge area and the spacious main bedroom, with an en suite. Up..."
"Guide Price £230,000 - £240,000 WHAT A BUY! This delightful detached bungalow is for sale with no onward chain and is close to all the amenities. This is not one you will want to miss out on. Call now to view"
"This stunning and spacious home is an excellent fit for a young family. With an abundance of living space and a driveway for two cars, this four-bedroom semi-detached home is the perfect opportunity. Situated in a sought-after location close to a range of local amenities such as schools and parks..."
"An extremely well presented three bedroom semi detached property offering generous living accommodation with generous corner plot gardens, garage and off road parking. Comprising of ; entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, porch, first floor landing, three bedrooms and a family bathroom."
"Guide Price £230,000-£240,000. Situated in this popular village of Blaxton is this three bedroom detached bungalow which benefits from having spacious living accommodation throughout. The property has an impressive range of off road parking with an open plan drive and garage."
"The Moresby is a spacious THREE BEDROOM HOME ideal for GROWING FAMILIES. On the ground floor you will find an OPEN-PLAN kitchen and dining area with FRENCH DOORS leading to the rear garden and a spacious lounge. Upstairs there are two double bedrooms, the master with EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM. On the..."
"Looking for a four bedroom family home in a sought after area of Thorne?  If so, call our Thorne Office now to arrange a viewing. "
This beautifully presented property is stylish and contemporary throughout requiring no further renovation from buyers. Located in a prime and desirable position the property is within walking distance to the heart of Sprotbrough Village and would make an ideal family home. The property has an at...
"MOVIN' ON UP - A STUNNING 4 Bed Detached Property! Located in a sought after modern development in Mexborough! Well placed for local schools, amenities and transport links! Boasting a drive, garage & delightful side garden - EXCELLENT FAMILY HOME - NO CHAIN - CALL NOW!"
"***THREE BEDROOM***MODERN OPEN PLAN LIVING***BI-FOLDING DOORS***DOUBLE DRIVEWAY***ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN*** The hallway of The Hamilton leads to a Milan-inspired kitchen with integrated appliances, and a light and spacious open plan living and dining area extending, through bi-fold doors, into t..."
"3 Bedroom property semi-detached property, with a large, extended open-plan kitchen/living area. Standing in a good sized plot with a large garden and spacious and versatile accommodation. The location allows easy access to a full range of amenities, facilities, and schools close by."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... The property is south facing benefitting for sun all day, not being overlooked with a private back ga..."
"With a substantial rear garden, modern open plan kitchen diner and ample of off road parking this beautifully presented home is definitely one to see! "
"Detached home set in sought after location, boasting spacious accommodation with two reception rooms, four good sized bedrooms attractively priced to allow for cosmetic modernisation and no onward chain."
"GUIDE PRICE £230,000 - £240,000 MORE THAN MEETS THE EYE! A rare opportunity has arisen to acquire this extended semi detached bungalow with spacious accommodation and for sale with no onward chain. You won't want to miss out call now to view"
"STUNNING PROPERTY - Located in a quiet rural village location is this beautiful, contemporary style three bedroom detached dormer bungalow. The property has been recently refurbished throughout and is ready to move straight into. The property comprise Entrance porch leading into the lig..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £230,000 - £245,000 *** Finished with a modern bright contemporary interior, an immaculate 4 bedroom detached house laid out over 3 floors offering spacious living with a brick garage."
A fantastic opportunity to purchase this amazing three bedroom detached bungalow situated in the sought after village of Norton. Call now to arrange a viewing.
"Wonderfully presented 4 bedroom detached house located in Edenthorpe, Doncaster Comprises of: Warm and welcoming entrance hall Bright and airy reception/dining room Well-appointed kitchen with base and wall units Four generously sized bedrooms Contemporary t..."
"Guide Price £230,000-£240,000 - Located in the popular area of Scawsby with excellent access to local amenities and the motorway networks such as the A1 is this spacious and extended three bedroom semi-detached property which is an ideal family home. The property provides ..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£230,000-£240,000. Situated in this highly sought after residential development is this four bedroom detached family home which is immaculately presented throughout with a spacious lounge diner, conservatory and a breakfast kitchen."
"Fantastic detached home close to amenities & transport links. With spacious accommodation boasting two reception rooms & conservatory, breakfast kitchen, four bedrooms three having built in wardrobes, book your viewing now as this will not be on the market long."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... ""The property offers Modern open plan living, great natural light and has a large garden with an..."
"Includes 12 month mortgage contribution worth £5000! Exceptional four bedroom-three storey home living with OPEN PLAN living, EXCLUSIVE KITCHEN DESIGNS, and BIFOLD doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM."
"NO CHAIN SALE………VIEWING ESSENTIAL on this original 3 bedroom detached bungalow, however subsequently reconfigured to create 2 larger bedrooms, sat on a large corner plot with garage and parking to the rear."
With a sociable kitchen diner and patio doors from the lounge to rear garden.
"DESIRABLE family home with Zero Stamp Duty to pay! STYLISH living across 3 floors. LARGE BEDROOMS, separate DRESSING ROOM & LARGE EN SUITE in the primary bedroom. SPACIOUS PRIVATE GARDEN. LEGAL FEES PAID PLUS UPGRADED DESIGNER KITCHENS FITTED. FLOORING PACKAGE. INTEGRATED APPLIANCES INCLUDED."
"The Property Selling Company is pleased to present this three-bedroom detached property located in the town of Doncaster. The property consists of – Sitting room, Kitchen/diner, WC, Three bedrooms (one en suite) and a Bathroom This property offers modern light-filled accommodation arrang..."
"£2,000 towards legal fees and free flooring package included^, contact us to find out more...The Mountford - Full of charm, flooded with light, this three-bedroom home is perfect to make your own. The Mountford is a beautifully appointed, semi detached 3-bedroom property, set across t..."
"£250 a month towards your mortgage payments for 12 months+ PLUS free flooring package, get in touch for more detailsThe Aslin, a true family home offering generously proportioned living.
This fantastic 4-bedroom, 3-storey house offers space, comfort and every convenience one could wi..."
"Viewing recommended on this wonderful three bedroom detached bungalow situated in a superb cul de sac location boasting generous living accommodation with beautiful landscaped front and rear gardens, garage and off road parking. Comprising; entrance hall, kitchen, open lounge dining room, three ..."
"The Mountford is a beautifully appointed, semi detached 3-bedroom property, flooded with light and set across two storeys. Enter into the airy hallway space, with a large living room to your left, and an open-plan kitchen/dining/living area to your right. The dual-aspect living room is..."
"Springbok Properties offers this attractively priced well presented terraced property, in Warmsworth on the outskirts of Doncaster. Viewing Advised. "
Detached bungalow situated on a large corner plot! Call our Thorne Office now to arrange a viewing. 
WOW DO NOT MISS OUT! A beautifully modern three bedroom detached property in the semi- rural village of Brodsworth. This property was built in 2021 and has a spacious and contemporary interior throughout. With a large dual aspect living room and open- plan kitchen/ diner plus WC do...
Fantastic home situated in sought after location available with no onward chain. We were impressed by the overall presentation and we are sure all buyers but families especially will love the local area. Too good to miss-book your viewing today.
"This four bedroom detached house will make a fabulous home for a growing family, close by to both primary and secondary schools, local amenities and great transport links. "
"Guide Price £225,000-£235,000. This four bedroom semi detached dorma bungalow has an impressive south east facing rear garden with open field views and a tandem garage. The property benefits from a range of spacious living accommodation throughout and a driveway providing ample off road parking."
"This SPACIOUS DETACHED BUNGALOW is located on a SOUGHT AFTER RESIDENTIAL ESTATE in Dunscroft and is a MUST SEE. Call SH0316 when calling......
"
"GUIDE PRICE £225,000-£235,000. This attractive kingsville style four bedroom, three storey end townhouse benefits from an en-suite shower room, a study, an open plan breakfast kitchen and a double drive positioned on the Park Edge sought after development."
This spacious extended four bedroom semi-detached family home is situated on a corner plot and provides ample off road parking by an electric gated driveway with garage. There is an en-suite shower room and a landscaped patio and lawned rear garden.
"*** GUIDE PRICE £225,000 *** CHAIN FREE……With a single storey extension across the rear elevation this larger than average 3 bedroom semi detached house enjoys a beautiful setting within Sprotbrough Village."
This large three bedroom property on Sprotbrough Road occupies a large plot that is set back from the main road and certainly has a great presence. The impressive frontage has a significant driveway large enough for several vehicles and the property has a lovely traditional feel with bay windows....
"This immaculate home has been finished to the highest standard throughout and must be viewed to be appreciated. Benefiting from modern and stylish decor throughout and variety of upgrades and extras this home is ready to move straight into. Ideal for any investor or first time buyer, call to view!"
"GUIDE PRICE-£225,000-£250,000. This spacious three bedroom detached family home is situated in this popular location close to local schools, shops and excellent transport links. The property must be viewed to appreciate."
3D Virtual Tour Available- We have loved living in our family home for the last 17 years. It is within a stones throw from beautiful country walks leading up to the Mount Pleasant Hotel and Rossington Hall. The street is very quiet with lovely neighbours. We hope the next people to live in the...
"Located in the sought after area of Dunsville is this spacious and extended five bedroom semi-detached property which is presented to a high specification and is ready to move into. The property comprises of two spacious reception rooms, an stunning open plan kitchen with integrated a..."
New to the market is this three bed semi detached which has been extended to the rear and therefore boasts a great open plan kitchen area at the back of the property. There is modernisation required but this spacious home is ready for you to come and put your stamp on it. The location is so s...
"*** GUIDE PRICE £225,000 *** Located on this popular residential cul-de-sac a good sized 3 bedroom detached bungalow with a detached garage and a South facing rear garden."
"Northwood are proud to present for sale this Detached Large Three bedroom house in the popular location of Bennetthorpe on a corner plot. This property requires modernisation throughout and is great opportunity not to be missed, located close to the City Centre.Call now to a..."
"This spacious, extended and very well presented four bedroom, three reception room detached family home is located near the end of a quiet cul-de-sac. The property has recently been much improved and now boasts a 'Baxi' combi boiler and new radiators (2018), new carpets, solid oak doors, stairca..."
"***SALE AGREED BY WILLIAM H BROWN BAWTRY*** TRADITIONAL HOME - With HIGH CEILINGS and OPEN PLAN living, creating an ATTRACTIVE & SPACIOUS ENVIRONMENT. With generous accommodation throughout, including TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS. Lovely walled garden and potential work from home space."
"An attractive two double bedroom period end cottage offering deceptively spacious living accommodation close to the heart of Tickhills many shops and amenities. This well presented property enjoys front and rear gardens, briefly comprising of: entrance hall, lounge, dining room, utility, kitchen,..."
"Beautifully presented three-bedroom detached family home on the highly regarded Skylarks Grange Estate in the Woodlands/Brodsworth area of Doncaster. Built in 2020 and finished to a very high standard, with a driveway to the side and wrap-around garden.  The home comprises a spacious, dou..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £225,000 - £250,000 *** CHAIN FREE…….A fine example of a large traditional styled 4 bedroom bay fronted semi detached house in this highly sought after residential suburb."
"*** £225,000 *** IF YOU'RE LOOKING FOR A FAMILY LOOK NO FURTHER! Located on a popular new build estate Arlington Road is the dream when it comes to family homes! A THREE BED semi detached with a modern interior, off road parking and with local amenities, schools and transport links close at hand!"
"*** GUIDE PRICE £225,000 *** Located on the fringe of the development, a very contemporary styled 3 bedroom double fronted semi detached house built approximately 3 years ago."
"Residential Building Plot, Rectory Lane, Finningley, Doncaster"
"GUIDE PRICE £225,000.00 TO £235,000.00 Ideally positioned on a generous corner plot is this lovely 4 bedroomed detached family home. Located in the sought after area of Dalecroft Road , Carcroft this home has many desirable features to offer and greatly benefits from a double storey side extensio..."
Woodward Lakes is a modern holiday park landscaped from the South Yorkshire landscape providing you with a private and secure destination. The park has excellent transport links with the market town of Doncaster only a short drive away. The park boasts excellent facilities for a great place to un...
"William H Brown Thorne are proud to present this four bedroom detached property located on a popular street in Thorne! Benefiting from off street parking, four bedrooms and spacious garage! This property is perfect for buyers looking to upsize!"
"The Brackley is a stylish and spacious three bedroom semi-detached home is perfect for growing families and couples alike.
The light and airy living room is luxuriously appointed, while at the heart of the property is an impressive, high specification kitchen with dining a"
Includes 12 month mortgage contribution worth £6000! Experience DESIGN-LED living today with DESIGNER KITCHEN and BI-FOLD doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE shower room.
Experience DESIGN-LED living today with DESIGNER KITCHEN and BI-FOLD doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE shower room.
"The Rosebery is a delightful 3 bedroom home that provides ample space and flexibility for any family. Its impressive living room is flooded with light from the bi-folding doors, which lead out into the garden. The kitchen and dining area is enhanced with dual aspect windows, offering a light and ..."
A traditional double fronted home which is perfectly designed to ensure there is plenty of ground floor space for growing families.
"The Moresby is a spacious three bedroom home ideal for growing families. On the ground floor you will find an open-plan kitchen and dining area with French doors leading to the rear garden and a spacious lounge. Upstairs there are two double bedrooms, the master with en suite shower room. On the..."
"Beautifully presented three bedroom detached property tucked away in a desirable residential estate in Adwick-le-Street. The property has been extended to the ground floor to create a beautiful open plan kitchen diner, downstairs WC and utility area. Finished to a stunning standard internally the..."
"Offered for sale is this fully renovated to a high standard three bedroom semi detached house situated on a large corner plot, with lots of potential to extend. "
"Located in the popular suburb of Rossington with excellent access to local amenities is this chain free, four bedroom detached property which is an ideal family home. The property comprises of a spacious lounge, conservatory, modern kitchen, utility room, master bedroom with en suite,..."
"GUIDE PRICE £220,000.00 TO £230,000.00 Ideal are pleased to offer for sale this lovely family home which is located in the highly desirable area of Sprotbrough and with in walking distance to sought after schools. This 3 bedroom semi-detached home benefits from a single storey extension, a w..."
"£220,000 - £230,000 - IS YOUR FAMILY GROWING? Prepare to be charmed the moment you step through the door of this absolutely stunning, four bedroom semi det. Boasting an en-suite, office/bedroom 5, beautiful gardens to both the front & rear, a versatile summer house and a drive & garage -CALL NOW!"
"A lovely 2 bedroom detached bungalow having stylish and contemporary fixtures and fittings, modern decoration, large conservatory, driveway and garage. Comprises ; entrance hallway, spacious lounge, kitchen with various units, 2 bedrooms, four piece bathrooms suite, gas heating, UPVC double glaz..."
"Situated on this highly anticipated and sought after Furlong Park development is this three bedroom semi-detached family home with a spacious living kitchen diner, family room with bifolding doors, an en suite shower room, a contemporary style and high finish throughout and off road parking."
"Offered with NO CHAIN, Reeds Rains are delighted to market for sale, this 3 bedroom detached bungalow situated within the popular area of Barnby Dun. Briefly comprising of an entrance hall, lounge diner, kitchen and a bathroom. Benefits include a GCH system and DG. Gardens driveway and a garage. ..."
"Presented for sale with no chain, is this extended three bedroom semi-detached family home in the desirable area of Wheatley Hills. The property benefits from excellent kerb appeal and has 16 solar panels making the property energy efficient. In close proximity to Donca..."
"GUIDE PRICE £220,000 - £230,000. This stunning 3 bedroom semi detached property is brought to the market with no onward chain and offers show home standard accommodation ideal for a first time home. Conveniently situated on the edge of this new development lying within walking distance of a hos..."
This five bedroom property in a great location would be perfect for a growing family and has masses of potential to be a stunning family home! The property has ample off road parking and a spacious entrace hall leading to a separate lounge with bay window at the front and an open plan kitchen din...
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a beautifully presented and extended three bedroom traditional semi detached house located within the sought after suburb of Wheatley Hills. The property in brief comprises; entrance hallway, lounge with feature fireplace, dining room, contemporary fitted kitch..."
"RECENTLY REDUCED.
NO CHAIN. An opportunity to acquire a delightful bungalow in the market town of Thorne. Close to all local amenities and the motorway. Positioned on a generous sized plot in a pleasant area benefiting from 3 bedrooms, kitchen, bathroom and lounge. Blocked paved driveway with amp..."
DON'T SETTLE FOR LESS - Located in this sought after village location of Conisbrough is this immaculately presented 3 bedroom semi! Conveniently placed close to schools & local amenities! Also benefiting from delightful front & rear garden & a driveway and garage for off street vehicle parking!
"Looking  for a spacious detached property, then look no further!  Call our Thorne Office now to arrange a viewing. "
"Positioned off Common Lane, on this ever popular modern development, a well presented 2 bedroom detached house, with well enclosed, private rear garden and detached, brick built garage. The centre of Tickhill lies within about 1/2 mile and offers a wide variety independent shops, bars and restaur..."
"Guide Price £220,000-£230,000. This three bedroom detached bungalow is situated in this popular location of Intake and is located on an ample corner plot with a range of off road parking. The property benefits from an enclosed rear garden and is close to local amenities and transport links."
Stunningly presented with light and airy rooms plus contemporary finishes.
This three bedroom semi-detached family home is situated in this popular location close to local amenities and transport links. The property has spacious living accommodation throughout with off road parking to the front and an enclosed garden to the rear.
BEAUTIFUL DETACHED HOME IN EDENTHORPE JUST A SHORT WALK TO LOCAL SUPERMARKET AND PUBLIC HOUSE. This lovely property has been much improved and extended to create a spacious family home in a sought after location within DN3. Fantastic presentation throughout means that this will be a move in ready...
"A FABULOUS THREE BED FAMILY HOME! This delightful 3 bed property boasts spacious living areas throughout, has modern furnishings and a plentiful rear garden & parking to the front! Situated in this sought after village location of Barnburgh! CALL NOW!"
"*** GUIDE PRICE £220,000 *** Virtually new, this contemporary styled 3 bedroom 3 storey semi detached house offers fashionable living on this popular new development."
Situated in this popular location close to local amenities and transport links is this spacious three bedroom detached family home (formally four bedrooms).The property benefits from having spacious accommodation throughout and a converted garage to create a family room.
ACT IMMEDIATELY TO AVOID DISAPPOINTMENT. Dunstans are pleased to offer for sale this well appointed semi-detached bungalow in a popular area of Conisbrough where properties very seldom appear on the open market. Benefiting from gas fired central heating and Upvc double glazing briefly comprising;...
"Guide Price £220000 - £230,000 NOT A THING TO DO! This stunning recently refurbished EXTENDED property is perfect for a growing family and is close to all the amenities. With a stunning dining kitchen, stylish shower room and much more. Call now to view"
"A beautiful two bedroom detached bungalow located in the village of Skellow, with three reception rooms, two bathrooms and an immaculate interior throughout. With a modern and homely feel, this property is deceivingly spacious and set in an ample plot with gardens to the front and ..."
This double fronted two bedroom detached bungalow is situated on a substantial plot with extensive block paved front and rear gardens and is available with no onward chain. The property benefits from three reception rooms and occasional attic space with skylights.
"Guide Price £220,000-£230,000 - Fabulous modern three bedroom semi-detached family home located in the much sought after village of Auckley. The property has lovely modern decor throughout with the downstairs floor consisting lounge, Kitchen diner with patio doors leading to the enclo..."
"***STUNNING PROPERTY ***CONTEMPORARY LIVING***ACCOMMODATION OVER THREE STOREYS***TASTEFUL DECOR THROUGHOUT***THREE BEDROOMS***MODERN ENSUITE & BATHROOMS***CONTEMPORARY KITCHEN/DINING ROOM***INTEGRAL GARAGE***SOUGHT AFTER DEVELOPMENT*** An EXCEPTIONALLY WELL PRESENTED three double bedroom, three ..."
"Situated in Balby on the Keepmoat residential site is this spacious and ready to move into three bedroom semi-detached property which is available with no chain. The property comprises of a spacious modern kitchen/diner, downstairs cloakroom, spacious lounge with French doors that lea..."
"READY FOR PASTURES NEW - THEN VIEW PASTURES MEWS! Situated on this sought after modern, residential estate & tucked away at the head of the cul-de-sac, this 3 bedroom det boasts beautifully presented accommodation, a drive, garage & delightful gardens- a perfect family home- CALL NOW!"
"A great opportunity to purchase a 3 bedroom semi-detached property in Tickhill village offering potential for further extensions subject to permissions. Set within walking distance of local shops, eateries, schools and boutique shops this property provides an ideal family home. Accommodation co..."
"Guide Price £160,000 - £170,000 THE FIRST STEP ON THE LADDER! This delightful semi detached home is for sale with no onward chain and stands in a cul de sac. With the added extras of a downstairs w.c, dining kitchen and much more. Call now to view"
"CHARACTER, SIZE AND LOCATION! OVER 1200 SQUARE FEET, LOVELY VILLAGE LOCATION, SUNNY SOUTH WESTERLY REAR ASPECT WITH VIEWS, NO ONWARD CHAIN!"
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website...This three bed semi detached home cab be found in the sought after location of Bessacarr, in need..."
AVAILABLE WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN AND EARLY COMPLETION - NOT TO BE MISSED! If you are looking for the next step up the property ladder this EXTENDED detached home would be perfect. You won't want to miss out call now to view
"A home made to different standards. LIGHT and BRIGHT OPEN spaces, BI-FOLD doors and CONTEMPORARY specification. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE shower room."
"Ideal for first time buyers, the Gosford is a spacious three bedroom home."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website... This property has generous gardens to front and rear and enjoys a lovely en-suite to the master (very..."
"REDUCED £199,995 This two double bedroom home offers spacious accommodation with a lounge, dining room, full sized kitchen, two double bedrooms (master with en-suite ) , study and house bathroom. The property is sold as seen and comes with all furniture displayed in the photographs."
Ex-show home sold as seen. Design-led living in this home features OPEN PLAN living with EXCLUSIVE KITCHEN DESIGNS with integrated appliances and BIFOLD doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM.
"PRIME LOCATION AND HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER AREA. This BEAUTIFUL, GENEROUSLY PROPORTIONED brand-new home boasts a spacious hallway entrance and CHARMS from room to room. GENEROUS GARDEN. FANTASTIC interiors included + ZERO STAMP DUTY! LEGAL FEES PAID + UPGRADED KITCHEN PACKAGES WITH ALL APPLIANCES. "
"This bright and practical home is ideal for modern family living. The large OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN with ample dining space has French doors leading out to the SOUTH FACING GARDEN. The home also features a spacious lounge for all of the family to relax in.
Upstairs the main bedroom has an EN SUITE show..."
"This bright and practical home is ideal for modern family living. The LARGE OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN with ample dining space has FRENCH DOORS leading out to the SOUTH FACING GARDEN. The home also features a spacious lounge for all of the family to relax in.
Upstairs the main bedroom has an EN SUITE show..."
"The Moresby is a spacious three bedroom home ideal for GROWING FAMILIES. On the ground floor you will find an OPEN-PLAN kitchen and dining area with FRENCH DOORS leading to the rear garden and a spacious lounge. Upstairs there are two double bedrooms, the master with EN SUITE shower room, a sing..."
"This excellent duplex apartment offers a lounge, a fitted kitchen, three large bedrooms, two shower rooms, a separate WC and two balconies offering breath-taking views of the lakes and city. This property presents a fantastic opportunity for home hunters. "
"The Maidstone is an IDEAL FAMILY HOME, designed with plenty of space for modern living. The ground floor has a dual-aspect lounge and OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN with dining area and FRENCH DOORS leading to the SOUTH FACING GARDEN. On the first floor are two double bedrooms, with an EN SUITE to the main, ..."
"The Somerton is a stunning 3 bedroom home with block paved parking space and more space than meets the eye. A welcoming hallway leads to the spacious lounge, perfect for relaxing and spending time with the family. The hub of the home is the large open plan kitchen diner designed to create easy ac"
"An Up to date epc is being done for the property This spacious 3-bed semi-detached property is situated in the sought-after location of Balby, close to all local amenities, transport links and fantastic schools and colleges.  The downstairs briefly comprises a very spacious lounge house a..."
Located on a quiet cul-de-sac is this extended 3-bedroom semi-detached house with a large garden. This property would make a fantastic family house in a sought-after area close to good local schools.
"A lovely 3 BEDROOM, semi-detached home IDEAL FOR GROWING FAMILIES.
Downstairs offers OPEN-PLAN LIVING with a kitchen and dining area with FRENCH DOORS to the garden, separate lounge and cloakroom. 
Upstairs you'll find two double bedrooms with EN SUITE shower room to bedroom 1, a single bedroom a..."
"Offered for sale with a no vendor chain is this two double bedroomed detached bungalow situated within the heart of the village just a short walk from all local amenities, schools, bus route and the railway station. The property benefits from gas central heating and Upvc double glazing briefly c..."
"This beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached family home is situated on this popular development with spacious accommodation throughout. The property benefits from a modern kitchen diner, a downstairs WC, a master bedroom with en-suite shower room and off street parking."
"CHARACTER, STYLE AND LOCATION! QUIRKY BARN CONVERSION, IMPECCABLE STANDARDS THROUGHOUT, VILLAGE LOCATION, HOP, SKIP AND A JUMP TO BAWTRY! "
FAMILY FRIENDLY EXTENDED 4 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE!! Arranged over 3 floors this well kept property won't be around for long... 
"A contemporary styled 3 bedroom, 3 storey semi detached house on this modern development with excellent motorway access, perfect for commuters."
ABSOLUTELY BEAUTIFUL EXTENDED BUNGALOW POSITIONED ON A CORNER PLOT IN THE SOUGHT AFTER VILLAGE OF ARMTHORPE. This delightfully presented three bedroom semi-detached home is now available for sale and offers any purchaser a move in ready home to be proud of. A generous plot with off street parking...
***STUNNING COMTEMPORARY HOME***MODERN LIVING***ACCOMMODATION OVER THREE STOREYS***BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT***THREE BEDROOMS***MASTER WITH ENSUITE & DRESSING ROOM***SPACIOUS LOUNGE WITH MEDIA WALL***CONTEMPORARY KITCHEN DINER***LUXURY MODERN BATHROOM & ENSUITE***WALK IN DRESSING ROOM TOP ...
We are proud to present this Three Bedroom Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.
"One of a kind, do not dismiss! This fantastic new build property has been renovated to feature additional reception room with media wall, master bedroom with walk in wardrobe and en suite shower room and a landscaped garden! Viewings are absolutely essential and can be requested online 24/7."
"**STUNNING OPPORTUNITY!** Three double bedroom, three story town house now on the market located in the sought after village of Auckley. Offering a private rear garden with studio, off street parking and an EPC Grade C. **CLICK NOW!!**"
"The Maidstone is a THREE BEDROOM, semi-detached home ideal for FIRST-TIME BUYERS. The heart of your new home is the spacious lounge that leads to an attractive, OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining room with French doors leading to the rear garden.
Upstairs you will find two double bedrooms, with an EN SUITE..."
"The Maidstone is a three bedroom, semi-detached home ideal for FIRST-TIME BUYERS. The heart of your new home is the spacious lounge that leads to an attractive, OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining room with French doors leading to the rear garden.
Upstairs you will find two double bedrooms, with an EN SUITE..."
"Situated in the delightful town of Harworth, Simpson Park is a wonderful collection of brand new three and four bedroom homes built by Tilia Homes. This new development is surrounded by an array of exciting amenities to cater for every member of the family. The Re..."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website...Well presented semi detached property ready to move straight into.  The rear garden is low..."
"PRICE GUIDE.... £210,000-£220,000. Large three bedroom, extended semi detached property in this highly desirable location offering a generous footprint and demanding an early viewing"
NO ONWARD CHAIN | PRIVATE GARDEN | WELL MAINTAINED
"This three bedroom semi detached home includes an open plan kitchen with a dining area and French doors to the garden. A spacious lounge and a cloakroom completes the ground floor.
Upstairs you'll find an en suite main bedroom, a further double bedroom, a single bedroom and a family bathroom."
NEW TO THE MARKET is this THREE bedroom DETACHED bungalow situated in a quaint cul-de-sac location! In immaculate condition this bungalow is sold with NO UPWARD CHAIN!!
"With the 3 bedroom Maidstone is perfect for first-time-buyers and couples looking to start a family. On the ground floor, this modern home benefits from a spacious lounge, in which you can unwind after a busy day. The kitchen and dining area leads directly off the lounge, and the seamless flow c..."
"Whether you're in need of a home ready to welcome a new family or if you're a first-time buyer making your start on the housing ladder, The Maidstone is the ideal choice. The ground flow has a natural flow as the spacious lounge moves seamlessly into the open-plan kitchen and dining area - which..."
"Step inside The Archford and discover a stylish open-plan kitchen diner - perfect for those who love to cook, and those who love to eat! You'll enjoy access to the garden through French doors, perfect for summer barbecues. There's also a bright and spacious lounge that's perfect for curling up to..."
"A lovely 3 BEDROOM, semi-detached home IDEAL FOR GROWING FAMILIES.
Downstairs offers OPEN-PLAN LIVING with a kitchen and dining area with FRENCH DOORS to the garden, separate lounge and cloakroom. 
Upstairs you'll find two double bedrooms with EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM to bedroom 1, a single bedroom a..."
"Guide Price £210,000 - £220,000 NOT A THING TO DO! This stunning EXTENDED semi detached home is perfect for a growing family. With two reception rooms, stylish dining kitchen, good sized garden and much more. Call now to view"
"This traditional yet stylish 3 bedroom semi-detached home is perfect for first time buyers. The Archford features a bright and modern open-plan kitchen dining room with French doors opening out onto the rear garden. A hallway separates the kitchen and the spacious lounge, with stairs leading to ..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £210,000 - £220,000 *** With what must be one of the biggest plots on the development, this immaculate 3 bedroom double fronted semi detached house with a gorgeous new kitchen needs to be viewed."
"Largest ""Gosford style"" plot on the estate, corner plot with large south west facing garden (sun all day) VIEWING ESSENTIAL... Located on this sought after development, a gorgeous 3 bedroom semi detached house with many high quality upgrades. With upgraded full glass doors through..."
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website.."
"View now to avoid disappointment, well presented modern detached home close to amenities & transport links, with four good sized bedrooms, modern kitchen & bathrooms, this will not be on the market long."
Looking for a home full of character with an abundance of space? then look no further! Available with no onward chain! Call Your Move for a viewing or take a virtual tour.
"An attractive three bedroom mid town house offering spacious living accommodation with wonderful presentation throughout with brand new fitted carpets and landscaped rear garden. The property comprises of : sitting room with open plan dining room, kitchen, first floor landing, two bedrooms, fami..."
This superb stone built house is offered for sale with no onward chain and resides in an exclusive cul-de-sac in the sought after village of Norton. We strongly urge an early internal viewing to avoid disappointment. Awaiting epc ratings.
"Occupying a quiet cul de sac position is this substantially extended four bedroom semi detached house. The property in brief comprises; entrance hallway, spacious lounge/dining room, garden room extension, kitchen, master bedroom with en suite shower room, three further bedrooms and family bathro..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£210,000-£220,000. This fabulous spacious three bedroom detached family home is situated in this sought after location close to a wide range of local amenities including schools and motorway connections."
"An absolute must view, this beautifully extended three bedroom home boasts open plan, modern living and benefits from a newly fitted kitchen. Ideal for all buyers this energy efficient home has solar panels to three sides which provide income and low bills to the owners. Viewings strongly advised!"
"Enjoying what can only be described as the pick of the plots, this extended 2 bedroom detached bungalow stands well with ample off road parking, garage and beautiful gardens."
"The Maidstone is a three bedroom, semi-detached home IDEAL FOR GROWING FAMILIES. The heart of your new home is the spacious lounge that leads to an attractive, OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining room with FRENCH DOORS leading to the rear garden.
Upstairs you will find two double bedrooms, with an EN SUITE ..."
SUPERB semi-detached home in the sought after village of Branton with COUNTRYSIDE VIEWS. An early viewing is highly recommended to avoid disappointment.
ENDLESS POTENTIAL! Currently set up for a business but with potential to be converted to a residential property this property must be viewed to see the full potential! With 3/4 bedrooms and plenty of potential living space this could be your ideal blank canvas! CALL NOW TO BOOK YOUR VIEWING!
"** WOW FACTOR FAMILY HOME !! ** Viewing is essential to appreciate the standard and finish that this property has to offer.This stunning 4 bedroomed home is located on Osborne Avenue , Woodlands, DN6 and comes with many outstanding features including double glazed Georgian bar windows ,dual a..."
***VENDORS ENTERTAINING SENSIBLE OFFERS-BOOK YOUR VIEWING NOW*** Smart three bedroom semi- detached house in the sought after village of Sprotbrough close to many local amenities. Call Your Move for your viewing or take an online virtual tour today.
"RARE OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME ON MADAM LANE IN BARNBY DUN. Just a short walk to the canal/countryside walks, this village position offers plenty with easy access to local amenities, local primary school and plenty of transport links. This delightfully presented h..."
"NEW BUILD PROPERTY! Call now to register your interest and for more information! Located on the outskirts of Hatfield, Radnor Place is an exclusive development of three four bedroom properties, and two three bedroom properties, located close to local amenities and transport links."
"Guide price: £210,00- £220,000. This three bedroom semi-detached family home is situated in the highly sought after location of Sprotbrough provides a spacious lounge diner with sun room. The property has a driveway providing off road parking, a garage and a South facing rear garden."
"This extremely well presented and 'ready to move into' detached bungalow is brought to the market with no onward chain. Lying within easy reach of local amenities including superstores, schools, bus routes and A1 motorway networks this property must be viewed. The accommodation comprises: hall..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£210,000-£220,000. Situated in the popular village of Arksey is this well-presented extended three bedroom semi-detached family home which provides spacious accommodation throughout. There is a driveway providing off road parking and a large enclosed rear garden with open views to rear."
"GUIDE PRICE £210,000-£220,000. This superb three bedroom semi-detached family home is situated in this popular location of Edenthorpe and benefits from an open plan style lounge diner, a downstairs shower room, utility room and a generous south facing rear garden which overlooks the stunning fields."
Great opportunity to purchase a GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT in sought after market town BAWTRY. Having TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS & OFF STREET PARKING along with OPEN PLAN LIVING. Modern and well presented throughout. LOW MAINTENANCE GARDEN. Offered with NO CHAIN. Call us now to arrange your viewing!
"A 3-bedroom semi-detached property on a corner plot with huge potential. Being sold with NO UPWARD CHAIN.  Description The ground floor comprises of an entrance hall, on the right is the bright and spacious living room, leading from the hallway is the dining room with patio do..."
"Guide Price £210,000 - 230,000 A beautiful 300 acre park with a stunning mix of lakes and open grassland within a short distance from the village of Armthorpe. The park has excellent transport links with the market town of Doncaster only a short drive away and boasts e..."
LIFE ON ONE LEVEL! A superb 2 bedroom detached bungalow sits pretty on this sought after street location! Viewing is essential to appreciate this truly impressive property! This delightful bungalow is presented with a high specification throughout! Most enviable gardens & a driveway & garage!
"GUIDE PRICE-£210,000-£220,000. This fantastic opportunity to purchase this exceptional three bedroom semi-detached family home which is available with no onward chain. Providing extensive family living with a spacious extended kitchen, garden room and a bay fronted lounge and dining room."
"A rare opportunity to purchase a deceptively large three bedroom semi-detached property located in a very popular area of Doncaster, close to good schools local amenities and fantastic transport links"
"3D Virtual Tour Available- Take a closer, more detailed look around via our 3D Virtual Tour! Don't forget that you can also check availability for viewings online via a visit to our website...Well presented family home location in the popular village of Edenthorpe. "
"NO CHAIN - GUIDE PRICE £210,000 - £230,000 An EXCEPTIONALLY WELL PRESENTED three double bedroom three storey town house situated on this sought after modern development lying close to a local superstore, amenities, reputable schools and motorway connections. The property in brief comprises; entr..."
"The Sutton is a three-bedroom home designed for modern-day living. Its family-friendly features include a kitchen/dining room, a front-aspect living room and a convenient downstairs WC. There are two first-floor bedrooms along with the family bathroom and the master bedroom is on the second floor."
"The extremely popular Hanbury is a three-bedroom family home with a bright and modern open-plan kitchen/diner which has French doors leading into the garden. The downstairs WC, three handy storage cupboards and an en suite to bedroom one mean it ticks all the boxes for practical family living."
"Offered for sale with no chain and ready to move straight into! This beautifully presented new build property has been upgraded by the current sellers and is sure to appeal to a wide range of purchasers. Benefiting from generous sized bedrooms, en suite shower room and kitchen with appliances!"
The Sloane is a charming 3 bedroom property designed with modern families in mind. The living and dining room boasts a light and airy feel thanks to the bi-folding doors leading out to the rear garden. With the first floor offering a large master bedroom with en-suite.
"BOOK AN APPOINTMENT TO VIEW - COME AND SEE THIS BEAUTIFUL HOME FOR YOURSELF!
Welcome to The Ellerton, a fantastic 3 BEDROOM HOME for YOUNG GROWING FAMILIES. On the ground floor you can enjoy dining with your family in your open-plan kitchen diner or relax watching your favourite film in the spaci..."
Design-led living in this home features OPEN PLAN living with EXCLUSIVE KITCHEN DESIGNS with integrated appliances and BIFOLD doors. The main bedroom includes EN SUITE SHOWER ROOM.
"Your new home features and open-plan dining kitchen with French doors to the garden. Downstairs, you will also find a comfortable lounge and handy downstairs cloakroom. Upstairs, you will find 2 double bedrooms and a single that could also be used as a study. A stylish family bathroom completes t..."
"A desirable three bedroom detached house situated in the very popular village of Armthorpe. The property benefits from having excellent motorway access, great local schooling and a whole array of local amenities. Call now to arrange a viewing on ..."
"A fabulous family home on theoutskirts of Rossington , quiet location with its own drive for several cars/ single garage & very private rear garden. REF: LC-SW"
"The Maidstone is a three bedroom, semi-detached home ideal for FIRST-TIME BUYERS. The heart of your new home is the spacious lounge that leads to an attractive, OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining room with FRENCH DOORS leading to the rear garden.
Upstairs you will find two double bedrooms, with an EN SUITE..."
"Your new home features an OPEN-PLAN dining kitchen with FRENCH DOORS to the SOUTH EAST FACING GARDEN. Downstairs, you will also find a comfortable lounge and handy downstairs cloakroom. Upstairs, you will find 2 double bedrooms and a single that could also be used as a study. A stylish family ba..."
"This three bedroom semi-detached home is situated in this popular location on a corner plot location. The property has spacious accommodation throughout with a lounge, kitchen diner, downstairs WC and an en-suite shower room."
"GUIDE PRICE-£200,000-£210,000. An immaculate four bedroom semi-detached family home positioned on a corner plot within a cul-de-sac location and situated close to local amenities, primary and secondary schools and transport links."
"Guide Price: £200,000 A three bedroom detached house occupying a freehold plot of approx . 0.18 acre in the heart of Finningley and within easy reach of the motorway network. The property requires modernisation and offers excellent potential including possible redevelopment (STP) FOR..."
"A perfect first family home, the Palmerston is a popular 3 bedroom home. Downstairs offers an open-plan kitchen diner withFrench doors to the garden, a comfortable lounge, and a useful cloakroom. Upstairs, you will find an impressive main bedroom, an additional double bedroom, and a further sin..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £250,000 *** Your chance to build your ‘GRAND DESIGN PROJECT'. With planning permission already passed to extend and redevelop the existing building to a contemporary styled 4 bedroom detached dormer bungalow overlooking beautiful countryside."
"** KITCHEN TO BE COMPLETED UPON BUYERS SPECIFICATION  - with the option to alter the worktops **  Situated in the quiet yet popular area of Kirk Sandall, on the outskirts of Doncaster, comes this well-presented home, SPACIOUS Ideal for first-time buyers or investors lo..."
"VIEWING ESSENTIAL on this double extended, to the front and rear 3 bedroom semi detached house which offers more space than imagined."
"GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £210,000 This beautiful Three bedroom family home is a property you need to view to fully appreciate whats on offer. The three bedroom Gosford New Build design will appeal to both first-time buyers and families looking for a little extra space. The Gosford has a kitchen/d..."
"***EXCELLENT OPPORTUNITY***NO VENDOR CHAIN*** To purchase this excellent two bedroom detached bungalow situated in a very sought after area of Mexborough. A short drive to local shops, train and bus stations this property is ideal for any mover or planning for retirement."
"A perfect first family home, the Palmerston is a popular 3 bedroom home. Downstairs offers an open-plan kitchen diner with French doors to the garden, a comfortable lounge, and a useful cloakroom.
Upstairs, you will find an impressive main bedrooom, an additional double bedroom, a further single ..."
"*** Guide Price £200,000- £210,000*** BEAUTIFUL FIELD VIEWS! Located on the outskirts of Stainforth is this character filled three bedroom property! Located with in easy reach of local amenities, transport links and schools as well as scenic walks along the near by canal. CALL NOW!!"
"Guide Price £200,000-£210,000. Situated on a cul de sac location is this four bedroom semi-detached family home which benefits from having spacious living accommodation throughout and a breakfast kitchen. The property is on a corner plot which provides ample off road parking and a generous garden."
Situated on a large corner plot with a double garage. A beautiful home ready to move into.
"Reeds Rains are delighted to offer For Sale this two bedroom semi detached bungalow located within the popular and much sought after area of Bessacarr. Being very well presented and briefly comprising of; entrance hall, lounge/dining room, kitchen, two bedrooms and a bathroom together with low m..."
BOOK AN APPOINTMENT TO VIEW – THIS HOME IS READY TO MOVE INTO AND AVAILABLE TO VIEW NOW. A bright and spacious home cleverly designed around busy modern living. The OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM is ideal for enjoying time with friends and family as double doors from here open onto your LARGE REA...
"Due to extremely high demand for this property type, it is very rare to find a move-in ready bungalow “up for grabs” in today’s market. A lovely single-storey property that has recently been thoroughly updated. From its superb location - right in the heart of Edenthorpe village to its charming g..."
"CHAIN FREE.....EARLY VIEWING ESSENTIAL....... Located on this sought after development, a gorgeous 3 bedroom semi detached house with many high quality upgrades."
This attractive 3 bedroom semi-detached home nestled in a quiet new build estate would be ideal for first-time buyers. It is well placed for access to local amenities whilst having excellent transport links.
"Reeds Rains are delighted to market for sale with NO CHAIN, this 3 bed detached family home in need of modernisation. Comprising of a lounge diner front porch kitchen, 3 bedrooms and a bathroom with a separate wc. Driveway garage and gardens. EPC Rating E. Viewing advised"
"GUIDE PRICE £200,000- £210,000. This is a fabulous three bedroom semi-detached family home which comes to the market with no chain on a generous corner plot. There are two bay reception rooms, a bay fronted master bedroom and a triple garage."
Situated in this popular location close local amenities and transport links is this fabulous well presented three bedroom semi detached family home which has many upgrades and must be viewed.
"An ideal home for FIRST-TIME BUYERS, the Palmerston offers an OPEN-PLAN kitchen with dining area and FRENCH DOORS leading to the SOUTH EAST FACING GARDEN. A spacious lounge and handy cloakroom complete the ground floor.
Upstairs, you will find 2 double bedrooms and a single that could also be use..."
Detached House - For sale by Auction - 4th April 2023 (subject to usual conditions)
"Absolutely beautiful statement property with three good-sized bedrooms, a family bathroom, open plan lounge diner, kitchen, and an inviting enclosed south-facing garden. The property has a spacious, landscaped driveway providing a sense of grandeur along with its traditional double bay window fro..."
"Guide Price £200,000 - £210,000 WHAT A BUY! Standing in a cul de sac this beautifully presented extended semi detached home would be ideal for a growing family. This is not one to miss out on. Call now to view"
Situated on a popular residential estate in Lakeside is this spacious three bedroom end terrace property which is perfect for a young professional couple or an first time buyer. The property has ample living space both internally and externally as well having allocated parking. 
VIEWING ESSENTIAL - Spacious THREE DOUBLE bedroom detached house. Newly fitted kitchen. Lounge and dining room. UPVC conservatory. Modern bathroom. Gated driveway to garage. Private rear garden. Small popular side road. Close to schools.
"*** GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £210,000 *** Enjoying a larger than average corner position, this original 3 bedroom semi detached bungalow has been extended and makes for a better layout with more living space."
"MOTIVATED VENDOR, WITH ONWARD PROPERTY FOUND - An extended semi detached home in the popular location of Harworth. Internal accommodation briefly comprises; entrance hall, lounge, conservatory, kitchen/diner, utility, WC, first floor landing, four bedrooms, master en suite & family bathroom."
"GUIDE PRICE-£200,000-£220,000. This three bedroom semi detached bungalow is situated in this popular village location of Barnby Dun. The property occupies a generous plot and has front and rear gardens, off road parking and a garage."
"NOT A THING TO DO! This stunning bungalow is located on a cul de sac in this ever popular modern development. With a stylish kitchen with built in appliances, landscaped garden and much more. You will not want to miss out . Call now to view"
"A well positioned three bedroom mid town house set amongst a small cul-de-sac lying within easy reach of a host of local amenities, schools and bus routes. The accommodation comprises: hallway, separate wc and cream kitchen with integrated appliances, lounge/dining room with storage cupboard, bo..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£200,000-£215,000. This immaculately presented show home standard and finished three bedroom semi-detached family home has much to offer with a South-West facing generous rear garden and a stunning open plan breakfast kitchen living diner tucked away within a cul-de-sac location."
"Guide Price **£200,000 - £220,000** This well presented and extended 3 bedroom detached house enjoys a pleasant cul-de-sac location within Edenthorpe, close to local amenities."
"Guide Price £200,000-£220,000. This well-presented and extended three bedroom semi-detached family home is situated in a cul de sac location in the popular village of Finningley and is positioned close to local amenities and transport links."
"A modern, well presented family home stood on a popular residential development with garage, gardens and off road parking. Viewing recommended"
"GUIDE PRICE-£200,000-£220,000 Situated in this sought after location in Armthorpe is this well presented three bedroom detached home which occupies a corner plot and is ideal for a first time buyer/young families and is close to local amenities and transport links."
"Offered with no onward chain and vacant possession this large three bedroom semi-detached property enjoys a great spot in a desirable location in Cusworth. In need of modernisation, this property has masses of potential to become a stunning family home with an abundance of space .There is also ob..."
"A pretty period cottage situated in a sought after position offering two double bedrooms over three floors enjoying many charming features and enclosed rear garden. The property briefly comprises of ; sitting room, kitchen, rear lobby with staircase, first floor landing, main bedroom, family bat..."
"A superb example of a good as new, three bedroom semi detached home boasting a great corner plot, large driveway, stunning bathrooms and kitchen and generally perfectly presented in every way. View now before it's gone for good."
A rare opportunity to purchase a deceptively large period cottage located in the desirable hamlet village of Hampole. This quirky cottage is set in a peaceful location and viewing is essential. 
"A great opportunity to purchase a 3 bedroom traditional mid terraced in the sought after village of Tickhill. Lying within walking distance of cafes, restaurants and boutique shops this property must be viewed. The accommodation comprises; lounge to front elevation with central brick fireplace,..."
"GUIDE PRICE-£200,000 - 210,000. This stunning three bedroom modern semi-detached family home is situated on the outskirts of Rossington with stunning views to the front. The property is conveniently located with easy access to the local M18 motorway network, Tickhill Village and Rossington itself."
"GUIDE PRICE-£200,000-£225,000. Situated in this popular location is this extended well-presented detached family home which has front and rear gardens and off road parking. The property is ideal for growing families and first time buyers."
"This three/ four bedroom semi-detached dorma bungalow is situated in this desirable location of Blaxton and is tucked away in a cul de sac. The property benefits from having a driveway with garage providing off road parking, front and rear gardens and having spacious living accommodation throughout."
"Looking to downsize? Ask about our part exchange scheme..A great opportuniy to buy new 1 bedroom home within the city of Doncaster. Easy to commute to the city centre, local amenities and stunning outdoor surroundings at this Lakeside. Perfect for a travelling professional with Doncaster railway ..."
"REDUCED £199,995 This two double bedroom home offers spacious accommodation with a lounge, dining room, full sized kitchen, two double bedrooms (master with en-suite ) and house bathroom. The property is sold as seen and comes with all furniture displayed in the photographs."
This beautifully presented and spacious property despite being listed as a three bedroom has a fully converted loft room with staircase from the main landing so if its space you are craving then this is the perfect property! There is no renovation budget required for this contemporary property th...
"The Eveleigh - a true family home, warm in character and generous in proportion. Welcome to The Eveleigh, a charming semi-detached 3-bedroom home. A place to live in, to grow a family in and to make years of happy memories in. Behind its warm and welcoming faÃ§ade you'll find a s..."
"Location location location! Situated in the centre of the historic Durham City, this fantastic three bedroom, end terrace, within minutes' of Durham University, the beautiful riverbanks, train station and bustling shops is very exciting! With potential to be a fantastic student property and gener..."
"Fernhill is quintessentially a magnificent, detached city manor house. Centrally located, within a discreet setting, enjoying immaculate landscaped..."
It’s not often that a house of this calibre is offered to the market especially one which enjoys a city centre location whilst still being completely private and set within its own grounds. Highgate House sits on outstanding 0.7-acre plot with the added benefit of owning the adjoining woodl...
 The rise in this popular estate has been meteoric and it not surprising when you see the size and design of some of the most spectacular modern mansions in the north of England. This exclusive oasis has commanded some of the most expensive sales seen in the Northeast over the last 3 years a...
"Magnificent country house set in 4.5 acres of beautifully landscaped grounds. Situated in a picturesque position, this home enjoys impressive views of the surrounding countryside. 4.5 acres of land and mature gardens provide privacy and seclusion, together with approximately 11.5 acres of woodla..."
Bradley Hall is delighted to offer for sale this specular home situated in the City Centre of Durham. Durham House dates back to 1847 a date which is etched on the headstone of the original door. It features in many paintings and photographs of Durham in the foreground with the cathedral as it&rs...
"An outstanding detached period mansion house, set within the heart of Durham City. Exceptional interior design throughout comprising in brief of two elegant reception rooms, open plan kitchen / dining area, garden room, six spacious double bedrooms, four luxury bathrooms, private landscaped ga..."
"A beautiful stone-built farmhouse with annexe and outbuildings, set within wonderful private gardens and grounds "
Rarely does the opportunity arise to purchase such an impressive and private detached property situated in its own grounds with an additional paddock but being so close to Durham City. The property has been maintained to the highest of standards throughout by our clients and offers spa...
"Occupying an exclusive cul-de-sac position in this highly sought after area close to the City Centre, we are delighted to offer for sale this thoughtfully and imaginatively extended and much improved family home with gas fired central heating and double glazing. Enjoying a a large priva..."
"Hill Top Farm at Ramside Park offers stunning detached accommodation of an exceptional proportion and this five bedroom detached ""Mill House"" design is situated on a luxury residential location near Durham City. Offering an executive lifestyle set within the private grounds of Ramside Park Spa..."
This beautifully situated and superbly designed four bedroom detached family home is outstandingly located in the corner of a delightful cul de sac in the highly desirable Crossgate Moor area of Durham City across the A167 from the popular Durham Johnston School. Offering the best of both worlds ...
"Let for the upcoming academic year 2023/24 and is currently let to 5 students and returning a rental income of £54,340 inclusive of bills (our client has capped the spend at £6,500 to cover the bills). The property is situated within a minutes walk of the Student Union and ..."
"Let to students for the academic year 2022/2023 this is an ideal investment opportunity with a current rental income of £42,952. The accommodation is arranged over four floors and currently comprises: entrance hall, communal living room, kitchen/diner, rear lobby and a cloakroom..."
"This immaculately presented, individually built and stylish four bedroom detached family home has been thoughtfully designed in an eco-friendly style with a stunning amount of spacious accommodation in a beautiful setting on a private plot of nearly an acre of land. Situated down a quiet lane on ..."
"Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to the market this this truly wonderful home, located on what is arguably one of Durham City's most sought after streets. St Johns Road is a cul de sac of impressive period houses and the subject property occupies an elevated position in a popular ..."
"Having been fully refurbished by our clients to a high standard, we are delighted to offer for sale this substantial four bedroomed barn conversion. Situated within a development of similar properties, Priory View offers a substantial family home with accommodation all on a single floo..."
"Substantial detached house in an excellent location, extended to provide spacious accommodation and being suitable for a variety of orientations.
This is a rare opportunity, sure to prove popular amongst buyers. Early viewings are strongly recommended to avoid disappointment."
"Substantial PRICE ADJUSTMENT on this LUXURY LODGE in the heart of the City. A very rare opportunity to acquire one of the finest detached lodges offering luxury accommodation within a discreet and private setting. Recently refurbished to an extremely high level, this stunning home will suit th..."
"Seldom does a property as unique as this one come to the market especially one located in the popular residential location of Crossgate Moor. This spacious, five bedroom detached home is situated just off the A167 and providing excellent transport links throughout the area. The property is conve..."
A magnificent grade II listed semi detached house of great character and charm. Rarely does a property of this exceptional quality come to the market within walking distance of Durham City Centre. 
"A rather remarkable rendered brick property incorporating an abundance of heritage and charm located close to Shincliffe village on the outskirts of Durham city offering in excess of 2700 sq ft... Fabulous property, stunning original features..."
"This rarely available Victorian four bedroom detached home is offered to the market. Located behind its own double gates this period property with modern features would make the perfect home for a growing family. Benefitting from spacious gardens for front and back, four bedrooms, two reception r..."
"This development has now established itself as one of the premier residential locations in the heart of this historic city. The house was completed in 2017 and as a result, will still have the benefit of the remainder of its 10-year NHBC guarantee. This family home benefits from a priv..."
"LOCATION The subject property is located on Darlington Road in Nevilles Cross, Durham. Darlington Road links with A167 and A690 just outside of Durham city centre. The property is situated within a popular residential location with a number of local housing estates within close p..."
"Ideal Starter or Family Home ** Larger Than Usual Plot ** Pleasantly Tucked Away ** Well Presented Throughout ** Gardens, Parking & Garage ** Upvc Double Glazing & GCH ** Popular Development & Location ** Good Local Amenities & Access to Transport Links ** Early Viewing Advised ** The fl..."
"CURRENTLY LET AT £1100PCM ** CITY CENTRE LOCATION ** ACCESS TO RIVER WALKS, BARS, RESTAURANTS & AMENITIES ** IDEAL FOR A VARIETY OF BUYERS ** SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT ** WELL PRESENTED ** TWO BATHROOMS ** ELECTRIC HEATING & DOUBLE GLAZING ** The floor plan briefly comprises: communal entra..."
"This outstanding student home is superbly situated in the Viaduct area close to the heart of Durham City centre. The excellent property has a HMO license and is currently tenanted for this coming school year generating an income around £40,000 per calendar year and is let for this current academi..."
"Offering the perfect blend of charm, character and modern convenience The Granary was converted around 1997 from former farm buildings into a most impressive family home. Since this time The Granary has been further re-modelled and updated to and has still retained its original character. Brick a..."
Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to the market this extensive five-bedroom detached home which extends to over 2000 sq.ft. This family home is ideally located in the popular and sought after Merryoaks Estate in Elvet Moor. Elvet Moor is on the doorstep of the city which offers a fascinating ...
OFFERS INVITED Bradley hall are delighted to offer for sale this delightful detached 4 bedroom residential house with the benefit of 2 exceptional building plots with planning permission for a further detached house and situated within this highly desirable residential area. 
"A unique opportunity to acquire a three storey, 6 bedroom student rental property in close proximity to Durham City. This is a fully licensed HMO and is in excellent condition throughout. Sure to prove extremely popular therefore early viewings are strongly recommended to avoid disappointment. "
Urban Base are pleased to present this Stunning 5 Bedroom Detached property is situated on a corner plot in a quiet cul de sac of the estate with a large south facing landscaped rear garden within close proximity to the A690 and Durham City Centre. High Specification throughout. Viewing Recomm...
"Bradley Hall are delighted to market for sale, two exclusive residential plots in a highly sought-after residential location close to Durham City. These plots are available as a whole or individually and come with outline planning for a detached dwelling on each. This is a f..."
"'The Cottage' is an immaculately presented, beautifully modernised and stylishly designed four bedroom detached family home which is situated on a fantastic plot within the highly desirable Nevilles Cross area of Durham City. The stunning home is perfectly located for families with both the outst..."
"Pattinson Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this outstanding four bedroom home, located within the popular Merryoaks estate, a short distance from Durham City Centre and local schools. Upon entrance to the property, there is an entrance vestibule with floor to ceiling window a..."
"Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to the market this superb, four-bedroom detached home which is in the popular and sought after Merryoaks Estate in Elvet Moor. Elvet Moor is in a very well-established residential area, populated with some of the most expensive and sought-after hou..."
"Seldom do properties such as Hillcrest come to the market. Set within Durham’s conservation area taking in breath taking views of Durham City’s world heritage site. The property is accessed off a private road, situated at the end of a cul de sac serving only ten homes, creating a quie..."
"Situated in this highly respected area of the City, is this beautiful three bedroom bungalow with double garage, garden room and tiered rear garden. The property is freehold and warrants immediate viewing..."
"We are delighted to offer to the sales market this beautiful detached, four bedroom bungalow. Located in a prominent position on North End in Durham. A few minutes walk from the train station and Durham City Centre.This property is available with no onward chain. Call Elvet Estates for ..."
"CURRENTLY ACHIEVING £40,820.40 per annum (23/24) Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to the market a five bedrooom student investment which is fully let until 2024. The property comprises two ground floor bedrooms, shower room and open plan kitchen/living. To the first floor the..."
"Situated in the sought after Whitesmocks area of Durham, we are delighted to offer for sale this extended four bedroomed semi detached property ideal for growing families and retaining some period features. The property has been well maintained by our clients and has accommodation whic..."
An excellent opportunity to purchase 52.18 acres of productive arable land with development potential. CLOSING DATE FOR OFFERS WITH PROOF OF FUNDS: NOON ON TUESDAY 7TH MARCH.
"Situated on the sought after Hallgarth Street, we are delighted to offer for sale this attractive double fronted Period end terraced home which offers lots of charm and character and benefits from gas central heating, a recently replaced roof and kitchen. Occupying a pleasant position ..."
"Church View is an attractive modern detached large family house set on a most generous plot with extensive gardens, a detached double garage with rear store and a larger than usual block paved drive. UPVC double glazing throughout and a gas fired central heating system. The main front..."
"This really is the PERFECT FAMILY HOME! Rarely does the opportunity arise to purchase such an impressive, detached, stone built property situated on a generous plot. Boasting a large rear extension and four double bedrooms, with ample off-road parking for a growing family. Immaculately presente..."
4 Bedroom Spacious Detached House
"Offers in the Region Of £440,000 - An outstanding detached five bedroomed family home situated in the heart of the village of Meadowfield, County Durham the property is close to amenities such as schools, shops and public transport routes. If you are looking for a home that offers substanti..."
"Rarely does the opportunity arise to purchase such an attractive and unusual Grade II Listed Farmhouse. Having been lovingly restored and converted by our clients, the property has a floor plan comprising: entrance hallway with exposed well, octagonal lounge in the former cheesery room..."
Viewings are highly recommended to appreciate this outstanding versatile three bedroom apartment with superb south facing garden in the centre of Durham...
COMPETITIVE PRICE ** THREE BEDROOMS ** POPULAR LOCATION CLOSE TO DURHAM CITY ** CURRENTLY RENTED £720PCM ** GOOD FURTHER POTENTIAL ** CLOSE PROXIMITY OF GOOD SCHOOLS AND MAJOR TRANSPORT LINKS ** DOUBLE GLAZING & GAS CENTRAL HEATING ** GARDENS ** EARLY VIEWING ADVISED ** The property ben...
Beautifully presented detached bungalow presented to the highest of standards with top quality fixtures an fittings throughout. From the moment your enter the high specification of this well planned family living space is immediately evident. Internal inspection is essential. 
"Stunning and considerably improved Family Home ** Modern Development ** Walking Distance to Durham City, Amenities & Transport Links ** Unique Remodelled Layout ** Spacious & Extended Floor Plan ** Stunning Kitchen with Bi-Fold Doors to Rear Garden Terrace ** Off Street Car Parking for 2 cars ** ..."
"Occupying a pleasant cul-de-sac position within this ever popular area, this detached property offers flexible and adaptable accommodation of a style and type which is seldom available. With gas fired central heating and double glazing, it provides accommodation which briefly comprises..."
"Hive Estates presents to the market in a prime location in Durham this period three-storey home with incredible views overlooking Durham Cathedral. With a unique tiered front garden, the property has a spacious living room with feature exposed fireplace and wood burning stove, with industrial fit..."
"A substantial detached property situated in the popular Crossgate Moor area of the City, close to the local schools and amenities. Internally this spacious property comprises of an entrance hallway, lounge/dining room with French doors to the rear garden, spacious family room, kitchen/breakfast r..."
"An exceptionally rare opportunity to purchase an EXTENDED THREE BEDROOMED DETACHED BUNGALOW located within an incredibly sought after cul de sac, close to fantastic schools, amenities, recreational facilities and motoring links. The property is located in Neville Dene just off Newcastle ..."
"Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to the market this three bedroom home within the fantastic development of ""Cathedral View"". Offering superb views over Durham Cathedral, this beautiful new home has recently been finished to a very high standard offering luxury living within close pr..."
"A spacious, and stylish, four bedroom detached family situated on a large corner plot within a very popular residential area. This property is situated in close proximity to Durham City, and the local Hospital, along with good road and public transport links via A167 dual carriageway. Private ..."
"*NO CHAIN* *FULLY REFURBISHED* *HIGH QUALITY THROUGHOUT* *STUNNING LANDSCAPED GARDENS* *BEAUTIFUL KITCHEN & BATHROOM* Situated in the desirable High Shincliffe village on the outskirts of the historic Durham City centre, this three bedroom detached bungalow has been refurbished to a high stan..."
"Having undergone a full refurbishment programme and having been substantially extended over recent years. From the moment you enter, the quality of this property is immediately evident.
Internal inspection is essential to appreciate this luxurious family home with a lot to offer."
Superb Residential Semi Detached Home ** Rare Opportunity ** Upgraded & Maintained ** Ideal For A Variety of Purchasers ** Pleasant Position ** Good Sized Enclosed Rear Garden With Sunny Aspect ** Integrated Kitchen ** Walking Distance to Durham City ** Excellent Commuting Links & Access to Ameni...
"THE BAILEY is a real head-turner, this prestigious FOUR bedroom DOUBLE FRONTED DETACHED home with DETACHED SINGLE GARAGE on the EXCLUSIVE Hartley Gardens development close to Durham City.Our STAR PLOT 34 is located in a quiet part of the development and includes an upgraded Charcoa..."
"We welcome to the market this exclusive new development of 4 luxury detached homes situated on the outskirts of New Brancepeth, enjoying a rural aspect to the rear. 2 Plots Remaining.
Each property will have a high quality internal specification with a well planned family living space in mind.
IN..."
"NO CHAIN. DETACHED COTTAGE. SOLAR PANELS. EXCELLENT SIZED REAR GARDEN. EXECUTIVE LOCATION. Located within this executive hamlet on Sleetburn Lane, 'The Cottage' is a beautiful 2 bedroom stone built dwelling oozing charm and character throughout. Sitting among high end executive properties within..."
"No Upper Chain ** Fairly Unique Family Home ** Spacious Floor Plan Extensively Extended ** Generous Corner Plot With Sunny Rear Aspect ** Fabulous Open Plan Kitchen, Living Dining Room ** Large Family Lounge With Multi Fuel Burner ** Very Popular Location ** Ample Parking for Numerous Vehicles *..."
"Situated in this popular Nevilles Cross area of Durham City and offering Four / Five Bedrooms, two/three reception rooms, three bath/shower rooms, garage and gardens. Please note that this property is tenanted until july 2023. PLease ask the Sales Branch for further details. <..."
"Ideally suited to family occupation this extended and much improved semi detached property also boasts gas fired central heating and double glazing throughout. The flexible home offers well presented accommodation briefly comprising to the ground floor: Entrance porch, entrance hallway, livi..."
"A substantial modern family home with four/five well proportioned bedrooms, Two reception rooms, three bath/shower rooms as well as garage and gardens. Kirkwood Drive is located on a popular and highly sought after residential development in the Nevilles Cross area of Durham which ha..."
"This three bedroom link detached Grade 2 listed barn conversion is a must to view. Situated in an ideal semi rural position, in immaculate order throughout, a great home for anyone seeking a lifestyle change..."
"Rarely available on the open market, we are delighted to offer for sale this extended 3 bedroomed semi detached property with oil central heating and which is situated on a substantial with well established plot. Situated within easy access of Durham City, the property is situated on a..."
"Situated in this popular Nevilles Cross area of Durham City and offering Four / Five Bedrooms, two/three reception rooms, three bath/shower rooms, garage and gardens. Please note that this property is tenanted until September 2022. PLease ask the Sales Branch for further details."
Bradley Hall is delighted to offer for sale this outstanding stone-built cottage situated within an exceptional plot and located only 2 miles to the west of Durham City centre. With shops on the doorstep at Langley Moor and easy access to the city it’s hard not to like this semi-...
"Available with the benefit of immediate vacant possession, we are delighted to offer for sale this attractive four bedroomed detached family property situated on an established estate of similar properties. This particular house sits towards the top of the estate and has attractive vie..."
"Stunning Family or First Home ** Upgraded Throughout ** Popular Development ** Pleasant Position ** Sunny Rear Aspect ** Two Bathrooms & Two Reception Rooms ** Popular Village Location ** Gardens, Parking & Garage ** Upvc Double Glazing & GCH ** Early Viewing Advised ** The floor plan co..."
"Viewings are highly recommended to appreciate the size and location of this spacious five bedroom detached residence, situated on this popular development in this highly regarded village..."
A fantastic opportunity to purchase a ready made FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME with versatile and spacious accommodation on offer. The property has undergone recent works and is different to builders specification with upgraded fixtures and fittings throughout. In brief comprising of Entrance...
"Beautifully presented and deceptively spacious 4 bedroom property, situated within the stunning Burn Hall Estate, an exclusive gated development which is set in around 30 acres of woodland and parkland on the outskirts of Durham City. Ideally suited to a wide range of purchasers, the property off..."
"THE HILD is a stunning FOUR bedroom home with SINGLE INTEGRAL GARAGEOur STAR PLOT 14 is situated in a Cul De Sac in the heart of Hartley Gardens, Plot 14 Includes a FULLY INTEGRATED HOWDENS KITCHEN from our Hartley Range, UPGRADED TILING to all Bathrooms. The West Facing Rear ..."
"* LUXURY TWO BEDROOM PENTHOUSE * PARKING INCLUDED * £1800PCM TENANCY IN PLACE UNTIL JULY 2023 * Located within the vibrant Walkergate area of Durham City, the property enjoys a high level of interior specification combining high quality finish throughout, with a contemporary design to cr..."
"Evenmore Properties are pleased to offer to the market this three bedroom three story townhouse, located in St Margarets Garth which is within walking distance of Durham City Centre and Train Station, This property comprises to the lower level; Utility room, single garage and driveway p..."
"A generous three bedroom detached bungalow which has been extended, situated on a substantial corner plot, on a highly sought after estate and boasting off road parking with garage and rear and side gardens. "
Seldom do bungalows become available in Durham especially ones which are located in Shincliffe. The village of Shincliffe is one of the most desirable areas to live away from the hustle and bustle of the city itself and offers a quiet retreat whilst still being within easy access of the city pro...
"An extended three bedroom mid-terrace home, located within the popular Sands area of Durham, this property is an ideal purchase for family occupation. Having been lovingly maintained over the years by our current clients, the property briefly comprises; Entrance hallway, modern kitchen..."
"*** NO UPPER CHAIN, CORNER PLOT, STUNNING REAR EXTENSION, SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN, HOT TUB INCLUDED, RARE OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A TRULY UNIQUE AND ONE OF A KIND EXTENDED DETACHED BUNGALOW, WALKING DISTANCE TO MANY AMENITIES, BI FOLD DOOR TO REAR, WORCESTOR CONDENSOR BOILER INSTALLED FEBRAURY 2..."
"** NO CHAIN ** PLEASANT POSITION ** SPACIOUS & EXTENDED ** RARELY AVAILABLE ** GOOD FURTHER POTENTIAL ** GARDENS, PARKING & DETACHED GARAGE WITH REAR STORE ** DOUBLE GLAZING & GCH ** Occupying a pleasant position, in this lovely cul de sac, we offer to the market with the benefit of no o..."
"*** NO UPPER CHAIN, RARE TO MARKET, SOUTH FACING GARDEN, DOUBLE GARAGE, WELL PRESENTED *** This unique three bedroom detached cottage is located in Pity Me, Durham. The property was built in 1992 and benefits from a private position. The property comprises: an entrance hallway, spacious living ro..."
"Venture Properties are delighted to offer for sale with no chain involved, this individually designed detached home occupying a large plot which benefits from extensive views to the front. In need of some modernisation, allowing buyers to add their own stamp, the property offers very spacious acc..."
"DELFT COTTAGE, Bearpark lies within a short driving distance of DURHAM CITY this four bedroom detached individual residence offers spacious living accommodation, externally a long driveway leads to the double garage with workshop and separate car port, open rural views to the front with large law..."
"PUBLIC NOTICE 18 Clements Wharf , Durham DH1 3RP We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £400,500 Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contracts takes place EPC R..."
"We take great pleasure in welcoming to the market this well presented four bedroom detached home in the convenient location of Belmont. This property would make the perfect home for a growing family and needs to be seen to be fully appreciated. Benefitting from a kitchen diner, large living area,..."
Viewings are highly recommended to see the internal layout and presentation of this spacious family home. Situated in a prime position for those using the excellent commuter links to Durham and further afield...
"**DETACHED**FIVE/SIX BEDROOMS**GARAGE AND DRIVEWAY**POPULAR LOCATION**NO UPPER CHAIN** Pattinson Estate Agents are happy to welcome to the market this well presented five/six bedroom detached family home situated on the popular estate of Glanville Drive, Houghton Le Spring. Perfectly located w..."
"Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to the market this exceptional four bedroom detached home which extends to over 1,390 sq.ft and located in the popular area of Ushaw Moor. Grant Close is situated only 4 miles to the west of the historic city of Durham which provides a comprehensive range of ..."
"We are delighted to offer to the market this four bedroom semi-detached home. Sitting on the biggest plot on the estate with stunning woodland outlook to the side and extended garden to the front this property would make the perfect family home. Benefitting from two reception rooms, four bedrooms..."
"We take great pleasure in welcoming to the market this beautifully presented three bedroom detached home in the sought after location of Belmont. Rarely does a property such as this, having recently undergone extensive ‘back to brick’ modernisation come to market. Finished to an exemp..."
"Double fronted detached bungalow in a cul-de-sac location and in excellent order throughout. Externally a long driveway providing ample off road parking leads to a detached garage and well stocked and laid gardens to the front and rear. A top quality detached bungalow, viewings are recommended. "
"What a lot of choice you have for the family with this five-bedroom home. The Belmont even incorporates a garage for the family car and the children’s bikes and boots. With five bedrooms, you can reserve one for guests or create a dedicated space to work from home. The..."
"Perfectly situated in a lovely cul-de-sac just a few minutes drive from Durham Golf Club and the village of Meadowfield, this property benefits from a glorious outlook and will make for wonderful new home for any buyer. With superb workmanship clearly apparent throughout, the property features t..."
We are delighted to market this modernised brick built semi detached property which has gas fired central heating via replacement boiler and double glazing throughout. Suited to a variety of purchasers this stunning home briefly comprises to the ground floor: Entrance hallway with cloakroom/...
"Situated in this delightful position with views to open fields to front and within walking distance of the highly regarded Durham Johnston school. This spacious FOUR bedroom semi detached family home is ideally positioned for access to Durham City, university, Hospital the railway station. ..."
"IDEAL INVESTMENT ** CURRENTLY TENANTED ** £950PCM ** VERY POPULAR LOCATION ** GARAGE & DRIVE ** CLOSE TO DURHAM CENTRE, AMENITIE* +S & ROAD / TRANSPORT LINKS ** DOUBLE GLAZING & GCH ** The accommodation is set over three floors. The ground floor has a bedroom, sh..."
Attention all Investors looking for an investment opportunity in the centre of the City of Durham. With current tenants for this academic year. The freehold of the building with two of three flats are to be sold...
"The Belmont is a beautiful five-bedroom detached home that is ideal for a growing family. The open-plan kitchen/dining room is spacious and bright and has French doors leading into the garden. It comes complete with an integral single garage, a downstairs WC and a useful en suite to bedroom one."
"*EXCELLENTLY PRESENTED* *EXTENDED FLOOR PLAN* *SPACIOUS REAR GARDEN* *4 CAR DRIVEWAY* A well presented and much improved 3 to 4 bedroomed mid terraced property with gas fired central heating, double glazing and the added advantage of a garden and parking to the rear.
H..."
"This beautifully presented, modern and stylish three bedroom semi detached family home is superbly positioned on a desirable cul de sac within this popular new development in Aykley Heads right in the heart of Durham City. "
"We take great pleasure in welcoming to the market this well presented Three bedroom Semi detached property in the convenient location of Aykley Heads. This property would make the perfect home for a young couple, Growing Family or as an investment opportunity and needs to be seen to be fully app..."
For sale by auction LIVE ONLINE AUCTION 30th March 2023 Having been recently refurbished throughout to a high standard we are delighted to offer for sale this spacious 3/4 bedroom mid terrace property benefiting from gas fired central heating (boiler fitte...
"This is a contemporary home with a traditional layout. Separate living and dining rooms complement the open-plan kitchen/breakfast room and make a great mix and match for family life, entertaining and home-working, if creating a home office is your plan. Alternatively, you c..."
"Morningside is a stunning, Edwardian styled, period property is available with no onward chain. Having been extended to the rear, the property is a beautiful mix of contemporary and period features including a ceiling rose, multi-fuel fireplaces and ornate archway carvings. With spacio..."
"We are delighted to bring to the market this three storey town house situated within this highly sought after residential development Nevilles Cross on the outskirts of Durham City. Within walking distance to Durham City Centre, Railway Station and University (approx. 1 mile). Having ..."
"Ideally suited to family occupation, we have pleasure in offering for sale, this extended detached family home with gas fired central heating and double glazing. Occupying a pleasant position, it offers flexible accommodation which briefly comprises to the ground floor: Entrance porch, cloak..."
"This beautifully presented, stylish and modern four bedroom detached family home is superbly situated on a desirable modern development within the popular village of Sherburn. Standing on a spacious plot in the corner of a wonderful cul de sac the property has lovely gardens to the front and rear..."
"NEW... NEW... NEW... A must see for Family Home Seekers this spacious 5 bedroom semi in a sought after DH1 location might just be the home you've been dreaming of. Entering the house you are greeted by a spacious hallway, , large lounge with Inglenook mock fireplace, Kitchen through dining r (cont.)"
"Venture Properties are delighted to offer for sale with no chain involved, this larger style three bedroom detached family home situated in the highly regarded location of Priors Grange. Enjoying a cul de sac plot with ample off street parking and lots of potential to further extend if required, ..."
"SUPERB FAMILY HOME RECENTLY UPGRADED ** EXTENDED FLOOR PLAN ** SPACIOUS AND WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT ** GARDENS, PARKING & GARAGE ** POPULAR LOCATION ** OUTSKIRTS OF DURHAM ** GOOD LOCAL AMENITIES & TRANSPORT LINKS ** DOUBLE GLAZING & GCH ** MUST BE VIEWED ** The extended floor plan co..."
"Superbly Family Detached Home ** Extended & Spacious Floor Plan ** Superbly Presented Throughout ** Pleasantly Situated ** Garage, Gardens & Good Size Driveway ** Small Popular Village Development ** Good Local Amenities & Road Links ** Upvc Double Glazing & GCH Via Combination Boiler ** Early V..."
"We offer for sale this spacious, detached property with gas fired central heating and double glazing. Occupied by the current owner from new it boasts a pleasant position within this popular development, it provides accommodation which briefly comprises to the ground floor: Entrance porch, e..."
"Perfectly designed for modern family living, this beautifully presented home built Avant Homes in their Morton design offers three well proportioned bedrooms and a high specification finish, as well as five years remaining NHBC guarantee. The impressive living accommodation comprises of ..."
"A well presented three storey town house, on a very popular residential estate, close to the Hospital. Having four bedrooms, one with an en-suite, brand new kitchen, garden and separate garage. Also featuring gas central heating from a new combi boiler and double glazing. No Upward Chain"
"This is a beautifully presented 3 bedroom semi detached house with garage, driveway and a west facing rear garden and situated on this modern development which is superbly located..."
"Ideally suited to a variety of purchasers, we have pleasure in offering for sale, this semi detached home which has gas central heating with 4 year old boiler and double glazing throughout. Occupying a pleasant position it provides chain free accommodation which briefly comprises to the grou..."
"Available with no chain involved, Venture Properties are delighted to offer for sale this spacious two bedroom semi-detached property situated in a sought after location within Langley Moor and benefiting from a large conservatory extension and garage. The well maintained property has an..."
"A well presented detached family home, set in a private cul de sac, in the popular Sherburn Village. Having a large P-shaped Sun Room to the rear and being open plan to the Dining/Kitchen, creating a huge living space. Long driveway and garage with front and rear gardens."
No onward chain and situated at the head of this cul-de-sac on the outskirts of this popular village is this three-bedroom detached house with garage. Well presented throughout and worthy of immediate viewing...
Stunning Upgraded Family Home ** Pleasantly Situated With Sunny Rear Aspect ** Ample Parking & Garage ** Village Location Outskirts of Durham ** Double Glazing & GCH ** Spacious Well Planned Floor Plan ** Landscaped Rear Garden ** Early Viewing Advised ** Occupying a pleasant position wi...
"We are delighted to offer for sale, this newly constructed three bedroomed semi detached dormer bungalow located in a private road of four similar properties with outstanding views to the rear over farmland. The property has been constructed to the highest of specifications throughout ..."
"Situated on a popular mature residential development we offer for sale this beautifully presented bungalow. The rarely available property is prominently positioned within the development and briefly comprises: Entrance porch, open plan living/dining room, fitted kitchen, two bedrooms and a shower..."
"Available with the benefit of immediate vacant possession, we offer for sale this spacious detached family property with gas fired central heating and double glazing. Occupying a prominent main road position at the entrance to Belmont, the property has not been on the open market for 7..."
"Early Viewing Advised ** Stunning Detached Home ** Recently Refurbished & Upgraded Throughout ** Lovely Enclosed Rear Garden with Patio & Hot Tub Area ** Popular & Convenient Village Location ** Good Amenities & Access to Major Road Links ** Outskirts of Durham City ** Gardens, Garage & Ample Par..."
"Pleasantly appointed larger 3 bedroom detached house situated on a corner site with an open aspect to the front and having the benefit of full planning permission for an extension.
Ideal for buyers looking for a property with potential that they can put their own stamp on.
"
"The Hornsea is a detached home with the bonus of an integral garage. It's got a good-sized living room with double doors leading into a bright open-plan kitchen/diner - perfect for family life and for entertaining. It's practical too with a utility, downstairs cloakroom and three storage cupboards."
Venture Properties are delighted to offer for sale this beautifully presented semi detached townhouse with spacious accommodation spread over three floors including four well proportioned bedrooms. The property is situated in a small cul de sac development within easy walking distance to a range ...
"Family life comes first in this new home. There’s space for everyone, even the family car. One living space flows into another and then into the garden, and with four bedrooms and two bathrooms, there’s space for your children to grow and for your guests to stay. "
Nicholas Humphreys are delighted to bring to the market this spacious THREE bedroom property. This is an investment property currently rented out at £995pcm. 
THE MASON is an attractive THREE BEDROOM HOME which has been carefully designed to provide a spacious interior across two floors also benefitting from a single INTEGRAL GARAGE.CALL OUR SALES TEAM TODAY TO SECURE THIS PROPERTY FOR £99 INCLUDING A £7200 MORTGAGE...
"A well presented four bedroom detached property on this popular housing estate offering easy accessibility across the region. The Ground Floor accommodation offers a spacious hall with integral door to Garage, separate lounge with French doors to Garden, kitchen with integrated oven, hob and e..."
"*** WELL PRESENTED, LINK DETACHED HOUSE, SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION, MODERN FITTED KITCHEN, FRONT AND REAR GARDENS, DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE, MUST BE VIEWED ***"
"2 BEDROOMED STUDENT/RENTAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY WITH FURTHER GROWTH POTENTIAL ** JULY 2023/JUNE 2024 - £12,480pa (£120pppw) excluding bills ** WELL PRESENTED & MAINTAINED ** CITY CENTRE LOCATION ** GOOD AMENITIES & TRANSPORT LINKS ** DOUBLE GLAZING & GCH ** WALKING DISTANCE TO CITY CENTRE **"
"Situated close to the city centre within this modern exclusive development this spacious three bedroom family home has two generous reception rooms, en-suite to master bedroom as well as gardens to front and rear with garage and parking space providing off street parking for two cars. This beauti..."
"Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to the market this substantial four bedroom detached home which extends to over 1,150 sq.ft and located in the popular area of Ushaw Moor. Grant Close is situated only 4 miles to the west of the historic city of Durham which provides a comprehensive range of ..."
"THE AIDEN is an elegant and modern THREE BEDROOM home provides a spacious accommodation over two floors plus private DRIVEWAY parking.CALL OUR SALES TEAM TODAY TO SECURE THIS PROPERTY FOR £99 INCLUDING A £7200 MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION, FLOORING THROUGHO..."
"**4 BEDROOMS**DETACHED GARAGE AND DRIVEWAY**ENCLOSED REAR GARDENS**SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION** Pattinson Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the sales market this immaculate four/five bedroom detached house situated in the sought after estate of Chadwick Close, Ushaw Moor. This lovely family..."
"*RARELY AVAILABLE* *2 RECEPTION ROOMS* *EXTENDED KITCHEN/DINER* *A GREAT FAMILY HOME* Having been excellently maintained, extended, and upgraded by our clients to the highest of standards this five bedroomed semi detached property is presented to an excellent standard and benefits from g..."
"Three bedroom end of terraced house situated within this highly desirable modern development close to Durham City Centre. Ideally located for access to the Hospital, City Centre and Railway station with schools, FE colleges and superb bus routes available in the imediate vicinity. With the ..."
"Recently constructed by Taylor Wimpey, this show home standard presented family property benefits from gas fired central heating and double glazing. Having been improved by our clients with fitted plantation shutters and blinds throughout and integrated appliances in the kitchen, the property ne..."
"*** EXTENDED FLOOR PLAN, NO UPPER CHAIN, IN NEED OF MODERNISATION, LOTS OF POTENTIAL, MUST BE VIEWED *** This three bedroom link detached bungalow is located on Lichfield Road in Newton Hall, Durham. The property is in need of some modernisation and is being sold with the benefit of vacant posses..."
Stunning two bedroom semi detached bungalow located in Newton Hall *** Two bedrooms *** Modern throughout *** Kitchen dining room *** Sun room *** Landscaped gardens *** EPC grade D *** Council tax band C *** Freehold *** Detached garage *** Close to local amenities *** 
"A big kitchen/diner, French doors to the garden and a large living room all add up to make a family-friendly home for a growing family. Three bedrooms and two bathrooms mean that everyone has their own space here – great features for happy family life as well as great features of..."
"DETACHED HOME- FOUR BEDROOMS- GARAGE AND DRIVEWAY- POPULAR LOCATION Pattinsons is delighted to welcome to the market this four bedroom detached home in the popular area of Ushaw Moor in Durham. This beautiful home is ideally located close to local shops, amenities and great transport links. Th..."
This beautifully presented and superbly positioned three bedroom detached family home sits in a prominent position within this desirable cul de sac in the popular Brandon area of Durham City. Offered for sale with no onward chain the property has been updated and superbly modernised to produce an...
This most impressive almost new Family Home that has been constructed to a high specification with a wide range of quality extras included which would allow any buyer to be able to just move in and relax
This well presented family home offers spacious and well presented accommodation over three floors with spacious lounge and kitchen dining room as well as entrance hallway and cloaks room/wc to ground floor. Two good sized double bedrooms to first floor with family bathroom/wc to first floor and...
Stunning Detached Bungalow ** Recently Refurbished ** Generous & Sunny Plot ** Large Driveway & Single Garage ** Pleasantly Situated ** Modern Re-Fitted Kitchen ** Enclosed & Private Rear Garden ** Spacious & Versatile Floor Plan ** Popular & Convenient Location ** Local Amenities & Access to Maj...
"Venture Properties are delighted to offer for sale with no chain involved, this spacious three bedroom detached bungalow occupying the largest plot in a small cul de sac of similar properties. In need of some cosmetic modernisation, the property and gardens offer lots of potential and early viewi..."
"Available with no onward chain, this newly refurbished, three bedroom semi-detached is ideal for first time buyers or growing families. Having gone through a total makeover by our clients, including new kitchen, bathroom, redecoration throughout and landscaping in both the front and re..."
We take great pleasure in welcoming to the market this well presented Three bedroom semi detached home in the sought after location of Belmont. This property would make the perfect home for a First time buyer or Growing family and needs to be seen to be fully appreciated. Benefitting from two rec...
"We take great pleasure in welcoming to the market this two bedroom detached bungalow in the sought after location of Newton hall. This property would make the perfect home for anybody who wants to enjoy the amenities available in the newton hall community . Benefitting from a reception rooms, Two..."
"We are delighted to offer to the market this well maintained two bedroom semi detached bungalow located within the popular area of Newton Hall. The property is decorated and double glazed throughout with well proportioned rooms, briefly comprises; Entrance hall with cupboard space, spacious loung..."
"Pattinson Estate Agents are pleased to bring to the market this spacious family home, situated in the popular Swinside Drive in Carrville. Offered with no upper chain, this property would make an ideal home for a family. Upon entrance to the property there is a porch with double glazed window,..."
"This is a well presented, three bedroom detached house, with a spacious garden overlooking farmers fields in this sought after village. Ideal for those wishing to enjoy a semi rural area whilst allowing access to Durham City and beyond..."
" We are delighted to market this beautifully presented, three bedroomed, detached home located on The Croft, Sherburn Hill. The spacious property would make the ideal family home and viewing is essential to appreciate all it has to offer. Boasting gas central heating and double glazing throu..."
"A fantastic family home, the Clayton Corner features a stunning open-plan kitchen diner and equally impressive living room with French doors opening into the garden. A utility room, WC and storage cupboard ensure it's practical as well as stylish. Upstairs you'll find three ..."
"Beautifully presented and substantially extended 3 bedroom detached property, altered and improved by the current owners to create a lovely family home. Available with no onward chain, the property offers spacious, well planned accommodation comprising, porch, hallway, 22' lounge with feature fir..."
"A well presented 2 bedroom first floor flat located in popular Shincliffe Village with views to the rear over farmland. The property is the ""bridge"" flat and has a stunning double aspect lounge dining room. The internal accommodation briefly comprises: entrance lobby, lounge..."
Pleasantly Situated Three Bedroom Semi Detached Bungalow ** Spacious Extended Floor Plan ** Well Presented Throughout ** Ample Parking ** Gardens ** Double Glazing & GCH ** Popular & Convenient Location ** Good Local Amenities & Road Links ** Early Viewing Advised ** The floor plan brief...
"This semi-detached home has a huge amount of potential to offer it's new owners. With three well-proportioned bedrooms, a living room, an additional reception room, a fitted kitchen, a three-piece bathroom, front and rear gardens and ideally located for an investment purchase next to the hospital..."
"Situated off May Lea in Witton Gilbert is this delightful detached bungalow providing easily maintained accommodation and gardens, possible for those needing one-level accommodation or for those retired or contemplating retirement..."
"We are delighted to offer to the market this well presented detached family home located in the popular village of Sherburn, just a short drive from Durham City centre. This beautifully decorated and spacious property briefly comprises: Entrance hallway with feature solid wood staircase, a large ..."
This beautifully presented and superbly positioned three bedroom detached family home sits in a prominent raised position within this desirable cul de sac in the popular Brandon area of Durham City. The extended property has been lovingly updated and superbly modernised to produce an excellent fa...
"Available with immediate vacant possession, we are delighted to offer for sale, this good sized two bedroomed semi detached property with gas central heating, double glazing and a larger plot with private rear garden.
The property itself has been owned for a considerab..."
"Having been occupied since new by our clients, we are delighted to offer for sale this extended two bedroomed semi detached bungalow situated in a quiet cul-de-sac of similar properties. The original kitchen has been extended to create a larger open plan area ideal for entertaining and..."
"If a detached three-bedroom house that includes a garage for the family car and the family bikes, is on your new home shopping list, the Grasmere fits the bill. Two bathrooms will prove to be a bonus as your family grows, and when family and friends want to come and stay."
"Signature North East are proud to introduce this delightful two-bedroom semi-detached home, situated on Durham Road, Brancepeth. This gorgeous cottage was built circa 1850 and still showcases an array of wonderful original features, yet with trendy styling and décor throughout for the best of bot..."
This stunning two bedroom semi detached bungalow is superbly situated in a pleasant cul de sac position within the highly desirable Newton Hall area of Durham City. The lovely home is beautifully decorated throughout and is offered for sale with no onward chain. The excellent floor plan briefly c...
"An opportunity to purchase a 3/4 bedroom detached property on this desirable residential development. This Freehold property has undergone a schedule of refurbishment works to create a beautiful family home. In brief this property comprises of; entrance vestibule, inner hall, open plan, ..."
"What a superb home, all ready to move into following recent years of upgrading and updating. Great views to front and rear. A number of period features which make this cottage a must-see... Dowen Estate Agents bring to market this 3 bedroom mid terrace cottage which is absolutely stunnin..."
"MINUTES DRIVE FROM DURHAM CITY A superb opportunity to purchase this impressive FOUR bedroomed DETACHED home, situated within this small exclusive development, this lovely family home offers a welcoming hallway, spacious lounge with solid oak wood flooring, the contemporary kitchen/diner is certa..."
We take great pleasure in welcoming to the market this no chain three bedroom semi detached in the quiet residential location of Belmont. This property would make the perfect home for a First time buyer or growing family and needs to be seen to be fully appreciated. Benefitting from two reception...
Extended Semi Detached Bungalow ** Remodelled & Spacious Floor Plan ** Well Presented & Maintained ** Private Rear Aspect ** Pleasant Cul-De-Sac Position ** Upvc Double Glazing ** GCH Via Combination Boiler ** Garage ** Gardens & Ample Parking ** Early Viewing Advised ** The floor ...
"Pattinson Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this lovely two bedroom semi-detached bungalow, in the ever-popular area of Carrville. Positioned on a quiet cul de sac, the bungalow is sat upon a large plot with extensive garden area, substantial driveway and garage. The property ..."
"Located in the historic county of Durham, Pity Me benefits a DH1 postcode, this exciting new development is just a few minutes' walk from excellent local amenities, including Ofsted awarded schooling, with superb transport links by road, and bus, Durham train station is also only 3 miles away. Ab"
"We are delighted to offer this two bedroom link detached bungalow situated in Sacriston close to local amenities and excellent transport links. The property benefits from private, easy maintain rear garden and driveway leading to garage. The accommodation briefly comprises of:- Entrance porch, h..."
"Well presented and spacious 3 bedroom semi detached property, occupying a pleasant cul de sac position on this popular development, ideally suited to a wide range of purchasers. Available with no onward chain, the property offers well planned accommodation comprising, porch, 19' lounge with featu..."
No Upper Chain ** Superb Semi Detached Bungalow ** Modern Kitchen & Wet Room/WC ** Pleasant Position ** Front and Rear Gardens ** Driveway Parking & Garage ** Convenient Location Close to Amenities ** Good Transport Links ** Upvc Double Glazing & GCH Via Combination Boiler ** Early Viewing Advise...
"NEW PRICE FOR LIMITED PERIOD! Are delighted to offer for sale with no onward chain, this spacious three bedroom semi detached property, occupying a generous plot and benefiting from some traditional features, displaying character in abundance, Located in a sought after area, the property has ac..."
"*** NO UPPER CHAIN, CORNER PLOT, RECENTLY REFURBISHED, IDEAL FOR A RANGE OF BUYERS, DETACHED GARAGE *** This three bedroom semi detached house is located on Limecrag Avenue in Gilesgate Moor, Durham. The property is being sold with the benefit of vacant possession and will appeal to a wide range ..."
"Nicholas Humphreys are delighted to bring to the market this spacious three bedroom semi detached property. Benefitting from no onward chain this property occupies a generous plot boasting traditional features throughout, displaying character in abundance. Complete with large rear garden and garage."
"*** WELL PRESENTED, CUL DE SAC LOCATION, DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE, FRONT AND REAR GARDENS, STYLISH BATHROOM, MODERN FITTED KITCHEN, MUST BE VIEWED ***"
A delightful extended two bedroom semi detached bungalow set within this pleasant quiet Cul De Sac in the ever popular Newton Hall area of Durham. Offering well proportioned rooms throughout with a garage conversion proving additional living space and a larger kitchen dining room with ...
"***NO ONWARD CHAIN***IMMEDIATE VACNT POSSESSION*** A spacious, extended TWO BEDROOMED SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW. Located in the highly desirable and popular location of Belmont, within easy reach of local amenities. The property benefits from having uPVC double glazing, gas central heating, front..."
"We have pleasure in offering for sale this extremely well presented and much improved semi detached property which has gas fired central heating and double glazing. Occupying a pleasant position on the outskirts of the development and not being overlooked to the rear, it provides accommodati..."
Mirkwood Cottage is an immaculate two bedroom semi detached home built in the 1800's with superb countryside views situated in a pleasant hamlet on the outskirts of Durham City. 
"Excellently positioned semi detached bungalow boasting open views to the front. Externally a stone flagged driveway providing off road parking leads to detached garage and gardens to the front, side and rear. Just 1 mile from Durham City Centre, internal inspection is essential. "
"No Upper Chain ** Spacious & Extended Floor Plan ** Sunny & Private Rear Aspect ** Parking & Gardens ** Popular & Convenient Location ** Local Amenities & Road Links ** Double Glazing & GCH ** Early Viewing Advised ** The floor plan comprises: entrance hallway, comfortable front lounge, ..."
"Beautifully refurbished end terraced house providing spacious family living accommodation ready to move into.
Enjoying views over surrounding farmland to the rear, the property would appeal to the most discerning buyer looking to live in this very desirable village.
"
* NO CHAIN * BREATHTAKING VIEWS * CUL DE SAC POSITION * DETACHED GARAGE * BRAND NEW RE-FITTED COMBI BOILER * Available to purchase with the benefit of no onward chain is this superbly situated and well presented family home with breathtaking views to the rear. Internally the wel...
"Offered with No Onward Chain, is this Spacious Semi Detached Bungalow located on Willowtree Avenue in Gilesgate Moor. Ideally situated for local amenities including shops and schools along with transport links. The property offers an internal layout of: Entrance hall, lounge, second receptio..."
This beautifully presented spacious and extended three bedroom semi detached family home is superbly situated on a pleasant plot in this modern development within the popular village of High Pittington. The superb property has been extended and stylishly modernised to produce a home of the highes...
"**SEMI-DETACHED HOME**TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS & A STUDY**DRIVEWAY & FRONT GARDEN**PRIVATE REAR GARDEN WITH COUNTRY SIDE VIEWS** Pattinson estate agents are delighted to welcome to the market this well presented two bedroom home, located in the ever popular location of Rainton gate, Houghto..."
"** No Upper Chain ** Excellent Condition ** Very Popular Location ** Cul-De-Sac Position ** Detached Garage ** Gardens ** Double Glazing & Gas Central Heating * Good Local Amenities, Schools & Transport Links * Ground floor briefly comprises: entrance lobby, comfortable lounge, stunning ..."
"Pattinson Estate Agents are pleased to bring to the market this great three bedroom semi-detached house, in the highly sought after area of Gilesgate. Located within close proximity to local amenities and Durham City Centre, this property would make a fabulous family home or rental property fo..."
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** With an impressive amount of living space and fantastic countryside views, this extended two-bedroom semi-detached house is the perfect opportunity for young couples, commuters, and families.  The entrance porch leads into the hallway, with ..."
This is a two bedroom semi detached house with garage and gardens to front and rear. The Vendor has obtained pre-planning details for extending to a four bedroom residence with en-suites...
"A SPACIOUS, EXTENDED and IMMACULATELY PRESENTED semi detached property which has THREE GOOD-SIZED BEDROOMS along with SUPERB OPEN PLAN LIVING ACCOMMODATION, a MODERN BATHROOM WITH FOUR PIECE SUITE, a LARGE, SOUTH-WEST FACING REAR GARDEN and OFF STREET PARKING FOR SEVERAL CARS. The proper..."
"Available for sale with no chain involved, this spacious semi detached bungalow on a generous plot, has two double bedrooms and two reception rooms. Having lots of potential, the property is ideally located close to a range of local amenities and public transport links. The floor plan co..."
"This nicely presented three bedroom semi-detached family home is beautifully situated on a corner plot in Dene Drive within the popular Carrville area of Durham City. This lovely house has a good amount of accommodation that briefly comprises: entrance hallway, a spacious living room, a separate ..."
"4 bedroom detached property, occupying a pleasant cul de sac position on this popular modern development making it ideally suited to a wide range of purchasers including a growing family. The well planned accommodation comprises, porch, lounge, dining room with stairs to the first floor and patio..."
"No Upper Chain ** Stunning Family or First Home ** Sunny Rear Aspect ** Fabulous Gardens & Cul-De-Sac Position ** Rarely Available ** Detached Garage & Driveway ** GCH & Upvc Double Glazing ** Early Viewing Advised ** The floor plan comprises: inviting entrance hallway, through lounge an..."
"The Windermere is such a flexible home. If you have a growing family, you’ll enjoy your own ensuite bedroom up on the second floor. If you are first-time buyers or young professionals, you’ll appreciate the option to have a guest bedroom and bathroom as well as a home offic..."
"Large semi detached house, prominently positioned in a very convenient location within 1 mile of Durham City Centre. Externally there's a detached garage and driveway. Gardens are to the front and rear of the property with a decked patio area. Sure to prove popular, internal inspection essentia..."
"Stunning Family or First Home ** Upgraded Throughout ** Popular Development ** Lovely Cul-De-Sac Position ** Sunny Rear Aspect ** Popular Village Location On The Outskirts of Durham ** Gardens, Parking & Garage ** Upvc Double Glazing & GCH ** Early Viewing Advised ** The floor plan brie..."
* POPULAR LOCATION * CORNER PLOT * OFF STREET PARKING AND DRIVEWAY ** CONSERVATORY TO THE REAR * FOUR GOOD SIZE BEDROOMS * EPC Grade: C Council Tax Band: D
"MASSIVE PRICE REDUCTION **PART EXCHANGE CONSIDERED** **INCENTIVES AVAILABLE** STUNNING STONE BUILT 3 BED BARN-STYLE NEW BUILD!! Copeland Residential offer this 3 bedroom, high quailty barn conversion-style new build, with stunning fixtures & fittings throughout. The property comprises in brief:..."
"Having been fully refurbished from top to bottom by our clients to a high standard, we are delighted to offer for sale this immaculately presented three bedroomed semi detached property with an attractive open aspect to the rear. The refurbishment work has included new kitchen, bathroom, boiler a..."
"**NOT TO BE MISSED** If you're looking for an affordable home that is also a solid investment opportunity, then this two-bedroom semi-detached, located close to Durham City Centre, with great transport links and amenities close by certainly fits the bill! The entrance leads into the hal..."
"Dowen are delighted to bring to the Sale Market this Four Bedroom Mid Link dwelling, this lovely home has been tastefully modernized throughout and the sheer size of accommodation on offer is second to none, with its impressive double fronted exterior, sumptuous hallway with an extensive..."
"The Windermere is such a flexible home. If you have a growing family, you’ll enjoy your own ensuite bedroom up on the second floor. If you are first-time buyers or young professionals, you’ll appreciate the option to have a guest bedroom and bathroom as well as a home office. This is ..."
"Welcoming this ideal family home with spacious living arrangements throughout. The property features a lounge, a fitted kitchen and 3 generously sized bedrooms. Externally the accommodation has well-maintained front and rear gardens along with a large driveway and garage offering off-road park..."
What a fabulous opportunity in the centre of Durham City. Ideal for a range of buyers - Investors or Owner Occupiers - a must to view...
For sale with NO UPWARD CHAIN is this spacious EXTENDED three-bedroom terraced family home with two further attic rooms and is highly recommended to be viewed internally to fully appreciate the size and composition on offer. Located in the village of Bearpark and is situated approximately 4 miles...
"We are delighted to offer for sale this attractive and well presented two bedroomed ground floor apartment benefitting from gas fired central heating via a combi boiler fitted in August 2020 and double glazing. Ideally suited to a variety of purchasers, the property has an attractive ..."
"This charming three bedroom, stone built end terrace is a stunning example of modern furnishing in a character property. Ideal purchase for first time buyers or growing families. Since our clients purchase, the property has been updated to a high finish, as well as a recently fitted h..."
"Situated in the Broomside area of the City is this self-contained purpose-built block of apartments, including this two bedroom refurbished ground floor apartment, much improved since purchase by the current owner...."
Nicholas Humphreys are proud to bring to the market this spacious THREE bedroom semi-detached property. Located in a quiet and quaint residential estate with great access to Durham City via the A690. The property benefits from a large rear garden as well as central heating and double glazing. 
"An attractive, well presented family home located at the head of a quiet cul de sac in a small development on the outskirts of Witton Gilbert. This smart property is situated only 4 miles from Durham City in a quiet and popular village, ideally located for doorstep country walks or shopping in th..."
"Available with no onward chain, this two bedroom semi detached property sits in a popular area, along with off street parking, the property is an ideal purchase for first time buyers or investors. Built in approximately 1890, the property is deceptively spacious and comes with the bene..."
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - CLOSE TO AMENITIES - RENTAL INCOME OF £1000 PCM An ideal investment opportunity, with current rental income of £1000 PCM giving a rental yield of 7.5%, if purchased at asking price. This is a chance to purchase two, two bedroom terraced properties, being sold und..."
"We are pleased to offer for sale, this freehold, three bedroomed detached property with gas fired central heating and double glazing, the property offers extremely quiet surroundings. The chain free property has accommodation which briefly comprises: Entrance porch, cloakroom/WC, open plan l..."
"*NO CHAIN* *RECENTLY DECORATED & CARPETED* *2 RECEPTION ROOMS* *PRIVATE REAR GARDEN* Ideally suited to first time buyers or small family, we have pleasure in offering for sale, this excellently presented and much improved semi detached house with gas fired central heating and UPV..."
"Early viewing of this well presented semi detached house with three bedrooms and large garage, is highly recommended. The property is situated in a sought after location, within easy reach of Durham City, walking distance to the University Hospital and close to a wide variety of local amenities.<..."
"EXTENDED 4 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME / NO UPPER CHAIN - This semi-detached house in Brandon offers ample living space with 3 reception rooms, 4 bedrooms and 2 bathrooms. Extended to the rear accommodating for a ground floor bathroom and WC with utility, the property also boasts a large conservatory as ..."
"Igomove take pleasure in offering to the market this rarely available mature three bedroom semi detached house situated in Sherburn village making it ideally placed for commuting to Durham, this well proportioned property offers several amenities such as; three good sized bedrooms, family bathroo..."
A fantastic opportunity to purchase a full mid terraced building with an upstairs apartment and an established commercial unit which has an ongoing agreement within the desirable Carrville area of Durham City. Ideal for an investor looking for a two bedroom apartment with excellent rental potenti...
This is a beautiful two bedroom ground floor apartment situated in the City and includes an en-suite shower room as well as main bathroom. With allocated parking and communal grounds...
"This well-maintained bungalow is ideal for those looking to down-size and is available with immediate vacant possession. For sale by probate, the property has the benefit of uPVC double glazing, gas central heating with combination boiler, a garage, driveway and gardens. The accommodat..."
"A well presented and extended 3 bedroom semi detached family home with gas central heating and double glazing. Situated in an attractive position with views to the rear the property has accommodation which briefly comprises: entrance porch, extended lounge/dining room, kitchen/ breakf..."
"This beautifully presented, modern and stylish three bedroom end of terrace home is superbly situated in the highly desirable Pity Me area of Durham City with excellent access to both the city centre and the nearby Arnison Shopping Centre. The lovely home has been substantially updated and modern..."
"No Upper Chain ** Generous Plot / Good Potential to Extend or Add Garage ** Very Popular Location ** Good Local Schools, Amenities & Road Links ** Pleasantly Situated ** Modern Fitted Kitchen ** Lovely Rear Enclosed Garden & Parking ** Ideal First Buy or Small Family Home ** Double Glazing & GCH ..."
"Superbly appointed end terraced cottage situated in a desirable village location.
Externally there's on street parking and grassed area to the front whist having a yard to the rear.
With gas central heating and UPVC double glazing.
An exceptional property, viewings are recommended."
"This beautifully presented and stylish townhouse is situated on a desirable and modern development within the popular village of Bowburn and would make a superb family home. Ideally located for commuting, the house lies a short drive from both Durham City centre and the A1(M). With accom..."
" Broadband speed: Fiber optic Bradley Hall is delighted to welcome to the market this modernised three bedroom, semi detached home. Situated in the popular area of Bowburn on the outskirts of Durham, this property is ideally placed for easy access on to the A1 for commuting ..."
"Offered for sale with the benefit of immediate vacant possession, New Brancepeth Methodist Church occupies a pleasant semi rural position on the outskirts of New Brancepth adjacent to open countryside. It is a substantial detached building which would be suited to a variety of uses and..."
This lovely spacious three bedroom traditional mid terraced home looks to be an ideal purchase for growing families. Fabulous garden with patio and lawn. Driveway providing parking. EPC Rating E / Council Tax Band A 
Set back within larger than average enclosed gardens this traditional cottage style 3 bedroom mid terrace house has undergone a refurbishment programme and is being offered to the market with No Upward Chain
THREE BEDROOMS. BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED. VIEWING RECOMENDED.
View through Your Move - arrange your viewing now to see this beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached house overlooking green belt to front and with easily maintained courtyard garden to rear...
"CUL-DE-SAC POSITION* *RARELY AVAILABLE* *2 RECEPTION ROOMS* *DOUBLE STOREY* *RE-APPOINTED BATHROOM* *2 CAR DRIVEWAY* *POPULAR VILLAGE LOCATION* Situated in the lovely village of High Pittington, this neatly presented and extended semi detached house would be perfect as a family home and ..."
**NO CHAIN** Extended and spacious three bedroom traditional terrace family home is superbly situated in the wonderful village of High Pittington.
"Venture Properties are delighted to offer for sale this attractive end terrace house with attached garage, located within a popular cul de sac and ideally placed for access in to Durham City and to the A1(M) for commuting. The deceptively spacious and well presented accommodation compris..."
"*** NO UPPER CHAIN, POPULAR LOCATION, IDEAL FOR A RANGE OF BUYERS ** This three bedroom end terraced house is located on Barrasford Road on the popular Newton Hall Estate, Durham. The property briefly comprises; an entrance porch, spacious living room and an open plan kitchen/diner. To the first ..."
"*Extended Floor Plan* *Popular Location* *Parking & Extensive Gardens* *Good Local Amenities & Road Links* *Double Glazing & GCH* *Must Be Viewed* *No Chain*
Internally the property has two living rooms, one of which could be used as a play room..."
"The excellent three bedroom semi detached family home is superbly positioned in a desirable cul de sac within the popular Sherburn Hill area on the outskirts of Durham City. The house sits on a fantastic plot with outstanding large gardens, a driveway providing off street parking which leads to t..."
"Evenmore Properties welcome for sale this 3 bedroom link detached property in Sacriston. This property is newly refurbished throughout with new electrical circuit and heating system. This property briefly comprises: entrance hall, w/c, large lounge through to dining area, kitch..."
Pattinson Estate Agents are delighted to present for sale this two bedroom mid terrace house located in the popular Pity Me. Offered to the market with no upper chain the property briefly comprises living room and kitchen to the ground floor. To the first floor are two good sized bedrooms alo...
"Signature North East are delighted to welcome this modern and spacious split level apartment complete with a private garden and allocated parking to the sales market. This wonderful property has well planned accommodation briefly comprising: Entrance hallway, stairs down to inner hallwa..."
This beautifully presented and stylish three bedroom semi detached family home is superbly situated on a good sized plot in the desirable Meadowfield area of Durham City. The spacious house is offered for sale with no onward chain and has been updated and modernised by the current owners with the...
"**NOT TO BE MISSED** If you're looking for an affordable family home that is also a solid investment opportunity, then this two-bedroom semi-detached home certainly fits the bill! The entrance leads into the hallway, with the ground floor W/C to the right, and the well-equipped fitted k..."
Very motivated vendor looking for a QUICK SALEThis well presented and spacious three bedroom semi detached family home sits in a lovely position on this popular development within the desirable village of Ushaw Moor.
A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE GROUND FLOOR BENEFITTING FROM PATIO DOORS TO THE COMMUNAL GARDENS Camsell Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 48 retirement apartments arranged over 3 floors served by a lift. There are two apartments l...
NO UPPER CHAIN ** NOT TO BE MISSED ** WELL PRESENTED & SPACIOUS THROUGHOUT ** GOOD FURTHER POTENTIAL ** POPULAR VILLAGE TYPE LOCATION ** SHORT DISTANCE TO DURHAM CITY ** IDEAL FIRST BUY OR FAMILY HOME ** UPVC DOUBLE GLAZING & GAS CENTRAL HEATING VIA COMBI ** OUTSIDE SPACE & DETACHED GARAGE WITH R...
For sale by auction LIVE ONLINE AUCTION 30th March 2023 Being sold subject to the existing tenancy we are pleased to offer this 2 bedroom ground floor flat. Situated in a modern block of similar properties there is a commmunal entrance hallway f...
"This property is highly recommended for viewing, being situated in the popular Carrville area of the City, lovingly maintained and of move -in condition. Two double bedrooms and potential off road parking..."
"*BEAUTIFUL HOME* *EXTERNAL HOME OFFICE* *2 CAR DRIVEWAY* *MODERN BATHROOM & KITCHEN* *OPEN ASPECT TO THE FRONTAGE* We have pleasure in offering for sale, this immaculately presented, much improved, three bedroom semi detached property with the benefits of gas fired central heatin..."
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** If you're looking for a spacious 3/4 bedroom home, then this semi-detached family home, located in a popular residential area certainly fits the bill! The ground floor benefits from a large lounge and dining area, with patio doors leading to the rear garden. There is..."
"Available for sale with no chain involved, early viewing of this semi detached with three bedrooms on this sought after estate, is highly recommended. Having a floor plan comprising of an entrance hall, open plan living and dining room, kitchen and utility room with walk-in storage cupb..."
"**OVER 55s ONLY** Located in a private and secure estate surrounded by woodlands and beautiful scenery, this two-bedroom park home is ideal for those looking to downsize or move closer to the countryside! The property has a bright open-plan lounge, kitchen, and dining area, with integrated ..."
"*IDEAL BUY TO LET OPPORTUNITY* *CURRENTLY TENANTED* A well appointed semi-detached house in a popular area with great rental potential. Comprising of an entrance lobby with W/C, a large living room including a feature electric fire. A large kitchen diner and an extensive r..."
"Ben Charles are delighted to offer this two bedroom semi detached house to the market. The accommodation briefly comprises: Ground floor; Entrance porch, entrance hallway, living/dining room, kitchen and conservatory. To the first floor are two bedrooms and a bathroom. Externally there are garde..."
ATTENTION INVESTORS RENTAL POTENTIAL - £775PCM = 7% Yeild! Bridgfords are pleased to welcome to the market this delightful two bedroom mid terrace conveniently positioned in DH1. This property will appeal to a range of buyers with fantastic rental potential and a great prospect for stu...
"A three-bedroom end of terrace house with the benefit of a garage and driveway, situated in a cul-de-sac location and suitable for a family or a couple..."
"Guide Price £125,000+ For sale by Livestreamed Online Auction on Tuesday 28th March 2023. For auction details, please visit auctionhouse.co.uk/northeast"
"We have the pleasure in offering for sale this well presented 3 bedroom end terrace house situated on a large corner plot, enjoying spacious gardens to the front side and rear, an ideal environment for families or those who love to spend time in their gardens. The plot offers great poten..."
"Deceptively spacious and well maintained 3 bedroom mid terraced house, pleasantly situated in this popular village with open outlook to the front. Ideally suited to a wide range of purchasers, most notably first time buyers, the property offers well planned accommodation comprising, lobby, entran..."
"GUIDE PRICE £125,000+ FOR SALE BY LIVESTREAMED ONLINE AUCTION ON TUESDAY 28TH MARCH 2023. For bidding registration details, please visit auctionhouse.co.uk/northeast"
** No Upper Chain ** Rarely Available ** Popular & Convenient Location ** Ideal Family or Investment Property ** Close to Durham City ** Good Amenities & Road Links ** Upvc Double Glazing & GCH Via Baxi Combination Boiler ** Early Viewing Advised ** The floor plan comprises:- entrance lo...
Stunning property located in the heart of Sherburn Village.
"This property's price is reduced for over 60s as a lifetime lease purchase under our Home for Life Plan. Discounts range from 8.5% to 59% depending on age, personal circumstances and property criteria. The price shown is based on our average discount."
"A beautifully presented two bedroom mid terrace house with off road parking. Situated in the hamlet of Sherburn Hill, with local rural countryside and excellent links to Durham and beyond..."
"Ideally suited for first time buyers, we offer for sale this three bedroomed mid terraced property benefitting from gas fired central heating, double glazing, amazing views to the rear and a garage situated close by. Requiring some cosmetic updating the house has a floor plan comprisin..."
"Pattinson Estate Agents are pleased to bring to the market this modernised three bedroom, semi detached house located in the popular village of Sacriston. Benefitting from new flooring throughout and new windows to the rear, this would be an ideal first time buy or buy to let investment. To th..."
"A good sized semi detached house, situated in the village of High Pittington which is a few miles North East of Durham City. Ideal as a base to commute being close to the A1 and perfect as a semi rural retreat with plenty of countryside right on the doorstep. This two bedroom home......."
"Ideally suited for owner occupation or investment purposes, we offer for sale this well presented second floor apartment. Benefitting from gas fired central heating and double glazing throughout the chain free property comprises: Entrance hall, living room, fitted dining kitchen, two double ..."
A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE SECOND FLOOR Camsell Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 48 retirement apartments arranged over 3 floors served by a lift. There are two apartments located in a separate annexe at the end of the drive....
"Safe and Secure welcome to the market this Two Bedroom First Floor Flat in the sought after area of Belmont Court, Durham.
This modern property is currently tenanted and would make a great purchase for property investors and landlords.
The property benefits from gas central heating, double glazin..."
*Modern Method Of Auction* Spacious two bedroom semi detached house with gardens and large conservatory to rear. Situated in this popular Framwellgate Moor area of Durham. Property is offered for sale through the Modern Method of Auction which is operated by iamsold L...
"A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE TOP (SECOND) FLOOR WITH JULIETTE BALCONY AND OPEN ASPECT TO THE WEST. The property is conveniently located in the Development, being within close proximity to the lift and stairs to the Residents lounge and the communal laundry room. Camse..."
No Upper Chain ** Popular & Convenient Location ** Pleasantly Situated ** Spacious Floor Plan ** Well Presented & Upgraded ** GCH Via Combi ** Rear Enclosed Courtyard Garden with Possible Parking ** Local Amenities & Road Links ** Early Viewing Advised ** The floor plan briefly comprises...
"Pattinson Estate Agents welcome for sale this executive ground floor apartment approximately 12 minutes by bus (Google maps) from Durham City centre and close to the A1(M) / A690. Well presented throughout, this apartment briefly comprises: Security door to communal entrance, hallway, open plan l..."
"** No Chain ** Competitive Price ** Good Further Potential ** Pleasant Position ** Popular Location ** Outskirts of Durham ** Two Double Bedrooms ** Parking, Garage & Gardens ** Double Glazing & Modern Combi Boiler ** Alfreton Close is situated on the outskirts of Brandon where a good ra..."
"We take great pleasure in welcoming to the market this immaculately presented top floor retirement apartment. Located in the ever popular Camsell Court retirement complex available to over 60's and benefitting from secure communal entrance, communal lounge and resident laundry, this property also..."
"Available with vacant possession, we are delighted to offer for sale, this good sized two bedroomed mid terraced property with gas central heating, double glazing and a garden over the rear lane. The property itself has accommodation comprising: open plan lounge/diner and a recently re..."
"We are delighted to offer for sale, this substantial and deceptively spacious three bedroomed mid terraced property with gas central heating and double glazing. The property has an interesting history and was at one point a back to back house and now has a sizeable floor plan briefly c..."
A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE TOP FLOOR Camsell Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 48 retirement apartments arranged over 3 floors served by a lift. There are two apartments located in a separate annexe at the end of the drive. T...
"*** OVER 60's APARTMENT BLOCK, NO UPPER CHAIN, WELL PRESENTED, COMMUNAL LOUNGE *** This one bedroom top floor apartment is located in the popular Camsell Court in Framwellgate Moor, Durham. The property is available to over 60's and benefits from an on site manager and communal garden. The proper..."
"This updated and well presented two bedroom first floor apartment is superbly situated in the desirable Newton Hall area of Durham City. Beautifully positioned to take advantage of the lovely views to the front, this spacious apartment is offered for sale with no onward chain and should prove pop..."
"Available with no onward chain, we are delighted to offer for sale this deceptively spacious two bedroomed mid terraced property situated in a rural setting yet within easy access of Durham City. The property itself requires some cosmetic updating but has a spacious floor plan comprisi..."
"Having been well maintained and updated by our client during their ownership, the property is an ideal purchase for first time buyers and investors alike. With the benefit of a gas fired central heating system and double glazing throughout, the property is well presented and features ..."
"Hunters Durham welcome to the market this much improved 2-bedroom ground floor flat on Featherstone Road, Newton Hall. The property is located in the popular development of Newton Hall, which benefits from a great choice of local schools and is a short distance from the Arnison Centre Retail Park..."
"*SOLD WITH SITTING TENANT* Excellently presented much improved 3/4 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE ideal for the growing family. The property benefits from a ground floor extension and re-appointed KITCHEN/DINING ROOM. DOUBLE GLAZED, GAS CENTRALLY HEATED with a floorplan briefly comprising e..."
"No Upper Chain ** Ideal Starter, Family or Investment Property ** Possible Rental Income £650/£675pcm ** Well Presented ** Large Side Garden Offering Potential ** Upvc Double Glazing & GCH Via Combination Boiler ** Close to Amenities & Major Road Links ** Outskirts of Durham ** Must be Viewed ** ..."
"Exclusively for the over 55's Development on the outskirts of Durham City with a superb array of communal facilities to enjoy including beautiful landscaped gardens, communal lounge and social areas, laundry service and family visitors room for when friends or family visit. This spacious one bed..."
"A two storey terraced property, well located close to local Gilesgate amenities, and with good access to Central Durham and A690 and A1(M) road links. The house includes an Entrance Hall, Two Reception Rooms, a Kitchen, a Ground Floor Shower Room, Three Bedrooms, and a Bathroom. With double glazi..."
Located in arguably one of the best positioned apartments in this excellent development. Offered to the market is this pleasantly situated and well presented ONE BEDROOMED APARTMENT. Available for the over 60's the property has a floor plan which briefly comprises: entrance via secure i...
"This semi-detached house features two double bedrooms and has undergone recent renovations, including a new roof, full central heating with a combi boiler, and a refitted kitchen and shower room. One of the standout features of this property is the sun room extension to the rear."
This two bedroom apartment is beautifully presented and is of move-in condition. Superbly located in the Carrville area of the City and providing an allocated parking bay. A must to view...
"Igomove take pleasure in listing this superb self contained first floor, two bedroom apartment located in Lambton View, Rainton Meadow, this immaculate property is ideally situated for commuting to Durham and Sunderland, it offers several desirable features which include; two well proportioned be..."
"*** CURRENTLY TENANTED FOR £575 PCM, SPACIOUS APARTMENT, ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE, NEW BOILER INSTALLED OCTOBER 2021 *** This two bedroom first floor apartment is located in Whitfield Court in Framwellgate Moor, Durham. The property was built in 2007 and benefits from gas central heating and..."
This is a superb development opportunity to buy land with outline planning permission granted for a two bedroom detached bungalow with off road parking. Situated within an area of similar housing in the highly respected Belmont area of Durham...
"Available with no onward chain, with stunning views across the countryside, this two bedroom mid terrace property is an ideal purchase for first time buyers. With the benefit of gas central heating and double glazing and plenty of storage options throughout, the property makes an idea..."
"This 2 bedroom first floor apartment which benefits from electric heating, double glazing and a Juliette balcony from the living area. The property has accommodation that comprises: communal entrance hallway, private entrance hallway, open plan lounge/diner with access to the juliette..."
"This fabulous 2 bed/2 bath home is immaculately presented throughout, and is well situated for quick and easy access to Durham, Newcastle, Sunderland and Gateshead. Located in the popular development of Pickering Place, this property presents an opportunity to acquire a lovely home in an ever..."
"This beautifully presented, modern and stylish two bedroom end of terrace home is superbly situated in the popular village of Ushaw Moor just 3 1/2 mile from Durham City centre. The stunning home has been modernised and extended providing an open plan living/sitting and kitchen space with the add..."
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN**WELL PRESENTED**EXTREMELY LARGE GARDEN BACKING ONTO OPEN COUNTRYSIDE**EXCELLENT VIEWS** An exceptionally well presented and much improved TWO BEDROOMED SEMI-DETACHED HOME. The property briefly comprises: entrance lobby, living room, rear lobby with storage cupboard, downstairs..."
NGU Homesales are delighted to bring to the market this lovely two-bedroom terraced family. The property is close by to a number of local amenities and has plenty of outside space making it ideal for first time buyers and families. Achievable rent £525 PCM
"Safe and Secure welcome to the market this Two Bedroom Upper Flat in the popular area of Victoria Court, Framwellgate Moor.
This spacious, modern flat benefits from electric heating, double glazing and allocated parking bay.
Close to local amenities and transport links the property would suit a v..."
"Available with no onward chain, we are delighted to offer for sale this deceptively spacious three bedroomed mid terraced property benefitting from double glazing and an attractive position with open views to the rear. The property itself requires some cosmetic updating in places but h..."
Top floor apartment - Two bedrooms - Gated access - Beautiful surrounding views Pattinsons is delighted to welcome to the market this two bedroom top floor apartment in Lambton view. Surrounded by beautiful views to the front and rear. Located ideally with great transport links to the A1 an...
"Available with immediate vacant possession, we are delighted to offer for sale this immaculately presented and much improved two bedroomed mid terraced property benefitting from gas fired central heating and double glazing. Occupying a pleasant position with open views from the first f..."
"Offers are invited from investors. The property is available for sale with an established sitting tenant, and the sale is subject to the grant of a new twelve-month lease. Tenant is currently paying £510 PCM Situated on the first floor of this modern development, this spacious a..."
"Moovd are delighted to bring to the market this well presented, spacious 2 bedroom first floor flat, located in the popular Newton Hall area on the outskirts of Durham City. Currently tenanted at £540 PCM, this property is perfect for an investor. The layout briefly comprises entrance ha..."
"Prominently positioned semi detached house, situated on the outskirts of West Rainton Village and available with no onward chain. Externally there is on street parking to the rear and gardens to three sides of the property with two brick built storage sheds. Viewings are recommended. "
"A SPACIOUS home in West Rainton, available CHAIN FREE, ideal for INVESTORS or FIRST TIME BUYERS. Call to enquire! Bettermove are pleased to welcome to the market this charming three bedroom semi-detached house in West Rainton, available with no forward chain.The property ben..."
** NO UPPER CHAIN ** DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS ** VILLAGE LOCATION ** OFF-STREET PARKING WITH GATED ACCESS ** UPVC DOUBLE GLAZING AND GAS CENTRAL HEATING VIA COMBI ** FLOORED LOFT SPACE ** VIEWING ADVISED ** Elliot Street is located in the village of Sacriston which has a range of local ameni...
"No Upper Chain ** Spacious Floor Plan ** Good Potential ** Double Glazing / GCH Via Back Boiler ** Popular & Convenient Location ** Good Amenities & Road Links ** Outskirts of Durham ** Early Viewing Advised ** The floor plan comprises; entrance hallway, comfortable full width lounge din..."
"CITY CENTRE LOCATION ** 55 AND OVER DEVELOPMENT ** TWO BEDROOMED TOP FLOOR SELF CONTAINED APARTMENT ** ELECTRIC HEATING RADIATORS ** RESIDENTS PARKING ** Situated on the side of the building overlooking the residents parking area, this self contained apartment is located on the top fl..."
"*Two bedroom terraced house ideally situated for Durham City Centre and Franwellgate Moor high Street with an array of local shops and bus routes to Durham, Chester Le Street and Newcastle * Gas central heating (COMBI), modern kitchen and bathroom. Well presented internally with lawned..."
"A first floor retirement apartment offering independent living to the over 60's (partners can be 55 plus). This popular McCarthy and Stone complex is situated close to many shops, amenities and offers easy access to Durham city centre and transport links."
"*NO CHAIN* *MODERN KITCHEN & BATHROOM* *SPACIOUS OPEN PLAN LOUNGE/DINING KITCHEN* *GARAGE* Dowen Estate Agents are delighted to offer this excellently presented, much improved 2 bedroom mid terraced property. The property has been massively improved by the current owner. The read..."
"Deceptively Large Mid Terraced House, in need of some refurbishment and available with no onward chain.
Externally there's on street parking and a yard to the rear.
Viewings are recommended."
This deceptively spacious and nicely presented two bedroom traditional terrace home is superbly situated in an elevated position on South View within the popular village of Ushaw Moor and has stunning views to the front across the surrounding countryside. The property is being sold with no onward...
"Ben Charles are delighted to offer this spacious, two bedroom terraced house to the market. The accommodation briefly comprises to the ground floor: Entrance hallway, living room and dining kitchen. To the first floor are two bedrooms and a shower room. Externally there is a walled courtyard gard..."
"Ben Charles are delighted to offer this chain free, three bedroom, terraced house to the market. The accommodation briefly comprises: On the ground floor; Entrance porch, living room, dining kitchen, inner hallway and rear entrance. To the first floor are three bedrooms, bathroom and separate WC...."
"Hive Estates welcomes to the market this well-presented two bedroom mid-terrace home in Ushaw Moor. Benefitting from a large open-plan living space and two double bedrooms, the property has a modern finish throughout. Ideally located close to local transport links and amenities nearby, t..."
"If you're looking for an affordable family home, that is also a solid investment opportunity, then this three-bedroom terraced certainly fits the bill. The ground floor has a family lounge, with two large windows providing plenty of natural light, and a modern fitted kitchen with ample sto..."
"*NO UPPER CHAIN* *IN NEED OF FULL REFURBISHMENT* *IDEAL INVESTMENT* *POTENTIAL TO EXTEND, IDEAL FOR A RANGE OF PURCHASERS, FRONT AND REAR GARDENS* This three bedroom semi detached house is located on Priory Road in Framwellgate Moor, Durham. The property benefits from double glazing and ..."
Hunters are delighted to welcome to the market this mid terrace two bedroom property that would make the perfect investment opportunity. This property is offered to the market with tenants in-situ making this the ideal buy for a landlord looking to extend their portfolio. Briefly the pro...
"A SPACIOUS mid terrace property which has TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS along with a SPACIOUS DINING KITCHEN, a LARGE LOUNGE and an ENCLOSED YARD TO THE REAR. The property is located in a quiet spot on the edge of the village and has views over neighbouring countryside to the front. Transport link..."
Attention Investors. This is an excellent opportunity to take over the ownership of a property which has been rented to a reliable tenant for some time and is likely to deliver in the region of 6.4% gross return on investment...
"With a good size garden to the rear, which also provides off-street parking, this mid-terraced house is ideal for first-time buyers. It occupies a very convenient location close to a host of village amenities and has good road access to Durham City and Chester le Street. The layout comprises a lo..."
"Ideal Investment ** Currently Tenanted £480pcm ** Rental Growth Potential ** Popular Location ** Good Local Amenities ** First Floor Apartment ** Well Presented ** Upvc Double Glazing & Electric Heating ** Parking Space ** Briefly comprising of communal entrance via entry system, stairs..."
With lease extended to 31 July 2162 this very well presented two bedroom ground floor flat is pleasantly situated within this popular residential development in the village of Sherburn which lies just a few miles from Durham City Centre with superb bus links and a range of local shops avail...
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY!!! A delightful quaint two bed cottage in the popular village of Ushaw Moor, Durham. Ideal opportunity for landlords looking to expand a buy to let portfolio as the property is currently tenanted at 450pcm. Walking distance from all the local amenities, shops and schools."
"We offer to the market this rarely available semi detached bungalow in the village of West Rainton. An affordably priced investment opportunity.
Benefiting from gas central heating via a combi boiler, UPVC double glazing and no onward chain.
Internal inspection is essential."
"We are pleased to welcome to the market this two bedroom terrace cottage, situated on South Street, West Rainton, Houghton le Spring. The property briefly comprises Kitchen / Diner, Lounge, First Floor Landing, Downstairs WC, Two Double Bedrooms, Bathroom and benefits from being gas central he..."
"Offered via the MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION, this property is situated in Brandon with a range of local amenities, schools and transport links. The property briefly comprises of entrance hall, spacious lounge and modern fitted kitchen with range of units, range style cooker. To the first floor are t..."
"Guide £60,000+ An impressive one bedroom, first floor flat offered For Sale via Online Unconditional Auction. FEES APPLY. TO BE SOLD WITH EXTENDED LEASE OF 125 YEARS FROM JANUARY 2022. The property briefly comprises: Communal stairwell to rear of property, inner lobby l..."
*NICELY PRESENTED HOME* *TRADITIONAL TERRACE HOUSE* *POPULAR VILLAGE LOCATION* *TWO BEDROOMS* *NO ONWARD CHAIN* This well presented two bedroom traditional terrace home is superbly positioned in a pleasant street within the popular village of New Brancepeth. Offered for sale with no onward purch...
"For sale by auction TAKING BIDS NOW - OPTION 1 We offer for sale this 2 bedroom mid terrace house with gas central heating and double glazing. The property itself has accommodation comprising: lounge, dining room, kitchen and bathroom. To the fi..."
"Ideal for an investor to develop and re-sell or let, this two bedroom mid terrace house has been priced to sell and reflect some modernisation required..."
"This spacious two bedroom semi detached home has gardens to front and rear. Double glazing, gas central heating via combi, sizes with two double bedrooms, modern bathroom/wc, a well proportioned lounge dining rooms. FOR SALE BY CONDITIONAL AUCTION - Please visit our web site for..."
"SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACE | CONTEMPORARY FITTED KITCHEN / DINER | GAS CENTRAL HEATING | DOUBLE GLAZED | PRIVATE FRONT AND REAR GARDEN | CLOSE TO AMENITIES | INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY We welcome to the market this spacious three bedroom family home located on High Graham Street, Sacristo..."
"PUBLIC NOTICE - 9 Harle Street, Browney, Durham, Durham, DH7 8HX - We have received an offer of £ 62,500.00. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contracts takes place. EPC Rating (D) Three bedroom terraced ho..."
"Offered for sale by Palace Green Homes, this substantial detached home is available for sale with no upward chain. Located on the edge of Ely on a mature development which once housed RAF and US Air force personnel and their families, the property comprises entrance hall, utility, cloakroom, dini..."
"Brown & Co offers a substantial home of superior quality in Ely, Cambridgeshire, with easy access to the city and King´s Ely school. This truly exceptional property is a masterpiece of contemporary housebuilding from a developer who only undertakes one-off, high specification projects."
"Queen Adelaide Farm is an attractive lifestyle property with a well presented four bedroom detached dwelling and private specimen carp fishery, set in a total of 4.3 acres (1.7 ha). "
A beautifully presented and deceptively spacious four / five bedroom dormer bungalow situated approximately 200 metres from the City Centre on the popular Vineyards.
"Offered for sale by Palace Green Homes, this refurbished 4 bedroom detached home is available for sale with no upward chain. Located on the edge of Ely on a mature development which once housed RAF and US Air force personnel and their families, the estate has been a familiar landmark with familie..."
"The Albertus presents FOUR DOUBLE bedrooms, set on a DETACHED PLOT with a GARAGE and PARKING. There's a spacious SOUTH-EAST FACING GARDEN and the living room boasts DUAL ASPECT windows plus a UTILITY ROOM. The Master bedroom boasts an EN"
"A recently constructed 3 double bedroomed (3 ensuite) detached home of approximately 1,400 sq ft, finished to an excellent specification and with no upward chain. Accommodation comprises entrance hall, cloakroom, kitchen/dining/family room with fitted appliances, utility, lounge and 3 double be..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this spacious, five-bedroom semi-detached home in a highly popular area of Ely, only a short distance from the city centre and amenities. Modernised by the current vendors, this property offers a recently fitted kitchen with spaces for all appliances, and..."
A spacious and well appointed five bedroom semi-detached property which lies in a cul-de-sac position a little over a mile from the City centre.
"Located in one of the most sought after areas of Ely and within walking distance of the City Centre is this fabulous Town House.The property is beautifully decorated throughout. Accommodation comprises of Kitchen/Diner, Cloakroom, Lounge, Four Bedrooms, En-Suite & Bathroom. Enclosed Garden & Carport"
A development opportunity to purchase a former commercial premises with planning for three luxury apartments opposite Jubilee Gardens and less than a mile from the mainline railway station - Planning Ref 22/00096/ERN.
"The Knightley is a popular family home, and the 'L' shape of this property means that both the living room and the kitchen/dining room provide direct access, though French doors, into the garden. The ground floor has the considerable benefit of an additional living space at the fr..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this immaculately presented 4-bedroom end-terrace townhouse set within a highly regarded development which is in walking distance of Ely town centre, river and parks. The well- appointed accommodation comprises large hall with storage cupboard and WC lead..."
"A popular style 1930s semi-detached conveniently placed for access to central Ely, the A10 and the Princess of Wales Hospital. The accommodation has been altered and extended over the years to create an impressive family home including 3 reception rooms, stylish kitchen, 3 bedrooms and a modern b..."
haart are pleased to market this five bedroom property located on the popular estate of Stour Green. The front of the property overlooks a pleasant green area and from the back of the property you have some amazing Cathedral views and is within walking distance to local
"Ideally located at the end of a private drive and overlooking green space, the Trusdale is a 4 bedroom home with a single garage & driveway parking."
"An extended link detached 5 bedroomed property situated within a popular cul de sac location close to primary schools, Ely College and convenient for the city centre. Comprises on the ground floor, entrance lobby, lounge, kitchen/breakfast room, dining/family room and on the first floor there ar..."
A four/five bedroom semi-detached family home with three reception rooms and tandem length garage situated in the highly sought after Stour Green development.
"FOUR bedroom semi detached home with flexible living over three floors. The house is as flexible as it is practical, with three floors creating all of the space you and your family need. From the open plan kitchen/dining area and the feature lounge, to the four bedrooms and integral garage, each ..."
"*Chain Free* A lovely four-bedroom detached family home superbly located close to the popular St. Johns School within the desired City of Ely. The first floor offers four good sized bedrooms, a family bathroom and an en-suite off the master bedroom. The downstairs acco..."
"Choose either Part Exchange on this superb home OR a deposit contribution of £13,500!** The choice is yours to get you moving into this superb 4 bedroom detached home!£8,997 enhanced specification inside!Home 65, the Grainger is a detached home featuring four generously sized bedroom..."
"A substantial 4 bedroomed property including a studio flat, situated within a prime city location backing onto Cherry Hill Park, overlooking Jubilee Gardens to the front and being close to the mainline railway station. This highly individual and versatile residence comprises on the groun..."
"Well placed for access to the highly regarded St John's Community Primary School, this modern detached house occupies an excellent position within an established cul-de-sac on the west side of Ely. The accommodation, in brief, comprises:- entrance hall, cloakroom, sitting room, dining room, kitch..."
"A modern and rarely available design terraced property within a cul de sac location within a popular residential development. Comprises entrance hall, kitchen, lounge/dining room, 2 double bedrooms (1 ensuite) and bathroom, together with south facing garden and allocated parking."
"This four bedroom town house offers, lounge, kitchen/breakfast room, dining room/family room, utility, cloakroom, family bathroom and en-suite, low maintenance garden to rear, single garage, gas central heating and double glazing. "
The Midford is a 4 bedroom family home with a single garage & driveway parking and south facing garden.
"Situated on a private drive opposite a corridor of green space, the Midford is a 4 bedroom home with a single garage & 2 parking spaces."
"Located on a private drive, the Midford is a 4 bedroom home with a single garage & driveway parking."
"Believed to date from the 1950s this detached bungalow occupies a fine, non-estate location well placed for access to the city centre. A Co-op store, convenience store, public house and St Mary's Doctors Surgery are also within close proximity. Well maintained, the accommodation, in brief, compr..."
"£5,000 Deposit Contribution! The Kateri presents a delightful new home which features OPEN PLAN LIVING and three DOUBLE BEDROOMS, two with DOUBLE FITTED WARDROBES while the Master bedroom boasts an EN-SUITE. Accompanying bedroom 2 and bedroom 3 is a 4-PEICE family BATHROOM. To find out more."
The 3 bedroom Yewdale is a traditional double-fronted home ideally suited to first time buyers or young families.
"A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED PENT HOUSE APARTMENT BENEFITTING FROM TWO SHOWER ROOMS, TWO SPACIOUS BEDROOMS AND ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE IN THE PRIVATE CAR PARK."
"An immaculately presented modern 3-storey townhouse situated within a no-through road cul de sac position. Versatile accommodation comprises entrance hall, cloakroom, utility room, family room, study/bedroom 4, first floor open plan kitchen/dining room and lounge, 3 further bedrooms on the secon..."
"Enjoy the high life with the three-storey Aslin. This four bedroom home has been thoughtfully designed with modern day family life in mind. With two substantial living spaces, and the bedrooms spread over the two upper floors, this layout is extremely popular.
The ground floor kitchen..."
"Enjoy the high life with the three-storey Aslin. This four bedroom home has been thoughtfully designed with modern day family life in mind. With two substantial living spaces, and the bedrooms spread over the two upper floors, this layout is extremely popular. The ground floor kitch..."
"Move into the 3 bedroom Yewdale this Summer. This home has optional extras included worth over £4,100 and we can help contribute towards your deposit*."
"A brilliant opportunity to purchase this well-kept; semi-detached home set within Ely's highly sought after Brays Lane, where properties are rarely available for sale. All city centre shops are within easy walking distance with the train station and riverside located close by. This property also ..."
"The first Chelbury home design to be released, this home is a 4 bedroom townhouse offering flexible and contemporary living across 3 storeys."
"The Aslin 3 is a fantastic three bedroom home family home.
On the ground floor there is an open-plan kitchen/diner, a downstairs cloakroom and a living room at the rear, with glazed patio doors leading to the garden. Moving up the stairs you'll find two well proportioned bedrooms an..."
"THREE BEDROOM semi-detached home with OPEN PLAN KITCHEN, SEPARATE LOUNGE and EN-SUITE MASTER BEDROOM. With traditional features and craftsmanship to the outside of the property, and the pinnacle of modern living to be found inside, The Ludlow is a home for you to truly fall in love with."
The 3 bedroom Yewdale is ideally suited to first time buyers or young families and includes a fully integrated kitchen & shower over the bath.
The 3 bedroom Easedale at Lantern Croft boasts a south facing garden and has 2 allocated spaces in the private parking court.
The 3 bedroom Easedale is ideally suited to first time buyers or young families and features an upgraded kitchen & shower over the bath.
"A well presented three bedroom, two bathroom (one en-suite), detached property which lies at the end of a small spur off the close within this sought after City location."
"Home 67, the Aslin is a fantastic four bedroom home with flexible accommodation - a true family home.
On the ground floor there is an open-plan kitchen/diner, a downstairs cloakroom and a living room at the rear, with glazed patio doors leading to the garden. Moving up the stairs yo..."
"A well located 4 bedroom link-detached house, with driveway and generously sized enclosed garden. Positioned in a quiet residential cul-de-sac within walking distance of Ely city centre, Ely's well served railway station, and in the sought-after catchment of St. John's primary school..."
"A double-fronted home, the Mountford offers balanced design in its exteriors and balanced living spaces in its interiors. The ground floor features two substantial living spaces, each of which run the full length of the home. There's a sizeable, dual aspect living room which is brigh..."
"The 3 bedroom Braxton offers contemporary living for both first time buyers and families and has 2 parking spaces, including a carport."
"The 3 bedroom Gosford offers contemporary living for both first time buyers and families and has an optional extras included worth over £3,900."
"The property is ideal for families as it offers a spacious reception rooms, an open plan kitchen/dining room and cloakroom downstairs. Upstairs the property offers three bedrooms with the master benefiting from a ensuite and a family bathroom"
"STUNNING THREE BEDROOM HOME - With traditional features and craftsmanship to the outside of the property, and the pinnacle of modern living to be found inside. The Letchworth is a home for you to truly fall in love with, simple lines make the most of the space, while inspired designs let the lif..."
"Enhanced specification inside worth £6,164! Home 64, the Mountford is a stunning double-fronted home.The ground floor features two substantial living spaces, each of which run the full length of the home. There's a sizeable, dual aspect living room which is bright and airy and a kit..."
The Braxton is a 3 bedroom townhouse offering flexible and contemporary living for first time buyers & families.
The Cassian presents a THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM semi-detached home. This new home has a spacious OPEN PLAN living/dining room with FRENCH DOORS leading out to the SOUTH FACING garden. The Master bedroom boasts a DOUBLE SHOWER EN-SUITE and a 
A beautifully presented ground floor two bedroom retirement apartment. A bright and spacious living room benefiting from large windows OVERLOOKING THE COMMUNAL GARDENS. Part of out RETIREMENT LIVING PLUS DEVELOPMENT
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this decent sized four-bedroom end of terrace property, that boasts cathedral views situated within a highly desirable area in Ely, only a short distance to the schools, city centre and other amenities. This property also benefits from being offered with no upw..."
"A well presented three/four bedroom semi-detached family home, with recently refitted kitchen and shower room, situated in an established development close to the City centre."
A beautifully presented 3/4 bedroom home situated on a highly regarded residential development close to the Lantern & Isle of Ely primary schools and Ely Leisure Park.
The 3 bedroom Gosford offers contemporary living for both first time buyers and families.
"An amazing opportunity to purchase this stylish; modern home occupying a favoured location, providing well-proportioned living accommodation arranged over three floors; with the added benefit of being offered with no upward chain. On the ground floor the entrance hall leads to all prin..."
"An attractive Link-Detached Family Home with Conservatory to the rear, Carport & Garage. The property is located close to the City Centre and is well presented throughout. Accommodation comprises 3 Beds,EnSuite,Cloakroom,Conservatory, Bathroom, Carport, Garage & Enclosed Gardens."
"The Eveleigh - a charming semi detached 3-bedroom home that is spacious and well-appointed. You'll find an open-plan kitchen, downstairs cloakroom, and a hallway that leads to an impressively sized rear living room. Glazed patio doors lead out from the living room to a garden, drawi..."
"*BOOK YOUR VISIT TODAY AND STEP INSIDE OUR BRAND NEW EVELEIGH VIEW HOME*Home 16 is READY TO MOVE INTO! PLUS, now comes with £7,821 worth of internal upgrades including flooring, downlights, and integrated kitchen appliances.The Eveleigh - a charming semi detached 3-bedroom home that..."
"A brilliant opportunity to purchase this immaculately presented; three-bedroom semi-detached home in the popular city of Ely, which has the extra added benefit of being offered with no upward chain. Downstairs consists of a modern kitchen which includes a range of eye and base level u..."
"Four Bedroom, Chain free property in the City of Ely split over three levels located in the highly regarded area of The Medway, which is situated just off Stour Green and within catchment of well-regarded local schools. This four bedroom end of terrace property is a perfect family home and provid..."
A semi detached character cottage situated within a pleasant central city location within walking distance of amenities and benefitting from being offered for sale with no upward chain.
"The Raphael is a THREE bedroom home with PARKING. The OPEN PLAN living and dining area features a REAR DOOR to the GENEROUS GARDEN. Both the Master bedroom and bedroom 2 have FITTED WARDROBES and are accompanied by a good sized BATHROOM. Bedroom 3 could be used as a STUDY, great if you..."
"An immaculately presented Semi-Detached Family Home situated within walking distance of the City Centre in a popular residential development. There are some well regarded local schools within close proximity.The property comprises of Cloakroom, Lounge,Kitchen/Diner,Conservatory,Three Beds & Bathroom"
"NO CHAIN! This modern 3 bedroom home is ready to move straight into and offers bright and airy accommodation throughout which offers an open plan kitchen diner, downstairs cloakroom, good size bedrooms and 2 allocated parking spaces to the rear. VIEWING IS ESSENTIAL to appreciate everything thi..."
A three bedroom semi-detached home situated on a good size plot with double length garage to the rear and off road parking. Situated in a small cul-de-sac close to St. Johns School and being offered for sale with the benefit of no upward chain.
"A modern end of terrace property benefitting from being offered for sale with no upward chain. Accommodation comprises entrance hall, lounge, cloakroom, kitchen opening to dining room, 3 bedrooms (1 ensuite) and bathroom. Outside there is a driveway, garage and enclosed garden."
"A superbly presented two-bedroom terraced house, within a stone's throw of Ely City Centre. This character property has been extremely well maintained, including a new gas combi-boiler, updated kitchen together with tasteful decoration and a south-west-facing garden. The g..."
The Canford has 2 bedrooms and is ideal home for first time buyers with a south facing garden and side by side parking.
"The Brigid is a two bedroom home with PARKING. The OPEN PLAN living and dining area features a REAR DOOR to the GENEROUS GARDEN. Both the Master bedroom and bedroom 2 have FITTED WARDROBES and are accompanied by a good sized BATHROOM. Bedroom 2 could be used as a STUDY, great if you..."
A well situated two bedroom detached bungalow which lies in a highly sought after location less than ½ a mile from the railway station and marina. No Upward Chain.
"A 2 bedroom end of terrace Victorian cottage offering spacious ground floor accommodation, situated in a central city location within close proximity of Ely's mainline railway station and the River Great Ouse."
The energy efficient Canford is ideal for first time buyers and has 2 double bedrooms and sociable living space for entertaining family and friends.
"A brilliant opportunity to purchase this lovely two double bedroom end of terrace property set within a highly desirable area of Ely, only a short walk to the city centre and other amenities. The front door opens up into a great size lounge which benefits from a feature fireplace with wood ..."
"Deposit Unlock available - Home 10 is READY TO MOVE INTO and comes with superb upgraded specification including Integrated BOSCH kitchen appliances, flooring throughout and turf to rear garden worth £7,576The Cartwright is a generously proportioned two bedroom home. Its size and layou..."
 A 3 bedroom corner terrace house located in a popular area to the north of Ely. From the hallway is the cloakroom & then the lounge 9'4 x 12' with patio doors into conservatory 9'2 x 4'9 with single door to rear garden. Dining room ('2 x 5' with opening into kitchen with base & wall un...
"Abbotts presents this lovely three-bedroom mid-terrace house, with a beautiful rear garden located close to the heart of the City of Ely. It is approximately a 10-minute walk to the city centre and 20 minutes to the train station with connections to both Cambridge and London. This pro..."
A modern two bedroom terraced house situated on a popular residential development approximately 1 mile to the City centre.
"The Lidwina is a gorgeous, very SPACIOUS DETACHED HOUSE with a GARAGE and rear door to the SOUTH FACING GARDEN. This home offers a LARGE OPEN PLAN kitchen/living/dining room and two DOUBLE bedrooms, both with FITTED WARDROBES and accompanied by a good-sized bathroom. To find out more call us on..."
"A well-proportioned 2-bedroom end-terrace house, with a good sized low maintenance garden and an allocated parking space. Set back from the road and benefiting from gated access to the rear garden, and parking being directly to rear of the property. The ground floor offers ..."
"No Chain! Close to the City Centre sits this well presented mid terrace property, ideal for first time buyers"
The Yves Apartment presents OPEN PLAN living with a generous family bathroom and two BEDROOMS both with DOUBLE FITTED WARDROBES featuring SLIDING DOORS and the Master bedroom boasting a DOUBLE SHOWER EN-SUITE. There is ample storage through the home and TWO DEDICATED PARKING SPACES. For more info..
"A great opportunity to purchase this 3-bedroom end of terrace home situated in a brilliant area of Ely, close to the city centre. The downstairs consists of a large entrance hall, WC, kitchen with ample work surfaces, eye and base level units and a large lounge/dining room. The Front ..."
A beautifully presented two double bedroom ground floor apartment with a private entrance and patio doors opening to the communal gardens situated in a small cul-de-sac close to the City centre.
"A great opportunity for investors only to purchase this two-bedroom semi-detached property in a highly desirable area of Ely, with a tenant in situ. Current EPC rating is F. The current landlord has spent the prerequisite amount required to satify the exemption of minimum energy effic..."
"An outstanding second floor apartment of approximately 776 sq ft situated within a small, private development, of just ten apartments, ideally placed for access to all local amenities. Substantially larger than the majority of the other apartments it boasts an impressive and spacious open plan st..."
A delightful two double bedroom maisonette situated in a central location close to Waitrose and just a short walk from the Waterside and Ely mainline railway station.
An amazing opportunity to purchase this spacious three-bedroom terraced home which has been freshly painted throughout and benefits from being situated a short distance to the city centre; close to amenities and is also being offered with no upward chain. The downstairs consist of a g...
"This property is perfect for first time buyers.This well presented three bedroom end of terrace home is comprised of a shower room, lounge, dining area, fitted kitchen and utility room on the ground floor. On the first floor you will find three bedrooms plus parking."
"A well presented coach house style apartment situated within a popular development overlooking a green to the front. Accommodation comprises entrance hall with stairs leading to the first floor landing, 17'8"" x 10'2"" lounge/dining room, kitchen, 2 double bedrooms and bathroom, together with a gar..."
The Amand Apartments are spacious with an OPEN PLAN living/dining and kitchen area. Boasting DUAL ASPECT windows making the space feel light and airy. The DOUBLE bedroom is accompanied by a GOOD SIZED BATHROOM as well as FITTED STORAGE in the hall way. To find our more please contact the sales consu
A beautifully presented two bedroom ground floor apartment situated in this stylish historic building.
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase this *CHAIN FREE* well-presented ground floor apartment to the north of the City. Accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, lounge/dining room with electric fireplace, fitted kitchen, master bedroom, a second bedroom and a fitted bathroom. The property has e..."
"A perfectly presented Ground Floor Apartment within walking distance of the City Centre of Ely.The property is offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The apartment is in a popular development of similar properties.Accommodation comprises Lounge/diner,KitchenTwo Bedrooms and a Bathroom.Allocated Parking."
"This ground floor studio apartment is well located in the City of Ely and within walking distance of the city centre and the Ely train station, with railway links to both Cambridge and London. Outside the property there is access to the convenient shared communal garden. Thi..."
"*£5000 TOWARDS EXTRAS* PLOT 94 THE STEEPERTON AT EQUINOX III - A 3 bedroom detached house with downstairs cloakroom, spacious lounge and kitchen/dining room with double doors that open into the garden. Master bedroom with en-suite, and separate Bathroom."
Exeter - Topsham - For Sale by Informal Tender on April 21st 2023 - an outstanding development opportunity with outline planning permission for up to 100 dwellings.
"INVESTMENT BLOCK OF APARTMENTS with estimated annual rent income of C.£162,000. BRAND NEW block of 15 apartments, all TWO BEDROOMS with BALCONIES and ALLOCATED PARKING SPACES. Situated within the Exeter area."
A total of 24 bedrooms with this long established and licenced student property portfolio of four properties in prime EX4 locations in the university city of Exeter
DISCREETLY AVAILABLE. A beautifully presented country property with extensive grounds of 8 acres including tennis court and indoor pool.
"A beautifully presented family home with a gorgeous garden
situated in one of Exeter’s best suburbs. Designed by Exeter-based architects, Heighway Field Associates, 1 Rosebarn Avenue is a contemporary family home with generously sized rooms that is focussed on
modern living and muti-generational..."
"A WONDERFUL DETACHED FARMHOUSE, situated in a popular TEIGN VALLEY VILLAGE with just under 7 ACRES OF GARDEN AND PASTURE. FIVE BEDROOMS and superb living space. ADJOINING ANNEXE. Range of outbuildings including A CIDER BARN and THRESHING BARN, with POTENTIAL FOR CONVERSION (STPP). BEAUTIFUL VIEWS..."
"A wonderful opportunity to purchase this impressive DETACHED HOUSE with spacious, adjoining TWO BEDROOM ANNEXE. EQUESTRIAN POTENTIAL with approximately FOUR ACRES of land with STABLE BLOCK and 40m x 20m SAND SCHOOL"
"A BEAUTIFUL, ELEGANT Edwardian FAMILY HOME situated in the HEART of ST. LEONARDS and presented in fantastic order throughout. The spacious accommodation includes two large reception rooms, a STUNNING KITCHEN/FAMILY ROOM, SIX BEDROOMS/HOME OFFICE SPACE, ground floor cloakroom, utility and laundry ..."
Approx 1.0 ha (2.47 acres) potential development land adjoining Tesco Store.
"****COMING SOON**** Architecturally striking 4 BEDROOM home offering over 3000sq ft of accommodation. Luxury interiors, sleek modern kitchens with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, 3 with en suite, DOUBLE GARAGE with ANNEXE/HOME OFFICE above. Landscaped enclosed gardens, drivew..."
"*VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE* *GUIDE PRICE £1,400,000 - £1,750,000* SUBSTANTIAL detached house in a SOUGHT-AFTER RESIDENTIAL ADDRESS just 1/2 a mile from the city centre, close to the PROTECTED HOOPERN VALLEY PARK and nearby Exeter Cricket ground. WELL-MAINTAINED AND VERY WE..."
"CITY CENTRE DEVELOPMENT/INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY UNIQUE OPPORTUNITY to acquire a LARGE DETACHED PERIOD PROPERTY set in c. HALF AN ACRE PLOT with FIVE GARAGES and AMPLE PARKING, midway between the University Campus and city centre. Offering almost 4,500 SQ FT of FORMERLY MANAGED ACCOMMODA..."
"INVESTMENT PORTFOLIO with a RENTAL INCOME of c.£116,000 pa which represents an 8.6% GROSS RETURN on the guide price. Two fully refurbished 8 Bed HMO's predominantly let to young professionals, within walking distance of the Quay and the city centre, close to local amenities and public ..."
"UNBROKEN FREEHOLD INVESTMENT BLOCK A Modern purpose built block of 1 Bed apartments for over 50s with parking for each apartment and a well maintained communal garden. The property is currently generating c.£89,400 pa increasing to c.£93,300 pa later in the year."
"****READY WINTER 2023/2024**** STUNNING four bedroom DETACHED home with PRIVATE ACCESS TO THE BEACH, situated on the outskirts of a popular SEASIDE town. Over 2,500 sq ft of flexible living accommodation, with the buyer having choice of layout and design, TRIPLE GARAGE and BEAUTIFUL CO..."
"An elegant Grade II Listed Georgian town house in the heart of St Leonards, offering spacious accommodation over five storeys with multi-generational potential. The property has immense character and charm, retaining many original features. There is also a delightful SW facing walled rear garden"
Freehold Block of 6 Flats. For more information please call the office on .
"GUEST HOUSE WITH 7 LETTING ROOMS AND SEPARATE OWNERS ACCOMMODATION, BEAUTIFUL GARDENS WITH REAR ACCESS TO A CAR PARK WITH 10 PARKING SPACES. CITY CENTRE LOCATION WITH FANTASTIC REVIEWS. Situation The property is located in the lively Cathedral City of Exeter, which offers a rich h (cont.)"
"A huge, INCREDIBLY IMPRESSIVE PENTHOUSE apartment in this prestigious apartment building on Cathedral Yard. Served by a lift with PRIVATE ACCESS straight into the apartment, large reception hall, STUNNING OPEN PLAN living/dining/kitchen, two bedrooms with en-suites and dressing areas, a utility r..."
"A fabulous renovation of a former chapel house with gated off road parking for 2 cars, private garden and communal garden of over 0.5 acres."
"Clyst View is an exclusive development of 4 A-Rated modern homes creating stylish and contemporary living positioned on a no-through road on the edge of Exeter, built in 2021. This beautifully presented family home of over 2,500 sq ft of versatile accommodation is currently arranged with 4 bedroo..."
"An ATTRACTIVE 1920's detached house set in grounds of c. HALF AN ACRE with extensive SOUTH FACING LAWNED GARDENS. SUPERB accommodation of 3.133 SQ FT including FIVE BEDROOMS, THREE RECEPTION ROOMS and a large open plan kitchen/breakfast room. GATED ENTRANCE with private drive, ample parking and a..."
"A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO ACQUIRE THESE FOUR 2-BEDROOM APARTMENTS NEAR THE CITY CENT OF EXETER. A BEAUTIFUL GARDE II LISTED PROPERTY IN A GOOD ORDER WITH ALL THE FLATS CURRENTLY TENANTED. Situation The property is located in the lively Cathedral City of Exeter, which offers a rich (cont.)"
"A rare investment opportunity to purchase one of two high quality properties for sale in an exclusive development, which are currently let on long term AST, providing a rental yield of 7.68%. Near the heart of a vibrant city, renowned for culture, leisure, education, health and business facilities"
"A rare and exciting opportunity to acquire this impressive 4 bedroom townhouse forming part of a highly sought after residential development in St Leonards set around a residents' communal green. The spacious three storey property is quietly situated close to local amenities, city centre and just..."
"*£5000 TOWARDS EXTRAS* Plot 86 THE RIPPON AT EQUINOX III - A 2 bedroom semi-detached house with a downstairs cloakroom, kitchen/dining room and separate lounge with double doors leading into the garden. The first floor comprises 2 bedrooms, both featuring en-suites."
"GUEST HOUSE WITH 7 LETTING ROOMS AND SEPARATE OWNERS ACCOMMODATION WITH BEAUTIFUL GARDENS. CITY CENTRE LOCATION WITH FANTASTIC REVIEWS. Situation The property is located in the lively Cathedral City of Exeter, which offers a rich heritage and is a fantastic place to live and work. (cont.)"
"*Guide Price £1,000,000 - £1,250,000* An elegant Victorian detached house offering spacious ADAPTABLE ACCOMMODATION and includes a STUNNING FAMILY ROOM, FIVE BEDROOMS and HOME OFFICE SPACE and ANNEXE POTENTIAL. WALKING DISTANCE from WATERLOO LINE and PINHOE AMENITIES"
"A rare investment opportunity to purchase one of two high quality properties in an exclusive development, which are currently let on long term AST, providing a rental yield of 7.68%. Near the heart of a vibrant city, renowned for culture, leisure, education, sports, health and business facilities"
"Set in a private, gated development this luxury five bedroom detached home with double garage and driveway parking is now available to reserve. Finished to a superior specification throughout, contact our team to find out more.
"
"A beautifully refurbished, late Victorian townhouse with
garaging in a charming crescent close to the city centre. Built in the early 1880s on land that was previously part of the Pennsylvania Park Estate, No. 13 Powderham Crescent is a gorgeous example of a late-Victorian, terraced townhouse. I..."
"A beautifully presented and spacious four bedroom detached property with ANNEX situated on the fringes of the City within close proximity to Alphington Village. The property boasts excellent living accommodation with modern fitted kitchen and bathroom, Master en- suite and dressing room, arge con..."
"Potential 305k per annum income opportunity. Fantastic village location but very central to Exeter, Marsh Barton Trading Estate a stones throw away. Main Building: Currently arranged as a large 12 Bed licensed HMO, could easily provide other residential uses. 5 bed Barn Conversion STPP. ..."
"Forming part of a Grade 11 listed manor house, this superior property boasts an abundance of character and charm throughout with four double bedrooms, a large kitchen/breakfast room, two further reception rooms, and a double garage and study."
BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED & VERY SPACIOUS EXECUTIVE STYLE DETACHED FAMILY HOME This superb modern house was built by David Wilson Homes & occupies a lovely cul de sac position on the outskirts of this popular development. The property has been the subject of various upgrades &a...
"A high specification detached family home, immaculately presented, with 5/6 double bedrooms in a prestigious and private area of St Leonards. The property compromises a fantastic kitchen/diner, lounge, study, 5/6 bedrooms and a large private garden. There is a double garage with a spacious drivew..."
"Greatly extended four double bedroom detached family house, backing onto the golf course on a large level plot of approximately 2900 sq ft.  The house is presented in excellent order throughout, offering spacious and versatile accommodation."
"An excellent opportunity to invest into the lucrative House of Multiple Occupancy market with this 15 Bedroom property achieving 10%+ gross return with an annual income close to £100k per annum. Fully let, licensed and achieving income from this tried and tested HMO which has gone through a ..."
**VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE** STUNNING 2017-BUILT ‘DAVID WILSON’ HOME quietly situated in this popular “new” address just 4 miles from the city centre. LARGE BEAUTIFULLY LANDSCAPED SOUTH WESTERLY ASPECT CORNER PLOT with GREAT ‘FAMILY-SIZE’ ACCOMMODATION i...
"A RARE INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY a property consisting of 9 self-contained one bedroom/studio flats in Exeter City Centre. Sydney Place is a Grade II listed semi-detached building currently producing a yearly gross income of circa. £68,000."
"A very well presented and stylish contemporary five bedroom detached house built in 2013, with spacious and light accommodation, designed as reverse level, offering versatile accommodation, benefitting from ample parking, integral double garage and useful home office/store."
"4/5-BEDROOM MODERN DETACHED PROPERTY IN A QUIET AND SECLUDED SPOT MINUTES FROM TOPSHAM AND EXETER CITY CENTRE. WRAPPED AROUND TERRACE, GOOD SIZE GARDEN AND LUXURIOUS OPEN PLAN LIVING THROUGHOUT. Situation The property is located in the lively Cathedral City of Exeter, which offers (cont.)"
"** CONTACT OUR TEAM TO ARRANGE AN APPOINTMENT ** This stunning, detached four bedroom home is situated within a private, gated development in Exeter, finished to a superior specification throughout."
"A great opportunity to enjoy a secluded, private location within walking distance of the city centre is this delightful 2-story detached house with old-world charm and breath-taking views of Exeter. This 5-bedroom, 2-bathroom home has a 2-car garage-giving you over 2,100 sq. living accommoda (cont.)"
"WE ARE PLEASED TO WELCOME THIS STUNNING ECO-FRIENDLY 4-BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE BUILT IN 2021 WITH THE MOST LUXURIOUS OPEN PLAN LIVING. GOOD SIZE GARDEN, DOUBLE GARAGE AND CLOSE TO ALL LOCAL AMENITIES. Situation The property is located in the lively Cathedral City of Exeter, which of (cont.)"
"** VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE ** BEAUTIFULLY-PRESENTED, ARCHITECTURALLY STRIKING modern detached house on the fringes of the DURYARD VALLEY PARK and the University campus. Offering c.2,500 SQ FT of SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION including STUNNING ATRIUM AREAS and FABULOUS OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINER, p..."
Located in the desirable St Leonards area this characterful 5 bedroom Edwardian townhouse offers spacious accommodation over 3 floors. Front and rear gardens plus parking to the rear
"A rare opportunity to purchase this fantastic investment, producing a potential yield of over 8%, consisting of 8 self-contained one bedroom flats, split between two properties. Situated in Exeter City Centre, Holloway Street is two terraced Grade II listed buildings. The property has a potential..."
A truly exceptional opportunity to acquire an outstanding 5 bedroom detached property in the highly desirable location of Pennsylvania with stunning views across the Duryard Valley and Belvidere Valley Park and beyond towards Dartmoor. This much loved family home dating back to 1920's sits on...
"A rare opportunity to acquire a five bedroom detached property in the desirable village of Clyst St Mary with generous living accommodation including large family/dining room, master en-suite, off road parking for multiple vehicles and enclosed rear garden. EPC C, Council Tax Band F, Freehold."
"A superb six-bedroom semi-detached family home with a fantastic rear garden and panoramic views across Exeter from the second floor. Situated in this elevated position on Dunsford Road, the property offers spacious and versatile accommodation over three floors and retains many period features thr..."
"GUIDE PRICE £775,000-£800,000 A superb home built in 2016, one of just 4 detached properties situated in a level, elevated position close to LOCAL SCHOOLS. Accommodation of 2550 SQ FT includes 19FT SITTING ROOM, office, STYLISH KITCHEN/DINING ROOM, cloakroom, FOUR BEDROOMS, TWO E..."
BEAUTIFULLY-PRESENTED first floor apartment in the PRESTIGIOUS ST. MARGARET’S RESIDENCES development in Exeter’s sought-after ST LEONARDS. Boasting BRIGHT SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION with LARGE TWIN ASPECT LIVING/DINING ROOM; FABULOUS QUALITY BESPOKE KITCHEN;TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS both EN ...
"A charming three storey townhouse on a quiet no-through road in the heart of St. Leonards, with front and rear garden and residents parking."
"A remarkable GRADE II LISTED BUILDING consisting of five UNIQUE LUXURY apartments, situated in one of Exeter's most iconic locations. Five individual apartments featuring STUNNING VIEWS OF EXETER'S HISTORIC CATHEDRAL, LIFT servicing each apartment and ROOF TERRACE to PENTHOUSE apartment."
"Beautifully presented, extended 4 double bedroom family home located in the sought after Village of Alphington. This property has an outdoor entertaining area with bar and hot tub area, a double garage and parking for 6+ cars. "
"A superb three bedroom detached bungalow situated in a sought after cul de sac position in Alphington with good size living accommodation, front and rear gardens and double garage. The property is within close proximity to local shop, supermarket, post office, public house and main commuter links..."
"GUIDE PRICE £725,000-£750,000 A superbly presented 4 BEDROOM DETACHED family home with a good-sized SOUTH WESTERLY facing landscaped rear garden & FAR-REACHING VIEWS to the Haldon Hills. Quiet cul-de-sac close to Exeter City Centre & UNIVERSITY. Sitting Room, SPACIOUS KI..."
"We are delighted to bring to market this stunning period property that is bursting with character. This delightful home has 2 reception rooms, 4 double bedrooms and is positioned on a large plot. The kitchen/diner is the hub of this house with beautifully modern fitted kitchen, exposed beams, han..."
"** VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE ** A SUBSTANTIAL FAMILY HOME within a highly sought after address with RIVER VIEWS and nearby walks. Over 2,500 sq. ft. of accommodation over three floors. PERIOD FEATURES. Smart KITCHEN/BREAKFAST room, plus 32ft. sitting room. Private level GARDENS, PARKING for..."
"Internally Arranged To Provide Nine self contained Flats, Comprising Seven x One Bedroom Flats and Two x Studio Flats, Seven Flats subject to on Assured Shorthold Tenancies and Two Flats Vacant, Total GIA of Flats approximately 245 sq m (2,637 sq ft) , Close to Exeter University and the City Cent..."
"A beautifully presented five-bedroom detached family home situated within the picturesque Duryard Valley just moments from the University Campus and within easy reach of Exeter City Centre. The property sits on a generous plot with gardens to the front, side, and rear and is located on a private ..."
"*Guide Price £700,000 - £725,000* IMMACULATELY-PRESENTED, SPACIOUS DETACHED CHALET BUNGALOW in the favoured ST LEONARDS district. Enjoying a LEVEL PRIVATE GARDENS, GARAGE and OFF-ROAD PARKING. Offering THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS, THREE BATHROOMS, LARGE ‘L’-SHAPED LIVING/D..."
Potential development site (Subject to Planning) on the edge of Exeter. c.4 acre site that currently has a bungalow and a range of disused agricultural buildings. Offers are invited subject to planning or for an outright sale with an uplift if planning is achieved. 
"SPACIOUS, EXTENSIVELY IMPROVED and IMMACULATELY PRESENTED modern detached house – tucked-away on the fringes of the University campus and the DURYARD VALLEY PARK. Offering GREAT LIVING SPACE including FABULOUS OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM. Good-size garden plus DOUBLE GARAGE and parking fo..."
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire this eight bedroom terraced property set in a great City Centre location perfect for local amenities. Let for the 2023/24 academic year based on a 48 week contract. The property briefly comprises Eight Bedrooms with sink or en suite, Two Bathrooms, Lounge, Kitch..."
Zero Carbon Smart Homes are coming to Pinhoe - contact us now to register your interest! Introducing Nexa Fields - a zero carbon oasis nestled between the bustling streets of Exeter and rolling Devon countryside.
"A stunning four bedroom detached house in this ever popular development on the fringes of Exeter. Having recently been completely refurbished this beautiful house combines all of the modern luxuries with an enviable setting on the outskirts of the City, close to the surrounding countryside and be..."
"An elegant Grade II Listed GEORGIAN TOWNHOUSE situated within HALF A MILE of the CITY CENTRE. Offering ADAPTABLE ACCOMMODATION with HOMEWORKING SPACE and POTENTIAL FOR ANNEXE. Fabulous sitting room, dining room and kitchen with breakfast room. FOUR/FIVE BEDROOMS, DELIGHTFUL 100FT WALLED REAR GARD..."
"With a RENTAL INCOME of c.£58,000 pa which represents an 8.3% GROSS RETURN on the guide price. 8 Bedrooms, many with en suites and kitchenettes. Within walking distance of the Quay and the city centre, close to local amenities and public transport."
"One of Three HIGH QUALITY RESIDENTIAL HMO INVESTMENT with a RENTAL INCOME of c.£58,000 pa which represents an 8.3% gross return on the guide price. 8 Bedrooms, many with en suites and kitchenettes. FINISHED TO A HIGH STANDARD with solid built-in furniture."
Five bedroom DETACHED home with four DOUBLE bedrooms and a single/STUDY room. Open plan KITCHEN/DINING and FAMILY room and SEPARATE LOUNGE and with INTEGRAL DOUBLE GARAGE
"Stunning FIVE BED DETACHED home, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING/FAMILY area, separate lounge. Four DOUBLE Rooms and 5th STUDY or DOUBLE Room."
"FOUR DOUBLE-BEDROOM DETACHED home with DOUBLE GARAGE. Internally offering a a huge OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING & FAMILY AREA stretching width of property as well as a SEPARATE LOUNGE. The first floor includes TWO EN-SUITE BEDROOMS, with separate FAMILY BATHROOM."
"A very spacious six bedroom licenced student HMO with a contract in place for the current 2022/2023 academic yearproviding an income of £47,190 and a similar figure foreseen for the 2023/2024 academic year, once a contract has been agreed."
A superbly decorated first floor residence in the popular location of Whipton Village with TWO spacious bedrooms and private enclosed rear garden and private balcony. A fantastic first home or potential investment opportunity.
"Situated in the heart of the city centre in Exeter, this development opportunity proposes the formation of eight new two bedroom apartments on the High Street."
"Guide Price £650,000- £675,000 - This is a beautiful 5 bedroom Georgian semi-detached home that is situated in an ideal spot and is within easy walking distance of the city centre, RD&E, the university, well regarded schools and Waitrose The property benefits from a lounge, a dining room, a kitch..."
"A very well-presented six bedroom licenced student HMO with a contract in place for the current 2022/2023 academic yearproviding an income of £40,062 and a contract agreed for the 2023/2024 academic year for £42,900 over that period."
"FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOME featuring TWO EN-SUITE BEDROOMS, SEPARATE LOUNGE AND SNUG, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM and an INTEGRAL DOUBLE GARAGE."
"*Video tour available* A STUNNING five/six bedroom semi-detached Grade II listed family home located in Countess Wear. Only a short walk to the river, local pub, public transport links, M5 commuter links and easy access to the City Centre, Topsham and surrounding areas. The property i..."
"A 4-BEDROOM DETACHED HOME SET IN THE PEACEFUL AND SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION OF WINSLADE PARK ON THE OUTSKIRTS OF EXETER. DOUBLE GARAGE WITH AMPLE OF PARKING, LARGE GARDENS AND 3 RECEPTION ROOMS. Situation Clyst St Mary's location means that it is in an ideal position to access the surr (cont.)"
"IS THIS ARGUABLY THE BEST HOUSE ON THE STREET? Fantastic, five bedroom detached house with private drive, double garage and large enclosed garden, located in the popular Clyst Heath area. The entire plot spans over 2,400 sqft with the potential to extend further. "
"An opportunity to acquire a well proportioned detached family home located within this highly sought after residential area within close proximity to local amenities, university, popular school and city centre. Occupying a larger than average site with good size enclosed rear garden. Four bedr..."
DETACHED FOUR BEDROOM home with OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/LIVING AREA and a SEPARATE LOUNGE. Also boasts a SEPARATE UTILITY and an EN-SUITE to the master bedroom.
"If you’re looking for a spacious, beautifully finished, sophisticated, unique home, this 5-bed house is definitely worth a look. At approximately 1421 square feet, this spacious property is full of potential, and period features, and is perfect for growing families or anyone looking for a little"
"OPEN HOUSE SATURDAY 18TH MARCH - CALL TO BOOK IN! *Guide Price £600,000 - £625,000* A fabulous 1920's built INDIVIDUAL DETACHED HOUSE enjoying a PRIVATE and SECLUDED POSITION. Arranged over three floors with TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, spacious kitchen/breakfast room and cons..."
This stunning DETACHED BUNGALOW represents an extremely RARE OPPORTUNITY to buy a spacious property in this very sought after quiet location of Campion Meadows. The property provides good access to local amenities including popular schools and major link roads and provides stunning views of Ludwe...
"VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE *Guide Price £600,000 - £650,000* A superb FAMILY SIZED detached house enjoying a SECLUDED LOCATION WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE OF ST. PETERS HIGH SCHOOL. Well presented accommodation includes entrance hallway, cloakroom, large sitting room, FABULOUS E..."
"Coming Soon! A modern FIVE BEDROOM town house in the heart of this sought after development, CLOSE TO THE CITY CENTRE, ROYAL DEVON & EXETER HOSPITAL and a choice of PRIMARY & SECONDARY SCHOOLS. SOUTH WEST facing lawned garden with patio. Garage."
"Beautifully-presented ENERGY EFFICIENT three bedroom townhouse home situated in prestigious St Margaret's Residences, St Leonards. STYLISH INTEGRATED KITCHEN & living area with doors to pretty rear garden. PRIMARY SUITE with EN SUITE, two further bedrooms and family bathroom. PRIVATE PARKING ..."
CONFIDENTIAL LISTING - Investment Property in Central Exeter. A block of 4 x one bedroom flats and Ground Floor Retail Unit. Compliant & Licensed with Exeter City Council. Please quote Ref number LH1000 when contacting the office.
"*Guide Price £600,000 - £650,000* IMPRESSIVE EXTENSIVELY IMPROVED AND EXTENDED detached house in a FINE ELEVATED POSITION with STUNNING FAR REACHING VALLEY PARK VIEWS. Boasting FABULOUS 26’ X 21’ OPEN-PLAN LIVING/FAMILY ROOM with FULL HEIGHT FULL WIDTH WINDOWS AND SLI..."
"A fabulous four bedroom detached family home situated in a sought after position in Alphington presented to a very high standard with modern fitted kitchen, bathroom and conservatory. The property benefits from good size living accommodation, enclosed rear garden, off road parking and a garage. E..."
"GUIDE PRICE £600,000 - £625,000. An IMMACULATE FAMILY HOME located at Seabrook Orchards only a short walk to THE CENTRE OF TOPSHAM, with 4 good sized bedrooms, OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM, LOVELY LEVEL GARDEN and LARGE GARAGE with DRIVEWAY PARKING in front for 3 cars. EER 'B'."
"An opportunity to purchase this exceptional early Victorian link attached house, which has been extended and enhanced to a very high standard, perfect for family living and home working."
"8 Bed licensed HMO Revenue circa £50,000 PA, EPC exempt, HMO licence for 10 persons. Likely rent increase possible to £55,000 P/A+ Well positioned for shoping and transport routes, close to Riverside leisure centre and the Quay. Potential to increase rents to 55k+ P/a. Potential to extend ..."
VERY SPACIOUS MODERN DETACHED HOUSE WITH ANNEXE POTENTIAL Situated in a little known location at the end of a long private driveway is this substantial modern detached house. The property offers very versatile accommodation and could be used as up to 7 bedrooms if necessary. There ...
"A spacious and well presented four/five bedroom family home situated in the sought after location of Alphington and positioned on a good size corner plot. This lovely home boasts a master en-suite, kitchen diner, conservatory, enclosed rear garden, off road parking, garage with workshop and car p..."
An impressive two bedroom apartment situated in the heart of the highly regarded St. Leonard's area of Exeter.
*PRESTIGE LOCATION* DETACHED*4 BEDROOMS WITH MASTER EN-SUITE*GENEROUS SIZE LOUNGE*SPACIOUS MODERN KITCHEN*DINING ROOM/STUDY*CLOAK ROOM*FAMILY BATHROOM*FULLY ENCLOSED GARDEN WITH LARGE PATIO*DOUBLE GARAGE WITH ELECTRIC DOORS*DRIVEWAY* This immaculately presented four bedroom detached ...
"HMO INVESTMENT CLOSE TO THE CITY CENTRE WITH SEPARATE APARTMENTS, GOOD ORDER THROUGHOUT. PARKING AND A GARDEN. Situation The property is located in the lively Cathedral City of Exeter, which offers a rich heritage and is a fantastic place to live and work. It is a thriving City wit (cont.)"
"Cooksleys are proud to bring to the market this fine example of a detached family home in popular Newcourt, with fantastic transport links to the M5, A30 and Newcourt Train Station. The flexible living accommodation comprises of Entrance Hall, Dining Room, Lounge, Large kitchen/Living Area, Utili..."
"An excellent opportunity to acquire the freehold of this attractive period property situated in this prime location. The four storey property is split, with a ground floor retail unit, currently trading as a bakery/cafe. Whilst the first, second and third floors, form the living accommodation. "
"***ONLY 1 APARTMENT REMAINING*** ONE OF THE BEST VIEWS IN THE CITY overlooking the RIVER EXE, Exeter’s historic quayside and Cathedral. SPECTACULAR, RESTORED GRADE II LISTED PENTHOUSE apartment with ROOFTOP TERRACE. Offering two large Bedrooms, luxurious Bathroom, STYLISH Kitchen..."
"A stunning 3-bedroom townhouse in a prestigious location benefitting from regular transport links. This beautifully maintained residence offers high ceilings, large bay windows and plenty of natural light with several period features. The property has been tastefully refurbished throughout and i..."
"*BEING SOLD VIA MODERN METHOD OF SALE and with no onward chain* see bottom of description for more details. A fantastic opportunity to acquire this beautifully presented three bedroom detached home in a very quiet, popular location in Pennsylvania. Only a short distance frSom the Unive..."
"STUNNING IMMACULATELY PRESENTED CONCIERGE SERVICED ground floor city centre apartment. With COMMUNAL GARDEN, GYM and “CLUB ROOM” plus PARKING. Offering GREAT LIVING SPACE with LARGE RECEPTION HALL, STYLISH KITCHEN/DINING ROOM, TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS, TWO LUXURIOUS BATHROOMS. A real &ldq..."
SPACIOUS DOUBLE BAY FRONTED detached house on a LARGE LEVEL GARDEN PLOT with DEVELOPMENT POTENTIAL (STP) on the edge of the popular PINHOE VILLAGE just 2.5 miles from the city centre. GREAT “FAMILY-SIZE” accommodation including 25’X18’ LIVING ROOM and GOOD-SIZE BEDROOMS pl...
Haldon Road is a substantial end of terrace home which has been with the current owners for some considerable period. The property is in need of some modernisation but provides a large family home but could be easily converted - subject to planning to create a separate downstairs apartment. The ...
"A substantial six-bedroom HMO investment opportunity for sale in Mount Pleasant, let for the current academic year. The property will generate an income of £41,580 for the current academic year (inclusive of bills) and has been relet for the 2023/2024 academic year for the same amount, exclusive ..."
A modern townhouse with four bedrooms and a delightful garden situated in the highly sought after suburb of St Leonards. This property is offered for sale chain free.
"DETACHED FOUR BEDROOM family home. TRADITIONAL ARCHITECTURE with SPACIOUS OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING & LIVING AREA including a SEPARATE LOUNGE & UTILITY, plus EN-SUITE to the master bedroom along with two further doubles and a single bedroom and FAMILY BATHROOM."
"ATTENTION INVESTORS! A student investment property with a 6 person HMO license in the Mount Pleasant area, with a fantastic rental history. The property has been well looked after and meets all the up to date requirements. The property is being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"A rare opportunity to acquire a fabulous Redrow built detached family home located within a highly desirable select cul-de-sac of 14 similar homes providing great access to local amenities, countryside walks and major link roads. Spacious and very well presented living accommodation. Three goo..."
"ARE YOU LOOKING FOR A STYLISH HOME, LOCATED ON THE EDGE OF TOPSHAM? This exceptional home has been custom-designed at build stage, to make this arguably one of the best homes in the area! This stunning home benefits from south west facing garden & upgraded double garage."
"The Lutyen -a spectacular family home with five bedrooms and fantastic flexible family spaces is for many, simply, a dream home.
Enter the hallway and find the open plan kitchen/dining area to your left, the study and living room to your right, and the downstairs cupboard and cloakr..."
AIR B&B TOWNHOUSE in EXETER close to an excellent range of local amenities. Presently arranged to provide 6 EN-SUITE ROOMS and potential to convert the LIVING ROOM. OFF-ROAD PARKING FOR TWO CARS.
"A stunning 5/6 Bedroom Detached home, with TWO En suite bathrooms, modern throughout with a fantastic garage used currently as a gym."
"A stunning three bedroom extended semi-detached family home, situated in the very sought after location of St. Leonards. The property is within walking distance of Magdalen Road shops, Exeter city centre, the Royal Devon and Exeter Hospital, County Hall and Exeter Quay. The property benefits from..."
"EXCITED TO BRING TO MARKET THIS STUNNING 4 BEDROOM DETACHED property in a highly sought after location. A quiet secluded cul de sac in the catchment area for St. Peters school with Clyst Heath Nursery and Primary across the road, An unsequestered garden to be enjoyed all year round."
2 Celtic Close is a superbly presented and spacious executive style four-bedroom detached house built by David Wilson Homes. Situated in a quiet and exclusive feeling development in the sought after location of Monkerton this is a superb family home.
"This property is for sale by Modern Method of Auction powered by iamsold LTD - Starting Bid £000,000 plus Reservation Fee. 2 COMMERCIAL UNITS, 1x3 BED FLAT, 2x1 BED FLATS NEAR THE CITY CENTRE OF EXETER. GOOD ORDER THROUGHOUT AND WOULD MAKE AN IDEAL INVESTMENT. £40,000 A YEAR INCOME WITH P (cont.)"
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire this magnificent 4 bedroom family home, located in a prestigious cul-de-sac of similarly glorious houses. The property compromises of an unusually large landscaped garden, garage and spacious driveway.
"
"** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £305,000 ** : A deceptively spacious mid terraced family home occupying a highly convenient position providing access to local amenities, Exeter city centre and Topsham. Good decorative order throughout. Three bedrooms. First floor bathroom. Reception hall..."
"A superb 3 double bedroom detached bungalow in sought after residential area within easy reach of main transport links and regular bus service to and from the city centre. Built just three years ago, this spacious and beautifully appointed property stands in a level plot and offers excellent acco..."
"This spacious and well presented five bedroom town house sits in the heart of the prestigious Horseguards development, a former cavalry barracks which was redeveloped in 2000. On the ground floor the accommodation comprises Entrance Hall, Dining Room, Kitchen, Utility Room, Cloakroom and Integral..."
Detached Garage with Long Private Driveway for 3 Cars * Spacious Open Plan Kitchen/Dining/Family Area with a Feature Bay Window and Island * French Doors Leading to the Garden from both the Kitchen and Lounge * Separate Study Room * Utility Cupboard * Four Double Bedrooms * Master Bedroom with...
"A beautifully presented four bedroom detached property with good size living accommodation, modern fitted kitchen, conservatory, well maintained front and rear gardens, off road parking and integral garage. This wonderful property is well positioned in a popular residential area of Alphington and..."
THREE BEDROOM HOME with and EN-SUITE TO EACH along with a WALK-IN DRESSING ROOM to the master. Ground floor boasts an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM along with SEPARATE UTILITY and CLOAKS ROOM as well as a SEPARATE LOUNGE and INTEGRAL GARAGE.
"Built by Redrow Homes, this well-proportioned four bedroom family home features a 25' kitchen-family room with patio doors leading out onto a south-west facing garden to the rear. There is a large single garage and a driveway providing off-road parking for up to 3 cars. Built to a high specificat..."
An opportunity to acquire a recently Redrow built detached family home (Oxford lifestyle) occupying a fabulous cul-de-sac position with south facing landscaped rear garden. Spacious living accommodation. Presented in superb decorative order throughout. Three double bedrooms. Three ensuite show...
"A substantial sized property with the potential for multiple dwellings situated in a central location with easy access to Exeter University and City Centre. This property benefits from 4/5 bedrooms and a garage at the rear, being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN!"
"GUIDE PRICE £525,000 - £550,000 WOULD YOU LIKE TO LIVE IN THE HEART OF THE CITY CENTRE, IN A BEAUTIFUL PERIOD HOME? An elegant home boasting an open plan living space, modern fitted kitchen, four good size bedrooms and basement."
"A beautifully presented mid-terrace home located in one of the most sought after residential areas in Exeter. This bright and spacious property has been updated by the current owners creating a warm and welcoming home. The layout of accommodation includes 3 double bedrooms, sitting room with an ..."
•ELIGIBLE FOR GREEN MORTGAGES •SOLAR PANELS (OWNED) •FANTASTIC EPC RATING : B - 91 / A - 92 POTENTIAL •4 Double Bedrooms •Strong Transport Links •Double Garage + 2 Additional Off-Road Spaces •No Onward Chain
An opportunity to acquire a deceptively spacious six bedroom detached family home offering well proportioned living accommodation arranged over three floors. Reception hall. Well proportioned sitting room. Dining room. Modern kitchen. Good size utility room. Ground floor cloakroom. uPVC double...
"Guide Price £525,000 - A well presented 5 bedroom detached modern home that is situated in the popular Newcourt development. The property benefits from a lounge, a dining room, a kitchen/breakfast room, a w/c, a bathroom, an en-suite shower room, a garage and an enclosed garden."
"A superb four-bedroom end-of-terrace townhouse located within the popular residential development of Gras Lawn. The property offers convenient access to the Royal Devon & Exeter Hospital, City Centre, Exeter's Historic Quayside, and a regular bus service. Being sold with no onward chain,..."
A well appointed Redrow built detached family home offering well proportioned living accommodation whilst presented in superb decorative order throughout. Four good size bedrooms. Ensuite shower room to master bedroom. Family bathroom. Reception hall. Sitting room. Well proportioned open plan ...
"FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED home, with spacious KITCHEN/DINING Room & SEPARATE lounge, ENSUITE to main room, FAMILY BATHROOM and with INETGRAL SINGLE GARAGE"
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase The Oxford, a 4 bed detached Heritage Redrow family home, in a woodland setting on a private brick paved road within the sought after Saxon Brook development of Westclyst. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, bay fronted dual aspect living room, beautiful..."
"A stylish top floor apartment situated in a prestigious building in the heart of Exeter. This bright and spacious apartment of over 1,000 sq ft has wonderful views towards the Haldon Hills and a delightful south-east facing balcony. The layout of accommodation provides a substantial open plan liv..."
"A substantial five-bedroom, two bathroom townhouse set over four levels in Exeter city centre with a private rear garden and excellent potential for a large city centre home or conversion for an investor/developer."
"A well-proportioned three bedroom family home located in a tucked away position in Countess Wear. The property features a generous garden to the rear incorporating a home office/studio and there is also a single garage with parking in front. Internally, the accommodation briefly consists of an en..."
"A stunning and beautifully presented four bedroom detached family home in the popular location of Westclyst with great local amenities. The versatile accommodation comprises Entrance Hall, Lounge, Kitchen/diner, Utility Room, Snug, Cloakroom, Four First Floor Double Bedrooms (includes two en-suit..."
"****COMING SOON**** A beautifully designed two bedroom GROUND FLOOR apartment, nestled in the heart of Exeter City within close proximity to ST LEONARDS. Offering a HIGH SPECIFICATION kitchen with integrated appliances, two DOUBLE bedrooms, RIVATE GARDEN and ALLOCTED PARKING with EV ch..."
"With PROTECTED COUNTRYSIDE views and SOUTH FACING garden, this superb FOUR DOUBLE bedroom detached family home is presented in IMMACULATE condition and is within EASY REACH of the City Centre. Also on offer is a GARAGE and driveway PARKING."
"GUIDE PRICE £500,000 - £550,000 Planning Consent for c.1750sqft Barn Conversion as a 4 bedroom home with PARKING and GARDEN. Set in approx. ONE AND A QUARTER ACRES situated in a picturesque countryside location only 10 minutes from EXETER CITY CENTRE. Separate large barn ..."
"SPACIOUS c.1650 SQ FT MODERN detached “FAMILY-SIZE” home in a favoured address close to HEAVITREE PARK, COMMUNITY HUB and “VILLAGE” AMENITIES. 22’ LIVING ROOM and TWO HOME OFFICES. Garage and EXTENSIVE PARKING. EXECUTOR SALE. ."
 OVER 1500 SQFT...A handsome three / four bedroom family home located on a large plot with generous front and rear gardens. This is the first time the property has come to the market in over 40 years and is a property that is not to be missed. NO ONWARD CHAIN. 
"A delightful period town house situated in this prestigious area of St Leonards. The accommodation is well appointed throughout and comprises entrance vestibule, hall, open plan living room/dining room, large recently fitted kitchen/breakfast room, three bedrooms, family bathroom, ensuite and add..."
South-West Facing Rear Garden * Large Master Bedroom Complete with En suite and a Large Shower Enclosure *Main Bathroom has a Separate Bath and Shower * Open Plan Kitchen Dining Area with French Doors Leading to the Garden * Utility Cupboard * 3 Double Bedrooms * Large Storage Cupboard
"A four bedroom detached property situated in a cul de sac position within the popular and sought after location of Alphington. The property boasts good size living accommodation, conservatory, front and rear gardens, off road parking and a garage. EER 'D', Council Tax Band E, Freehold."
"GUIDE PRICE £500,000-£550,000 FABULOUS GREATLY EXTENDED AND EXTENSIVELY IMPROVED semi-detached house in the heart of Pinhoe village. Offering almost 2,000 SQ FT of VERSATILE ACCOMMODATION including STUNNING 25’ KITCHEN/DINING/FAMILY ROOM plus SUPERB MASTER BEDROOM SUITE. Po..."
"PLOT 39 THE OAKMONT - 4 bedroom detached home featuring garage with 2 parking spaces, kitchen/dining room, separate utility room, downstairs W/C and cloakroom as well as study. The first floor benefits from master bedroom with en-suite, bedrooms 2, 3, 4 & separate bathroom. *Flooring included - T&C'"
"Crossways Lodge is a unique detached home located on the Topsham Road at Countess Wear, backing onto Exeter's Golf and Country Club. This stone lodge is believed to date back to the early 1800s with later additions arranged with 3 double bedrooms, sitting room, dining area, kitchen, conservatory,..."
Traditional double fronted 4 bedroom home with substantial accommodation for growing families or couples in search of extra space.
"A fabulous much improved and extended detached family home with fine outlook and views over neighbouring area, countryside and beyond. Presented in superb decorative order throughout. Four bedrooms. Family bathroom. Reception hall. Cloakroom. Kitchen. Lounge/dining room. Light and spacious sit..."
"A charming 4 bedroom Victorian townhouse, nestled on the quiet residential street of Elmside Close. The terraced property is situated in the very convenient location close to the city cente. 4 bedrooms, sitting room, kitchen/breakfast room, garden room, Two bath/shower rooms and good sized sout..."
South-West Facing Rear Garden * Detached Garage and Private Driveway * Stunning Open Plan Kitchen/Dining/Family Area * Spacious Lounge with a Feature Bay Window * Utility Cupboard off the Hallway * Master Bedroom with Fitted Wardrobes and En Suite * Main Bathroom with Separate Shower and Bath
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this rare opportunity to purchase this unique four bedroom detached family home, offering a range of exceptional features including four good sized bedrooms, master with en-suite, two reception rooms, a superb open plan kitchen/diner, sitting on a sub..."
An opportunity to acquire a spacious much improved and modernised detached chalet style bungalow. Presented in superb decorative order throughout. Three bedrooms. Large ensuite shower room to master bedroom. Spacious reception hall. Ground floor cloakroom. Modern kitchen/dining room. Large sit...
South-West Facing Garden * 2 Double Bedroom Bungalow with Integral Garage * Great position on a new phase at Pinhoe * French Doors Leading off both the Kitchen/Diner and Living Room * Separate Utility Cupboard * Large en suite to Master Bedroom * Large rear garden * Personnel Door leading from th...
"A fabulous detached family home, with a modern kitchen/dining room, generous living room, four bedrooms, two en-suites, a garage, parking and an enclosed rear garden, with a pleasant parkland outlook, in a quiet position in the city of Exeter."
"Underhill Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this spacious three/four bedroom link detached chalet bungalow in St Thomas, Exeter. Beautifully decorated and recently modernised this fantastic family home boasts a large, modern kitchen-diner and conservatory creating a wonderful fam..."
"A fantastic three/four bedroom semi detached family home situated in a popular and desirable area of Higher St Thomas with good size living accommodation, bedrooms with balconies, well maintained gardens to the front and the rear, off road parking and a garage. EPC D, Council Tax Band D, Freehold."
"A stunningly presented 3 bedroom detached bungalow having been the subject of a complete makeover in recent years to the highest quality and finish. With superb modern landscaped gardens facing due south, and in a slightly elevated position, these enjoy some lovely views whilst at the front of the"
Situated within HEAVITREE is this unique opportunity of buying a THREE BEDROOM home with a ONE BEDROOM BASEMENT APARTMENT currently rented and achieving income! A GREAT BUY for someone looking for a property with the prospect of supplement their income. Excellent location for the ROYAL DEVON &...
SUPERB EXTENDED 4-BEDROOMED 1930'S SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME This very spacious family home is situated in a quiet cul de sac within this very popular area. The house is being sold for the first time in well over 25 years & has undergone many improvements. There is an impressiv...
"A beautiful spacious three bed 1930's semi-detached property, with all the character and charm you would expect from a property of this period. Located on a quiet road off Topsham Road the property is ideally located with great transport links to the city, to the RD&E and to the M5/A30 corrid..."
EXTENDED 4-BEDROOMED MODERN FAMILY HOME IN SOUGHT AFTER AREA This very well presented house has been the subject of many improvements by the current owners including the addition of a 2 storey extension to the side. The property is located in a very desirable area close to both the...
"Located in the sought after area of Duryards in Pennsylvania, this four/five bedroom detached house offers considerable potential. The property briefly comprises a lounge / dining room, fitted kitchen, four/five bedrooms, two bathrooms and cloakroom. To the rear of the property is a low-mainten..."
"***OPEN DAY EVENT SATURDAY 18th MARCH***Strictly appointment bookings only. GUIDE PRICE £475,000-£500,000
Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this newly built four bedroom detached family home, originally constructed by Taylor Wimpey in 2022, offering a range of exceptional features in..."
"Guide Price £475,000 to £500,000 - A stunning 3 double bedroom Penthouse apartment that is situated in a central sought-after location. The property benefits from a lift giving direct access straight into the apartment, a large open plan lounge/kitchen/dining room, en-suite, bathroom and parking...."
"An immaculately presented four-bedroom detached house with landscaped gardens, located on the modern Taylor Wimpey development of Mayfield Gardens. The property is well-placed for access to well-regarded local primary and secondary schools, the major road network surrounding the city, and Pinhoe ..."
"Wonderful four bedroom detached property in an extremely sought after location. Boasting a recently fitted bathroom and modern kitchen/ breakfast room. Decorated neutrally throughout and with its large windows light continually floods in, off road parking for multiple cars, a garage and close pro..."
The Grainger is the perfect 4 bedroom family home. The ground floor has a beautiful kitchen/dining area with French doors leading out to the garden and in addition there is a large separate living room with the stunning feature of a bay window. On the 1st floor Bedroom 1 has its own en...
Open plan kitchen/dining/family area that spans the entire back of the home featuring a large bay window and French doors to the garden * Separate utility area off the hallway * Spacious living room with large windows * Garage and driveway * Master bedroom with en suite and fitted wardrobes*
"A beautifully presented much improved and modernised detached family home located within this highly sought after residential development within close proximity to local amenities, Digby railway station and major link roads. Four bedrooms. Refitted ensuite shower room to master bedroom. Refitt..."
"A spacious four bedroom detached family home with far-reaching views, situated in the popular residential area of Exwick. The property boasts gardens to the front and rear, along with a garage accessed via the garden, and a driveway allowing off-road parking. The well-presented internal accommoda..."
FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED home with OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING FAMILY area and a SEPARATE LOUNGE and an EN-SUITE MASTER BEDROOM.
"This beautifully presented four bedroom family home is in show home condition throughout. The property is situated within easy access to Exeter City Centre with the wealth of amenities on offer within the City centre, schools nearby to cater for all ages, University, R&D Hospital and local sh..."
"*** Guide price £450,000 to £500,000 *** On the open market for the first time in many years this is a rare opportunity to buy an elegant Edwardian 5 bedroom town house which has wonderfully spacious accommodation and numerous period features all with fantastic scope for updating, ren..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market a rare opportunity to purchase a six-bedroom Victorian terraced home with original features. Situated on the popular Polsloe Road, the property is in a sought-after location and is close to the beautiful Centre of Exeter with its excellent offering of..."
"This is a rare opportunity to acquire a link detached home on the edge of Exeter City Centre, in close proximity to the high street and also the university. The property has three double bedrooms including one en-suite room on the first floor, three reception rooms, a kitchen and bathroom. The pr..."
"A well presented detached family home situated in this highly sought after residential development providing good access to local amenities, Royal Devon & Exeter hospital and city centre. Three good size bedrooms. Ensuite shower room to master bedroom. Family bathroom. Entrance hall. Sitti..."
A detached bungalow with a large south garden of approx. 0.42 acres and outstanding views across the beautiful Duryard Valley. Detailed planning permission to demolish the existing property and construct a substantial contemporary detached house.
"ARE YOU LOOKING FOR A FAMILY HOME IN ST LEONARDS, WITH THE CITY CENTRE JUST A STONES THROW AWAY? A fantastic opportunity to acquire a substantial three bedroom home, in an excellent location. This homely property has a wonderful feel to it and must be seen."
SPACIOUS DOUBLE FRONTED EDWARDIAN DETACHED HOUSE This very spacious attractive red brick detached house is being sold for the first time in over 60 years. The property is now in need of modernisation but retains many original features & would make a wonderful family home. 
A stylish purpose built first floor apartment situated in a popular gated development next to Exeter quayside. Spacious open plan lounge/dining room. Modern kitchen. Reception hall. Double bedroom. Bathroom. Electric heating. uPVC double glazing. Private and secure underground car parking spac...
Beautifully presented 3 double bedroom family home located in the sought after Bishops Court estate. This property has an additional conservatory at the back and has access to the garage from the garden. There is parking for cars.
"A beautifully presented 1930's semi-detached family home with a superb rear garden and private driveway. The property is located between Pinhoe and Westclyst, with Pinhoe's wide range of amenities on offer in Pinhoe village such as a Spar Shop, Pharmacy, Public House, Butchers, and eateries, all ..."
A stunning FOUR bedroom DETACHED residence by the popular developer LINDEN HOMES with GARAGE & OFF ROAD PARKING.
"DETACHED 3 Bed BUNGALOW with TWO DOUBLE ROOMS with ENSUITE TO main room & a further SINGLE bedroom or STUDY room, KITCHEN DINING ROOM and spacious SEPARATE LOUNGE, also offers GARAGE and REAR GARDEN."
7 Collins Road is a spacious three bedroom detached house with huge potential located in the sought after area of Pennsylvania. The property benefits from a generous garden and superb far reaching views and is being offered to market with no onward chain. 
"Guide price £425,000-£450,000 This deceptively large property is nestled in a wonderful location within walking distance of the city centre, it boasts three double bedrooms, an extended open plan family kitchen dining space along with a large lounge area and so very much more the property has bee..."
"NEW TO THE MARKET! Plot 37 The Tavy is a fantastic brand new, detached home featuring four spacious bedrooms (master en-suite), garage, allocated parking and popular south facing garden with the facility for outdoor hosting. *Flooring included - T&C's apply"
VERY SPACIOUS 4 BEDROOMED SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME This superb semi-detached house is situated in a very popular location towards the end of Topsham Road on the City outskirts. The property has been very well maintained by the current vendors & has been the subject of extens...
"GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000 - A deceptively large detached property with landscaped gardens surrounding. A stunning kitchen diner with elevated views over the gardens. Three great sized bedrooms, character features and potential for a home office. Also having driveway and garage. Easy access ..."
VERY SPACIOUS 5 BEDROOMED SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE This superb family home is situated in a very convenient and popular location just a short distance from the RD&E hospital. The property has undergone many improvements including a substantial loft conversion which creates 2 additio...
STUDENT INVESTMENT - Situated within the ARTICLE 4 DIRECTION and Managed by STAR since 2012 is this FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM STUDENT Home. Potential to create into a Licensed FIVE bedroom HMO subject to the relevant planning constraints. EPC D. 
"A beautifully presented and extended three bedroom semi detached property situated in a popular residential area of St Thomas with open plan living, modern fitted kitchen, delightful rear garden, off road parking and a a garage. The property is within close proximity to local schools, shops and m..."
"GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000 3D VIRTUAL TOUR AVAILABLE - A superb FIVE bedroom family home, in the popular location of HEAVITREE being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"A fantastic four double bedroom detached property, situated in a quiet cul de sac in Broadfields. There is large living accommodation, off road parking and a landscaped south west facing garden."
A brand new bespoke top quality detached 3 bedroom chalet bungalow just finished and available for immediate occupation with level modest gardens and parking for two vehicles in a very convenient tucked away position in a very well regarded location in Pinhoe.
"A beautifully presented and recently renovated family home, offered with no onward chain, situated within an established and desirable residential location to the northeast of the city centre of Exeter."
"THE RIPLEY is a stunning 3 storey 5 bedroom family home. Featuring a large kitchen/dining area with French doors out to the garden and in addition, a separate spacious living room, it really accommodates the whole family. There is also a downstairs cloakroom for convenience. To the 1st..."
"Cooksleys are proud to present this superb penthouse apartment located in a most convenient City Centre location. The apartment comes with stunning views over the City, Quayside and beyond - prime location with a parking space. The accommodation comprises Communal Entrance, Hallway, Lounge, Dinin..."
"The Leverton is a beautiful double fronted 4 bedroom family home. Featuring a spacious living room with French doors leading to the garden, a large open plan kitchen/dining area and a study, it really accommodates the whole family. In addition, there is a utility and downstairs cloakro..."
"This attractive, well presented 3 STOREY TOWN-HOUSE has a SUPERB TOP FLOOR BEDROOM with dressing room & EN SUITE, ideally situated close to NEWCOURT RAILWAY STATION. Sitting room, open plan kitchen/dining room, THREE BEDROOMS, GARAGE, parking & gardens."
"A beautifully presented and extended three bedroom detached property situated in the popular residential area of Higher St Thomas with fantastic views over parts of the City. The property boasts a stunning open plan kitchen, modern bathroom, off road parking and charming enclosed rear garden. EER D."
" A TRULY UNIQUE AND VERSATILE PROPERTY... Currently, a modern three bedroom end of terraced family home, with a one bedroom self contained ANNEX, with a rental income of £750 PCM or could be a very generous four bedroom family home. "
"A well-presented four-bedroom terraced house in a sought after quiet cul-de-sac location, conveniently near to Heavitree’s comprehensive shopping centre, pleasure park, Ladysmith Primary School, St Sidwell's Point Leisure Centre, Waitrose and Royal Devon and Exeter Hospital. Walking distance to t..."
"A well modernised and spacious 3 bedroomed semi-detached house with striking open-plan kitchen/diner and an excellent attic room served by a staircase and offering fashionable home office/studio space, playroom or teenager's lounge area. This impressive family sized home also boasts a separate ut..."
A fantastic QUAYSIDE property with SOUTH facing garden being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN.
"A well presented three bedroom semi detached property situated within close proximity to Heavitree Shops, RD&E Hospital, Heavitree Park and main commuter links. The property benefits from good size living accommodation, good size enclosed garden and off road parking. EPC C, Council Tax Band D..."
"Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000. New to the market is this beautifully presented three bedorom detached property in Cowley. Close to local amenities, farm shop, public transport links and only a short walk to the university. The property comprises of a light and airy living/dini..."
"A spacious and well presented four double bedroom semi-detached family home situated in a popular location only a short walk away from Topsham. The ground floor boasts fantastic accommodation comprising entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, family room, kitchen/breakfast room, utili..."
"A beautifully presented two bedroom bungalow elevated from the road and offering fantastic living arrangement. The property has parking for several vehicles, south facing gardens, conservatory and a good degree of privacy"
"A well presented family home situated in a sought after development near Topsham and Exeter Golf & Country Club. This bright and spacious property was built in 2015, with a 10 year NHBC Warranty, arranged with 3 bedrooms, sitting room, kitchen/dining room, utility, family bathroom, master ensuite..."
"An established and well-presented four bedroom student investment property which has a current ten month tenancy in place generating an income of £22,000 for 2022/2023 and a tenancy agreed in principle for the 2023/2024 academic year which would generate £24,200 over an ele..."
"Cooksleys are proud to present this stylish and immaculately presented ground floor apartment located in the heart of highly regarded Pennsylvania. The Grade II* listed property boasts spacious and versatile accommodation comprising of stunningly maintained communal entrance, private entrance hal..."
"3-BEDROOM PROPERTY IN THE HEART OF THE CITY CENTRE. FITTED KITCHEN WITH TWO SEPARATE RECEPTION ROOMS, CHARACTER FEATURES THROUGHOUT AND COURTYARD GARDEN WITH REAR ACCESS. Situation The property is located in the lively Cathedral City of Exeter, which offers a rich heritage and is a (cont.)"
"Guide Price - £400,000 - £425,000. This is an amazing 4 bedroom semi-detached property located in the popular residential area of Pinhoe boasting easy access into and out of the city, versatile living accommodation and a huge plot including a vast open driveway. The property itself consi..."
"GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £425,000 3D VIRTUAL TOUR AVAILABLE - A superb FOUR bedroom detached family home in the popular road of Roundtable Meet, being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN"
"Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000. Fulfords are very pleased to present this stunning and extended four/five bedroom semi-detached family home in a highly sought after location. Close walking distance to plenty of amenities, shops, schools, the RD&E and frequent public t..."
"Guide Price £400,000-£425,000 This delightful 1930's home has been sympathetically modernised and benefits from a superb open plan kitchen/dining room with walk-in pantry, a utility room and ground floor cloakroom, a light and spacious lounge with feature fireplace and log burner, a useful atti..."
"A well-presented and extended four-bedroom semi-detached house located within the popular and well-established residential area of Broadfields. This highly desirable area offers convenient access to a regular bus service, well-regarded schools, City Centre, and the major road network surrounding ..."
"3 DOUBLE BEDROOM PERIOD FAMILY HOME CLOSE TO CITY CENTRE. CHARACTER FEATURES THROUGHOUT, OPEN FIREPLACES AND 2 SIZEABLE RECEPTION ROOMS. COURTYARD GARDEN WITH REAR ACCESS AND LARGE STORGE SHED. Situation The property is located in the lively Cathedral City of Exeter, which offers a (cont.)"
"THREE BEDROOM semi-detached home with OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING area, SEPARATE LOUNGE and EN-SUITE MASTER BEDROOM."
"The Aldridge features sociable living spaces, generously-sized bedrooms and a luxurious bedroom suite, tucked away in the sanctuary of the top floor.
The combined kitchen/dining room is a sociable space in which to entertain and the lovely bright living room provides access into the g..."
"A striking period property quietly tucked away in the heart of Heavitree affording superbly presented accommodation over two storeys. This impressive property comes with a stunning kitchen/diner/family room with log burner, lounge with 'hole in the wall' gas fire, store room (potential utility ro..."
"A three bedroom semi-detached family home located in the highly popular area of Pinhoe. This spacious property benefits from a garage, driveway and enclosed garden to the rear. The internal accommodation consists of an entrance porch and hallway, two double bedrooms on the ground floor, an open-p..."
Families or couples looking for practical living space will find all they need in the four bedroom Huxford.
"*MOTIVATED VENDORS* *Guide price £390,000-£400,000* An immaculately presented family home situated in a sought after cul de sac in Pinhoe. Boasting open plan living space flooded with natural light from a large front window and patio doors to the rear. A modern kitchen, with stunning finish..."
"This perfectly positioned third floor ONE BEDROOM FLAT boasts generous living and bedroom area.This well maintained apartment comprises of living area, large bedroom, kitchen area and bathroom. Fantastic views from every aspect of the property and finished to a high stardard."
"The Aldridge features sociable living spaces, generously-sized bedrooms and a luxurious bedroom suite, tucked away in the sanctuary of the top floor.The combined kitchen/dining room is a sociable space in which to entertain and the lovely bright living room provides access into the gar..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this rare opportunity to purchase this beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached extended family home, offering a superb kitchen/breakfast area, extended dining area, three good sized bedrooms, office/study room, modern bathroom and a good siz..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this beautifully presented three bedroom townhouse, offering a range of exceptional features including an superb open plan kitchen/diner, three double bedrooms, master with en-suite and dressing area, utility area/cloakroom, stylish bathroom suite, ga..."
5 Swallowfield Road is an immaculately presented three bedroom semi-detached house where no expense has been spared by the current owners to create a lovely home in a sought after location. Located on a quiet road and offering far reaching countryside views as well as having Ludwell Valley Park o...
A well presented three bedroom terrace property that is situated in a quiet and friendly residential street within easy walking distance to Exeter City Centre and Exeter University.
"A superbly presented three bedroom semi detached home located in this highly sought after residential area. The property offers excellent access into the City Centre, to local schools and commuter links and is in a superb position for riverside walks and cycle routes. The property has be..."
"A modern, well presented semi detached three bedroom property with great kerb appeal, excellent entertaining space, garage and parking directly accessed from the property. West facing rear garden, good size fenced garden. Master en suite, family bathroom and ground floor WC. "
"A stunning and immaculately presented three bedroom detached property in the popular Hill Barton Vale Development. The accommodation comprises of Entrance Hall, Lounge, Kitchen/Diner, Utility Room, Cloakroom, Three First Floor Bedrooms (including master en-suite) and Family Bathroom. The property..."
An opportunity to acquire a much improved and remodelled detached family home presented in superb decorative order throughout. Three bedrooms (previously four which could be converted back). Good size sitting room. Modern kitchen/dining room. Ground floor cloakroom. Modern first floor bathroom...
"Energy-efficient 2 bedroom apartment in Exeter city centre, with open plan living area and allocated off-street parking. "
"A very well presented four bedroom terraced house.Fully let to students for the 2022/2023 academic year generating a gross income of £23,848 over an 11 month period. A tenancy has been agreed for the 2023/2024 academic year which will generate a gross inco..."
"A stunning three bedroom semi detached property with fantastic open plan kitchen/dinner with bi-folding doors leading to a well-maintained garden with separate outdoor living spaces. The property is situated in a popular residential area and is within close proximity to local schools, supermarket..."
"GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000. A stylish three-bedroom, DETACHED family home located on a large corner plot, with a private sunny rear garden offering optimum privacy. This property has so much to offer call us today for more details. Potentially no onward chain."
"Guide Price £375,000 to £400,000 - A well-presented Edwardian style terraced house. Located within the popular residential area of Mount Pleasant, the property is conveniently located for access to the City Centre, with Polsloe train station and regular bus routes only a few hundred meters away, ..."
"IS THIS ARGUABLY ONE OF THE BEST PROPERTIES ON THE HILL BARTON ESTATE? Stunning former ex show home, located on a large plot with detached double garages and ample parking to the front. OFFERED TO THE MARKET WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN!"
"Plot 75 The Dart - opposite a fantastic green open space! Brand new 3 bedroom home with entrance hall, downstairs cloakroom, separate lounge, kitchen/diner with double doors into the garden, master double bedroom with en-suite, bedrooms 2 & 3 and separate bathroom. *Flooring included - T&C's ..."
"WE ARE PLEASED TO WELCOME THIS TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM, TERRACED HOUSE SITUATED IN SEABROOK ORCHARDS, OFFERING OPEN PLAN LIVING, GOOD SIZE GARDEN AND PARKING ALL WITHIN MINUTES OF TOPSHAM. Situation Topsham is an ancient port situated 4 miles south east of the cathedral city of Exeter o (cont.)"
"GUIDE PRICE OF £375,000-400,000. A brilliant property situated on a quiet no through road moments from local amenities, major transport links and with highly acclaimed school catchments makes this the perfect family home. Consisting of versatile living space the ground floor is made up of ..."
"This large and unique property presents a multitude of opportunities for flexible living accommodation and offers some business potential. In need of refurbishment internally, the property has a fantastic heritage. Once used as a bakery in the Victorian era, it still retains original features in..."
"Underhill Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this well presented three/four bedroom mid-terrace property in the popular location of Gloucester Road, Exwick, Exeter. The property boasts ample living accommodation spread across three floors comprising of an entrance hall, sitting ro..."
An opportunity to acquire a well proportioned 1930’s semi detached family home occupying a highly desirable residential location convenient to local amenities and good access to major link roads. Requiring modernisation. Three bedrooms. First floor bathroom with separate WC. Reception ha...
"*** NO CHAIN *** Fulfords are very pleased to bring to the market this 3 bedroom detached chalet bungalow with fantastic views of the city in the popular residential location of higher St Thomas. The property benefits from a large kitchen diner with good views of the garden, a separate lounge, a ..."
"Guide Price £375,000 - £400,000. A chance to acquire this three/four-bedroom terraced property in Mount Pleasant being sold as an investment opportunity with no onward chain. Comprising of a front reception room currently used as a bedroom, a further reception room and a ..."
"*£5000 TOWARDS EXTRAS* Plot 96 THE BRACKEN AT EQUINOX III - A 3 bedroom house with a downstairs cloakroom, kitchen/dining room and separate lounge with double doors leading into the garden. The first floor benefits from a master bedroom with en-suite, bedroom 2, bedroom 3 and separate bath..."
A modern link detached family home built by the national developer Charles Church. Three bedrooms. Ensuite shower room to master bedroom. Family bathroom. Reception hall. Spacious open plan lounge/dining room. Ground floor cloakroom. Modern kitchen/breakfast room. Gas central heating. uPVC dou...
"Guide Price £375,000 - £400,000. New to the market is this charming two/three bedroom detached bungalow in Cowley on a fantastic corner plot with lovely far reaching views. The bungalow comprises of a light and airy living room, spacious kitchen breakfast room with a utility spa..."
"GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000 New to the market is this charming Grade II listed detached cottage in the sought after area of Countess Wear. Close to local schools, shops, public transport links and only a short walk to the River. The property itself comprises of a ..."
A beautifully presented much improved and extended semi detached family home occupying a fabulous position with pleasant outlook and views over neighbouring fields and beyond. Three bedrooms. First floor modern bathroom. Sitting room. Separate dining room. Modern kitchen. Spacious sun lounge. ...
"Well presented 3 bedroom family home located in the popular area of Pennsylvania. This property has a large living/dining area, upgraded kitchen and 3 good sized bedrooms. There is a patio garden and a garage. "
"A beautifully presented much improved and modernised detached family home with large lawned rear garden and fabulous outlook and views over neighbouring area, parts of Exeter including Cathedral and beyond. Three bedrooms. First floor modern bathroom. Reception hall. Sitting room. Light and sp..."
"A well appointed modern detached family home located within this highly sought after residential development convenient to local amenities, major link roads and Digby railway station. Good decorative order throughout. Three bedrooms. Ensuite shower room to master bedroom. Family bathroom. Rece..."
"GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000. AN EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME WITH PLENTY OF PARKING, GARAGE AND TIMBER FRAMED OFFICE. Situated in one of Exeter's most sought after family areas close to St Peters secondary school."
"The Elmslie boasts a sizeable living room with dual views over the garden. The ground floor also features a kitchen/dining room: separate spaces for cooking and dining, which creates a sociable space in which to entertain. With great living spaces, three bedrooms, ample storage and gen..."
"Move in for Spring to the Foulston; a stunning 4 bedroom home, spread over 3 floors. The ground floor offers a spacious kitchen/dining area with French doors leading out to a good sized garden. There is also a downstairs cloakroom along with access to an integral garage from the hallwa..."
"Please note, floor plans and dimensions are taken from architectural drawings and are for guidance only. Dimensions stated are within a tolerance of plus or minus 50mm. Overall dimensions are usually stated and there may be projections into these. With our continual improvement p..."
A deceptively spacious and well appointed 4 bedroom link-detached family sized house safely tucked away at the end of a favoured cul-de-sac with garden backing onto a field. The property comes with a superb open-plan kitchen/diner which opens out onto the rear garden and the original garage has b...
A beautifully presented and spacious three-bedroom house offered for sale within the popular residential area of Kings Heath. The property offers excellent access to a variety of local amenities including Digby & Sowton Train Station and the well-regarded Clyst Heath Nursery & Community Primary S...
"Home 299 is READY NOW! The Mountford is a beautiful 3 bedroom family home featuring an extensive, dual aspect living room along with a large kitchen/dining area with French doors leading out to the garden. This home also has a downstairs cloakroom and utility room for convenience. Upst..."
"The Eveleigh is a beautiful 3 bedroom family home which features a large living room with French doors leading out to the garden. In addition, it also has an open-plan kitchen/dining area and downstairs cloakroom to the ground floor. Upstairs Bedroom 1 has an en-suite, and there is a s..."
"A rare opportunity to acquire this deceptively spacious semi detached family home, located in the highly desirable suburb of Lower Pennsylvania. The property is conveniently located just a short walk away from the City Centre and the Streatham Campus of Exeter University. The property benefits fr..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this beautifully presented three bedroom Victorian terrace, offering a range of exceptional features including a modern fitted kitchen with under floor heating, open plan living/dining area with wood burning stove, three good sized bedrooms, large sty..."
**FREE LEGAL FEES FOR NHS STAFF** Spacious A Rated GROUND FLOOR ONE BEDROOM apartment with PRIVATE FRONT GARDEN and ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE. Primary double bedroom with EN SUITE and separate GUEST CLOAKROOM. HIGH SPEC INTEGRATED KITCHEN and beautiful living space with floor to ceiling ...
"The Foulston is a stunning 4 bedroom home, spread over 3 floors. The ground floor offers a spacious kitchen/dining area with French doors leading out to a good sized garden. There is also a downstairs cloakroom along with access to an integral garage from the hallway. The 1st floor has..."
"Cooksleys are proud to offer this spacious three bedroom property spread over three floors to the market, situated close to Exeter University and within walking distance to the City centre. The accommodation benefits from a large lounge, three bedrooms, kitchen, bathroom, downstairs cloakroom, en..."
"Welcoming to the market is this modern, mid-terrace town house with kitchen/diner, lounge, four bedrooms, master en-suite, a balcony, carport, an enclosed rear garden, and far-reaching views, in the city of Exeter."
"Plot 38 The Dart is a brand new 3 bedroom home with entrance hall, downstairs cloakroom, separate lounge, kitchen dining/room with double doors into the garden, master double bedroom with en-suite, bedrooms 2 & 3 and a separate bathroom. *Flooring included - T&C's apply"
"A well-proportioned three bedroom semi-detached family home located in the popular Hill Barton Vale development, conveniently placed for shops, schools and transport links, with the benefit of master en-suite, low maintenance garden, garage and parking."
"*** PLOT 338 HILL BARTON VALE *** : The Clayton - A superb family home, The Clayton features a stunning open plan kitchen/dining room and equally impressive living room with French doors opening into the garden. A utility room, WC and storage cupboard ensure it’s practical as well as sty..."
"The Clayton features a stunning open-plan kitchen diner and an equally impressive living room. A utility room, WC and storage cupboard(s) make this home practical as well as stylish. Upstairs you will find three bedrooms, a large bedroom one with an en suite, a bathroom and a handy storage cupboard."
"*** PLOT 189 ASHWORTH PLACE *** : THE CLAYTON - A superb family home, the Clayton features a stunning open-plan kitchen/dining room and an equally impressive living room with French doors opening into the garden. A utility room, WC and storage cupboard ensure that this home is practical as wel..."
"Plot 36 The Bovey is a Detached house with entrance hall, downstairs cloakroom, lounge, kitchen/dining room with DOUBLE DOORS TO THE GARDEN, three bedrooms and en-suite to the master bedroom. *Flooring included - T&C's apply"
"***GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £360,000*** Presented to an exceptional standard is this two bedroom detached bungalow situated in an elevated and highly favoured residential area enjoying far reaching views. Situated within a short distance to public transport links and local ame..."
The three-bedroom terraced house is one not to miss. Located in the central and highly convenient Roseberry Road. The property is in good order throughout with three double bedrooms and a private rear garden.
"A well appointed 4 bedroom end of terrace townhouse in the heart of Heavitree with spacious accommodation over three floors. The property benefits from the home comforts of gas central heating & sealed unit wood framed double glazing, master bedroom with en-suite shower room, cloakroom WC and a p..."
"This extended 5 bedroom property currently split into 5 studio flats with an income of over £32,000 per annum. Situated close to local amenities and with good access in and out of the city. The ground floor flat has its on private garden and there is parking for one vehicle at the front of ..."
A three bedroom terrace property situated in a convenient location within close proximity to Exeter City Centre with good size spacious living accommodation and enclosed rear garden. EER 'C'
"New to market is this characterful Victorian terrace house situated on a desirable road within the heart of Heavitree, close to local amenities, highly acclaimed schools and easy access to Exeter's RD&E this property makes for a brilliant residential or investment purchase. The property itsel..."
"A stunning 2 double bedroom top floor apartment that is situated in a popular City location. The property benefits from an open/plan lounge/kitchen/dining room, a bathroom and from an enclosed balcony. The property is currently let out with an income of £22,500 per year."
"Based within the highly sought-after location of Exeter, is a beautifully presented three-bedroom mid terraced property, located within walking distance, or a short drive from various amenities, shops, train stations, and local schools. This home is perfect for families looking to move to an a..."
"This three bedroom semi-detached property is offered to the market for the first time since 1936, featuring a garage and large rear garden situated within the desirable St Thomas area."
VERY SPACIOUS 4-BEDROOMED MODERN LINK HOUSE This very well presented 4 bedroomed modern house is situated in a very popular location close to Topsham & the Exeter Golf & Country Club. Offering spacious accommodation and having undergone many improvements this would make a perfec...
"PRICE GUIDE £350,000 - £375,000 An extended FOUR bedroom end of terraced family home with THREE private parking spaces, GARAGE and stunning City Views. Located in a highly sought after quiet area, this property is a must view... "
BARN FOR CONVERSION Planning Consent for c.1750sqft Barn Conversion as a 4 bedroom home with PARKING and GARDEN. Set in approx. HALF AN ACRE situated in a picturesque countryside location only 10 minutes from EXETER CITY CENTRE.
A spacious semi detached family home with good size rear garden and fabulous and views over neighbouring area and beyond. Good decorative order throughout. Three good size bedrooms. First floor refitted modern shower room. Reception hall. Spacious sitting room. Well proportioned kitchen/dining...
"A lovely three bedroom property situated in a popular residential area with far reaching views over parts of the city, enclosed rear garden, off road parking and a garage. EPC C, Council Tax Band C, Freehold."
"New to the market is this beautifully presented four bedroom end of terrace family home in Pinhoe. Close to local amenities, shops, schools, public transport links and M5 commuter links. The property comprises of a light and spacious living room, conservatory, cloakroom and good size kitche..."
" A spacious 4 bedroom semi detached family home based at the top of St Thomas with panoramic views of the city. PROPERTY The property is accessed down a small set of steps with a handrail, where there is a tiered laid to lawn garden with a hedge border. The house is at the end of the road ..."
"Tenanted HMO With Scope To Refurb, Refinance Then Command Higher Rents. This close-to-town six bedroom terrace could earn more per room following a freshen-up."
"ARE YOU LOOKING FOR A THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME, LOCATED IN THE HEART OF ALPHINGTON, WITH GARAGE AND DRIVEWAY?"
"A stunning two double bedroom apartment that is currently being fully renovated. The property is situated in a beautiful building in the heart of Exeter City Centre and benefits from a high specification kitchen, a shower room, a large en-suite shower room and from being SOLD with with no onward ..."
"Superb top floor apartment within a leafy St Leonards location close to Magdalen Road shops. Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Two DOUBLE BEDROOM one with EN-SUITE, apartment benefitting from a PRIVATE BALCONY. GARAGING for TWO CARS."
"A beautifully presented DETACHED HOUSE conveniently located for the city's amenities and EXCELLENT ACCESS to the M5 and 'A' road intersection and coastal routes. The fabulous accommodation includes a cloakroom, spacious sitting room, kitchen/dining room, THREE BEDROOMS - ONE EN SUITE, bathroom an..."
"A well presented three bedroom end terrace David Wilson home, situated in the popular location of Monkerton. The light and airy accommodation comprises an entrance porch, cloakroom, living room, modern kitchen dining room, 3 bedrooms, en-suite shower room and a family bathroom. The rear garden wi..."
"A recently renovated and extended 3 double bedroom home that is situated in the popular St Thomas area of Exeter. The property benefits from a lounge, a dining room, a new kitchen, a downstairs shower room, a family bathroom, an enclosed garden and from being SOLD with no onward chain."
"GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000 A well-presented 2 bedroom detached bungalow situated on a generous plot with a large rear garden and an abundance of off road parking in the popular Countess Wear area of Exeter."
"INVESTMENT PROPERTY - A house with 2 self contained studios and three rooms with a communal bathroom located in the popular St Thomas area. All flats are currently let by Martin & Co and generating a total of £32,640 per annum The property benefits with long term tenants on fixed term a..."
"*** PLOT 167 ASHWORTH PLACE *** : THE CLAYTON CORNER - A fantastic family home, the Clayton Corner features a stunning open-plan kitchen diner and equally impressive living room with French doors opening into the garden. A utility room, WC and storage cupboard ensure it's practical as well as ..."
"Home 268 is ready NOW! The Eveleigh is a beautiful 3 bedroom family home which features a large living room with French doors leading out to the garden. In addition, it also has an open-plan kitchen/dining area and downstairs cloakroom to the ground floor. Upstairs Bedroom 1 has an en-..."
"*£5000 TOWARDS EXTRAS* Plot 88 THE HAYTOR AT EQUINOX III - A 3 bedroom house with downstairs cloakroom, separate lounge and kitchen dining/room with double doors that open into the garden. The first floor benefits from a master double bedroom with en-suite, bedroom 2&3 and separate bathroom."
"A well presented four bedroom terrace house backing onto Cowick Barton Recreational Ground with good size living accommodation, kitchen/breakfast room and enclosed rear garden. The property is within close proximity to local schools, shops, doctors surgery and local commuter links. EPC D, Council..."
"*** PLOT 232 ASHWORTH PLACE *** : THE HATFIELD - Enjoy the best of modern living in this popular three-bedroom home which benefits from a stylish open-plan kitchen/diner with French doors leading into the garden. The Hatfield's bright front-aspect living room, separate utility room, handy stor..."
West Facing Rear Garden * Fantastic open plan kitchen/diner with separate utility area *Driveway and parking for 2 cars * Master bedroom with en suite *10 year NHBC warranty included  
"A deceptively spacious four bedroom home, close to the city centre and the idyllic walks around the River Exe. Internally the property offers fantastic living arrangement with spacious lounge, kitchen & office/dining room. The first floor has a stylish bathroom and four generous sized bedrooms"
"Underhill Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this spacious and well presented three double bedroom mid-terrace property in the popular location of Okehampton Road, St Thomas, Exeter. Offering ample living accommodation the property comprises; vestibule hall, entrance hall, lounge-..."
"A Stylish three bedroom home with large landscaped rear garden and lovely outlook to the front. Perfectly located for schools, local shops, busses, and easy access to the city centre/M5, this home everything you need in a spacious three bedroom home"
"GUIDE PRICE £340,000 - £350.000 This stunning home with 3/4 bedrooms and modern throughout with newly fitted bathroom & kitchen. With views of the city being only a short distance from local schools and shops."
"A well presented three/four bedroom town house situated in the popular residential area of Higher St Thomas with good size living accomodation, kitchen/diner, front and rear gardens, off road parking and views over the local green space. The property is being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. EPC C, ..."
"Home 267 is ready NOW! The Eveleigh is a beautiful 3 bedroom family home which features a large living room with French doors leading out to the garden. In addition, it also has an open-plan kitchen/dining area and downstairs cloakroom to the ground floor. Upstairs Bedroom 1 has an en-..."
"We are proud to present this Four Bedroom Town House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £335,000 - £355,000*"
"An exciting opportunity to acquire this sizeable 2 double bedroom semi-detached bungalow lying within easy walking distance of the Royal Devon & Exeter Hospital, Heavitree shops and amenities. This well-appointed property has recently been refurbished and boasts a newly modernised bathroom and th..."
"A well presented two bedroom detached bungalow situated in the popular area of Alphington with a conservatory, garage, off road parking and garden to the rear. EPC C, Council Tax Band D, Freehold."
Beautifully presented 2 bedroom property located in the city centre with access to a direct path to the university. This property has a driveway and good sized garden.
"*** NO CHAIN *** A bright and spacious 3 bedroom semi detached house situated in the popular location of Monkerton. The accommodation offers comprises an entrance hall, cloakroom, multiple storage cupboards living/dining room, modern kitchen/breakfast room, 3 bedrooms, en-suite shower room and a ..."
"Stunning 2 bedroom apartment, with EPC rating B, utility room, allocated off-street parking and private balcony. "
"WE ARE PLEASED TO OFFER THIS 4-BEDROOM PROPERTY CLOSE TO TOPSHAM AND EXETER CITY CENTRE. CAR PORT WITH PARKING FOR 3 CARS, GOOD SIZE GARDEN AND LARGE RECEPTION ROOMS. Situation The property is located in a fantastic area with some local amenities, close to Topsham and the city cen (cont.)"
The 3 bedroom Benford has a spacious and versatile layout which would suit couples and families alike.
"A FANTASTIC 3/4 BEDROOM TOWNHOUSE SITUATED IN THE POPULAR WESTCLYST DEVELOPMENT. THERE IS A SPACIOUS KITCHEN/DINER, STUDY & WC DOWNSTAIRS. THE FIRST FLOOR HAS A LOUNGE/BEDROOM 4, BEDROOM WITH ENSUITE AND THE TOP FLOOR HAS 2 BIG BEDROOMS AND A BATHROOM. THERE A PATIO GARDEN, OFF ROAD PARKING &..."
"This 3/4 bedroom property is offered to the market with no onward chain, sitting perfectly for local amenities and great transport links in and out of the City. The accommodation comprises Entrance Hall, Two Ground Floor Bedrooms, Utility Room and Cloakroom. The first floor comprises of Two Bedro..."
"A beautiful double bay fronted property with lovely period features, good size living accommodation, modern fitted kitchen and shower room and enclosed garden. The property is well positioned for St Thomas Recreational Ground, local shops, schools, Exeter City Centre and Historic Quayside. EPC D,..."
"A link detached bungalow located in a highly desirable area. This wonderful bungalow, sits on a large plot with beautiful gardens surrounding, garage and long private driveway. The property is offered with no onward chain. "
Fulfords are extremely pleased to bring to the market this three double bedroom town house situated in the heart of St Thomas. The home was built in 2021 to a high standard and comes with a ten year new build warranty. To the ground floor you have a duel aspect open plan lounge/diner/kitchen with...
"A charming semi-detached cottage located in the popular area of Countess Wear. The property is filled with character features, adding to the appeal of the home, including exposed beams, a thatched roof and a period fireplace. There is also the added benefit of an off-road parking space. The inter..."
"A modern four-bedroom terraced property in a popular residential location. The accommodation briefly compromises the Kitchen/Diner, Lounge with Gas Fire, and with patio doors leading to the garden. On the 1st floor, there are 3 bedrooms and a family bathroom with a shower over the bath. On the 2n..."
"** GUIDE PRICE BETWEEN £325,000 - £345,000 ** : A beautifully presented bay fronted mid terraced house occupying a highly convenient position convenient to local amenities, Polsloe Bridge railway station and Exeter city centre. Three bedrooms. First floor modern bathroom. Reception..."
"We are proud to present this Four Bedroom Mid Terrace – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. *Guide Price £325,000 - £350,000*"
"A well presented three bedroom semi detached property situated in a cul de sac with far reaching views to the rear, good size living accommodation, off road parking and enclosed rear garden. The property is within close proximity to Bettysmead playing fields, Mincinglake Valley Park, local shops,..."
A spacious three bedroom detached bungalow located on a large plot with ample amount of off road parking and garage. The property is being offered to the market with No onward chain and is perfect for anyone looking to add their own stamp to a property. 
"A wonderful opportunity to acquire this well presented four bedroom mid link home located within the established and sought after residential area of Pinhoe. The property offers excellent access to transport links including the M5, Pinhoe Train Station & Exeter Airport. Well regarded primary ..."
"3-BEDROOM END TERRACE PROPERTY AVAILABLE AS AN INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY WITH TENANTS IN PLACE CURRENTLY PAYING £900PCM. CLOSE TO THE CITY CENTRE. Situation The property is located in the lively Cathedral City of Exeter, which offers a rich heritage and is a fantastic place to live an (cont.)"
"Cooksleys are proud to present this three bedroom family home situated in the popular new development of Tithebarn, constructed in 2018 by Linden Homes. The property sits perfectly located for the M5, A30 and great transport links in and out of Exeter City Centre. The accommodation comprises Entr..."
"A three bedroom semi-detached house with tremendous potential to create a special home, with a large plot, two receptions, off-road parking and garage all located at the end of a private cul-de-sac."
"GUIDE PRICE - £170,000 - £180,000 This fantastic TWO BEDROOM ground floor apartment being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN is perfect for FIRST TIME BUYERS."
"A stylishly appointed one bedroom apartment in a highly
sought-after central Exeter location This stylish first floor apartment is set in one of Exeter city centre's most sought-after locations, moments from the beautiful cathedral on historic Southernhay, with its attractive green. The apartm..."
"A spacious four bedroom terraced student HMO with a contract in place for the 2022/2023 academic year generating an income of £20,988. A contract secured for the 2023/2024 academic year will increase the rent to £23,040.A new first ..."
"£325,000 - £335,000 . A chance to acquire this beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached family home in the popular Tithebarn development. Close to local amenities, supermarkets, schools and easy access to the M5 and Exeter Airport. The property comprises of a welcoming ..."
"A fantastic opportunity to purchase a spacious family home in a popular residential location of Exeter. Located close to supermarkets, open walks, schools and parks. With split level living accommodation there is plenty of space for a large family. A fully enclosed and low maintenance garden woul..."
A rare opportunity to acquire this three bedroom detached home positioned at the end of a cul-de-sac within the popular residential area of Pennsylvania. Occupying an elevated position this well presented home enjoys beautiful views across the surrounding area and countryside. Situated approximat...
"Detached two bedroom bungalow located in the Whipton area of Exeter. Offering access to the local amenities on offer in the area. The property briefly comprises Lounge / Dining Room, Conservatory, Kitchen, Utility, Shower Room and two Bedrooms. The property benefits from uPVC windows and a gas fi..."
VERY SPACIOUS 3-BEDROOMED SPLIT LEVEL SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW This lovely semi-detached home offers deceptively spacious accommodation. Occupying an elevated site which enjoys lovely far reaching views over the City to the front. Situated in a popular location within easy reach of t...
A deceptively spacious three storey terraced house offering well proportioned versatile living accommodation whilst occupying a highly convenient position close to local amenities and Exeter city centre. Three/four bedrooms. Reception hall. Sitting room. Dining room/bedroom. Bathroom. Lower gr...
"GUIDE PRICE £325,000-350,000. A beautiful, characterful property situated on a quiet no through road close to local amenities, stunning walks over to the popular town of Topsham and transport options into the city. The property itself comprises of a spacious living room filled with characte..."
"PRICE GUIDE £325,000 - £350,000 ARE YOU LOOKING FOR A MODERN THREE BEDROOM END OF TERRACED HOUSE WITH GARDEN, GARAGE AND PARKING, ALL WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE OF EXETER CITY CENTRE, ST DAVIDS TRAIN STATION & QUAYSIDE?"
Beautifully presented 3 bedroom family home with large garden and a driveway. This property is located in the heart of Countess Wear only minutes from Topsham and Exeter City Centre. The River Exe is also only a few seconds walk away and this gives access to river walks and cycle paths. 
"A well presented and modern four bedroom family home with good size living accommodation, master en-suite, enclosed rear garden, off road parking and a garage, situated in a development with excellent commuter networks to the City and major transport links. EPC B, Council Tax Band D, Freehold."
"*Guide £330,000-£340,000* Situated in a quiet position in Pinhoe this family home has recently undergone refurbishment giving you a blank canvas to make your own. Offering four bedrooms with a toilet on each level, including a master en suite. The living room boasts a Juliet balcony and the whole..."
"£5,000 Deposit Boost *Two Parking Spaces Side by Side *Open plan kitchen/diner with separate utility area * Spacious lounge *Bedroom 3 could double as a home office *Part of a new phase at Pinhoe with plenty of open green space and mature trees"
A well-presented and spacious three-bedroom house situated towards the end of a pedestrian walkway. Located within the popular residential area of Kings Heath. The property offers excellent access to a variety of local amenities including Digby & Sowton Train Station and the well-regarded Clyst H...
"*£5000 TOWARDS EXTRAS* Plot 95 THE BRACKEN AT EQUINOX III - A 3 bedroom house with a downstairs cloakroom, kitchen/dining room and separate lounge with double doors leading into the garden. The first floor benefits from a master bedroom with en-suite, bedroom 2, bedroom 3 and separate bath..."
THREE-BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY IN THE QUIET SOUGH-AFTER VILLAGE OF CLYST ST. MARY. GOOD SIZE GARDEN WITH LOVELY RURAL VIEWS AND THE ADDED BENEFIT OF PARKING AND A GARAGE. Situation Clyst St Mary's location means that it is in an ideal position to access the surrounding towns (cont.)
Two Parking Spaces Side by Side *Open plan kitchen/diner with separate utility area * Spacious lounge *Bedroom 3 could double as a home office *Part of a new phase at Pinhoe with plenty of open green space and mature trees
"A superbly located and well proportioned apartment set in the heart of St Leonards. The accommodation is well appointed throughout and comprises entrance hall, large open plan living space with kitchen and French doors to the balcony. Two double bedrooms, en-suite and separate shower room. The pr..."
"A modern three bedroom end of terraced family home, located walking distance to the City Centre. The property benefits from a GARAGE and off road parking. Internally the property boasts a modern fitted kitchen, living / dining room. downstairs WC, family bathroom & attractive rear garden."
"A beautifully presented three bedroom property situated in a popular location of St Thomas with modern fitted kitchen and bathroom, wrap around garden and a garage. The property is within close proximity to supermarkets, school, and main commuter links. EER 'D'"
A stylish semi detached family home located within this popular new development on the outskirts of Exeter providing good access to local amenities and major link roads. Presented in superb decorative order throughout. Three bedrooms. Ensuite shower room to master bedroom. Family bathroom. Rec...
"An attractive three-storey, three-bedroom home, the Souter has an open-plan kitchen/diner, living room and three bedrooms. Bedroom one on the top floor benefits from an en suite. The enclosed porch, downstairs WC, two storage cupboards and off-road parking mean it's practical as well as stylish."
"A fabulous opportunity to purchase a modern semi-detached family home. Living Room, Kitchen Dining, 3 Bedrooms, En-suite, Bathroom & Cloakroom. Rear Garden & Parking. New and ever-growing development on the outskirts of Exeter providing easy access to local amenities and major link roads. "
"*** PLOT 334 HILL BARTON VALE *** : THE SOUTER - An attractive three-storey, three-bedroom home, the Souter has a modern open plan kitchen/dining room, well-proportioned living room and three good-sized bedrooms. The top floor bedroom one also has a spacious en suite. The enclosed porch, downs..."
"Well-presented three bedroom family home located in a popular residential location within easy walking distance of local amenities. The property benefits from off street parking, large modern living room, open plan kitchen/dining room, master en-suite, bathroom, downstairs W.C & sunny rear garden. "
"NEW 42' x 20' Prestige Residence, 2 bedrooms, en-suite, fully furnished. Exclusive residential development of just 20 homes for the over 50's. Pets welcome. Ready for viewing early 2023"
"NEW 42' x 20' Prestige Sofia (new model), 2 bedrooms, en-suite, fully furnished. Exclusive residential development of just 20 homes for the over 50's alongside the River Exe. Pets welcome. Arriving Summer 2023."
"Check out this modern, semi-detached town house with spacious living room, modern kitchen/dining room, three double-bedrooms, large master en-suite, an enclosed rear garden and parking, on a recent development in the city of Exeter."
"A spacious and well presented four bedroom townhouse located in this popular development of Pinhoe, within a stone's throw of local amenities and Pinhoe primary school. The property is offered for sale with no onward chain and the accommodation comprises Entrance Hall, Kitchen, Lounge, First ..."
A stylish three storey end terraced town house located within this highly sought after residential development convenient to local amenities and major link roads. Good decorative order throughout. Three double bedrooms. Ensuite shower room to master bedroom. First floor family bathroom. Sittin...
MODERN 3-DOUBLE BEDROOMED HOUSE WITH LOVELY VIEWS OVER BARTON FIELDS This smart modern house is situated in a popular cul de sac and enjoys a wonderful open aspect directly over Barton playing fields immediately behind. The property has been well maintained by the current vendors w...
A spacious three bedroom semi-detached house with garage and driveway. This home is in a quiet cul-de-sac in the Pinhoe area of the city.
"Guide price £300,000 to £325,000. An opportunity to acquire a wonderful first floor apartment in a quiet location within easy reach of the city centre. The apartment is part of a prestigious conversion of a Grade II Listed former school building, dating from 1861. The accommodation offe..."
"Attractive, bright two double bedroom mid terrace house, re-furbished throughout, retaining original features and high ceilings with West facing garden.  Located in the popular area of Heavitree, walking distance of local amenities and R D & E Hospital."
"NEW 42' x 20' Prestige Anthem, 2 bedrooms, en-suite, fully furnished. Exclusive residential development of just 20 homes for the over 50's alongside the River Exe. Pets welcome. Ready for viewing "
"GUIDE £300,000 - £325,000 A stylish three bedroom end terrace with modern interior and great access to shops & schools."
"New to market is this four bedroom end of terrace house situated on a quiet road with great links to local amenities, popular schools and transport options into and out of the City. The property itself comprises of a large, light and airy living room, a modern fitted kitchen/dining space with pat..."
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £305,000. A well-presented three-bedroom terraced family home situated within the popular residential area of Countess Wear. The property is superbly positioned for access to riverside walks and cycle routes, located on the South Eastern outskirts of the City, offering exce..."
VERY SPACIOUS END TERRACED FREEHOLD PROPERTY This is an extremely rare opportunity to purchase this substantial end terraced property that is currently arranged as a ground floor shop & spacious self-contained 2 bedroomed 1st floor flat. There is potential to convert the proper...
"A spacious first floor flat sold with no onward chain located in a prestigious location within St Leonards. The flat benefits from a single garage, visitor parking and use of the attractive communal gardens. The internal accommodation briefly consists of an entrance hallway, a generous living roo..."
"Guide price - £300,000 - £325,000 - A rare opportunity to acquire a superb modern ground floor apartment, part of a prestigious conversion of a grade II listed building dating from 1861. Being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN, this property comes as a must view."
A spacious three bedroom semi-detached family home with private DRIVEWAY. The property is a short walk to the RD&E hospital & has easy access to the City Centre. This is arguably the best plot situated on Kingsway.
"Underhill Estate Agents are delighted to bring to market this well presented bay fronted 3 bedroom terrace house in central St Thomas. This attractive property benefits from a good sized living room, spacious kitchen/diner, three bedrooms and a family bathroom. Further benefits include gas centra..."
SUPERB 2-BEDROOMED SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW This lovely modern bungalow occupies an elevated location and enjoys some outstanding far reaching views across the City to the rear. Bungalows within this locality remain extremely popular and this particular property benefits from a beau...
"Beautifully presented and recently updated 3 bedroom family home with landscaped garden, garage and off road parking. This property is located in the popular area of St Thomas with easy access to the M5 and A30."
"A SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME WITH ATTIC ROOM, TWO BATHROOMS AND USEFUL OUTBUILDING CURRENTLY BEING USED AS A BAR. If you are looking for a property on a large plot, then this is a property not to be missed."
"A well presented three bedroom terraced property situated in a popular area of St Thomas and within close proximity to Cowick Barton Recreational Ground, local schools, shops and commuter links. The property benefits from good size living accommodation and enclosed rear garden. EPC **, Council Ta..."
"NEW 42' x 20' Prestige Reprise, 2 bedrooms, en-suite, study, fully furnished. Exclusive residential development of just 20 homes for the over 50's. Pets welcome. Ready for viewing"
"3 BEDROOMED MODERN END LINK HOUSE WITH GARAGE AND DRIVE This modern end link house occupies a corner plot & offers potential to extend (subject to the usual permissions & consents etc.), with other houses in the locality having added substantial 2 storey extensions. The pro..."
"Cooksleys are delighted to offer this historic property set in the heart of the City. Spacious and characterful it has the potential to provide delightful modern, open plan living over four floors, from the much sought after ground floor recreational storage to the top floor en-suite bedroom and ..."
"INVESTORS ONLY - A rare opportunity to purchase this purpose built three bedroom student flat currently let for the academic year of 22/23 with an annual income of £19,547 and let agreed for the academic year of 23/24 with an annual income of £22,429."
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000 3D VIRTUAL TOUR AVAILABLE - A modern FOUR bedroom town house situated in Exwick being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"Situated in the highly regarded St Leonards this property sits in a perfect location with stunning views over the water to be enjoyed all year round. A perfect downsize, investment or first time buy; it really shouldn't be missed with accommodation comprising Entrance Hallway, First Floor Lan..."
"A three bedroom house with superb corner plot garden , off road parking and a garage set in a popular residential area of St.Thomas. NO ONWARD CHAIN. EPC D, Council Tax Band C, Freehold."
The Hardwick is a delightful 2 bedroom semi-detached home. It benefits from a large living area along with an open plan kitchen/dining area and downstairs cloakroom. Upstairs there are two good sized double bedrooms. An en-suite serves bedroom 1 and in addition there is a main bathroom...
A well appointed spacious terraced house situated this popular residential area of St.Thomas. The property is conveniently located close to bus routes for the city centre and access to major road links including the M5 and A30. A number of well regarded primary & secondary schools are within easy...
"Accommodation comprises Hallway, spacious Dual aspect Lounge, Modern Kitchen with built in oven and hob, space for further appliances. Dining Room. On the first floor there are 3 double bedrooms and a bathroom. Outside to the front there is a driveway and low maintenance garden. The rear garden i..."
"A well-presented terraced house located in the popular area of Pinhoe. The property boasts a garage in a nearby block with a parking space in front, as well as a delightful enclosed rear garden. Internally, the accommodation consists of a good-sized living room, and a well-appointed kitchen diner..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this three bedroom semi-detached home situated on a corner plot, offering a range of exceptional features including three good sized bedrooms, spacious lounge, conservatory, driveway with space for 2+ cars and sitting on a good sized plot. Ideal oppo..."
Versatile Family Home With Everything You Need Within A 15 Minute Walk. This spacious 3 bedroom mid-terrace is in a great spot with everything your family could need right on your doorstep.
"Fulfords are introducing this stylish three bedroom, semi-detached house, to the market. The property offers a porch and entrance hallway, an open plan lounge/diner with views of the city, and a separate kitchen. To the upstairs, there are three bedrooms, and a newly fitted modern bathroom. The g..."
"This unique character property is situated in the heart of the sought after area of Heavitree, having a range of amenities within easy reach, including local shops, supermarkets, healthcare practices, restaurants and leisure facilities. Heavitree allows easy access to Exeter and the M5 motorway...."
The two bedroom Ashenford is an ideal starter home.
"A well presented three bed terraced property situated in a great location just a stones throw from Exeter's popular Quayside. The accommodation comprises Entrance Hall, Cloakroom, Lounge, Kitchen, Three First Floor Bedrooms and Bathroom. The property enjoys a delightful garden and garage prov..."
"A well presented and spacious two bedroom end of terrace property located within the modern and popular residential area of Newcourt. Conveniently situated on the outskirts of the city the property offers easy access to major commuter links, Exeter Business Park, & Exeter International Airport. N..."
"** QUAYSIDE LOCATION** Fulfords are pleased to bring to the market this beautifully presented two bedroom terraced property in the heart of Haven Banks. This home has been well cared for over the years and is being sold with NO CHAIN. The property benefits from a bright and airy lounge, a modern ..."
"A three bedroom terraced house located in the popular area of Mount Pleasant. The property is offered with no onward chain and boasts an enclosed garden to the rear, as well as a double garage allowing off-road parking. The internal accommodation briefly consists of an entrance vestibule and hall..."
"A well-proportioned, end of terrace house tucked away within the popular area of Heavitree, offered for sale with no onward chain. Internally, the property comprises an entrance hallway with access to a cloakroom and the dining room that leads to both the kitchen and a large living room. Upstair..."
"*BEING SOLD VIA MODERN METHOD OF SALE* see bottom of description for more details. New to the market is this recently renovated four bedroom terraced property in Pinhoe. The ground floor is a light and airy open plan living space, with a brand new fitted kitchen, downstairs cloakroom and doo..."
"An exciting opportunity to buy a superb one bedroom first floor apartment in the prestigious Princesshay development, which is located in the heart of the city, with the benefit of a garaged parking space. No Chain."
3D VIRTUAL TOUR AVAILABLE - This fantastic THREE bedroom terrace comes in the popular residential area of Powderham Road.
"A lovely well-presented, chain free semi-detached property in excellent order throughout and located in the popular area of Wonford. Within easy reach of the RD&E and transport links to the City and beyond. Offering a modern kitchen, two reception rooms, cloakroom, three bedrooms and a fami..."
Large Garden Super Location Fantastic opportunity to purchase a three bedroom semi-detached house located in the heart of St Thomas providing easy access to the City Centre and local amenities. The property boasts spacious accommodation over two floors with potential to extend. Garden t...
"A stylish semi detached family home occupying a highly convenient position providing good access to local amenities, popular schools and major link roads. Good decorative order throughout. Three bedrooms. Ensuite shower room to master bedroom. Family bathroom. Ground floor cloakroom. Sitting r..."
"A fabulous Grade II listed townhouse located within this highly sought after residential development convenient to local amenities, major links roads and Digby railway station. Well presented characterful accommodation. Three bedrooms. First floor bathroom. Large reception hall. Impressive lig..."
A beautifully presented two-bedroom ground floor apartment benefitting from its own private entrance and a share of the freehold. Set within a quiet gated development with communal gardens and stunning views over the city.
"A charming 2/3 bedroom end of terrace thatched cottage situated in this popular and sought-after residential road in Alphington. Approached via a pedestrian walkway, Grade II listed, and retaining many original features, the property has a delightful rear garden offering a good degree of privacy ..."
"Location Location Location! A super family home in a fantastic location in St Thomas. Spacious accommodation adds to the appeal of this property, lovely sized conservatory leading onto the rear garden with lawn area and borders of mature shrubs, offroad parking for 3 vehicles and a..."
"A superb opportunity to purchase this spacious and well presented semi detached three bedroom house located on the modern Hill Barton Vale development. The property offers excellent access to local amenities including Sowton industrial estate, the MET office, City Centre, and major transport link..."
3- BEDROOMED HOUSE IN POPULAR ST THOMAS This is a very rare opportunity to purchase a property in this exclusive private road situated just off Cowick Lane. The property has the advantage of off street car hardstanding immediately to the front of the house with a covered walkway r...
"Underhill Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this CHAIN FREE, two double bedroom semi-detached bungalow in the popular location of Parkway, St Thomas, Exeter. In need of modernisation, the property offers ample living accommodation comprising; porch, hallway, kitchen, living room,..."
"A well-presented two bedroom semi-detached bungalow in the very popular residential location of Higher St Thomas which benefits from fantastic views across the city. The property offers a spacious kitchen breakfast room, a lounge diner, a shower room, front and rear gardens, driveway and garage. ..."
"A lovely and much improved three bedroom family home, located in a quiet cul de sac in Pinhoe. This lovely home has a lot to offer with attractive enclosed sunny garden and garage in a nearby block. Downstairs is open plan aspect, perfect for entertaining and perfect for all the family to enjoy."
"This spacious first floor apartment within an attractive Grade II Listed Georgian building is situated in the heart of St Leonards. This apartment features tall ceilings and generous sash windows with spacious accommodation including 2 bedrooms, sitting room, kitchen and bathroom. An allocated pa..."
"A newly renovated three bedroom semi detached property with good size living accommodation and enclosed rear garden. The property is situated within close proximity to local schools, shops and transport links. EER C, Council Tax Band B, Freehold."
*MID-TERRACED*3 BEDROOMS* MODERN KITCHEN*UTILITY ROOM* LOUNGE/DINING ROOM*FULLY ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN*GARAGE* CUL DE SAC LOCATION* Right at Home are delighted to bring to market this beautifully presented three bedroom mid-terraced property situated in the ever-popular area of Pinhoe ...
"Guide Price £280,000 - £290,000 A three-bedroom semi detached property in a superb location. Great south facing garden with planted olive tree, parking and garage and located close to the Woodwater Academy. The property needs renovation, however this easy is an easy oppurtunity to add value."
"Underhill Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this immaculately presented two bedroom, double park home located on the popular Newport Park, Topsham. Offering privacy with some river views, this fantastic property has been lovingly refurbished over the last four years by the curren..."
"A three bedroom end of terrace property in need of some modernisation situated in the popular residential area of St Thomas and within close proximity to local shops, schools, St Thomas Plesaure Ground, Exeter City Centre and Historic Quayside. EPC D, Council Tax Band B, Freehold."
"Underhill Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this well presented three bedroom, terrace property in the popular location of Alphington, Exeter. The property in brief comprises of an entrance hall, living room, kitchen-diner, conservatory, three bedrooms, family bathroom with separ..."
"A three bedroom mid terrace property situated in the popular residential area of St Thomas within close proximity to shops, schools, City Center and Exeter's Historic Quayside being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN! EER' D"
"**WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN** A beautifully presented 2 bed end of terrace house situated on the popular residential Hillside Gardens development. The accommodation briefly comprises a downstairs cloakroom, fitted kitchen, spacious lounge/dining room, 2 double bedrooms, en-suite shower room and a bath..."
"A spacious semi-detached house located in the popular residential area of Beacon Heath. The property benefits from gardens to the front and rear, and the internal accommodation briefly consists of an entrance hallway, a living room, an open-plan kitchen diner and a lobby leading to a downstairs c..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this beautifully presented two bedroom terraced property, offering a range of exceptional features including a modern fitted kitchen, light and spacious family lounge/diner with doors opening to the rear garden, bedroom one with en-suite, good sized l..."
"*** PLOT 321 HILL BARTON VALE *** : THE WELWYN - Perfectly-proportioned, The Welwyn has a stylish open plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading into the garden, two double bedrooms, a good-sized living room and off-road parking. Ideal if you’re a first-time buyer looking for a ..."
"Now selling from Ashworth Place
Hill Barton Vale is a collection of new homes located on the eastern edge of the cathedral city of Exeter in Devon. This fantastic location has something to offer everyone, and our range of beautifully designed homes are perfect for the w..."
"Guide Price £275,000 - £300,000. A fantastic opportunity to acquire this Grade II listed spacious apartment located in one of Exeter's most sought after locations. Close to the River, Magdalen Road shops, the RD&E and much more. Entering the property you have a stunning, private s..."
"Guide Price £275,000 New to the market is this three/four bedroom investment property currently let to students located in Newtown, within a short walk to a convenience store, the City Centre, St Lukes Campus, local amenities and much more. The property comprises of a downstairs bedro..."
"Guide Price £275,000 - £300,000. Being sold with no onward chain is this three/four bedroom end of terrace property located in Newtown. Only a short walk to the City Centre, close to local shops, amenities, schools, the RD&E and public transport links. Comprising of a spacious liv..."
A unique opportunity to purchase this beautifully presented two bedroom terrace property in the sought after location of St Thomas.
"A two double bedroom terraced house located in the convenient area of Exwick. The property boasts two allocated parking spaces, a garage and an enclosed garden to the rear. Internally, the accommodation consists of an entrance hallway leading to the kitchen, lounge diner and downstairs cloakroom...."
"**NO CHAIN** Fulfords are pleased to bring to the market this two bedroom, purpose built Riverside apartment located on the popular and historic Quayside. The apartment benefits from having its own private balcony, two double bedrooms, an open plan lounge diner leading through to a modern kitchen..."
"*** PLOT 320 HILL BARTON VALE *** : THE WELWYN - Perfectly-proportioned, The Welwyn has a stylish open plan kitchen/dining room with French doors leading into the garden, two double bedrooms, a good-sized living room and off-road parking. Ideal if you’re a first-time buyer looking for a ..."
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a well presented two double bedroom property occupying a cul-de-sac position within this popular residential area. Situated in a highly convenient location the property offers excellent access to riverside walks and nearby cycle paths. St David’s Train Station, ..."
"Underhill Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this well presented three bedroom semi-detached property in the popular cul-de-sac location of Poppy Close, Exwick, Exeter. The property currently holds planning permission for a fourth bedroom with en-suite in the loft space, and offer..."
"A two bedroom first floor flat situated within an attractive Georgian building in the popular location of Mont Le Grand. The internal accommodation enjoys a number of period features, including cast-iron fireplaces, decorative coving and wooden flooring to name a few. The rooms consist of a kitch..."
"A superb one bedroom apartment in the heart of the CITY CENTRE, with great access to train stations, local bus services and offers a low service charge & SHARE OF FREEHOLD"
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this well presented three bedroom semi-detached family home, offering a range of exceptional features including an open plan living/dining area, spacious lounge, good sized rear garden and driveway. The property is located in the Beacon Heath area o..."
"A well presented two bedroom bungalow set close to the local shops of Heavitree, and within walking distance of Heavitree park. The property offers a spacious lounge/dining room, modern fitted kitchen, shower room, 2 double bedrooms, conservatory and enclosed and private rear garden"
"We are excited to bring to the market a stunning Victorian property. This beautiful home is bright, presented well and is radiating with character. Located within walking distance of local parks, Exeter City Centre and Local Amenities. "
"GUIDE PRICE - £270,000 - £280,000 A wonderfully presented bungalow , offering a cul de sac position giving quiet surroundings. Walking distance to an abundance of local amenities including, corner shops, takeaways, hairdressers and veterinary surgery. Boasting two double bedrooms beautiful level ..."
SPACIOUS 3-BEDROOMED TERRACED HOUSE Situated in a level location in the heart of St Thomas is this lovely 3 bedroomed terraced house. Very conveniently located being just a short walk to the shopping precinct and with easy access to some stunning Riverside walks. The deceptively sp...
"BEING SOLD FOR A GUIDE PRICE OF £270,000-290,000. New to market on the popular Hill Barton Vale development is this well presented three bedroom semi detached house, situated close to great transport links into and out of the city and also benefitting from easy access to local amenities. Th..."
"A three bedroom terraced property with enclosed rear garden well positioned for Cowick Barton Recreational Ground, Pinces Gardens, local schools, shops and supermarkets. EPC **, Council Tax Band B, Freehold."
"BRAND NEW, 36' x 20' Prestige Park Home at Newport Park, a fully residential park for the over 50's. Pets welcome. On the banks of the River Exe. Fully furnished. No stamp duty!"
"A lovely, well presented, semi-detached, three bedroom home backing straight onto Ludwell Valley Park. Occupying a highly convenient position with good access to the Royal Devon and Exeter Hospital, Ludwell Valley Park and local amenities."
"Luxury one bedroom first floor apartment located in the sought after Magdalen Road, St Leonard's within easy walking distance of local shops and amenities. The property benefits from a beautiful open plan Kitchen/Living/Dining Room, and luxury bathroom."
"This well kept coach house comprises an entrance with stairs rising to accommodation where you have a landing area opening through to the lounge/diner and fitted kitchen. In addition there are two bedrooms and a bathroom with wc and fitted shower. Other feature include gas central heating, uPVC d..."
"A two bed coach house comprising private entrance with stairs leading to the first floor with landing area. L- shaped Living Room/Dining area, Fitted Kitchen, two double Bedrooms and a Bathroom. Includes integral Garage, Gas central heating and double glazing"
"Pennsylvania.... Stunning grade II listed property in potentially one of the most sought after locations in Exeter. This property comes to the market oozing period features, from ceiling roses to high ceilings and feature wall panelling, there really isn't much this property doesn't have. The..."
"Guide Price £260,000 - £270,0000. New to the market is this three bedroom family home in Beacon Heath, close to local amenities, shops, supermarkets, schools and public transport links in and out of the City. The property comprises of an entrance porch, shower ..."
"A deceptively spacious three bedroom family home, close to local shops, schools and regular bus route to the city centre. The property has a spacious lounge, kitchen/diner two double bedrooms and a generous single bedroom"
"A well-presented two-bedroom house located on the newly built development of Hill Barton Vale. The property offers excellent access to local amenities including Sowton industrial estate, the MET office, City Centre, and major transport links surrounding the city including Junction 29 of the M5 mo..."
"Contemporary apartment in the heart of the St. Leonards area, featuring modern open plan layout, utility area and private balcony. "
"This modern 2 bedroom mid terraced house forms part of a sought after residential development, namely Rougemont Park. The property is offered in excellent condition throughout and will appeal in particular to first time buyers and those seeking a well placed investment property for the rental mar..."
"PRICE GUIDE £260,000 - £270,000 A lovely three bedroom end of terraced family home benefiting from, impressive open planned kitchen/dinning room, spacious living room & garage. located in Redhills offering stunning city views."
"A generous sized, two double bedroom apartment with garage and parking. The apartment has spacious accommodation with large lounge/dining room, kitchen/breakfast room, bathroom with shower and two double bedrooms"
"A chance to acquire this spacious three-bedroom terraced property located in the sought area of Broadfields, close to local amenities, schools, parks and public transport links. The property comprises of a light and airy living dining room, separate kitchen, downstairs cloakroom and the garage ha..."
"GUIDE PRICE £260,000 - £270,000 A wonderfully presented two bedroom coach house situated in the popular area of Monkerton being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN"
"Constructed four years ago Wynford Gardens is a private development of just 8 Apartments over two buildings, with this apartment being the garden apartment of the rear block. Accommodation comprises two double bedrooms and a large open plan dining/sitting area opening onto the private rear garden..."
"A spacious end terrace family home, well presented with a modern family kitchen and bathroom and gas central heating throughout. The property also has good sized gardens to the front and rear. No chain. "
"Modern living at its best, the Morden's open-plan kitchen/dining/living room is bright, sociable and ideal for the way we live today. Upstairs there are two nicely-proportioned bedrooms and a family-sized bathroom. This lovely cheerful home is perfect for first-time buyers and young professionals."
"A well-presented two-bedroom end of terrace house in a popular residential area, perfect for first time buyers or landlords. The property benefits from good views, an open plan lounge diner, a separate kitchen with a door leading to the garden, two double bedrooms and a beautiful modern bathroom...."
"An exciting opportunity to acquire this 2 bedroom mid-terrace house with a sunny rear garden, substantial garden shed/workshop and an attic room approached from bedroom 2. The property has been maintained to a good standard while offering scope for new owners to upgrade and modernise to their own..."
"******NO CHAIN****** A two bedroom terraced house situated in the popular residential area of St Thomas. The property benefits from an open plan lounge diner, a kitchen with a door leading to the fully enclosed private garden, two double bedrooms, a family bathroom and being close to local amenit..."
"A two double bedroom terraced house in need of updating and improvement, located in the convenient area of Exwick. The property has a garage and parking and an enclosed level garden to the rear. Internally, the accommodation consists of an entrance hallway leading to the kitchen, lounge diner and..."
"A two bedroom ground floor flat located in a highly popular area close to Exeter's quayside. The flat benefits from its own private entrance and internally comprises a hallway with built-in storage, a good-sized open-plan living space, two bedrooms and a bathroom. The block also provides an area ..."
"Ideal first home or wonderful investment. This home boasts a large enclosed rear garden with plenty of opportunities to grow, three bedrooms, a family bathroom, lounge, kitchen and conservatory. Gorgeous multi fuel burner, that will keep you lovely and warm on those colder days plus solar panels ..."
"3 BEDROOMS | END TERRACED | NO CHAIN | GOOD SIZED GARDEN | OPEN PLAN KITCHEN /DINER| GREAT POTENTIAL | SITTING ROOM | Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this three bedroom end of terraced property with great potential and offering a good sized garden to rear, open plan kitchen/diner ..."
"Lovely mid terrace Cottage with flexible accommodation of 3 / 4 bedrooms. Located in the heart of the village opposite the Primary School and benefits from a large reception room, ground floor bedroom suite, inner hallway/utility and courtyard garden. Perfect for modernisation and potential exten..."
"This wonderful property set over three levels boasts 3 good sized bedrooms a large lounge/ dining room and modern kitchen, the property has been neutrally decorated throughout and benefits from not only a modern kitchen but a modern bathroom too, so whether you are looking for your first home or ..."
"Guide Price £250,000 - £260,000. New to the market is this beautifully presented two bedroom first floor apartment in a quiet secluded location in the City Centre. Only a short walk to the shops, local amenities, public transport links, plus the University and the RD&E..."
"A superb opportunity to purchase a 2 bedroom end terrace property in the popular area of Whipton. The property offers generous accommodation over two floors comprising living room, kitchen, separate conservatory, currently being used as a dining room. On the first floor are two good sized bedro..."
A well proportioned end terrace family home occupying a highly convenient position providing good access to local amenities and major link roads. Two double bedrooms. First floor study/bedroom three. Spacious first floor modern bathroom (scope to swap bathroom with study/bedroom three to creat...
"GUIDE PRICE £250,000 - A well presented two bedroom, purpose built Riverside apartment located on the popular and historic Quayside. The apartment benefits from two double bedrooms, an open plan lounge diner leading through to a modern kitchen, a family bathroom, ample storage, allocated un..."
"A well-presented 3 bedroom mid terrace house in the popular area of Beacon Heath, Exeter. The property benefits from gardens to the front and rear, great travel links and would make the perfect first time buyer home or buy to let investment."
"We are pleased to present this two-bedroom terraced property located in Exeter. The property consists of – Sitting/Dining room, Kitchen, Two bedrooms and a Bathroom. This property offers light-filled, well-presented accommodation in the popular St Thomas location. The property i..."
"An opportunity to purchase this one bedroom detached bungalow. The accommodation comprises an entrance porch, living room, kitchen, lean-to, bedroom, bathroom and conservatory. Outside the property is approached via a driveway providing off road parking and there is a rear garden. EPC Rating: D. ..."
"New to market is this well situated park home on the popular Newport Park, boasting ample links to local amenities and easy access to Exeter's City Centre and the historical harbour village of Topsham. The property itself comprises of two double bedrooms one with ensuite, bathroom, spacious loung..."
"A beautifully presented two bedroom terraced property with enclosed rear garden situated perfectly for local shops, schools, Exeter City Centre, Historic Quayside and local transport links.. EPC D, Council Tax Band B, Freehold."
"A fantastic first floor apartment set in a private and sought after gated community on Exeter’s historic Quayside. The property offers two double bedrooms, open plan lounge/diner, and modern fitted kitchen and shower room. The Apartment also benefits from secure and private parking"
"New to the market is this two bedroom link detached house in the heart of the City Centre. Currently rented with tenants who would like to stay if able to - contact us for more information on this. The property itself comprises of a spacious kitchen dining room, separate living room a..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN A three bedroom semi-detached family home located within walking distance to RD&E Hospital with OFF ROAD PARKING. Internally the property boasts a spacious living / dining room, fitted kitchen overlooking the rear garden, downstairs bathroom & three good size bedrooms upstairs."
"Guide Price £240,000 - £250,000. A great opportunity to acquire this spacious three-bedroom end of terrace family home in Beacon Heath. Close to local amenities, shops, supermarkets, schools and public transport links. The property is set back from the road wit..."
"GUIDE PRICE £240,000 - £250,000 SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACED FAMILY HOME, WITH LARGE REAR GARDEN AND OFF ROAD PARKING. The property is located in Beacon Heath close to the City Centre, good schools and M5 corridor."
A modernised and well appointed 2 bedroom second floor retirement apartment situated in the sought after Pegasus Retirement Complex found in the centre of Heavitree. The lounge/diner features tall uPVC double glazed windows opening out to a Juliet balcony. This particular apartment benefits from ...
A TWO BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT Pegasus Court is a development of apartments designed for the retired and developed by Pegasus Retirement Homes plc. The Estate Manager sees to the day-to-day running of the development and can also be contacted in the event of an emergency. Fo...
A 3 bedroom end terrace house being offered to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN. This fantastic property is within close proximity to the RD&E and comes with a wonderful opportunity for investment. The property is in a residents parking zone and has a low maintenance enclosed patio garden and lawn.
"* WITH TENANTS IN SITU * An opportunity to acquire this spacious Victorian lower ground floor apartment, within close proximity to Exeter city centre. The accommodation briefly comprises a private entrance, living/dining room, kitchen, 2 good sized double bedrooms, bathroom, utility room, separa..."
"A CHARMING 2 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED IN THE CUL DE SAC OF BRITTEN DRIVE, WITH GREAT ACCESS TO SCHOOLS AND THE RD&E. COMES WITH ALLOCATED PARKING, SOUTH-EAST FACING GARDEN, IN A GREAT LOCATION."
"Spacious two bedroom coach house style apartment situated in the highly sought after Alphington area of Exeter, offering good access to the city of Exeter, local business park and amenities, and major road network. This delightful property features; large double aspect living/dining room, separat..."
"Underhill Estate Agents are delighted to bring to market this well presented 3 bedroom, ground floor, maisonette with private garden in St Thomas, Exeter. Conveniently located in the centre of St Thomas. In brief the property comprises; a good sized living room, fitted kitchen, shower room, 3 dou..."
A well-presented two bedroom end terrace house being sold with no chain. This property is perfect if you are a first time buyer or a landlord looking to add to your portfolio. The property is situated in an elevated position giving you views from the garden. and benefits from a light and airy lou...
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this charming two bedroom mid terraced home, offering a range of exceptional features including a kitchen/breakfast area, a cosy lounge area with a recently fitted log burner, two double bedrooms, utility/W.C. and private garden to the rear. "
"A well presented one bedroom, second floor retirement apartment - offered for sale as part of the shared ownership scheme. Options to purchase between 50% - 75% of the value - subject to meeting the criteria."
"A fantastic opportunity to own a modern 2 bedroom second floor apartment located in the heart of Exeter City Centre. The University and Exeter Cathedral are only minutes away, and the transport links are fantastic with bus stops and both mainline railway stations within walking distance. This pu..."
"A one bedroom retirement apartment, with walk out balcony, situated in this sought after development in the vibrant city of Exeter - exclusively available to the over 55's."
Beautifully presented 2 bedroom home with garden and conservatory. This beautiful property comes with off road parking for 2 cars and is located only minutes from Exeter City Centre.
"Underhill Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this CHAIN FREE, two bedroom, semi-detached bungalow in the popular location of Exwick Road, Exwick, Exeter. Recently refurbished, the property offers ample living accommodation comprising; an entrance hall, lounge/diner, breakfast kitc..."
"A well presented two bedroom terraced house with car hardstand and level rear gardens.Gas fired central heating, mostly upvc double glazed windows and front door.Ideal investment or for owner occupation.Very popula..."
"**INVESTMENT ONLY** WE ARE PLEASED TO OFFER THIS TWO-BEDROOM APARTMENT EXETER CITY CENTRE WITH ALLOCATED PARKING AND A SPACIOUS LOUNGE. Situation The property is located in the lively Cathedral City of Exeter, which offers a rich heritage and is a fantastic place to live and (cont.)"
NO CHAIN - A spacious two bedroom house with amenities and bus routes close by.
"A two bedroom, top floor flat located in a highly central location close to Exeter's High Street. The flat boasts a garage in a nearby block providing valuable off-road parking or space for storage. The internal accommodation briefly consists of an entrance hallway with doors to the open-plan liv..."
"YOPA is pleased to present to the market this two double bedroom first floor apartment in the sought after location of Tithebarn area of Exeter, benefiting from great transport links to both the City Centre and the M5. Viewings Strictly by appointment only"
"BEING SOLD TO INVESTORS ONLY GUIDE PRICE £220,000. A stunning two bedroom first floor apartment situated in a popular area benefitting from great access into and out of the city, local amenities and transport links. The property itself makes for a brilliant low maintenance investment with g..."
"A three bedroom end-of-terrace family home set in the leafy and private location of Exwick. The property offers open plan lounge/dining room, modern fitted kitchen, three bedrooms and a family bathroom. Outside the property has a sunny rear and side garden, and garage located in a block"
"Connells are excited to market this immaculately renovated two bedroom, double park home located on the popular Newport Park in Topsham. The location is superb, offering fantastic walks, local amenities on the doorstep and a wealth of history. The park itself has amazing views over the estuary."
"GUIDE PRICE £220,000 - £230,000 A delightful TWO bedroom residence a close proximity to popular local schools being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN, a fantastic purchase for First Time Buyers."
"BEING SOLD TO INVESTORS ONLY. A well presented two bedroom apartment situated in a popular development within the desirable St. Leonards Quarter, benefitting from easy access to Exeter's City Centre, transport options out of the city and close vicinity to quayside walks this makes for a brilliant..."
"Available now is spacious and modern one bedroom apartment located in Princesshay, right in the Centre of the City. Accessed via a secure entry system, the property comprises a light and spacious open plan living room/kitchen with integrated appliances and access on to the balcony with views of E..."
"A two bedroom property in need of some modernisation with enclosed rear garden and is in close proximity to local shops, schools, doctors surgery, Exeter City Centre, Historic Quayside and is being offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. EPC D, Council Tax Band B, Freehold."
"NO CHAIN - We are proud to bring to market this beautiful 2-bedroom apartment. This property has been newly renovated and has an open plan living/dining area, a separate kitchen, 2 bedrooms and is only minutes away from Exeter city centre, a train station, bus route, local amenities and cycle pat..."
"An opportunity to acquire a stylish purpose built ground floor apartment occupying a highly convenient position providing good access to local amenities, major link roads and Digby railway station. Well proportioned living accommodation. Two double bedrooms. Ensuite shower room to master bedro..."
"A three bedroom end of terrace property situated on a corner plot with modern fitted kitchen and bathroom, enclosed garden and allocated parking representing an ideal first time purchase or investment opportunity. NO ONWARD CHAIN. EER 'D', Council Tax Band B, Freehold."
"Fulfords are pleased to market this one-bedroom apartment in the sought-after Waterside Development. Located on the Quay, with walking distance to the restaurants and amenities, this is one you do not want to miss. The property offers an open plan lounge/diner, with a Juliet balcony overlooking t..."
"A great opportunity to purchase a THREE BEDROOM mid terrace property with enclosed rear garden and allocated parking for two cars situated in the popular location of Exwick. Within walking distance of the River Exe, St David's Railway Station and other local amenities."
"An attractive semi-detached two bedroom cottage with exposed beams.Ideal for a young family/first timer buyers or investment opportunity.Benefitting from Upvc double glazed windows and door, gas fired central heating."
"An opportunity to acquire a contemporary one bedroom first floor apartment in this much sought-after location within the award winning Princesshay development.The flat is accessed via a private communal entry system with remote intercom, communal staircase and p..."
"This charming two-bedroom house is well situated within easy reach of excellent local amenities. On the ground floor, a spacious open plan living/dining room opens into a modern kitchen. There are French doors opening from the living space on to the enclosed rear garden. On the first f..."
RECENTLY RENOVATED TO THE HIGHEST STANDARD. A DELIGHTFUL 2 BEDROOM PARK HOME WITH A LEVEL GARDEN LOCATED IN A LOVELY POSITION ON SOUGHT AFTER NEWPORT PARK. Situation At Newport Park there is a strong community spirit a neighbourly caring without being obtrusive. Nestling in the g (cont.)
"NO ONWARD CHAIN.. A two bedroom mid terraced house located in the highly sought after Broadfields area. Tucked away at the bottom of a quiet cul de sac, the property requires modernising. The property would be a ideal first home or excellent investment property "
"This lovely home comes to the market after enjoying years of love and attention, the property boasts a lovely out look over a pedestrian only walk way lined by maintained communal areas, there is an allocated parking space a long with all that the property boasts, two bedrooms, good sized lounge,..."
"A second floor flat located in an attractive Georgian building within the highly desirable area of Mont Le Grand in Heavitree. The flat is accessed via a private stairwell leading to the internal accommodation. This briefly consists of a living room with access to a small roof terrace, a kitchen ..."
A Three bedroom mid terraced family home situated within walking distance to the RD&E hospital. The property boasts an open planned kitchen / dining room and a spacious lounge. Upstairs are three good size bedrooms and a family bathroom. To the rear of the property is an enclosed garden.
"A well presented two bedroom top floor apartment in an outstanding position which enjoys superb country and city edge views. Perfect for owner occupation or an ideal investment for letting with a great potential return. The accommodation includes a spacious lounge with panoramic views, kitchen, t..."
"OPEN HOUSE- BY APPOINTMENT ONLY Terms & Conditions apply. Starting Bid £200.000. A charming two-bedroom end terrace house with well presented accommodation, parking space and a private, enclosed garden."
An excellent opportunity to purchase a one bedroom ground floor apartment with a private courtyard garden located in the prestigious area of St Leonards. This apartment represents an excellent investment opportunity or step onto the ladder. The apartment is accessed via a secure communal...
"Situated in a popular residential location is this second floor 2 bed flat set within a short walking distance to numerous public transport links and a variety of local amenities. Accommodation comprises entrance hallway, two double bedrooms, living room, fitted kitchen and bathroom. Additional b..."
"Suitable for cash buyers only: A well presented three bedroom house located within the popular residential area of Whipton. The property offers convenient access to local amenities including primary & secondary schools, a regular bus service, parade of shops in Whipton Village & Doctors Surgery.<..."
"Underhill Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this very well presented two double bedroom park home, sited at Montgomery Road, on the popular Ringswell Park, Exeter. The property offers ample living accommodation comprising of an entrance hall, living room, dining room, kitchen, tw..."
"Underhill Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this well presented, two bedroom mid-terrace property West of the river in Exeter. Ideal for first time buyers or investors alike, the property offers ample living accommodation comprising; entrance hall, living room, modern fitted kitc..."
"A well presented ONE BEDROOM ground floor RETIREMENT PROPERTY with NO ONWARD CHAIN, off road parking and communal garden."
Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this lovely two bedroom second floor apartment. The property offers deceptively spacious accommodation throughout and is presented in good decorative order. The Lounge offers ample space for living and dining room furniture. 
"4 Wellpark Close, Exeter, EX4 1TS. We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £ 178,000 on the above property. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before exchange of contracts tak..."
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY IN THE POPULAR AREA OF ALPHINGTON. 1-BEDROOM APARTMENT IN A GOOD ORDER WITH A CURRENT RENTAL INCOME OF £650pcm. Situation The property is located in the lively Cathedral City of Exeter, which offers a rich heritage and is a fantastic place to live and work. I (cont.)"
"NO CHAIN - We are proud to bring to market this 2-bedroom apartment. This property has an open plan living/dining area, a separate kitchen, 2 bedrooms and a garage. Located only minutes away from Exeter city centre, a train station, bus route, local amenities and cycle paths/walks."
"GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £200,000 A well-positioned, sunny two bedroom upper floor apartment in the ever popular location of Heavitree, within walking distance to shops and the RD&E Hospital."
"Underhill Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this well presented two double bedroom, CHAIN FREE park home in the popular location of Newport Park, Topsham. Close to transport links and amenities this well maintained property offers ample living accommodation comprising; porch, kit..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £195,000*** A great opportunity to acquire this two-bedroom flat situated in a quiet and elevated position providing far reaching views across Heavitree. Taking great advantage of being set within a short walking distance to public transport links a..."
"A spacious ground floor flat located in a central location close to Exeter's high street. The flat benefits from it's own enclosed garden to the rear, and internally features an entrance hallway leading to the living room, bedroom and kitchen. There is also a lobby with doors to the bathroom and ..."
"****NO CHAIN**** A two bedroom first floor apartment situated in the popular residential location of Haven Banks. The property benefits from a good size lounge diner with a Juliet balcony, kitchen, master bedroom with built in wardrobe, storage cupboard in the hallway, bathroom and an allocated p..."
"A spacious two bedroom maisonette situated in a highly central location close to Exeter's High Street. The property is accessed via a communal hallway to the first floor landing which opens to the kitchen, living room, shower room and one of the bedrooms. There is a door into the stairway which l..."
"A spacious two bedroom top floor apartment conveniently situated within close proximity to local amenities and main commuter routes with an allocated parking space. Ideal first time purchase or investment opportunity. NO ONWARD CHAIN. EPC C, Council Tax Band C, Leasehold."
"A well presented and spacious ground floor flat with modern fitted kitchen and bathroom, front and rear gardens, allocated parking space and summer room (which could be used for multiple purposes). The property is situated in the popular and sought after location of Alphington and within close pr..."
"A well-proportioned, one bedroom flat located in a highly central location close to Exeter's High Street. The internal accommodation consists of an entrance hallway, kitchen, spacious living room and a double bedroom with a door to the shower room. Externally, the flat boasts an allocated parking..."
Nicely presented apartment comprising Hallway with built in cupboards. Lounge/Diner. Modern Kitchen with base and eyelevel cupboards and appliance spaces. 2 double bedrooms and a bathroom with white suite including a shower over the bath. Double glazing and electric heating. Views over the town. ...
"A WONDERFUL 2 BEDROOM RESIDENCE IN THE HEART OF EXETER within walking distance of the City Centre and university perfect as a first time buy or investment opportunity also WITH A RARE PRIVATE GARDEN, BEING SOLD WITH NO CHAIN."
"Are you looking for an investment or potentially a first time purchase within walking distance of the hospital, if so look no further this neutrally decorated 2 bedroomed property could seriously be ticking your boxes, it is not only close to the hospital but also within close proximity to Heavit..."
An opportunity to acquire a spacious purpose built ground floor apartment occupying a highly convenient position providing good access to local amenities including riverside walks and St Davids mainline railway station. Good decorative order throughout. Two bedrooms. Lounge/dining room. Kitche...
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this beautifully presented two bedroom ground floor flat, conveniently located in a quiet, tucked away position overlooking communal gardens, and offering a range of exceptional features including a modern fitted shower room, two double bedrooms, ligh..."
"Guide Price £175,000. This is a gorgeous 1 Bedroom Retirement Apartment available for over 60's in Pinhoe, which is warden controlled and close to bus routes to the City Centre. This is a great property with communal gardens"
"A well presented spacious ground floor apartment situated in this popular development. The property is well appointed and has been newly carpeted. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, lounge/dining room with french doors to the gardens, kitchen with integrated appliances, double bedroom wit..."
"Guide Price £175,000 - £180,000. Being sold as an investment currently acheiving £1000 a month. The apartment is located just a short walk to the city centre and on the second floor. As you enter the property there is a central hallway with an open plan lounge/diner which leads ..."
A spacious top floor flat located very close to Exeter's city centre boasting an allocated parking space and no onward chain. The internal accommodation briefly consists of an entrance vestibule with a door to the open-plan living space and to the double bedroom leading into the shower room. The ...
"Newly refurbished first floor one bedroom retirement flat with outlook over the communal gardens and school grounds. Brand new fitted kitchen, refitted shower room and new floor coverings throughout. Night storage heating and upv..."
"WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN. A light and airy top floor two bedroom apartment in the popular area of Pinhoe. The property has an elevated outlook and is conveniently located within walking distance to supermarkets, local amenities, Pinhoe train station and bus routes for easy access to the City Centre. ..."
"Investors - Are You Looking For A Light Refurb Rental That Could Deliver Up to 7% Yield? This 3 bedroom maisonette may be just what you’re after. With buses to town stopping outside & close to the retail park, it’s going to attract a range of tenants."
"Guide Price £170,000 - £180,000. A one bedroom end of terrace house in the City Centre being sold with no onward chain. Entering in to the living room, modern bijou kitchen, staircase up to the good size bathroom and spacious double bedroom. Currently being rented but please enquire f..."
*BEING SOLD VIA MODERN METHOD OF SALE* see bottom of description for more details. A chance to acquire this two double bedroom maisonette located in the heart of the City Centre and being sold as an ongoing investment. Currently achieving £1100 per calendar month. Having its own ...
"Underhill Estate Agents are proud to bring to the market this well presented one bedroom, mid-terrace property in the popular location of East Wonford Hill, Exeter. Ideal for first time buyers or investors (there are currently tenants in situ) the property briefly comprises living room, kitchen, ..."
"Cooksleys are delighted to bring to the market this superbly presented one- bedroom first floor, purpose built Riverside apartment located on the popular and historic Quayside. Close to local amenities, including cafes, shops and restaurants and also within walking distance of the City Centre. ..."
"A wonderful opportunity to purchase a purpose built ground floor apartment situated in the heart of the city. Close to an abundance of shops, restaurants and the high street. This is the perfect investment for you. Having TENANTS IN SITU paying £750pcm this is a great place to invest."
"A ground floor apartment that is situated in the popular St Leonards area of Exeter. The property benefits from a lounge, a kitchen/dining room, a bathroom, a double bedroom, a utility room, communal gardens and from being SOLD with no onward chain."
"*****GUIDE PRICE £175,000 TO £180,000***** Fulfords are proud to offer to the market this detached two bedroom park home situated within Exonia Park, finished to an extremely high standard throughout. The property comprises of an entrance hall, two double bedrooms with built in wardro..."
"A fantastic opportunity for first-time buyers to own a well-proportioned, well-presented one-bedroom home! This property benefits from an allocated parking space and a large open-plan kitchen/living room. "
"A delightful first floor apartment situated in a gated development on Exeter's historic Quayside. The apartment would make an ideal investment or home in a popular and vibrant city location. The layout provides an open plan living space incorporating a sitting room, dining area and kitchen, a bed..."
A delightful first floor apartment situated in a sought after gated development on Exeter's historic Quayside. The apartment is presented in good decorative order and has an allocated parking space representing an ideal investment opportunity or first home. NO ONWARD CHAIN. EPC RATING - C.
A one-bedroom ground floor flat situated in an attractive period building in a highly central location close to Exeter's high street. The flat is offered with no onward chain and enjoys use of the communal gardens to the front and rear of the building. The internal accommodation briefly consists...
"A one bedroom mid-floor flat located within an attractive period building in the popular area of Lower Pennsylvania. The internal accommodation is well-proportioned and briefly consists of an entrance hallway with built-in storage, a kitchen, living room, bathroom and double bedroom with a pleasa..."
STUNNING two bedroom apartment located within walking distance of the  Exeter city centre. Viewing highly recommended. 
"GUIDE PRICE OF £160,000 A deceptively spacious first floor apartment in the centre of Exeter City centre. The apartment offers a generous sized lounge/dining room, Modern fitted kitchen, double bedroom and a large bathroom"
"A well presented two bedroom first floor flat with good size living accommodation, own private garden and within close proximity to local shops, supermarket, school and local bus route. EPC C, Council Tax Band A, Leasehold."
"CALLING ALL CASH BUYERS!! A two bedroom first floor flat in a central location close to local amenities. The flat is being sold with no chain and will have a brand new 125 year lease. The property benefits from, two double bedrooms, a bright and airy lounge diner, kitchen, family bathroom, own e..."
A well presented top floor flat situated in a popular residential area within walking distance to many local amenities. The flat was renovated in 2022 and benefits from everything being new inside including all the wiring and plumbing. The property has a beautifully presented open plan kitchen/l...
"Underhill Estate Agents are proud to bring to the market this chain free, two bedroom park home located on Swallow Drive, on the popular Exonia Park, Exeter. Requiring some updating, the property offers ample living accommodation comprising; hallway, L-shaped living room, kitchen, two double bedr..."
ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT WITH GARAGE Pegasus Court is a development of apartments designed for the retired and developed by Pegasus Retirement Homes plc. The Estate Manager sees to the day-to-day running of the development and can also be contacted in the event of an emergency...
"A well presented two bedroom flat situated in the heart of Heavitree. The property has an open plan living area, kitchen and shower room and will is perfect as an investment. The property has no onward chain and has clean, well managed communal areas. Viewing is highly recommended."
"GUIDE PRICE £160,000 - £170,000 A well-presented one bedroom FIRST FLOOR apartment in the heart of the City Centre, great for investors or as a first time buy. With ALLOCATED PARKING and walking distance to the shops, restaurants and bars that the City has to offer, and great transport links."
"Well-presented, light and airy Grade II Listed apartment situated in this highly sought after residential location of Heavitree. There is a reception hall, spacious open plan living/dining room, separate kitchen, double bedroom, and bathroom. "
*BEING SOLD VIA MODERN METHOD OF SALE* see bottom of description for more details. A brilliant two bedroom apartment that has been recently renovated situated within the desirable St. Leonards Quarter. With easy access to transport links and within close vicinity of Exeter Quay with popular...
Churchill Sales & Lettings are delighted to be marketing this lovely one bedroom ground floor apartment with Patio area. The property offers deceptively spacious accommodation throughout and is presented in good order. The Lounge offers ample space for living and dining room furniture a...
"Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this unique one bedroom cottage with a modern fitted kitchen, good-sized lounge with spiral staircase and a very well proportioned bedroom with en-suite facilities and fully double glazed. Located in the heart of Exeter City centre and walking distanc..."
 A ONE BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT WITH JULIETTE BALCONY Pegasus Court is a development of apartments designed for the retired and developed by Pegasus Retirement Homes plc. The Estate Manager sees to the day-to-day running of the development and can also be contacted in the event...
A one bedroom apartment with own private entrance and allocated off road parking in level St Thomas. Within easy walking distance of all local amenities and Exeter Quayside. No chain. 
A great opportunity to purchase this ONE bedroom ground floor apartment situated within walking distance of Exeter city centre and St Lukes Campus. 
SELF CONTAINED 1ST FLOOR FLAT CLOSE TO RD&E HOSPITAL This is a rare opportunity to purchase this 1-bedroomed 1st floor flat which benefits from a really good sized area of private garden. The property has its own private entrance and has both double glazing & gas central he...
"GUIDE PRICE £150,000-160,000. A well presented one bedroom apartment within a popular retirement development a stones throw from both local amenities and transport links into and out of the City. The property itself is a first floor apartment, accessible via lift, that comprises of a large,..."
"A spacious and light two bedroom City Centre flat. The accommodation comprises communal entrance, entrance hall, shower room, two double bedrooms, large open plan kitchen/lounge. 125 year lease taken out on 25th Sept 1998. Early viewing is highly recommended to appreciate what is on offer. "
"A well presented first floor flat situated in a popular residential area within walking distance to many local amenities. The flat was renovated in 2022 and benefits from everything being new inside including all the wiring and plumbing. The property has a good size open plan kitchen/lounge, a s..."
"Cooksleys are proud to offer a one bedroom ground floor apartment to the market, ideal for a first time buyer or investment. The property is positioned close to the river and within easy access to the city centre. The property benefits from an open-plan lounge and kitchen, one double bedroom, bat..."
"A PURPOSE BUILT TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR Montpelier Court set in the St David's district of Exeter, close to St Davids train station and the town centre, it was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 35 properties arranged ove..."
"A TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT LOCATED ON THE SECOND FLOOR0 Montpelier Court set in the St David's district of Exeter, close to St Davids Train station and the town centre, it was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 35 properties arranged over 3 floors ..."
"*CITY CENTRE LIVING* This flat is situated just off queen street so is with in a stones throw of the city centre and everything that this includes, restaurant's, pubs, shops and so very much more, there is also off road parking, there is an open plan living space along with a double bedroom and s..."
A one bedroom ground floor apartment located near the Broafields area on the outskirts of Exeter city center. The property is currently tenanted.  
"*Guide Price: £140,000 +. Public Auction : Wednesday, 05 April 2023 at , Virtual Livestream Online Auction GET READY TO BID BY VISITING THE AUCTIONEERS WEBSITE GUIDE PRICES & RESERVE PRICES Guide Price
An indication of the seller’s current minimum acceptable price at auct..."
"BEING SOLD VIA PUBLIC AUCTION on the 5th April 2023. A chance to acquire this three bedroom semi-detached property in Wonford in need of a complete renovation and is being sold with no onward chain. Located close to Ludwell Valley Park, the RD&E, local schools and public transport links..."
"A one bedroom top floor flat being sold with no onward chain in a highly central location. A door opens from the communal hallway to the stairs leading into the flat's hallway. The internal accommodation briefly comprises a double bedroom with an attractive outlook over the Cathedral, a bathroom ..."
"This well presented apartment situated in the City Centre is on the ground floor of a secure, modern building close to many local amenities such as shops, bars, restaurants and public transport links plus much more. This property comprises of a light and airy open plan living/kitchen/dining area ..."
"This is a nicely presented and very spacious second floor retirement apartment which was built by McCarthy & Stone. It is in an excellent location with city centre shops and other facilities close at hand. Includes a large sitting room, a kitchen and two spacious bedrooms as well as an excellent ..."
A well proportioned ground floor apartment in an attractive period building forming part of this popular retirement development close to local amenities and Exeter city centre. Spacious lounge/dining room. Kitchen. Shower/wet room. Large double bedroom (previously two bedrooms which could easi...
"1/2-BEDROOM PARK HOME IN A GOOD ORDER THROUGHOUT. SITUATED IN THE POPULAR NEWPORT PARK. LOVELY GARDEN, SIZEABLE LOUNGE AND CLOSE TO ALL AMENITIES. Situation At Newport Park there is a strong community spirit a neighbourly caring without being obtrusive. Nestling in the gentle cur (cont.)"
"A highly desirable move-in-ready apartment situated in central Exeter. With one spacious bedroom, an open-plan kitchen/diner, a cosy lounge, a three-piece bathroom and a rear garden. This property represents a rare find for any discerning buyer."
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN - This city centre studio apartment comprising of fitted kitchen, lounge, bedroom, bath/shower room. Situated in the popular location of Isca Place development in the heart of Exeter. This modern studio apartment is ideally located close to Exeter Unive..."
"This lovely ground floor apartment is situated in an enviable position at Mowbray Court, one of Exeter’s most popular retirement developments close to Heavitree shopping centre, the Royal Devon & Exeter Hospital, Heavitree pleasure park and bus stop providing frequent service to and from the city..."
"A well-positioned double unit PARK HOME situated in Rydon park. Boasting 2 double bedrooms, a large kitchen with a patio door, spacious living / dining area and a bathroom with a bath and shower overhead. Surrounding the home has pretty gardens and there is communal parking near by. NO CHAIN."
"A well-appointed first-floor studio apartment occupying a highly convenient central position within easy walking distance of the vibrant Princesshay Shopping Centre, Exeter High Street, and the Southernhay Business District. The flat is accessible by both stairs and a lift to the first floor. "
"Notice Of Offer : Property Address: 36 Marcus House, New North Road, Exeter, EX4 4JN.  We advise that an offer has been made for the above property in the sum of £106,000. Any persons wishing to increase on this offer should notify the agents o..."
Wonderfully presented 2 bedroom second floor retirement apartment in Exeter ***CHAIN FREE*** Comprises of: Warm and welcoming entrance hallway Bright and airy living room Good size and well appointed kitchen Master double bedroom with built-in wardrobes
"Notice Of Offer: Property Address: 54 Marcus House, New North Road, Exeter, EX4 4JN. We advise that an offer has been made for the above property in the sum of £110,000. Any persons wishing to increase on this offer should notify the agents of their best offer prior..."
"2 bedroom retirement property. Quiet location, city centre location, off road parking"
"A two bedroom second floor retirement flat situated close to all amenities that Heavitree and Exeter have to offer. Fore Street in Heavitree includes restaurants, post office, pharmacy, supermarket and public transport. The property benefits from a llift communal lounge, laundry and communal Gard..."
"GUIDE PRICE £110,000. New to market is this well situated park home on the popular Newport Park, boasting ample links to local amenities and easy access to Exeter's City Centre and the historical harbour village of Topsham. The property itself comprises of a good sized double bedroom, a we..."
"A TWO BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT Montpelier Court set in the St David's district of Exeter, was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 35 properties arranged over 3 floors served by a lift. The resident Development Manager can be contacted from vari..."
"PERFECT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - This stunning purpose built studio apartment has an open plan living room, kitchen and bedroom. The flat has lovely French doors and a balcony."
"EXTREMELY MOTIVATED SELLERS. A beautiful, two bedroom first floor retirement home, located in Central Exeter, with all amenities on your doorstep. Offered to the market with no onward chain. "
"A modern two bedroom, detached park home located in the sought after Exonia Park in Higher St Thomas. The park home is modern throughout and is just over 20 years old. Offered to the market with no onward chain. "
"A spacious first floor flat located in a popular retirement complex near the city centre. The property has two bedrooms, a living room, kitchen and shower room. There is parking, communal grounds and the added benefit of no onward chain. "
"A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT LOCATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR Montpelier Court set in the St David's district of Exeter, was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 35 properties arranged over 4 floors served by a lift. The resident Development Manager can be cont..."
"Cooksleys are proud to bring to the market a refurbished top floor studio apartment. Ideal for first time buyers and investors. Situated within easy walking distance to the city centre and local amenities. The property benefits from a large lounge/bedroom, kitchen, shower room and is offered for ..."
"A ground floor one bedroom retirement property located in a private and quiet location in Heavitree, close to the local shops, doctors surgery, pharmacy, the RD&E and public transport links. Comprising of a good size lounge dining room with a door opening on to the stunning communal gardens, ..."
"***Please read general & lease information plus shared ownership below*** Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this great opportunity to purchase a 40% shared ownership, 2 bedroom mid terraced property with enclosed rear garden, two double bedrooms, modern bathroom and modern fitted kit..."
An opportunity to acquire a stylish third floor purpose built apartment occupying a highly convenient position close to Exeter city centre. Spacious living accommodation presented in good decorative order throughout. Two good size bedrooms. Reception hall. Lounge/dining room. Covered balcony. ...
"Location
The site is located near Countess Wear Exeter, situated near the River Exe with easy access to Riverside Valley Park adjacent to the new Taylor Wimpey Riverside Walk development. Description
The site is shown edged red on the plan and is approximately 773m2 (0.19 acres). The boundary o..."
"A one bedroom, top floor apartment in the popular apartment complex of Kinnerton Court. The apartment offers open plan living/dining and kitchen area, double bedroom and bathroom with shower"
"A ground floor apartment set in tranquil grounds and next to the popular Belmont Park. The property benefits from delightful communal grounds, parking, Communal lounge and a Development manager. The apartment is bright and airy with modern fitted kitchen and shower room"
"*BEING SOLD VIA MODERN METHOD OF SALE* see bottom of description for more details. New to the market is this ground floor studio apartment located in the City Centre and only a stone throw from Central Station, local ameneties, shops, bars and restaurants. The apartment is a modern ope..."
A well presented second floor retirement flat for occupants aged sixty and over.Situated in the popular South Block with an aspect over the recreational park and southerly views across the city.Benefits from night storage heating and upvc...
"We are proud to offer this One Bedroom Second Floor Retirement Flat – GUIDE PRICE £90,000-£100,000 - all interest and OFFERS are INVITED."
"ATTENTION INVESTORS! This property is for sale by conditional online auction, powered by Bamboo Auctions. Place a bid on by 1pm on Tuesday 28th March 2023. Spacious 1 bed top floor flat close to the historic Iron Bridge & a short walk from the City..."
"Guide Price £90,000 - £100,000. Located in Heavitree, only a short walk to the shops, bus stops, RD&E and other amenities. This one bedroom first floor apartment is serviced by an elevator located in this popular retirement development offering a range of onsite facilities i..."
"Cooksleys are pleased to bring to the Market this well-presented one-bedroom first floor retirement apartment within a popular residential block, close to the City Centre. The property offers the services of a Warden and has the benefit of a lovely communal lounge and also a communal laundry. Th..."
1 BEDROOM | GROUND FLOOR | BEAUTIFUL GARDENS | COMMUNAL AREAS | NO-CHAIN | HIGHLY CONVENIENT POSITION | ***BUY TO LET ONLY*** Purplebricks are delighted to bring to market this well presented one bedroom ground floor retirement apartment for over 60s in a highly convenient position close to Exe...
"A well presented one bedroom ground floor retirement apartment with stunning communal gardens. The accommodation comprises lounge with archway through to the kitchen, bedroom with fitted wardrobes, bathroom and useful storage cupboard. Located in the popular location of St Thomas just a short wal..."
"Underhill Estate Agents are proud to bring to the market this well presented, CHAIN FREE one bedroom retirement property for the over 60's in the popular development of Homeclyst House, Alphington Road, Exeter. Close to the city centre, transport links and amenities, this well maintained property..."
"A ground floor purpose built retirement apartment occupying a level position providing good access to local shops, public transport, and Exeter Quayside. Reception hall. Lounge/dining room. Kitchen. Double bedroom. Bathroom. Communal facilities include lift, residents lounge, laundry room, gue..."
LOVELY 1 BEDROOMED RETIREMENT APARTMENT Representing truly excellent value for money is this well presented 1 bedroomed retirement apartment. The property forms part of this modern development within easy reach of the City Centre and with an aspect towards the University grounds. The p...
An opportunity to acquire a purpose built retirement flat occupying a fabulous central position within walking distance to Exeter City Centre. Lounge/Dining room. Kitchen. Hallway. Double bedroom. Bathroom. Pleasant outlook over communal garden. Resident Manager. Security entrance phone system...
"A first floor retirement flat, situated close in the city centre with lovely views and access to the high street. The property has one double bedroom, a large living room, kitchen and bathroom. Internal modernisation is required and there is no onward chain."
** Four Bedroom Detached Family Home ** No Onward Chain ** Spacious Accommodation ** Enclosed Garden ** Integral Garage & Driveway ** Popular Location ** Call To View:
A newly converted Grade II Listed building offering 14 one and two bedroom apartments that provide a perfect ready-made buy to let investment in Gloucester.
"Proudly presented to you by Move Estate Agents: INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY, development consisting of 9 x 1 bedroom & 3 x 2 bedroom newly refurbished apartments in two adjoining blocks. All of the properties are currently vacant pending completion. This block should deliver somewhere in the region of..."
"A STYLISH AND SPACIOUS MODERN FAMILY HOME IN A UNIQUE LOCATION ON BRICKHAMPTON COURT GOLF COMPLEX, IDEALLY LOCATED FOR COMMUTING TO CHELTENHAM AND GLOUCESTER, WITH 5 BEDROOMS, GAMES ROOM, GYM, HOME OFFICE, STUDIO, LOVELY ENCLOSED GARDEN AND GATED DRIVEWAY Reception Hall, Kitchen/Breakfas..."
"GRADE II LISTED SEVEN BEDROOM COUNTRY HOUSE with a DETACHED ANNEXE sitting within 4.28 ACRES OF GARDENS, PADDOCK and WOODLAND."
"A compact equestrian property located between Cheltenham and Gloucester. Set back from the lane behind an established boundary and tall gates, Little Woodfields is a superb equestrian smallholding that comprises 6.4 acres of fenced paddocks that includes a canter track, a 5 box stable barn (feed..."
"Hunters are delighted to offer this large imposing 7 bedroom semi detached period home, boosting much charm and character over 4 floors. There is an annexe to the lower ground floor level, providing further bedrooms/reception rooms, also there is an external staircase which leads to the first flo..."
"Standing in a quarter acre plot, this late Victorian detached house offers attractive and generously-proportioned accommodation and is presented in exceptional order having been extensively renovated by the present owners."
** Rarely Available Smallholding ** Four Bedroom Detached Bungalow with 8 Acres Of Agricultural Land ** Stables & Outbuildings ** Popular Village Location ** Spacious Accommodation Finished To A Superb Standard Throughout ** Call To View:
Elegance decadence and style best describe this spacious family residence which enjoys a generous size plot along with flexible living accommodation and an enclosed swimming pool.
A QUITE EXCEPTIONAL property on the higher slopes of Robinswood Hill being an architected designed BARN CONVERSION and self contained DETACHED ANNEX with gardens close to 1/2 acre. Number 34 is situated on the higher slopes of Robinswood Hill on Matson Lane with impressive views across the Sev...
"Built circa 1880 for a Harley Street specialist, KJT Residential are pleased to offer for sale this iconic home situated on sought after North Upton Lane, the property is in need of some cosmetic updating but offers huge scope for improvement and develpment, the property benefits from 6 double be..."
Stunning five-bedroom detached executive family home located in the exclusive  Staunton Hills development of high-quality properties built by Swan Homes in 2002 & enveloped by circa 11 acres of land jointly owned by the occupants.
"Situated on approx. 1/2 an acre, this stunning detached family home benefits from 360 degree gardens, a gated driveway, garage and parking for many cars. Internally the property benefits from high-end fixtures and fittings throughout. Downstairs offers a stunning open plan kitchen-dine..."
"An exclusive and luxury development of just five brand new, 4 bedroom detached homes in the lovely Gloucestershire village of Churchdown by the innovative Remico properties."
"A home of stunning quality and space in abundance. The flexible accommodation would suit those with extended families with the massively extended accommodation comprising of 5 bedrooms, 2 luxury en-suites and walk in wardrobes, a home office and breathtaking kitchen/diner/family space of over ..."
"A beautifully presented detached family home, which is situated in a desirable no-through road and boasts an impressive five bedrooms and ample living space. This period property has been occupied by the current owners for over 35 years and has been extended and lovingly maintained whilst ke..."
"Situated on the slopes of Robinswood Hill, this modern townhouse offers immaculately presented and generous family living over three storeys with ample parking, a lawned garden and superb views over Gloucester and beyond."
"Murdock & Wasley Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the open market this 1920's extended and detached family home situated in a popular and sought after location. The property has been substantially extended and modernised by its current owners and now offers spacious, versatile and beauti..."
"This superbly presented 4-bedroom detached property has been recently extended and renovated to exacting detail to provide a family home of exceptional quality and offered to the market chain free. This family house has completely new plumbing and electrical systems, including datapoi..."
SUBSTANTIAL GEORGIAN GRADE 11 LISTED SIX BEDROOM FOUR RECEPTION ROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY situated in an excellent position opposite Gloucester Park.
This truly stunning detached four bedroom home on the highly desirable Upton Close has undergone considerable improvement over the last few years and comes to the market for only the second time. A large driveway leads to the front door and into a spacious entrance hall. A dual aspect living ...
"Simply Stunning!
Situated on a large plot and backing onto Brickhampton Golf Course, this is an amazing opportunity to purchase this sumptuous 4 double bedroom family home in this sought after location. The fantastic family home comprises - "
"A number of shops, bars and restaurants are available along Llanthony Road , Gloucester Quays Shopping Centre is next to the property, Arranged to provide a Ground Floor Retail Unit and Four x self contained 2 Bedroom Flats over the First and Second Floors, Ground Floor Retail Unit subject to a 1..."
"Move Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this exciting new development in the village of Twigworth on the outskirts of Gloucester. Twigworth enjoys the comfort of rural living whilst also being just a short drive to Gloucester City centre with a wealth of shopping, leisure and e..."
"This is a wonderful four bedroom detached property set on a sizable plot on Barnwood Road, Gloucester. The property would make an ideal family home and comprises:- Entrance porch which leads into the living room/diner (this also has a very useful separate study area) there also a downstairs WC, s..."
"Being sold via Secure Sale online bidding. Terms & Conditions apply. This property will be legally prepared enabling any interested buyer to secure the property immediately once their bid/offer has been accepted. Ultimately a transparent process which provides speed, security and certainty fo..."
"This spacious home is set just off Estcourt Road in Longlevens and so offers convenient access to the local shops, schools and amenities as well the city centre, the A40 and the M5."
"SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - HIGH SPECIFICATION - AMPLE PARKING Rarely available is such a beautifully presented bungalow. The property is located in the village of Churchdown and offers landscaped and private gardens, ample driveway parking with garage. FULL VIRTUAL TOUR ONLINE"
"The Richmond is an attractive double-fronted, FIVE BEDROOM home with plenty of kerb appeal which you'll get to enjoy every time you arrive home. The spacious hallway leads to an impressive open plan kitchen/diner, which comes with a TRIPLE ASPECT GARDEN ROOM, so natural light will flood in."
"*** RARLEY AVAILABLE, GENEROUS SIZE, 4 BEDROOM DETACHED CHALET BUNGALOW, STUNNING REAR GARDEN *** This rarely available, 4 bedroom detached chalet bungalow situated on an expansive corner plot within Hucclecote, is now offered to the market for sale! The property has been extremely well maintaine..."
"A four bedroom red brick cottage that has been extended historically and is now at a stage where one can apply their own stamp to the home. Offered for sale with no onward chain, the property sits within a mature garden of one acre. Full of charm and character, viewing is highly recommended"
"A smartly presented, dormer style bungalow, offering excellent accommodation finished to a high specification. Ty Coch is located within a private road, bordering open fields and having far reaching views across a large plot. It is certainly an attractive home providing excellent famil..."
"An exclusive development of just 2 semi detached NEW BUILD bungalows are offered for sale by the multi award winning local developer Cape Homes. No 1 Vizard Place has light and airy accommodation throughout and offers 3 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, 2 with ensuites, large sitting room and a stunning OPEN PLA..."
"Situated towards the end of a residential cul-de-sac, this 5 bedroom detached ""David Wilson"" home offers attractively proportioned and generous accommodation but with scope for extension or alteration."
A brand new 3 bedroom semi detached bungalow situated along this quiet no-through road.
*** FIVE DOUBLE BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME ON A FANTASTIC PLOT ON LONGFORD LANE*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS offer for sale this exceptional size home with two separate driveways located in a highly desirable position. The accommodation has been in the current family for many year...
An individual DETACHED BUNGALOW which has not just been renovated but COMPLETELY REBUILT in the current ownership over the last 2 years. Innsworth Lane is a very popular residential road of predominantly individual properties approximately 1 ¼ mile to the North East of Gloucester City ...
"Situated on a sizeable plot, this property benefits from 360 degree gardens, a garage, an in and out driveway and gated entrance. Located on the edge of a quiet road on the outskirts of Churchdown Village, this property is positioned perfectly for those looking for close access to Cheltenham, Glo..."
"Situated within the ever popular and peaceful village location of Hempsted, this immaculately presented and charming five bedroom detached family home is positioned on a generous sized plot. Further benefitting from generous ground floor accommodation, private & enclosed rear garden, detached dou..."
"STAR BUY! £10,000 towards moving costs and carpets included!* SHOW HOME APPOINTMENTS NOW AVAILABLE! Quality, Service and Value For Money – experience the ‘Cotswold Homes’ Difference’. All-inclusive specification. NO HIDDEN EXTRAS! "
"Welcome to Brookthorpe Park, an Exclusively Private community of just thirteen 3-bedroom semi-detached and terraced homes and six 4-bedroom detached homes enviably perched on the edge of The Cotswolds in a leafy, village setting."
"HOME 133, THE MAPLE II - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. The Maple is a spacious home with superior styling, which certainly gives it the wow-factor. Downs..."
"A spacious and rarely available, five double bedroom, family home which is located in the popular residential area of Barnwood. This property has generous living accommodation throughout with ample off-road parking and to the rear, a good sized and enclosed garden."
"Situated within the ever popular village location of Hempsted, this immaculately presented modern five bedroom detached family home is positioned on the newly built Newland Homes development. Boasting generous living accommodation throughout, off-road parking for multiple vehicles and stunning vi..."
"Four double bedroom family home, situated on Estcourt Road. On entry to the property you are welcomed by a large hallway that offers access to the utility room, downstairs cloakroom and integral double garage. This then leads to the 'heart of the home' living/kitchen/dining area, the ..."
" This Nicely presented, extended family home is situated in the desirable and popular area of Longford Lane, Gloucester. This property offers ample amounts of space and would make the perfect home for a family to enjoy. This property is situated withing walking distance of Longle..."
"EweMove Gloucester Exclusive - A magnificent detached home spanning over 2000 sqft on the popular Cotswold Chase development, overlooking the Cricket Ground. With 5 double bedrooms, 3 bathrooms, 2 receptions, a study and a double garage, this is one not to be missed. Call Now 24/7 to view!"
"Situated in a small close of homes in the popular village location of Maisemore is this four bedroom, detached family home which has been lovingly updated by the current owner. The property itself boasts ample living space to include a large welcoming entrance hall, cloakroom, kitchen ..."
"HOME 186, THE MAPLE II - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. OPEN PLAN KITCHEN WITH FAMILY/DINING AREA & BI-FOLD DOORS The Maple is a spacious 1790sqft hom..."
An EXTENDED 1930's DETACHED FAMILY HOME in one of Gloucester's most popular treelined residential roads with LARGE SOUTH BACKING gardens to the rear. Estcourt Road is one of Gloucester's most sought after treelined residential roads situated just to the North of the City centre. Some of the ...
"Positioned in the peaceful cul-de-sac of Crescentdale in the popular residential location of Longford, this property has much to offer prospective buyers. With generous living accommodation, an enclosed rear garden and a driveway with parking for two vehicles, viewing is highly advised for both r..."
"**** RARELY AVAILABLE, FIVE BEDROOM, DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH DOUBLE GARAGE **** The Property Centre are delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this executive FIVE BEDROOM detached home in the ever popular city suburb of ABBEYMEAD. Within close proximity to local amenities, regular b..."
"Gloucestershire Property Online are thrilled to market this stunning four double bedroom executive detached home, positioned within the sought after 'Hunts Grove' development in Hardwicke. Constructed in 2020 by David Wilson Homes to 'The Chelworth' design, this property is immaculately presented..."
"Introducing The Weaver, a popular home comprising a detached double garage, a dual-aspect living room with french doors, open-plan kitchen/dining/family area with utility, two en-suites and a dressing area to bedroom 1. "
"The Property Centre are delighted to bring to the market this individually built detached family home which has been extended by the current owners and offers generous accommodation throughout. Accommodation comprises of an entrance hall. four reception rooms,16ft kitchen/breakfast room, ut..."
"This one of a kind spacious and truly unique barn conversion is set within the village of Twigworth which benefits from a semi-rural position with the convenience of quick and easy access to Tewkesbury, Gloucester and Cheltenham. The Barn is bursting with character yet offers the facilities desir..."
A well presented individually designed bungalow built in 1998 is offered with no onward chain and is nestled at the end of a private driveway.
"A premium 5-bedroom detached family home, the Garrton offers plenty of space for day to day living as well as relaxing and entertaining"
"Move Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this well presented, five bedroom detached home on this ever popular Cranham Gate in Hucclecote. The house offers open plan living for the modern family along with separate reception rooms for when needs must. Entering through the front ..."
A large DETACHED FAMILY HOME built approximtaley 4 years ago in a BETTER THAN NEW CONDITION New Dawn View is a small cul de sac of properties that were built approximately 4 years ago situated just off the Stroud Road approximately 2 miles to the South of Gloucester City centre. Some of the a...
"The Fletcher is a large five-bedroom family home offering an amazing amount of flexible living space and a garage and additional parking. This gorgeous 3-storey, 5-bedroom home could accommodate a large family, with room to spare. The kitchen/dining/living space, runs the entire rea..."
*** A FANTASTIC FAMILY HOME LOCATED IN AN EXCEPTIONALLY POPULAR POSITION*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to welcome NEW TO THE MARKET this eye catching family home tucked on Green Pippin close. The accommodation offers fantastic living space on both floors & early viewing...
"CHAIN FREE! Gloucestershire Property Online are delighted to offer this 4 bedroom executive detached house located on the Bristol Road in Quedgeley. This stunning house has been refurbished throughout and comprises; Entrance hall, cloakroom, playroom/ study, lounge, dining room,..."
"Situated on a quiet development of quality homes, this stylish, executive, detached home is well positioned. The property has been finished to a very high specification and is beautifully and tastefully presented throughout. Offering the perfect finished article ready to move into. Viewing highly..."
"THREE BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW ON A CORNER PLOT IN A EXCEPTIONAL LOCATION! We are delighted to welcome new to the open market this rarely available bungalow located on Harness Close, a sought after cul-de-sac in Hempsted. The accommodation offers generous living space & comprises of: En..."
"Murdock & Wasley Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the open market this delightful four bedroom detached arts and crafts home built in 1938. Offering spacious accommodation with a wealth of character features, master bedroom with en-suite and enclosed mature garden, we feel this property ..."
"An EXCEPTIONAL EXAMPLE of a THREE BEDROOM GRADE II LISTED DETACHED THATCHED COTTAGE dating back to the mid 1700's, having undergone a REAR AND RIDGE RE-THATCH IN 2022, carrying an ABUNDANCE OF CHARACTER AND CHARM to include FIREPLACES, EXPOSED BEAMS and ELM FLOORING, LARGE GARDENS of APPROXIMATEL..."
"AN IMMACULATELY PRESENTED 4 BED FAMILY HOME WITH ENCLOSED PRIVATE GARDEN, DOUBLE GARAGE AND PARKING, JUST MINUTES FROM HUCCLECOTE GREEN CONSERVATION AREA AND WITHIN EASY COMMUTING DISTANCE OF CHELTENHAM AND GLOUCESTER Reception Hall, Kitchen/Breakfast Room, Utility Room, Sitting Room, Di..."
"A Beautifully maintained and LARGE DETACHED house on this very popular development Gambier Parry Gardens, built in the mid 1980's by Bryant Homes, is one of the City's most popular small developments that is not only well positioned but also has beautifully matured. Gloucester City centre is ..."
With over 160 sq metres (1700 sq ft) of living space this older style family home is situated in a secure gated development at the end of a private drive and close to Ribston Hall and The Crypt schools. The Property It will be hard to find a 3/4 bedroom detached home that offers such substant...
"Stunning detached period property situated on a small select development of just five properties with a double garage. The double glazed entrance doors gives access to the porch which leads to the 14ft hallway with stairs leading to the first floor, to the left you have a generous lounge..."
"This attractive period property is tucked away down a private drive with just 4 other houses. It's located off the Stroud Road in Gloucester, meaning it has great access to local schools (Ribston, Crypt & St Peter's) as well as the city centre, local shops and the M5."
"PLEASE QUOTE REF LH0563; A double fronted, 1920s detached home situated in an exclusive private devleopment of only 5 properties. Offering versatile living space, with two reception room, kitchen, seprate utility room on the ground floor with three double bedrooms, a family bathroom and separa..."
"Taylors Estate Agents welcome to the market this executive five bedroom detached property set in the sought after development of Hunts Grove, Hardwicke. This beautiful family home offers spacious accommodation throughout and boasts three separate receptions rooms, five double bedrooms..."
"HOME 187, THE ORCHARD II - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. Open-plan kitchen/dining area with bi-fold doors to rear garden. A spacious 1600sqft home with a..."
"The Cottingham is a gorgeous 2-storey, 4-bedroom home with garage and additional parking. The kitchen/dining/family area, running the entire rear width of the house, with two windows and double doors leading out to a garden. There is also a separate utility room. The living room featur..."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is this recently built detached Taylor Wimpey home which is beautifully presented throughout, with various upgrades and a south facing rear garden. This deceptively spacious five bedroom family home is arranged over three floors and briefly consis..."
PROPERTY HAS A VIDEO: Extended Detached Bungalow l Sought After Churchdown Village l Three Bedrooms l 26' (max) Living Room l Kitchen (range style cooker) l 13'6 Utility l Multiple Vehicle Parking l Private Rear Garden
Andrews are pleased to offer this immaculate four bedroom detached home to the market located in Longford.
"The Knightley is a beautifully designed double fronted 4 bedroom detached family home. The well-thought-out 'L' shape of the ground floor means that both the living room and the kitchen/dining room provide direct access, though French doors, into the garden. The ground floor has t..."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^***Situated on an exclusive development in a sought-after VILLAGE LOCATION on the outskirts of GLOUCESTER, the Goldsmith home benefits from a detached GARAGE, OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining area with UTILITY and dedicated dining room."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** The Philosopher boasts an open-plan kitchen/dining/family area with adjoining utility room and french doors to the rear garden, a dedicated study/home office, an en-suite to bedroom 1 and a detached single garage. "
"**** FIVE BEDROOM, MODERN, DETACHED HOUSE IN PROMINENT ABBEYMEAD LOCATION **** The Property Centre are delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this well-proportioned detached family home which is position in a quiet cul-de-sac in the sought after residential suburb of Abbeymead. <..."
"An exciting opportunity to purchase the last remaining property on this exclusive development site of just 13 homes. Beechwood House is a beautifully designed large modern three storey four bedroom home featuring an impressive second floor master bedroom with en-suite, dressing room and study and..."
"SUBSTANTIAL HOUSE WITH LARGE SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN! Dating back to the late 19th century, this impressive five bedroom semi-detached house sits on a large plot and offers an exciting opportunity to update and create a lovely family home to a purchasers specific taste.  Through a porc..."
"The Property Centre are delighted to offer 'For Sale' this generous four bedroom detached home in the ever popular suburb of Hucclecote. Tucked away in a residential cul de sac with no through road, the property is within a short driving distance of local amenities and transport links to Glouces..."
"**MUST BE VIEWED** Situated in a cul de sac position in sought after Millfields Hucclecote, KJT Residential are pleased to offer for sale this substantial detached family home, the property benefits from 4 double bedrooms, 21ft living room, 21ft fitted kitchen/breakfast room, family bathroom and ..."
"Encompassed by dazzling countryside, under 6 miles away from CHELTENHAM, The Goldsmith is a beautifully designed home which benefits from a detached GARAGE, OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining area with UTILITY and dedicated dining room. This home is BRAND NEW and CHAIN FREE. "
Located in a popular position with little passing traffic this detached bungalow is well set back from the road and has good size front and rear gardens and could be extended subject to any required permissions and consents. The Property All the accommodation is accessed directly from the ce...
"Located just 15 minutes' drive from CHELTENHAM, The Camellia is a MODERN detached home with a detached GARAGE, plus a STUDY, an OPEN-PLAN kitchen dining area spanning the width of the property, with adjoining UTILITY and FRENCH DOORS, a separate front-facing lounge and EN-SUITE to bedroom 1"
A modern detached house standing in a generous plot in the sought after community of Upton St. Leonards offering scope for a new owner to renovate and improve the property to meet their own requirements.
"A FANTASTIC FAMILY HOME!! MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to welcome to the open market this well presented, detached family home located on Estcourt close, a sought after small development within walking distance of the city centre. The accommodation offers generous living ..."
"HOME 188, THE ASPEN - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. A modern take on a traditional design, this is a home you'll love coming home to. The front-facing ..."
Stunning and versatile four bedroom family home with double garage in private abbeymead cul de sac location. Early Viewing Advised!
"A traditional 4-bedroom detached family home, the Sunford offers plenty of space for day to day living as well as relaxing and entertaining."
"Situated just a 15 minutes' drive from CHELTENHAM and 10 minutes' drive from GLOUCESTER, the Philosopher is the perfect family home. Featuring a detached SINGLE GARAGE, a generous OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining/family area with UTILITY, a HOME OFFICE, separate lounge, and EN-SUITE to master bedroom. "
The Property Centre is delighted to present this lovingly extended David Wilson built four bedroom detached home in the sought cul de sac of Peregrine close in the popular area of Green Farm in Quedgeley. The property is close to the Gloucester and Sharpness canal. The accommodation co...
"*** AN EXCEPTIONAL EXTENDED DETACHED FAMILY HOME ON A CORNER PLOT IN LONGLEVENS*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to offer to the market this beautifully presented property which offers fantastic living space along with a stylish, modern finish throughout. The accommod..."
"*** BEAUTIFULLY APPOINTED TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM HOME*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS welcome to the market this very well presented end terrace property located at the end of Carmarthen street. The accommodation comprises of: Entrance hallway with original flooring, lounge/diner, mod..."
"The Property Centre are delighted to bring this stunning, four bedroom, detached property to the market. Built by David Wilson to The Holden design, this property is less than two years old and benefits from a range of upgrades including the kitchen. Situated on the Hunts Grove develo..."
A substantial 3/4 bedroom detached house with double garage offered for sale with no onward chain.
Located in a sought after position stands this immaculately presented four bedroom family home which offers flexible living accommodation along with quality finishes throughout and there is a good size outside office/studio ideal for working from home.
"An individual, recently renovated and updated four-bedroom, period detached family home located in the sought-after location of Barnwood Avenue overlooking open fields. Viewing is highly recommended to see all that this property has to offer."
" A quite exceptional and substantial Victorian SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOUSE in a prominent and convenient position Sandhurst Road is a popular residential road situated just off Kingsholm Road less than half a mile to the north of Gloucester’s city centre. Excellent local shopping, some o..."
"*** EXCEPTIONAL FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME ON BARNWOOD AVENUE WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to welcome to the open market this beautifully presented, bay fronted detached property located in an exceptionally popular location. The accommodatio..."
"Offered for sale is this detached, four-bedroom family home which has been loved and extended by one careful owner from new. It is situated in a highly convenient location, approximately 3 miles from the city centre, with good local amenities, supermarkets, excellent schools close by, also within..."
"Rarely available open plan four bedroom family home located on within The Wheatridge East, Upton St. Leonards! The accommodation in brief for the ground floor comprises of; Entrance hall, living room, dining room, kitchen & w.c. On the top floor we have; four bedrooms and family bathroom. Fu..."
"This beautifully presented 4 bedroom detached home is ideally situated in a cul de sac position in Abbeymead. The current owners have created a family home for socialising, entertaining and versatile layout for those needing to work from home with two spaces being used for this purpose alre..."
An INDIVIDUAL VICTORIAN DETACHED family home of substantial proportions in a very popular treelined residential road IN NEED OF SOME INTERNAL REFURBISHMENT Hinton Road is a very popular treelined road situated just off Lansdown and Denmark Road situated ½ mile to the North of Gloucester...
** Four Bedroom Detached Family Home Situated In A Popular & Sought After Location with No Onward Chain. ** Enclosed Garden and Garage ** Open Plan Living Space & Conservatory ** Call To View:
"**OPEN HOUSE VIEWINGS AVAILABLE; SATURDAY 18TH FROM 2PM - GET IN TOUCH TO BOOK YOUR SLOT** I am delighted to present to the market this fabulously well located family home, on the outer edge of the exceptionally popular Hunts Grove development. The home overlooks a play area and provides outst..."
Chain Free Victorian detached family home located at the end of an exclusive cul-de-sac commanding a sizeable plot that would benefit from some modernisation. An attractive older style home that oozes character and curb appeal. Your viewing starts from an enclosed storm porch & entrance...
"**READY TO MOVE IN TO** Set in a sought-after village location less than 3 miles from Gloucester city centre, The Luthier is a beautiful new home featuring an open-plan kitchen/dining/family area with french doors to the rear garden, a study, en-suite to bedroom 1 and a detached single garage. "
Situated within the heart of the popular residential area of Hempsted on the newly established Bellway development of Sandalwood Green. The Luthier is a four bedroom detached home benefitting from generous and flexible living accommodation aswell as a driveway and detached single garage. Viewing ...
"A traditional 4-bedroom detached family home, the Manford offers plenty of space for day to day living as well as relaxing and entertaining"
"A family home in the popular location of Barnwood with a fantastic 70ft South Facing Garden. With great access to local amenities, excellent schools and transport links. This Four-bedroomed detached home on a corner plot in a quiet spot could be the one for Ewe. Book a viewing Now with EweMove!"
"**** MODERN, FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE, IN PROMINENT BARNWOOD LOCATION WITH SUBSTANTIAL ENCLOSED GARDEN **** The Property Centre are delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this versatile and spacious four-bedroom detached family home. Occupying a fantastic plot and enjoying a subst..."
"Situated in the heart of CHURCHDOWN VILLAGE, INNISFAIL is a 4/5 bedroom DETACHED BUNGALOW that is being presented to the market for the first time in over 30 years. Offering flexible accommodation throughout the property further benefits GARAGE and DRIVEWAY and a FULLY ENCLOSED rear garden"
"Stunning four bedroom, three story family home, offered to the market with no onward chain and situated on the ever popular Church Road in Longlevens. The property is beatufully presented throughout and offers a wealth of space for its new owners to enjoy. **REF**  LC0510
"
DETACHED BUNGALOW -THREE BEDROOMS -HIGH SPECIFICATION - CHAIN FREE Located within a secluded and small development of just three detached bungalows is this modern detached bungalow built in 2022. - FULL VIRTUAL TOUR ONLINE
"Taylors Estate Agents welcome to the market this five bedroom detached character property located in Sandhurst Road, Gloucester. This Spacious character property originally built around 1873 really is the perfect family home. The property boasts original period features throughout incl..."
This is a FANTASTIC opportunity to purchase a 4 DOUBLE bedroom family home. The property is located in the semi rural location of Minsterworth and comes with a LARGE rear garden. This home has already been extended over the years but still offers lots of potential of extending (subject to the rel...
"The Property Centre is delighted to offer for sale this well presented executive four bedroom detached house situated in the very sought after Daleswharf development, Hardwicke. The property is built by Robert Hitchins to the 'Frampton' design and being sold with no onward chain. The property is ..."
"A modern detached property tucked away in a desirable cul-de-sac in Barnwood. Accommodation comprises three bedrooms, two bathrooms, a dressing room, an open plan kitchen-living-dining room, a utility room and a garage. Upon entering the property, the hallway offers wood effect flooring that f..."
"New to the market is a spacious detached bungalow on a generous size corner plot, situated in a highly convenient location in Churchdown Village. The property briefly consists of a porch, cloakroom, large light and airy living room which opens up into a dining room, with patio doors ov..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to present to the market this beautifully presented three bedroom detached bungalow with separate garage located in the desirable area of Churchdown village. Accommodation comprises of a kitchen, lounge, conservatory, family bathroom, en-suite shower room and thre..."
"The Hatherleigh is an attractive four bedroom DETACHED home, with flexible OPEN PLAN living spaces for growing families. The ground floor includes a large lounge with FRENCH DOORS that lead to the garden. The kitchen/diner is sure to become the heart of your family home."
" Immaculate four double bedroom detached family home that is situated on a quiet no through road in Coopers Edge over looking stunning countryside views. In brief the property comprises of; entrance hall, study, downstairs cloak room, spacious lounge/diner, modern fitted kitchen/breakfast r..."
"This good sized detached home is situated in the popular location of Pinery Road, Barnwood. The property is near local bus routes and transport links into Gloucester City Centre. Downstairs the property offers: Entrance hallway, lounge, Conservatory, Kitchen, Utility, Dining room, Dow..."
"**** IMPRESSIVE, DOUBLE FRONTED, FOUR BEDROOM MODERN DETACHED HOUSE IN PRIVATE GATED DEVELOPMENT IN HUCCLECOTE - CHAIN FREE **** The Property Centre are delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this very well appointed MODERN DETACHED family home in the always popular city suburb of Hu..."
"This large four bedroom detached is located in a fantastic spot in Abbeymead and is in need of a little modernisation. It offers a good size accommodation including lounge, dining room, study, WC, kitchen and utility downstairs as well as 4 double bedrooms with family bathroom and ensuite up..."
The property sits in 1/5 acre plot and is located at the end of a private cul-de-sac in Brockworth. It has the feel of a rural property but is within a few hundred metres of Tesco Extra. The home requires some modernisation but is in excellent order and it presents so many further possibilit...
"A beautifully presented, modern, four bedroom detached family house situated in this quiet, sought-after residential area also within walking distance to local schools and ideally located for access to Cheltenham, Gloucester and the M5 motorway network. This loved home offers good living sp..."
*** EXCEPTIONAL FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME WITH COUNTRYSIDE VIEWS*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to welcome to the market this beautiful family home with fantastic curb appeal located in a quiet & popular position. The property itself offers excellent living space &...
"Offered CHAIN FREE to the market, this detached village property built in natural Cotswold stone is ready to move into and boasts smart and well proportioned accommodation with a southerly aspect and picturesque outlook across the surrounding countryside. Character features can be found throughou..."
"Detached family house in a very popular position.
Built in 2007. Four bedrooms with master en-suite. A large family kitchen / dining room. Sitting room overlooking the garden. Gardens, garage and parking. "
"A FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOME with INTEGRAL GARAGE. Ground floor boasts OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM with SEPARATE UTILITY, CLOAKSROOM and a SEPARATE LOUNGE."
"Are you searching for a FOUR bedroom DETACHED home in ABBEYMEAD? This home is just right for a growing family, benefits include a STUDY/bedroom, ENSUITE TO MASTER , downstairs WC and SUNROOM, ample OFF road parking for four vehicles and DOUBLE GARAGE! Situated in a NO THROUGH ROAD."
"This beautifully presented FOUR bedroom family home is on the exclusive development of just eight detached homes and has been owned from new by the current owners since the property was built in 1997. The layout of this home is fantastic for a growing family, benefitting SUN ROOM, separate ut..."
"Privately positioned alongside woodland at the edge of the highly sought after Green Farm development quick viewing is highly advised. Offering four double bedrooms, en-suite to master, flexible reception space and exceptionally generous rear garden alongside off road parking and single garage. V..."
"Built in the 1930's to a very PLEASING DESIGN, the property has been BEAUTIFULLY MODERNISED and imaginatively EXTENDED to give superb family accommodation in a very sought after position. The property has been the subject of complete modernisation and clever extension and now offers individua..."
"Substantial four bedroom detached family home new to our portfolio, situated in a beautiful Abbeymead cul de sac. This stunning family home is in one of Abbeymead’s most sought after locations. The property is also located within walking distance to local school, shops & green fields. The pr..."
"HOME 56, THE PEMBROKE - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. This 4-bedroom home has a substantial kitchen/dining/family area with French doors leading out to t..."
"This beautiful 5 bedrooms detached family home is accessed via a private drive and has fantastic views over open fields to the front. Downstairs consists of a living room, study, kitchen/diner, utility and w.c. Upstairs boasts 5 bedrooms with en suite to master and a family bathroom. The property..."
"Brought to the market for the first time in over thirty years, is this well presented, three bedroom country cottage. With parts of the home dating back to the 17th century, this extended family home boasts a mixture of character features throughout alongside an enviable garden measuring approxi..."
"Brand new & chain free, The Allium is a beautiful family home that combines spacious living with stunning design features. This 4-bedroom home boasts an open-plan kitchen, dining, and family room, a separate living room, four double bedrooms and an en suite to bedroom 1. Book your appointment today!"
BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED! Gloucestershire Property Online are delighted to offer this stunning 3 bedroom semi detached house located on a popular road in Elmbridge. This stylish home has been extended recently to the rear creating 50 square metres of extra living space. The well p...
"This beautifully presented detached property is being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN and is situated in the desireable and sought-after location of Windfall Way, Gloucester. This property has been recently upgraded throughout and continues to be by the current owners and offers ample amounts of space ..."
"Immaculately presented unique three bedroom semi-detached family home with off-road parking for multiple vehicles with the potential for a building plot. The property itself offers generous living accommodation and a potential fourth double bedroom in the converted attic. Deceptively spacious, th..."
"YOPA are pleased to offer this MODERN FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOUSE with GARDEN, GARAGE & DRIVEWAY for sale. This modern and beautifully presented four bedroom detached family house is located in Bluebell Crescent within the sought after Brockworth area with good local facilities, all close at hand."
"HOME 69, THE PEMBROKE - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. This 4-bedroom home has a substantial kitchen/dining/family area with French doors leading out to t..."
** Beautifully Presented & Extended Four Bedroom Semi Detached House ** Master Bedroom with En-Suite ** Open Plan Living Space ** Garage & Off Road Parking ** Popular Location ** Call To View:
The Trusdale is a 4-bedroom property which will appeal to growing families in search of extra space
"HOME 94, THE LEVERTON II - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. Ideal for families, this 4 bed home enjoys a very large, dual aspect kitchen/dining area, separa..."
"EXCEPTIONAL CONDITION THROUGHOUT - EXTENDED - SOUTH FACING GARDEN - GARAGE Located in Hardwicke, built by Crest Nicholson, this extended four bedroom family home is offered for sale in excellent decorative order. Offering a garage, parking and south facing garden, this property is a must view"
"The Property Centre is delighted to offer for sale this executive four bedroom detached house built by David Wilson to the 'Everley' design and situated in the very sought after location of Peregrine close, Green farm. The property is close to the Gloucester and Sharpness canal. The ac..."
"A great four bedroom detached Linden Homes ""Grainger"" situated in a cull de sac location with views over Brockworth Church to the rear. You walk through the front door to a spacious central hallway. Enter the living room at the front of the house, through feature double doors and ..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, this three bedroom bungalow benefits from a very generous sized garden, detached garage and plenty of potential to improve. Accommodation comprises four bedrooms, a kitchen-diner/ breakfast room, bathroom and sitting room. Locate..."
The Property Centre are delighted to bring this four bedroom detached property to the market. Built by Bellway to the Wickford design this property is situated in the popular area of Hardwicke and is close to all local amenities. The downstairs accommodation comprises a spacious entra...
"**** SPACIOUS 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMED DETACHED PROPERTY, HIGHLY DESIRABLE & TUCKED AWAY NON-ESTATE LOCATION, IN NEED OF UPDATING BUT OFFERING FANTASTIC POTENTIAL, CHAIN-FREE, VIEWING COMES HIGHLY RECOMMENDED! **** MICHAEL TUCK ESTATE AGENTS are absolutely delighted to present to the open market..."
"HOME 26, THE JUNIPER - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. Outside, this house has all the character of a traditional home; inside it's everything a 21st Cen..."
"HOME 25, THE JUNIPER - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. Outside, this house has all the character of a traditional home; inside it's everything a 21st Cen..."
"FOUR BEDROOMS - GARAGE WITH DRIVEWAY - EN-SUITE- STUDY 26FT KITCHEN/DINER An exceptional detached family home located in Twigworth benefiting from a study, an impressive 26ft open plan kitchen/diner and a garage with driveway. FULL VIRTUAL TOUR ONLINE"
"A four bedroom detached house set in the sought after Abbeymead area. This family home is situated in a cul de sac just a short walk from local amenities, regular bus service and within easy reach of the M5. This property had planning granted in 2018 (now lapsed) for a double story ex..."
"Positioned in the popular residential location of Hempsted. this detached four double bedroom family home is offered to the market. Boasting generous living accommodation, enclosed rear garden, allocated parking spaces and double garage, this property has much to offer growing families looking fo..."
"FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND E We are delighted to offer to the market this stunning 4-bedroom detached house on Thistlebank in Gloucester. The property presents a well-adapted layout, offering spacious and comfortable accommodation throughout, making it an ideal fa..."
"A beautifully presented 4 bedroom detached house in the sought after area of Highnam village. Gas central heating, double glazed throughout, garage and large block paved driveway with room for several cars."
"**** BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMED DETACHED PROPERTY, HIGHLY DESIRABLE LOCATION, PRESENTED AS BRAND NEW WITH 9 YEARS NHBC REMAINING, 3 BATHROOMS, DETACHED GARAGE, VIEWING IS HIGHLY RECOMMENDED! **** MICHAEL TUCK ESTATE AGENTS are extremely pleased to welcome to the market this gener..."
"With 4 bedrooms, the Coltham is perfect for anyone looking for a home with space for the whole family."
"The Orchards is a unique development of nine, well-proportioned, detached, executive homes in the picturesque village of Minsterworth. The four, three-bedroom homes and five, four-bedroom homes have been thoughtfully designed and constructed using high-quality materials throughout. Built..."
"Substantial four-bedroom detached family home located in a sought-after cul-de-sac of Elmbridge within walking distance of Denmark Road and Thomas Rich's grammar schools and easy access to Cheltenham, Swindon, Oxford & Bristol."
Detached Home l Foor Bedrooms l En-Suite l Re-Fitted Bathroom l Cloakroom l 18´4 Living Rm l Dining Rm l 14´7 Kitchen/Breakfast Rm l Utility l 14'4 Sun Room/Conservatory l Parking l 18'6 Garage l Westerly Facing Garden
"***THREE BEDROOM DETACHED HOME IN QUEDGELEY*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS welcome to the market this attractively priced detached family home in a quiet & popular cul-de-sac in Quedgeley. The accommodation comprises of: Entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen/diner, three bedrooms & bathr..."
Move Estate Agents are pleased to offer this exciting freehold investment opportunity to the market. Consisting of two shops and a five bedroom two story HMO. Being positioned right in the centre of the city and just a few minutes walk to Gloucester Quays this property is ideally located. The ...
"Positioned in the peaceful cul-de-sac location of Hillcot Close in the heart of Quedgeley, this immaculately presented four bedroom detached family home is offered to the market with no onward chain. Further benefitting from flexible ground floor living accommodation, off-road parking and an encl..."
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN, EXCEPTIONALLY SIZED 4 BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE, BEAUTIFUL SUNNY REAR GARDEN, GARAGE *** Michael Tuck Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this spacious and well maintained four bedroom detached family home, located in a sought after cul-de-sac and positioned on a great..."
"*Showhome open to view* The Ophelia is a stunning four bedroom detached home with a single GARAGE, plus an OPEN-PLAN kitchen dining area with adjoining UTILITY and FRENCH DOORS on to the rear garden, a front-facing lounge and EN-SUITE to bedroom 1."
A gorgeous Four Bedroom Detached family home which is only a year old with views to Coopers Hill. Situated on the Perrybrook estate in a cul-de-sac. Offering great access to the motorway
"Located in the Perry Brook development with it's easy access to M5, Cheltenham and Gloucester is this nearly new 4 bedroom well presented ""Trusdale"" built by Taylor Wimpey. Growing families will feel right at home in the spacious home with its four bedrooms and practical grou..."
Spacious FIVE double bedroom detached family home with a DOUBLE GARAGE and TWO EN-SUITES situated in a popular family area. Downstairs accommodation comprises a 21FT LOUNGE with French doors out to the garden. The 24FT FITTED FAMILY KITCHEN/DINER is to the left and gives access to the s...
"An extended four bedroom family home, offering spacious accommodation throughout situated in a very desirable location of Longford lane, Longlevens with an excellent array of nearby amenities including shops, doctors surgery, library and well respected schools. The property sits in a good size p..."
"The Leverton is a stunning 4-bedroom double fronted home with a garage. Inside the spacious kitchen/dining/family area, stretches the entire length of the house. There is also a good-sized utility room that's accessible from the kitchen, with direct access to the garden. The living r..."
"PLEASE QUOTE REF DH0109; Daryl Hill powered by eXp is delighted to offer this stunning family home in the highly desirable and convenient suburb of Hempsted. The impressive home is set in a large plot with double garage and parking, and offers 4 generous bedrooms, with a particularly impressiv..."
Four bedroom link detached family home in Abbeydale offering ample of space and ideally situated
"A 4 bedroom link detached family home being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN and situated in the ever popular OLDBURY ORCHARD in the heart of Churchdown Village. The accommodation consists of 4 bedrooms ( 2 doubles and 2 singles ) and shower room upstairs, whilst downstairs there is a good sized sittin..."
THREE BEDROOM DETACHED family home with EN-SUITE to main bedroom & FAMILY BATHROOM.  The Warwick offers a GENEROUS KITCHEN/DINING area and a SEPARATE LOUNGE.
"Situated just a 15 minutes' drive from CHELTENHAM and 10 minutes' drive from GLOUCESTER, the Scrivener benefits from a detached SINGLE GARAGE, an OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining area with UTILITY, separate lounge with BAY WINDOW, and EN-SUITE to bedroom 1. "
"This detached house is situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac location on the outskirts of Borckworth. The well planned and well presented accommodation boasts an entrance hall, cloakroom, sitting room, separate dining room, kitchen, a good sized garden room, landing, four bedrooms including a 14'1 x ..."
***STUNNING EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN LONGLEVENS* OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO CHAIN** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to welcome to the market this beautifully presented semi detached home located in Longlevens. The accommodation has been completely modernised by th...
"The Property Centre is delighted to offer for sale this good sized four bedroom detached house situated close to the Gloucester and Sharpness canal and is being sold with no onward chain. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen. utility room, cloakroom, ..."
"STUNNING DETACHED HOME, SITUATED IN A POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION? GORGEOUS REAR ENCLOSED GARDENS. THERE IS THE OPTION TO EXTEND TO THE REAR SUBJECT TO THE NECESSARY CONSENT."
"Located on the popular development of Hunts Grove, Hardwicke, is this immaculately presented four double bedroom, detached family home. With generous living accommodation throughout, a private and enclosed rear garden, single garage, and off-road parking for two vehicles, viewing is highly advise..."
"TG SALES & LETTINGS are delighted to welcome to the market, For Sale, this beautiful four-bedroom home built by David Wilson Homes. This property is located within the popular Hunts Grove development and is beautifully presented with views over parkland. Step inside the entrance hall, and you ..."
"This is a fabulous, executive family home which is situated in the Cotswold Chase development offering substantial and well-presented accommodation throughout. The well-proportioned accommodation comprises four bedrooms (master en-suite) and family bathroom on the first floor. The ground floor of..."
" Michael Tuck Estate Agents Quedgeley are pleased to welcome to the market this executive four bedroom detached family home that is situated in Kingsway! In brief the property comprises of; Entrance hall, downstairs cloakroom, study, spacious lounge, dining room, modern fitted kitchen, ut..."
"SPACIOUS 4 BEDROOM DETACHED HOME - HUGE GARDEN & PLOT! What an opportunity to purchase this 4 bedroom, 3 reception home, located at the end of this quiet cul de sac. The property comprises - Entrance Hall - Double glazed door to side aspect. Stairs to first floor with understairs storage cupb..."
"Move Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the market this large executive family home located in ever popular Kingsway. Offering ample living space from it's three reception rooms, as well as good sized bedrooms two with en-suite and a double garage this house is sure to be popular. Enter..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to offer for sale this well presented four bedroom detached house built by Westbury homes to the 'Goodwood' design. The property is set back on a private drive and overlooks the nature reserve. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, cloakroom, loung..."
This is a fantastic opportunity to buy a 4 bedroom detached property in the rural area of Rudford. The home is set on a great sized plot including a double garage and off road parking for multiple vehicles. The rear garden that is owned by the property stretches beyond the current fence boundary ...
*** AN EXCEPTIONAL EXTENDED FAMILY HOME IN HEMPSTED VILLAGE*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to welcome to the market this beautifully presented property located in a highly desirable position. The accommodation offers wonderful living space throughout & early viewing is q...
"The Property Centre are delighted to bring this stunning, four bedroom detached property to the market. Built by Bellway, this property is situated in the popular area of Hardwicke and is close to all local amenities. The downstairs accommodation comprises a spacious entrance hall, cl..."
This is an exceptional example of a 3 bedroom detached family home. The property is located on a quiet road and tucked away behind double gates on a secluded plot. You are close to great primary and secondary schools along with being wihin close proximity to local amenities. Downstairs consists o...
"An EXTENDED DETACHED BUNGALOW in a very convenient but quiet cul de sac Highbank Park is a small cul de sac situated just off the Tewkesbury Road approximately ½ mile to the North of Gloucester City centre. Good schooling, transport facilities  and shopping are close by and acces..."
"Wonderful 4 bedroom detached family home, built on a spacious corner plot by Bellway homes in 2017 in a quiet cul de sac location"
"Welcoming this ideal family home, set within a desirable location. The property features a bright and spacious layout including, two reception rooms, and three double bedrooms with the master benefiting from an en-suite. Externally the accommodation offers private off-road parking and an impres..."
"This stunning extended family home is located in the heart of Longlevens. Rydal road is located close to shops, pubs, schools and other local amenities. Downstairs consists of a living room, w.c and an open plan kitchen/family room with a snug. The first floor boasts 3 bedrooms and a family bathr..."
"**KEY WORKER? SAVE £19,999 AND WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING** SPACIOUS home with open plan kitchen and French doors to the garden. EN SUITE main bedroom, two further double bedrooms and a single. Comes with garage and parking. Plot 21 | The Kingsley | Whittle Gardens | Barratt Homes. Full description..."
"Tucked away at the top of this cul de sac, is this fabulous 4-5 bedroom detached home located in the desirable location of Abbeymead. Perfect for the modern family the property comprises - "
"A SIGNIFICANTLY EXTENDED semi detached house with quite exceptional westerly backing landscaped gardens approcahing 1/3 ACRE. Manor Park is a popular and quiet cul de sac situated just off Nine Elms Road approximately 2 miles to the East of Gloucester City centre, Cheltenham and the M5 is onl..."
"This lovely presented 4 bedroom property is situated in the popular location of Manor Park, Longlevens. This property really is one of a kind and offers a substantially large garden to the rear making it the perfect family home. This property is also offered with no onward chain and offers ample ..."
"Located in this highly desirable Hucclecote location is this 4 bedroom semi detached home, which is in need of some cosmetic updating and would provide a wonderful home. The property, which is within close catchment to highly considered primary schools, multiple local amenities and The King Geor..."
"The Winchester is an impressive four bedroom three storey home, providing plenty of space for modern family life. "
Substantial 1940's family home located in a sought-after Avenue in lovely Longford. Click the Youtube Tour. Large open-plan lounge diner. 148 foot garden with mini orchard. Perfectly located in a quiet no through road adjac...
"*** FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED PROPERTY IN POPULAR ABBEYMEAD LOCATION WITH OWNED SOLAR PANELS, PRIVATE ENCLOSED GARDEN & GARAGE WITH PARKING *** This modern detached family home offers accommodation briefly comprising; entrance hall, living room with dining room to the rear overlooking ..."
"HOME 91, THE MYLNE - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. READY TO MOVE INTO, LOORING & TURF INCLUDED. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. A 4-bed family home which is ideal for entertaining, ..."
EXCEPTIONAL THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED VICTORIAN PROPERTY. The property has been subject to significant modernisation and upgrading to a high grade in recent years and offers spacious living accommodation and period features which have been retained and renovated.
"*** BEAUTIFUL 3 BEDROOMED DETACHED PROPERTY LOCATED ON HIGHLY DESIRABLE BAY TREE ROAD, ABBEYMEAD. NICELY PRESENTED, 3 DOUBLE BEDROOMS, DETACHED GARAGE, SIMPLY MUST BE VIEWED! *** MICHAEL TUCK ESTATE AGENTS are extremely pleased to welcome to the market this highly desirable 3 double bedroomed ..."
"HOME 115, THE MYLNE - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. READY TO MOVE INTO, FLOORING & TURF INCLUDED. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. OVERLOOKING OPEN SPACE. A 4-bed fa..."
"HOME 116, THE MYLNE - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. READY TO MOVE INTO, FLOORING & TURF INCLUDED. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. OVERLOOKING OPEN SPACE. This 4 bed home is perfect ..."
"Situated in popular Drivemoor, Abbeydale this 4 bedroom detached property has been extended to offer open plan living downstairs and an added bedroom with en-suite upstairs. On arrival at the property there is the feeling of open space opposite and views across to Robinswood Hill. The p..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase a NEW BUILD family home OFF PLAN in a popular city centre location (currently under construction) This three bedroom property is spacious and versatile measuring apporx 1200 sq foot, estimated completion Spring 2023."
"A beautifully presented DETACHED family home of an unusual design set in a small quiet and convenient cul de sac Foxleigh Crescent is a popular small cul de sac situated off Blackwater Way approximately 2 miles to the East of Gloucester City centre. Excellent local shopping within Longlevens,..."
 A substantial 1930's semi detached family house of a very pleasing design and set in a highly convenient position. Colebridge Avenue is a very popular treelined cul-de-sac situated off Merevale Road and the Barnwood Roads approximately a 1 1/4 miles to the east of Gloucester city centre. So...
** Three Bedroom House with One Bedroom Double Storey Annex ** Spacious and Versatile Accommodation ** No Onward Chain ** Popular Location ** Enclosed Garden ** Garage and Off Road Parking ** Call To View:
Move Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the market this Five bedroom brand new house situated on Yew Tree Gardens in Tuffley. Available immediately and on the edge of the estate with views across open fields these houses are sure to be popular. Ground floor accommodation comprises :- L...
"*** THREE BEDROOM DETACHED, EXTENDED BUNGALOW IN A QUIET CONVENIENT LOCATION*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to welcome to the open market this very well presented, spacious bungalow which is tucked at the very of end of Highbank Park, Longford. The accommodation in brief..."
"The Winster is a five-bedroom detached family home. The open-plan kitchen/diner is spacious and bright with French doors leading into the garden - perfect for gatherings with friends and family. It comes complete with an integral single garage, downstairs cloakroom and an en suite to bedroom one."
"Are you searching for a FOUR bedroom DETACHED home in ABBEYMEAD? This is a very well presented family home. Benefits include ENSUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM, recently refitted Bathroom, downstairs WC, separate STUDY and GARAGE ideal for a growing family, tucked away in a Cul-De-Sac position...."
VACANT POSESSION - IN NEED OF MODERNISATION - SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION Located in the corner of a cul-de-sac with the village of Upton is this chain free detached bungalow offering great potential. FULL VIRTUAL TOUR ONLINE
"A WONDERFUL 1930S EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM HOME WITH LARGE GARDEN & DETACHED GARAGE! We are delighted to welcome to the open market this attractive & popular opportunity to purchase a three bedroom home located on Cheltenham Road, Longlevens. The accommodation has been extended to the rear..."
" This lovely 1930's semi detached house is positioned in the popular location of Cheltenham Road, Gloucester. This property offers ample amounts of space, boasts period features throughout and would make a perfect home for a family to enjoy. Downstairs the property comprises of: E..."
"The Mountford B is a beautiful 3-bedroom double fronted home. The kitchen dining area runs the full depth of the house. A separate utility room offers a side access door leading onto the driveway. The dual aspect living room also runs the full depth of the home, providing a large airy..."
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN, 4 BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE, CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION *** Michael Tuck Estate Agents are very pleased to welcome to the market this lovely 4 bedroom detached house located in a quiet cul-de-sac of Barnwood. This fantastic sized home offers huge potential to the growing family, locate..."
Chain Free Three Bedroom Detached family home with a Upvc Double Glazed Conservatory located in a sought after cul-de-sac. Step under the storm porch into the entrance hall that gives access to a useful cloakroom. From here the living room is on your left and boasts a square bay window ...
"Three bedroom detached home located in a cul-de-sac in Barnwood bought to the market with no onward chain. To the ground floor, the property itself briefly comprises of entrance hall, WC, living room, dining room, kitchen, conservatory and garage. To the first floor you have three bed..."
"*** EXTENDED 3 BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE, SIMPLY STUNNING OPEN PLAN KITCHEN, BEAUTIFUL GARDEN *** Michael Tucks Estate Agents are extremely delighted to welcome to the open market this incredible extended 3 bedroom detached house, located at the end of a sought after cul-de-sac within adjacent to Up..."
"Fronting out onto beautiful scenery, this detached family home is tucked away with stunning views across greenland. Benefitting from a garage, off road parking and enclosed low maintenance rear garden. Internally, the property offers a kitchen, sitting room, dining room, downstairs wc,..."
"HOME 239, THE SPRUCE - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. This impressive double-fronted home combines traditional architecture with modern design to stunning..."
"REF DH0109: A bungalow, simply described as stunning, located in the popular suburb of Hucclecote. The property has been extended and renovated and provides a wonderful balance of accommodation consisting of 2 large double bedrooms and stylish shower room and a fantastic open plan living space..."
A particularly large garden is a real feature of this substantially extended family home which is ideally situated close to Elmbridge primary school and just a short distance to the junior and infants schools at Longlevens. The Property The ground floor of this extended bay fronted semi-detac...
"This FOUR bedroom detached house has been very well maintained, having a lot of potential with space and layout for a growing family. Situated in a popular location on the A38 (Tewkesbury Road) Longford. ***CHAIN FREE***"
"The Property Centre are delighted to offer for sale this beautifully presented three bedroom home in the popular Coopers Edge development. Within a short distance walk of open countryside this property has much to offer. The property is within close proximity to a local school, multiple amenities..."
"FOUR BEDROOMS - THREE RECEPTION ROOMS - CONSERVATORY - DRIVEWAY PARKING A Victorian semi detached family home offer vast living accommodation, a conservatory, driveway parking and generous rear garden. FULL VIRTUAL TOUR ONLINE"
"Tucked away in the private cul-de-sac position of Dale Close, this two bedroom detached bungalow benefits from generous living accommodation, enclosed rear garden, driveway and garage. The bungalow is positioned on a large plot offering ample space to extend or build subject to relevant planning ..."
Situated on a large plot in a popular location. This three-bedroom detached bungalow has been thoughtfully extended and offers spacious accommodation throughout. With a sitting / dining room overlooking a mature rear garden. Dinglewell is a very popular location and sits close to the main Hu...
"Tucked away in a quiet cul de sac position on sought after Windfall Way, KJT Residential are pleased to offer for sale this lovely detached family home, the accommodation in brief comprises, 3 double bedrooms, en-suite to master, separate reception rooms, 12ft fitted kitchen and downstairs cloakr..."
"Built in 2019 by Matthew Homes and having 6 years remaining on the NHBC guarantee this beautifully presented family home is nicely positioned overlooking green space, provides parking and a garage and is convenient for the primary schools at Linden and Calton as well as The Crypt and Ribston Hall..."
"Situated just off Barnwood Road in a small cul de sac of just four houses, Andrews Property Group are pleased to offer to the market this well presented four bedroom detached cottage. The accommodation comprises of the entrance porch which leads through to the hallway, from here you wi..."
"EXTENDED – FOUR BEDROOMS - TWO RECEPTIONS - TWO BATHROOMS – DRIVEWAY PARKING Positioned within a popular cul- de-sac of Gloucester is this extended four bedroom semi detached family home with a private rear garden, large patio and decking area, a garage and driveway parking for two vehicles..."
" This lovely extended property is situated in the sought-after location of Penny Close Gloucester, this property offers ample amounts of space making it the perfect family home. Downstairs the property offers: Entrance hall, downstairs WC, spacious living room, utility, 2nd recep..."
"Welcome to Brookthorpe Park, an Exclusively Private community of just thirteen 3-bedroom semi-detached and terraced homes and six 4-bedroom detached homes enviably perched on the edge of The Cotswolds in a leafy, village setting. Please note the development is at an early stage and spe..."
"Tucked away in a popular road in Longlevens, this extended, three bedroom detached, family home is well presented throughout and has a good size driveway. 
"
"This smart detached four bedroom home is situated on the edge of a modern yet well established development in Longford. The position is superb, with open fields to the front of the property and then a south facing rear garden. Outside, the approach is up a private road to the driveway which..."
A versatile four bedroom semi detached family home set over three floors. On the ground floor you'll find the kitchen with space for a breakfast table. There's also an open plan lounge with dining area and French doors to the garden.
"A versatile four bedroom semi detached family home set over three floors. On the ground floor you'll find the kitchen with space for a breakfast table. There's also an open plan lounge with dining area and French doors to the garden. The first floor has two double bedrooms, a single and a family ..."
EXTENDED three bedroom semi detached home situated in a CONVENIENT LOCATION for DENMARK ROAD High School and the City Centre. Useful entrance porch leads you to the entrance hall. The living room is to the front of the property with oak doors leading to the dining room. From here there ...
"HOME 24, THE SPRUCE - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. This impressive double-fronted home combines traditional architecture with modern design to stunning ..."
"This beautifully presented family property offers three bedrooms, generous living accommodation and a level garden all within a traffic-free 500m walk of the Upton St. Leonards Primary School."
The Elliston is a 4-bedroom home designed to appeal to growing families looking for a little extra space.
"The Property Centre are delighted to welcome to the market this beautifully appointed family home. The property is located within walking distance to local schools, shops, Gloucester Quays and other local amenities. The accommodation briefly comprises entrance hall, WC, recently instal..."
" This beautifully presented 4 bedroom home is situated in the popular and convenient location of Hyatt Close Longford. This property offers ample amounts of space and would make a lovely family home. Downstairs the property offers: Off road parking, entrance hall, Living room, Do..."
The Easedale is a traditional double fronted 3-bedroom home with a flexible layout to appeal to both couples and young families
"The Property Centre are delighted to welcome to the market this fabulous family home, located within short walks to excellent local schools, shops, transport links and other local amenities. The accommodation briefly comprises entrance hall, utility/WC, spacious lounge/diner with stunn..."
"**WE'LL CONTRIBUTE £18,249 AND INCLUDE FLOORING** SPACIOUS home with French doors to the garden. 2 double bedrooms and a single on the first floor. IMPRESSIVE en suite main bedroom with DRESSING AREA on the top floor. Comes with garage and parking. Plot 4 | The Woodcote | Whittle Gardens | Barra..."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** Encompassed by dazzling countryside, under 6 miles away from CHELTENHAM the Campanula is a beautifully designed home, spread across THREE FLOORS, that combines SPACIOUS LIVING AREAS and a high specification."
"* £800 towards your MORTGAGE for 12 MONTHS!* * The Lawrence is a fantastic opportunity for a new family to finally enjoy their own space, with room to grow! With a private en suite to the master bedroom, private driveway parking and space for a home office in the third bedroom,..."
"**WE'LL CONTRIBUTE £18,249 & INCLUDE FLOORING.** SPACIOUS home with French doors to the garden. 2 double bedrooms and a single on the first floor. IMPRESSIVE en suite main bedroom with DRESSING AREA on the top floor. Comes with garage and parking. Plot 6 | The Woodcote | Whittle Gardens | Barrat..."
"THREE/FOUR BEDROOMS - GARAGE WITH DRIVEWAY - VERSATILE ACCOMODATION A substantial semi detached Victorian property with versatile accommodation over three floors. Benefiting from a garage with driveway parking, a generous rear garden and four reception rooms"
"BEAUTIFUL VICTORIAN SEMI DETACHED HOUSE with a DRIVEWAY leading up to a DETACHED GARAGE. Inside the property there is a lovely dining room at the front with a bay window, the lounge follows and has ORIGINAL HARDWOOD PARQUET FLOORING and overlooks the rear garden, the breakfast room has f..."
"Located in Cotswold Chase, Brockworth is this lovely four bedroom ""Southcott"" design semi built by Bellway Homes. The accommodation is over three floors. On the top floor is a fantastic 22ft main bedroom with storage, wardrobes and en-suite. The middle floor has a further thre..."
"This home is tucked away at the end of a cul de sac and benefits from a LARGER THAN AVERAGE GARDEN, which is perfect for a family. Windfall Way is located off Elmbridge Road which is perfectly positioned within close proximity to some of the counties best primary and grammer schools like Sir Thom..."
"A surprisingly large 1930's SEMI DETACHED HOUSE in a very popular and quiet treelined road The property is situated in the quiet section of Heathville Road being treelined and running between Denmark and Lansdown Roads. The City centre is just over ½ mile to the South West, some of the..."
"A CHARMING TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM DETACHED GRADE II LISTED BLACK AND WHITE COTTAGE with an ABUNDANCE OF CHARACTER THROUGHOUT, GARAGE and OFF ROAD PARKING, WORKSHOP and SUMMER HOUSE, LOVELY COTTAGE GARDENS situated in a HIGHLY CONVENIENT LOCATION for GLOUCESTER."
"Presented over three floors, this well presented four bedroom home boasts off road parking, a garage and enclosed rear garden. Located within close proximity to high achieving schools, local amenities and bus routes. Outside boasts off road parking, a garage and a recently l..."
"Welcome to Brookthorpe Park, an Exclusively Private community of just thirteen 3-bedroom semi-detached and terraced homes and six 4-bedroom detached homes enviably perched on the edge of The Cotswolds in a leafy, village setting. Please note the development is at an early stage a..."
"**SHOWHOME AVAILABLE TO VIEW**. The Mason is a beautiful new home complete with SINGLE GARAGE, OPEN-PLAN kitchen dining area with UTILITY and FRENCH DOORS on to the rear garden, plus an EN-SUITE to bedroom 1. Situated just a mile from Churchdown village centre, and a 15-minutes' drive to Cheltenham."
"*** 3 BEDROOM DETACHED PROPERTY, FANTASTIC FAMILY HOME, MUCH IMPROVED & VERY WELL PRESENTED, DESIRABLE LOCATION, VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED! ***MICHAEL TUCK ESTATE AGENTS are very pleased to welcome to the market this generously proportioned 3 bedroomed detached property, situated in a very sough..."
"*INVESTORS ONLY* A freehold investment opportunity positioned on the ever popular Arthur Street on the edge of Gloucester City Centre. The property comprises of a one bedroom ground floor apartment, with private courtyard garden, and two further two bedroom apartments. Viewing is highly ..."
"A mature detached family home on the edge of the popular area of Brockworth benefitting from two reception rooms, a conservatory, a driveway providing off-road parking, and good-sized gardens of approximately .12 of an acre."
"*Brand new & chain free home* Located a 15 minute drive from Cheltenham, The Mason benefits from a generous OPEN-PLAN kitchen dining and family area with FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden, an adjoining UTILITY, plus a separate lounge. Upstairs, boasts three good sized rooms with EN-SUITE to bedroom 1"
**** SPACIOUS AND WELL PRESENTED 4/5 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN **** Michael Tuck Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this well presented family home located in Marham Drive. The property offers good sized accommodation and benefits from 3 rece...
"**** MODERN THREE BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH GARAGE AND PARKING IN POPULAR COOPERS EDGE LOCATION **** The Property Centre are delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this ""Bovis"" detached family home, with dual aspect frontage and Cotswold Stone frontage. ..."
"We are proud to offer this FOUR BEDROOM link detached family home that has recently undergone REFURBISHMENT to include a newly fitted KITCHEN, BATHROOM and CLOAKROOM. The property has also been REDECORATED throughout and benefits from NEW CARPETS to the stairs, landing and bedrooms The property..."
A very WELL PROPORTIONED detached FAMILY HOME built in 1986 in a QUIET POSITION overlooking playing fields. Podsmead Place is a small cul de sac of properties which overlook playing fields situated off Podsmead Road and Tuffley Avenue approximately 1 1/2 mile to the South of Gloucester City c...
"Stunning four bedroom BRAND NEW FAMILY HOME with GARAGE and PARKING within CUL-DE-SAC location within walking distance of GLOUCESTER QUAYS- **Plot 72 The Percy - INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, VINYL FLOORING TO KITCHEN. A beautifully designed 4 bedroom semi-detached home with GARAGE AND PARKING FOR 2 ..."
"Situated between Gloucester and Cheltenham, The Clematis is available with 5% DEPOSIT USING HELP TO BUY and features a single GARAGE, plus an OPEN-PLAN kitchen dining area with FRENCH DOORS on to the rear garden, a front-facing lounge and EN-SUITE to bedroom 1."
"This four bedroom semi detached home has a light and spacious kitchen with French doors opening onto the garden. On the ground floor there is also a cloakroom, storage cupboard and a fourth bedroom, perfect for using as a home office if you work from home."
"Offering generous accomodation throughout is this extended four bedroom semi detached family home presented in good order. The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, downstairs shower room, lounge, dining room, family room and kitchen on the ground floor. Upstairs there are three doubl..."
"Situated at the end of a cul de sac in a good sized corner plot. The property is offered chain free. Cosmetically it requires attention and would suit someone after a project. Downstairs you have Lounge, cloakroom, kitchen and dining room opening out to a good size garden. Upstairs are ..."
"An END TERRACE HOUSE in a very popular and convenient position in need of INTERNAL UPGRADING Number 1 is situated on the corner of Serlo Road and Deans Walk within easy walking distance of the City centre facilities.  The Docklands, exciting Quays and Cathedral are close by and access t..."
"A STUNNING PERIOD HOME WITH SOUTH FACING GARDEN IN HUCCLECOTE!! MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to welcome to the market this exceptionally presented, spacious family home with a LARGE SOUTH FACING rear garden. The accommodation offers generous space & comprises of: Entrance..."
"Presented in excellent condition is this spacious three bedroom detached bungalow which is offered with no onward chain and situated in the popular area of Tuffley. This bungalow boasts two double bedrooms and a large single bedroom, there is a light lounge with a feature fireplace, a ..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, is a larger than average, three double-bedroom, semi detached property. This family home which is located in the popular residential area of Hucclecote offers an extended open-plan living accommodation with three shower rooms. Outside, to the front, the..."
"A spacious three bedroom semi-detached property situated in the sought after development of Huntsgrove, Hardwicke. This exceptionally well presented 'David Wilson Home' was built two years ago and still has NHBC warranty remaining. The property benefits from a single detached garage an..."
This mid-terrace house is situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac location in the popular village of Sandhurst and backs on to open farmland. Sandhurst is an attractive small village just over 3 miles north of Gloucester and just over 10 miles south west of Tewkesbury. The village...
"The Property Centre are delighted to bring this well presented, four bedroom detached property to the market. Situated in the popular area of Kingsway, close to local amenities and schools this lovely home is ideal for families. As you enter the property, there is a welcom..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to offer for sale this good sized four bedroom detached house situated in the very popular School Lane, Quedgeley. The property has a good sized private rear garden. The property also benfit from having solar panels. The accommodation comprises entrance..."
"**A THREE-BEDROOM FAMILY HOME WITH GARAGE** TG Sales & Lettings are delighted to offer ‘FOR SALE’ this extended three double-bedroom family home, which is situated in Sims Lane, Quedgeley. Step inside the hallway of this well-presented home, where you will find the stairs to the..."
" A substantial Bay fronted Semi Detached House located on the highly sought after Stroud Road with NO ONWARD CHAIN! Currently divided into TWO MAISONETTES the property would make an ideal Buy To Let, but would require some RENOVATION throughout. Alternatively with some minor re-configuration wo..."
"This charming 3 bedroom detached house is situated in the popular and convenient location of Kingsholm Road Gloucester, This property boasts character throughout, is positoned on a generous plot and really is one of a kind. Downstairs the property offers: Long driveway, generous sized..."
" This beautifully extended property is situated in the popular location of Barnwood Road, Gloucester. This home has been beautifully renovated by the current owners and would make a lovely family home. Downstairs the property comprises of: Off road parking for several vehicles, c..."
"The Property Centre are delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this extended, semi detached property situated in the popular village of Hempsted. Located on a no through road this ideal family home is a must view. The accommodation briefly compromises: Entrance hall, lounge, dining r..."
"SPACIOUS FOUR BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN LINDEN WITH PARKING OFFERED CHAIN FREE The property is currently split into two maisonettes but can be restored to a spacious family home. The property is located within short walks to local shops, schools and Gloucester Qua..."
" This lovely 4 bedroom semi detached house is situated in the popular and desirable location of The Hedgerow, Longlevens. This property really is a rare find and has a lot to offer for a family! Downstairs the property comprises of: Entrance hall, dining room, large living room,..."
"Wonderfully maintained and enhanced, extended 3 bedroom semi detached home, located in this sought after location. The property, situated in Dinglewell, is in a highly convenient position within easy walking distance of all of Hucclecote’s comprehensive facilities including the library, doctors,..."
"This three bedroom detached property is situated in a good plot and location in a popular road within Longlevens. It has undergone many improvements over the years but could still benefit from some further modernisation. The accommodation briefly comprises: entrance hall, lounge, dinin..."
"Situated in the ever popular residential location of Canal Court in Hempsted, this modern and immaculately presented four bedroom family home is offered to the market. Boasting generous living accommodation, enclosed rear garden, driveway and single garage, this property must be considered by tho..."
"This spacious 1930’s bay fronted family home is ready for a growing family. Benefitting downstairs WC, OPEN PLAN kitchen/dining and OFF road parking ***CHAIN FREE***"
"HOME 80, THE BECKETT - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. A well-appointed 3-bedroom family home featuring a dual aspect living room & generous kitchen/din..."
"Whittle Gardens is a development of 2, 3 & 4 bedroom homes, just 3.8 miles from the vibrant city of Gloucester. Set within 64 acres of open space, your home will form part of a brand new community with a proposed school, local community centre, leisure centre, health centre and shops nearby."
"HOME 241, THE HAZEL - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. If you're looking for a standout home, this is it. This impressive house has a character and style ..."
"HOME 240, THE HAZEL - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. If you're looking for a standout home, this is it. This impressive house has a character and style ..."
"EXTENDED and WELL PRESENTED FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME sitting on a level plot at the end of a popular cul-de-sac. Inside there is a light lounge with oak flooring and French doors onto the garden, a well fitted kitchen with BUILT IN APPLIANCES that leads to the dining room, final..."
"HOME 245, THE HAZEL - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. If you're looking for a standout home, this is it. This impressive house has a character and style ..."
"HOME 244, THE HAZEL - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. If you're looking for a standout home, this is it. This impressive house has a character and style ..."
This charming three bedroom semi-detached property is well located on North Upton Lane and would benefit from updating and modernising throughout presenting a fantastic opportunity to make a lovely family home. A driveway leads to the front door and into the entrance hall. A cosy living room ...
"Situated on a large plot on the popular Conway Road, this three bedroom bungalow has been thoughtfully extended and offers spacious accommodation throughout. The bedrooms and bathroom sit at the front of the property while the living room, dining room, kitchen and conservatory are at the rear ove..."
"*KEY WORKER? SAVE £17,249 AND WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING* SPACIOUS home with an OPEN PLAN kitchen and French doors to the garden. A dual aspect lounge, cloakroom and some handy understairs STORAGE completes the ground floor. Upstairs you'll find an EN SUITE main bedroom, a further double and a single..."
"**WE'LL CONTRIBUTE £17,199 AND INCLUDE FLOORING** SPACIOUS home with open plan kitchen and French doors to the garden. Lounge and EN SUITE main bedroom on the first floor. 2 further bedrooms on the top floor. Comes with garage and parking. Plot 96 | The Kingsville | Whittle Gardens | Barratt Hom..."
"This four bedroom mid terraced home has a light and spacious kitchen with French doors opening onto the garden. On the ground floor there is also a cloakroom, storage cupboard and a fourth bedroom, perfect for using as a home office if you work from home."
"Ideally located within within walking distance of Churchdown village, and just six miles from Cheltenham, brand new home The Chandler features an OPEN-PLAN kitchen diner, front-facing lounge with BAY WINDOW, plus master bedroom with EN-SUITE. "
"SHOW HOME AVAILABLE TO VIEW! The Trevithick offers modern open plan living spaces. Off the hallway you'll find a spacious lounge, with plenty of room for the whole family to relax after a busy day. The OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING ROOM is a brilliant space for the family to spend time together,"
"HOME 123, THE BEECH - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. The Beech is a fantastic three storey home created for those who want a balance between family time a..."
"HOME 122, THE BEECH - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. The Beech is a fantastic three storey home created for those who want a balance between family time a..."
"HOME 121, THE HAZEL II - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. If you're looking for a standout home, this is it. This impressive house has a character and sty..."
"Detached bungalow with a large garden in Barnwood Avenue. This property is located towards the end of the road and it has the most fantastic garden for the keen gardeners out there. Internally there are 2 double bedrooms, a shower room, living room, kitchen/breakfast room and a conservatory. Othe..."
The Property Centre are delighted to bring this beautiful four bedroom detached property to the market. Beautifully presented throughout and close to all local amenities and schools this fantastic home is not to be missed. The downstairs accommodation comprises a generous entrance ha...
"HOME 84, THE ASLIN - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. The Aslin is a 4 bedroomed town house offering flexible living space over 3 floors. The living room h..."
"HOME 85, THE ASLIN - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. The Aslin is a 4 bedroomed town house offering flexible living space over 3 floors. The living room ha..."
"A fantastic, fully renovated four bedroom semi detached property providing spacious and flexible accommodation, situated in a sought after location, close to local amenities. Early viewings advised to avoid disappointment !"
"Set within a prime location, close to local schools, shops, and motorway access, this extended 1960s three bedroom semi-detached family home offers flexible living accommodation over two floors. With off-road parking and a generously sized private garden, viewing is highly recommended on this pro..."
"This deceptively spacious property is situated on the popular Greenways development in Barnwood. The property has been upgraded to a high standard and is in good condition throughout. The ground floor living space is well proportioned and offers a generous hallway, downstairs cloakroom, dining ro..."
A lovely LATE VICTORIAN semi detached house of deceiving proportions Lonsdale Road is a quiet residential road situated off the Elmbridge Road approximately 1.25 miles to the east of Gloucester city centre. Some of the areas most popular schools are within walking distance and access to goo...
** Rarely Available Three Bedroom Link Detached House Situated In A Popular and Sought After Location ** Large Enclosed Garden and Two Garages ** Newly Fitted Kitchen & Combi Boiler ** Call To View:
"An extremely spacious home offering plenty of accommodation and good room sizes and conveniently positioned for good local schools and amenities. The Property The house is an exceptionally spacious semi-detached home with an inviting hallway, lounge, separate dining room, a good size kitchen ..."
"Positioned within the heart of the ever popular residential location of Churchdown, this double bay fronted three bedroom semi detached family home has much to offer growing families. Currently boasting generous living accommodation and the potential to extend subject to the appropriate planning ..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to present to the market, with No Onward Chain, this rarely available three bedroom semi-detached bungalow in the heart of Churchdown village. This property boasts a kitchen, lounge, conservatory, family bathroom and three well sized bedrooms. Outside the property..."
" Michael Tuck Estate Agents Gloucester are delighted to welcome to the market this exceptionally well presented three bedroom semi-detached home located within a popular area of Gloucester. The accommodation on the ground floor comprises of; Entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/diner & enclosed rea..."
"A three bedroom semi-detached spacious bungalow, situated in a sought-after location in Hucclecote. This extended bungalow offers ample living space and is presented in excellent order throughout. The property itself briefly consists of a large entrance hall, three bedrooms..."
*** BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED FIVE DOUBLE BEDROOM EXTENDED FAMILY HOME IN TUFFLEY*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS welcome to the market this beautifully presented property located in a quiet & popular cul-de-sac in Tuffley. The accommodation benefits from an extension to offer fu...
"REF DH0109; A well positioned family home within reach of well considered local schools, the local arboretum and shopping facilities. The home, believed to be on one of the larger plots of its kind, offers accommodation of bay fronted living room  with complemented by a separate dining ro..."
"This home is brand new and chain free. Located a 15 minute drive from Cheltenham, The Chandler benefits from an OPEN-PLAN kitchen dining and family area with FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden, plus a separate lounge. Upstairs, boasts three good sized rooms with an EN-SUITE to bedroom 1."
Move Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this exciting new development in the village of Twigworth on the outskirts of Gloucester. This house is now available with £8000 worth of upgrades thrown in. Twigworth enjoys the comfort of rural living whilst also being just a s...
"The Trevithick is a three bedroom semi-detached home with an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER. Off the hallway you'll find a spacious lounge, with plenty of room for the whole family to relax after a busy day. SHOW HOME AVAILABLE TO VIEW at the Fallow Fields development."
"**WE'LL CONTRIBUTE £16,699 & INCLUDE FLOORING** SPACIOUS home with open plan kitchen and French doors to the facing garden. Lounge and EN SUITE main bedroom on the first floor. 2 further bedrooms on the top floor. Plot 10 | The Kingsville | Whittle Gardens | Barratt Homes. Full description:
Thi..."
"With 3 bedrooms, the Gosford is perfect for anyone looking for a little extra space"
"***THREE BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE FOR SALE WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN, SOUGHT AFTER ABBEYMEAD LOCATION*** This deceptively spacious three bedroom detached property is set in a quiet cul de sac location in Deerhurst close, Abbeymead. The property occupies a fantastic size plot and wo..."
"Brought to the market is this bay-fronted family home located on Barnwood Road. The semi-detached property boasts ample off-road parking and a large southwest facing garden. Internally, the property consists of a porch, entrance hall, kitchen, a spacious lounge, second reception room a..."
"* FLOORING and APPLIANCES INCLUDED!*  Boasting a sociable open plan kitchen / dining room, the Kilburn is ideal for couples or small families. And with the third bedroom perfect for a HOME OFFICE and BT FIBRE on site, working from home will be easy too!"
"*KEY WORKER? SAVE £16,299 AND WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING* SPACIOUS home with an OPEN PLAN kitchen and French doors to the SOUTH WEST garden. A dual aspect lounge, cloakroom and some handy understairs STORAGE completes the ground floor. Upstairs you'll find an EN SUITE main bedroom, a further double a..."
"This well-appointed family home located in a popular road in Matson offers great living accommodation and a dedicated office space to assist with those working from home. The property looks over Robinswood Hill to the front and has hillside views to the rear, the accommodation briefly ..."
"Move Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the market this extended family home in highly desirable Barnwood with excellent commuter links, good local schools and amenities are all nearby. In brief the accommodation comprises :- Entrance porch which leads into the hallway. Off the hallway..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, this well presented bungalow benefits from a detached garage, off road parking and low maintenance rear garden. Internally the property offers two double bedrooms, a modern shower room, kitchen and open plan spacious lounge-diner. Situated wi..."
"SPACIOUS TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW situated in a desirable cul-de-sac location and is offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/breakfast room, two double bedrooms and a bathroom. Additional benefits include upvc double ..."
" A FOUR/FIVE Bedroom Semi Detached House with EXTENDED Kitchen, TWO Reception Rooms and an EN-SUITE Bathroom located on London Road close to Gloucester City Centre The property offers flexible accommodation and currently comprises of Entrance Hall, Lounge with Study Area off, Dining Room, Exten..."
"The Property Centre are delighted to offer to the market for sale, this four bedroom semi detached home which will benefit from some internal updating. Located in the ever popular Hucclecote road within close proximity of schools, shopping amenities and transport links. The downstairs..."
* £800 towards your MORTGAGE for 12 MONTHS!* Superb 3 bedroom STONE BUILT semi detached FAMILY home * Open plan KITCHEN/DINING area * French doors leading out to rear garden * EN SUITE to master bedroom * Long private driveway for TWO cars *
"This lovely semi detached property is situated in the desirable location of Lavington Drive and is offered for sale with no onward chain. This property would make a lovely first time buy or family home. Downstairs the property offers: Ample amounts of off road parking, light and airy ..."
"This modern, spacious four bedroom townhouse is positioned in a quiet cul de sac location and close to all local school and amenities making this the perfect family home. Enjoying a wonderful position, not overlooked and with school field to the rear, the property comprises - "
"**** 3 BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW, HIGHLY DESIRABLE LOCATION, SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION, CORNER PLOT, CHAIN-FREE, SIMPLY MUST BE VIEWED! **** MICHAEL TUCK ESTATE AGENTS are absolutely delighted to welcome to the market this generously proportioned 3 bedroomed detached bungalow, positioned on an en..."
"**THREE BEDROOM EXTENDED FAMILY HOME IN LONGLEVENS ON A GENEROUS PLOT*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to offer to the open market this three bedroom semi detached home in Lavington Drive., Longlevens. The property has been extended to offer further living space. On the gr..."
"HOME 7, THE ELMSLIE - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. 3 bedroom home with a large living room, running the width of the house and with French doors to the ..."
A DETACHED BUNGALOW on a corner plot with potential for significant extension set within a popular and quiet cul de sac Number 7 is a rare example of a detached bungalow on this popular cul de sac development just off Nine Elms Road and the Cheltenham Road approximatley 2 miles to the East of...
"Situated in the heart of Gloucester, this unique five bedroom end terraced property provides an ideal investment opportunity. The property boasts flexible living accommodation throughout with a potential rental income of £1,200 pcm whilst also offering the potential to be turned into a HMO."
"The Property Centre is delighted to present to the market, with NO ONWARD CHAIN, this three bedroom detached house located in the popular location of Churchdown. Downstairs accommodation comprises of a kitchen, lounge-diner, and a downstairs cloakroom. Upstairs the property benefits from three be..."
"Situated in the popular residential area of Kingsholm this four bedroom end terraced townhouse is offered to the market with no onward chain. Benefitting from flexible living accommodation throughout, enclosed rear garden and an allocated parking space, the property makes for an ideal family home..."
"This former Police home has been sympathetically converted and now boasts a good family accommodation. On the ground floor you have lounge, study, kitchen/diner and utility/cloakroom. Upstairs are three DOUBLE bedrooms and en-suite to master. Outside is a pleasant 26ft x 22ft rear gard..."
"Situated in a cul-de-sac location and occupying a generous plot is this extended four bedroom family home. Accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, two reception rooms, 17ft kitchen/breakfast room and conservatory on the ground floor. Upstairs there are four double bedrooms and a..."
EweMove Exclusive - Are you looking to create the perfect family home in a popular Gloucester location? Then this fantastic 3-Bed period property with the potential to add a fourth bedroom and a garden extending to over 50ft could be the perfect project for you! Call Now 24/7 to book a viewing!
"Wonderful opportunity to create a fabulous family home in this sought after area! This 3 bedroom, bay fronted, semi detached property comprises - Ground Floor - Spacious entrance hall, 24' lounge diner with bay window to the front and double doors leading to the garden, kitchen, utility / st..."
Move Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the market this four double bedroom semi detached house in ever popular Hucclecote. Offered to the market with no onward chain this house will make a great home for its new owners providing the perfect blank canvass to truly put your stamp on it....
"This three bedroom semi detached home is presented in good order throughout. On the ground floor there is a lounge with bay window, kitchen/diner with French doors leading to the rear garden and a utility cloakroom. Upstairs there are three well proportioned bedrooms with en-suite to master..."
"THREE BEDROOMS -DOWNSTAIRS SHOWER ROOM - EXTENDED ACCOMMODATION An extended and well presented three bedroom family home located within walking distance to Sir Thomas Rich's School. Offering a downstairs shower room, generous accommodation and driveway parking - FULL VIRTUAL TOUR ONLINE"
"BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM HOME!! MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS welcome to the open market this extremely popular ""Sheringham"" style home. On the ground floor we have: Entrance hallway, cloakroom/utility, lounge & OPEN PLAN Kitchen/Diner. Upstairs are three bedrooms, en-sui..."
This attractive bay fronted Victorian semi-detached home provides extremely spacious accommodation extending to approximately 140 sq m and has been tastefully updated by the current owner and has an extremely good size rear garden. The Property Located close to the city centre this four bedro...
"Stunning 3 / 4 bedroom terraced town house situated on the exclusive Earls Park development and walking distance to Gloucester Quays. With FLEXIBLE LIVING ideal for HOME WORKING, This superb family home comprises -"
"*** THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME IN LONGLEVENS CHAIN FREE*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS welcome to the open market this fantastic opportunity for first time buyers or people downsizing to purchase this attractive, reasonably priced semi detached home located in a popular location..."
"**** 3 BEDROOMED SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY, NICELY PRESENTED, REFITTED KITCHEN, CONSERVATORY, HIGHLY DESIRABLE LOCATION, CHAIN-FREE, VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED! **** MICHAEL TUCK ESTATE AGENTS are extremely pleased to welcome to the open-market this well presented 3 bedroomed semi-detached proper..."
"This is a lovely 3 bedroom semi detached family home situated on Barnwood Road. The property is within walking distance to bus stops that take you into Gloucester and Cheltenham Town Centre. It is also in close proximity to supermarkets, schools and pubs. Internally the property boasts 3 bedrooms..."
"A three bedroom detached house built in 2015. The property is modern and beautifully presented throughout. The property is ready to move straight. Situated close to local amenities, schooling and good transport links with the M5 within easy access. The accommodation com..."
"**WE'LL CONTRIBUTE £16,249 AND INCLUDE FLOORING** Semi detached home with an OPEN PLAN kitchen and French doors to the garden. A lounge, cloakroom and some handy understairs STORAGE completes the ground floor. Upstairs you'll find an EN SUITE main bedroom, a further double and a single. Comes w..."
"Overlooking open space, this three bedroom semi detached home has an open plan kitchen with French doors to the south west facing garden, a spacious lounge and a downstairs cloakroom. There's also a handy storage cupboard in the hallway. Upstairs you'll find an en suite main bedroom, a..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to offer for sale this show home standard two bedroom detached bungalow built by Glevum homes and situated in the very popular Loriners Close, Quedgeley. This is the first time this property has been to the open market since it was built in the 1980's. ..."
"HOME 86, THE EVELEIGH - 12 MONTHS MORTGAGE PAID!* RESERVE FOR JUST £99 & SECURE THIS AMAZING OFFER NOW. T&Cs apply. Speak to a sales consultant or visit the website for details. This 3 bed home has a well-sized living room with French doors out to the garden. There is an open-..."
"**WE'LL CONTRIBUTE £15,999 AND INCLUDE FLOORING** SPACIOUS home with open plan kitchen and French doors to the garden. Lounge with HOME OFFICE space. EN SUITE main bedroom, further double bedroom and a single. Comes with parking. Plot 98 | The Maidstone | Whittle Gardens | Barratt Homes. Full d..."
"*Brand new and chain free home* The Valerian is a brand new home with parking for up to two cars, plus a generous OPEN-PLAN living and dining area with feature BAY WINDOW and French doors on to the rear garden, a separate kitchen, and EN-SUITE to bedroom 1."
The Eveleigh is a spacious three-bedroom home. With an open plan kitchen dining room and a spacious lounge stretching the full width of the home to the rear. The living room also has glazed double doors leading to the garden and letting the light in. Upstairs are three good-sized be...
"*KEY WORKER? SAVE £15,999 AND WE'LL INCLUDE FLOORING* SPACIOUS home with open plan kitchen and French doors to the garden. Light and airy lounge and lots of STORAGE space. EN SUITE main bedroom, further double bedroom and a single. Comes with parking.
 
Plot 81 | The Ellerton | Whittle Gardens | ..."
"This three bedroom semi detached home has a spacious lounge leading to an open plan kitchen with dining area and French doors to the garden. There's also a downstairs cloakroom and some handy understairs storage. Upstairs you'll find an en suite main bedroom, a further double bedroom, a ..."
FAMILY HOMES AVAILABLE FOR SHARED OWNERSHIP - MOVE IN THIS SPRING!
" New to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN, this spacious semi-detached house offers fantastic potential. Located in a quiet area of Hucclecote with a large, south-west facing garden and 3 double bedrooms this property would make a desirable family home. Oakwood Drive is a very popular locati..."
"Situated in a highly convenient location is this spacious, semi-detached bungalow which has the advantage of being offered with no onward chain. The property itself briefly comprises of a porch, entrance hall, living room, three bedrooms, a bathroom and a generous size kitchen-breakfas..."
"A newly renovated three bedroom semi-detached house for sale situated in the ever popular Linden area. The property overlooks the newly refurbished, tennis courts and play areas making this an ideal family home. The property is arranged over two floors. Accommodation on the..."
"A great 1930's family home situated in a popular road in Longlevens. This property is within walking distance to a number of local amenities including, schools, shops, pubs, doctors and a library. The property is also located in a no through road. Downstairs the property consits of 2 reception ro..."
"This three bedroom semi-detached family home in Hucclecote offers versatile living space, three DOUBLE bedrooms along with parking for multiple vehicles and within walking distance to Dinglewell School - Viewing is highly recommended. The property briefly consists of OPEN PLAN living a..."
"This three storey townhouse is situated in a Coopers Edge Offers a versatile accommodation with up to five Bedrooms. The home is presented in excellent order and comprises of entrance hall, cloakroom, family room/Bedroom 5 and kitchen/dining room on the ground floor. On the first floo..."
"TUCKED AWAY! Gloucestershire Property Online are delighted to offer to market this large 4 bedroom (Ensuite to master), semi detached house located in a popular cul-de-sac in Tuffley, Gloucester. The well presented accommodation is arranged over 3 floors and comprises; Entrance..."
"Move Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this five bedroom semi detached town house offering plenty of space and boasting an impressive master bedroom with walk through wardrobe and en-suite. Entering into the hallway you have the downstairs WC on your right, Kitchen on the lef..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to present to the market this extended three bedroom semi-detached house, with additional outbuilding, in the heart of Churchdown. This property comprises of a entrance hall, lounge/diner/ kitchen, downstairs w/c, three bedrooms and a family bathroom. ..."
BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT- CONSERVATORY - SOUTHERLY FACING REAR GARDEN With a southerly facing rear garden and offered for sale in excellent decorative order is this three bedroom semi detached family home - FULL VIRTUAL TOUR ONLINE
Available to anyone over 60 this is a stunning first floor apartment with allocated parking and a superb wrap around balcony with views across the gardens of Secunda Priory towards the canal and located just a short walk to Gloucester Quays and the historic docks. The Property If you are con...
"A David Wilson built home offering more space than the average townhouse. The home has a unique flexibility of use, providing fantastic living space over three storeys. The configuration provides 3/4 double bedrooms with a comfortable living room or 3 double bedrooms with two impressive reception..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, this three bedroom semi detached home is situated on a generously sized corner plot. The property has been updated and modernised throughout and benefits from brand new carpets, flooring and fixtures and fittings throughout. Outside offers a ..."
" Move Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market this exceptional double fronted house in the popular Kingsway area. This home benefits from a garage and driveway, en-suite to Master bedroom amongst it's many attractive features. The house greets you with the entrance hallway. To the..."
"Set in the heart of BROCKWORTH, is this delightful 3 bedroom semi detached BUNGALOW that is being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The flexible accommodation is well presented throughout and the generous rear garden is a particular benefit to the property. There is ample off street parking leading to..."
"Located close to local amenities and schools, is this 3/4 bedroom family home. This property has versatile living accommodation throughout and benefits from a driveway, enclosed rear garden and is offered to the market chain free."
"The Property Centre is delighted to offer this good sized four bedroom detached situated in the popular Kingsway development. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, cloakroom, study, lounge, dining room, kitchen/breakfast room, utility room, ensuite to master, three further bedroom..."
"***FIVE BEDROOM TOWN HOUSE WITH GARAGE IN KINGSWAY*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS welcome to the market this well presented spacious property located on Headley Court. The accommodation comprises of: Entrance hallway, cloakroom, kitchen/breakfast room, lounge, five bedrooms, en-suite ..."
"*** AMAZING OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE THIS 4 BEDROOM HOME WITH POTENTIAL FOR A 1 BEDROOM BUNGALOW TO BE BUILT (ARCHITECT PLANS DRAWN) *** The property comprises - Ground Floor - Entrance hall with downstairs shower room to the right, under stairs storage, through to the spacious lounge / dini..."
THREE STOREY ACCOMODATION- NO ONWARD CHAIN - GARAGE WITH ALLOCATED PARKING A very spacious and versatile family home located on the entrance to Cooper Edge with opening greenery which is adjacent to the property. FULL VIRTUAL TOUR ONLINE
"The Property Centre is delighted to present to the market this beautifully modernised three bedroom detached house, with No Onward Chain, in Brockworth. Accommodation comprises of a kitchen/diner, lounge, utility room, downstairs shower room, Three bedrooms two of which are doubles and..."
The Property Centre are delighted to present to the market this spacious and tastefully decorated modern three storey townhouse in the popular Cooper Edge location. Within easy commuting of the M5 and a short walking distance of local amenities this has everything to offer as a family home. 
A fantastic investment opportunity to acquire this fully licensed 6 bedroom HMO in the heart of Gloucester. If you are an investor looking for an immediate return then this property will offer you exactly that. A modern HMO which has been well maintained by the current landlord throu...
VACANT POSESSION - CORNER PLOT - GENEROUS GARDEN - GARAGE A three bedroom semi detached property offered for sale in the corner of a cul-de-sac which occupies a generous plot. Available with no onward chain. Full virtual tour online
"REF DHO109: A delightfully positioned home, on the edge of the development, presented in fantastic condition throughout and is the 'Southwold' design by Bovis constructed in 2015, a design offering well balanced rooms ideally suiting couples, singles, and young families. The property i..."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** The Tailor is a beautiful new home complete with OPEN-PLAN kitchen dining area, FRENCH DOORS on to the rear garden and an EN-SUITE to bedroom 1. Situated just 1 from Churchdown village centre, and a 15-minutes' drive to Cheltenham. "
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** Located on a brand-new development, The Tailor is a 3-bedroom home with an open-plan kitchen and dining area, a front-facing living room, a modern family bathroom, and an en-suite shower room to bedroom 1."
" An EX-SHOW HOME built by Bovis Homes to the MAGNOLIA DESIGN which has never been lived in by the current owners. Accommodation comprises of Entrance Hall, Lounge, Kitchen Diner Downstairs CLOAKROOM, THREE Bedrooms, EN-SUITE to Master Bedroom and a family bathroom. Further benefits include UPV..."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** The Tailor is a beautiful new home complete with OPEN-PLAN kitchen dining area, FRENCH DOORS on to the rear garden and an EN-SUITE to bedroom 1. Situated 1 mile from Churchdown village centre, and a 15-minutes' drive to Cheltenham"
"THREE BEDROOMS - GARAGE WITH DRIVEWAY - CONSERVATORY A well presented three bedroom semi detached family home offering driveway parking, a detached garage, conservatory and a generous garden - FULL VIRTUAL TOUR ONLINE"
"The Property Centre is delighted to present to the market, with No Onward Chain, this extended three bedroom semi-detached home situated in the heart of Brockworth. Downstairs the property offers a spacious kitchen with breakfast bar, dining room, lounge and a bedroom with en-suite. Upstairs the ..."
"Built in 2017 and located in this ever popular location, is this 3 bedroom semi detached home, situated equally between Gloucester and Cheltenham alike, so perfect for the commuter. The well maintained property comprises - Ground Floor - Through the front door and into the entrance hall with..."
"This four bedroom townhouse built by ""Eden Stone"" offers a versatile accommodation. On the ground floor is cloakroom, kitchen diner and lounge with french doors open to the garden. The first floor has 2 bedrooms (one with en-suite) and a family bathroom. The top flor has the fourth bedr..."
"EYE CATCHING KITCHEN! Gloucestershire Property Online are delighted to offer this beautifully presented 3 bedroom semi detached house located in a popular cul-de-sac in Hardwicke. This stunning property has been extended and the accommodation comprises; Entrance hall, cloakroom,..."
A nicely presented and superbly located family home in the picturesque village of Upton St Leonards. The home provides a well balanced accommodation for a young family or couple and viewing is highly recommended. On the ground floor is an open hallway with doors to the separate lounge and ki...
"Situated on a lovely sized plot and benefitting from a good degree of privacy, we are pleased to bring this three bedroom detached property to the market 'For Sale'. Accommodation comprises 18ft kitchen/diner, 18ft lounge, cloakroom to the ground floor. Whilst upstairs there are three ..."
"A three bedroom detached family home, situated on a larger than average plot in a quiet cul-de-sac location. The property benefits from being within walking distance to an excellent junior school, supermarket and the main Gloucester to Cheltenham bus service. The property itself briefl..."
"*** 4 BEDROOMS, 3 RECEPTION ROOMS INCLUDING CONSERVATORY, 2 BATHROOMS, GARAGE *** Michael Tuck Estate Agents are very pleased to welcome to the market this spacious EXTENDED END TERRACE which offers fantastic living space for all growing families. Located in a sought after cul-de-sac in Abbeydale..."
** Three Bedroom House Situated In A Popular Location Close To The Countryside and Local Amenities ** Master Bedroom with En-Suite ** Enclosed South/ Westerly Facing Rear Garden ** Garage and Off Road Parking ** Remaining NHBC Guarantee ** Call To View:
"The Property Centre are delighted to bring to the market this two bedroom, extended detached bungalow offering a generous plot tucked away in Tuffley. Presented in good order throughout and offered for sale with no onward chain the property benefits from a re-fitted kitchen, re-fitted bath..."
The Property Centre is delighted to offer for sale this approximately 18 month old three bedroom semi detached house built by David Wilson homes and is situated in the very popular Huntsgrove development. The current owners have refitted the kitchen. The accommodation comprises entranc...
"STUNNING CHAIN FREE two double bedroom DETACHED BUNGALOW on a LEVEL PLOT. Inside the property you have a USEFUL SIDE ENTRANCE PORCH which gives access to the BEAUTIFUL FITTED KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM, the 21ft lounge follows and has a bow window overlooking the cul-de-sac, at the rear yo..."
"A stunning three bedroom semi-detached property situated in the sought after location of Huntsgrove, Hardwicke. This exceptionally well presented three bedroom semi-detached home built by the popular and highly recommended 'David Wilson Homes' two years ago benefits from Three good s..."
"CHAIN FREE - THREE BEDROOMS - TWO RECEPTION ROOMS A three bedroom semi detached family home offered for sale with no onward chain. offering two reception rooms, extended accommodation and a generous rear garden"
"The Property Centre is delighted to present to the market this chain free three bedroom semi-detached property. The properties accommodation briefly comprises of a lounge, kitchen/diner, downstairs w/c, three bedrooms, two of which are doubles and a bathroom. Further benefits include a garage and..."
"This three bedroom detached family home for sale is situated in the sought after location of Quedgeley. The property is located at the tip of a quiet cul-de-sac near school lane and is within close proximity to well-regarded local schools and an array of shops and amenities, making th..."
"*** MODERN 3 BEDROON TOWNHOUSE, WELL PRESENTED, LOCAL AMENITIES *** MICHAEL TUCK ESTATE AGENTS are extremely pleased to welcome to the open market this fabulous and beautifully presented 3 bedroomed terrace, 3 storey town house, located in an enviable position within Innsworth, Whittle Gardens de..."
"*** Investment Opportunity, FOUR x One Bedroom flats *** Move Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the market this excellent investment opportunity of four, one bedroom flats offered for sale. All flats benefit from existing tenancy agreements and are sold with tenants in situ, and the flats..."
"***VERSATILE FOUR BEDROOM, THREE STOREY TOWN HOUSE, NO ONWARD CHAIN *** A modern four bedroom terraced property for sale situated in the popular development of Coopers Edge, Brockworth. This spacious and versatile home is immaculately presented and has been recently re-deco..."
"Superbly well-presented Three Bedroom Semi-detached house, located on a very Quiet street in Quedgeley. The current owners have made a large amount of improvements to include, underfloor heating in the Kitchen, Re-fitted En-suite and Family Bathroom, and changing the layout to offer an Open Plan..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to present to the market this beautifully presented three bedroom townhouse in the Whittle Gardens development, Innsworth. Downstairs the property benefits from a lounge, open plan kitchen/diner, downstairs w/c. On the further two floors there are three bedrooms, ..."
"Stunning 3 bedroom townhouse located in a quiet, friendly neighbourhood with good schools nearby, parks, playgrounds and green spaces across the Kingsway development and only a 5 minute walk to bus stop with direct connection to Gloucester City centre and train station, 10 minute walk to shops an..."
"A 3 bedroom, semi detached, property with a large garage/workshop, offered for sale with no onward chain."
This property requires modernisation but has plenty of potential especially with its large 48ft x 46ft rear and side garden. Downstairs is a lounge diner and kitchen with three bedrooms and a bathroom upstairs. Outside you have a rear and side garden as well as front garden and drivewa...
"KJT Residential Lydney office are pleased to offer for sale this interesting investment property ideal for a buy to let purchaser or Airbnb investor. Situated in a convenient edge of city location, close to the Gloucester Docks development, the Peel Centre shopping mall, a variety of restaurants..."
** Three Bedroom Townhouse with Flexible Living Accommodation ** Enclosed Garden and Garage ** Popular Location Close To Local Amenities and Schools ** Call To View:
Private living with a sense of community for the over 70's can be found in this beautifully presented top floor retirement apartment offering spacious accommodation with lovely views from both bedrooms and the living area towards Llanthony Secunda Priory and the surrounding grounds. An allocated ...
"*** A STUNNING DOUBLE STOREY EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM HOME WITH GARAGE & PARKING*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to welcome NEW TO THE MARKET this exceptionally appointed, extended three bedroom family home located in the ever popular ABBEYMEAD location. On the ground floor..."
" Immaculate three bedroom semi detached property that is situated on a quiet cul-de-sac in the ever popular Green Farm Development of Quedgeley! In brief the property comprises of; entrance hall, downstairs cloakroom, spacious lounge, modern fitted kitchen/diner, conservatory, two double bed..."
"As an individual architect designed bungalow in excess of 1000 SQ FT dating back to the 1970's, this property has been loved and looked after by the same family for over 30 years! The bungalow offers lots of potential to update, extend or even have multi generation living (subject to permiss..."
"*** STUNNING 3 BED SEMI DETACHED, CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION, MODERN, ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN *** Michael Tuck estate agents are delighted to welcome to the open market this much loved family home, perfect for a first time buyer or a young family. This stunning property has been much improved by its curren..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, this four bedroom terraced townhouse is located within close proximity to Gloucester City Centre and the Historic Gloucester Docks. Boasting flexible living accommodation throughout, enclosed rear garden along with the potential to create further living..."
"Please quote DH0109. A chain free Penthouse apartment in the historic Gloucester Docks, with views across the main basin and beyond. This property will appeal to those looking for stylish, contemporary living with a twist of warehouse character.
"
"A very WELL MAINTAINED end townhouse in this very POPULAR RESIDENTIAL POSITION Catherine Place is a very popular residential road on this highly sought after moderm development on the northern edge of Gloucester. Good schooling and shops are close by, Gloucester city centre, Cathedral and D..."
" Michael Tuck Estate Agents Quedgeley are delighted to welcome to the market this recently renovated three bedroom detached house located in Water Wheel Close, Quedgeley . The property in brief comprises of; spacious lounge, modern fitted kitchen, dining room, cloakroom, two double bedrooms,o..."
The Hardwick - a beautiful two-bedroom house with parking. Large open-plan kitchen and dining area running the width of the property with fully glazed double patio doors leading out to a private garden. The light and spacious living room includes a large built in storage cupboard...
"Plot 23 'The Mandeville' - A beautifully designed 3 bedroom END TERRACE house with 2 PARKING SPACES. The property boasts 991 sq ft and comprises of entrance hall with cloakroom, kitchen/dining room and living room with French doors to the rear garden. The kitchen has soft close units and fitted w..."
"MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS welcome NEW TO THE MARKET this exceptionally presented four bedroom property located on a generous size plot. The accommodation has been altered in the past to offer further space downstairs. In brief we have: Entrance hallway, shower room, lounge, OPEN PLAN Kitchen..."
"SPACIOUS FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME sitting on a CORNER PLOT. Inside the property there is a 17FT LOUNGE at the front, a 19FT KITCHEN/DINER at the rear, a cloakroom and a boot room. Upstairs there are four double bedrooms serviced by a bathroom with a white suite. "
This period property is comprised over three floors. As you enter the property into the lovely tiled hallway you have your living room on your right hand side with a bay window to the front and a working fire place. Kitchen/diner to the back of the property with sliding double doors out to ...
"THREE BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW pleasantly situated on the popular Bodiam Avenue. The accommodation comprises lounge, kitchen, three bedrooms and a bathroom. Additional benefits include gas fired central heating, upvc double glazing, convenient location, OFF ROAD PARKING for several v..."
"Extended THREE STOREY Townhouse which offers spacious and versatile accommodation. With accommodation consisting of four DOUBLE Bedrooms, Two Reception Rooms (Potential Bedrooms) and Two Bathrooms, this property is sure to attract the BUY TO LET Investor. Offer to the market with No Onward..."
*** BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM HOME IN HUCCLECOTE WITH LARGE GARDEN & NO CHAIN*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS welcome to the open market this attractive opportunity for first time buyers to purchase this chain free three bedroom property in a popular position. The ac...
** Four Bedroom Semi Detached Townhouse ** Master Bedroom with En-Suite ** Flexible and Spacious Accommodation ** Garage and Enclosed Garden ** Convenient Location ** Call To View:
"Plot 27 'Mandeville' - A beautifully designed 3 bedroom terrace house with 3 PARKING SPACES. The property boasts 991 sq ft and comprises of entrance hall with cloakroom, kitchen/dining room and living room with French doors to the rear garden. The kitchen has soft close units and fitted with inte..."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is this extended two bedroom semidetached bungalow conveniently located within walking distance of local amenities and on a bus route. The property has been well maintained and offers generous accommodation throughout comprising of an entrance hall, 17f..."
"Robinson David Estate Agents are delighted to present a charming semi-detached dormer style house, an iconic style for the popular area of Hucclecote, Gloucester , which is perfect for those looking for a centrally located family home."
"CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION - GARAGE WITH DRIVEWAY PARKING -THREE RECEPTION ROOMS Located within a cul-de-sac of Longlevens is this well presented and spacious three bedroom semi detached family home. Offering three receptions rooms, modern shower room and a garage with driveway parking - VIRTUAL TOU..."
"** Large Family Home** TG Sales & Lettings are pleased to offer to the market this well-presented, four-bedroom family home which is situated in the much sought-after area of Linden which is close to the historic Gloucester Quays and other local amenities including great primary and secondary ..."
"STUNNING THREE BEDROOM END-TERRACE - Plot 31 THE BOHON III - INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, VINYL FLOORING TO KITCHEN. (Please note that pictures do not represent exact plot) 'The Bohon III' is a 2 storey, 3 bedroom terrace property with 2 PARKING SPACES situated on the exclusive Earls Park develop..."
"A spacious and well presented semi-detached family home, situated in a sought after location in Hucclecote. The property itself briefly consists of a large reception room, living room, dining room and an extended kitchen downstairs. Whilst upstairs has three double bedrooms, a family b..."
"*** BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED STARTER HOME WITH GARAGE & GENEROUS SIZE REAR GARDEN*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS welcome to the open market this fantastically appointed three bedroom home with open plan living, garage & parking. The accommodation comprises of: Entrance hallway, cloakroom..."
"STUNNING THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED - Plot 42 THE BOHON I - INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, VINYL FLOORING TO KITCHEN. (Please note that pictures do not represent exact plot) 'The Bohon I' is a 2 storey, 3 bedroom semi-detached property with 2 PARKING SPACES situated on the exclusive Earls Park dev..."
"DETACHED - CONSERVATORY - WELL PRESENTED A very well presented detached family home offering an open plan kitchen/diner, two additional reception rooms, conservatory and an enclosed and generous rear garden. FULL VIRTUAL TOUR ONLINE"
*** A BEAUTIFUL TWO BEDROOM BUNGALOW ON A CORNER PLOT WITH GARAGE IN HUCCLECOTE*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to welcome to the market this exceptionally well appointed bungalow located in a popular cul-de-sac in Hucclecote. The accommodation comprises of: Entrance hall...
"Offered with no onward chain is this three-bedroom, semi-detached home set within a prime location, close to local schools, shops, and motorway access. Benefitting from off-road parking and a generously sized private garden, the property offers flexible living accommodation throughout and viewing..."
"A three bedroom extended semi detached property with a south facing rear garden and off road parking for three cars. Internally the accomodation comprises of an entrance hall. downstairs cloakroom, good size 21ft lounge/diner, extended living space leading on to the garden and an extended 16..."
"*£14,499 KEY WORKER DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION & FLOORING INCLUDED.* SPACIOUS home with open plan kitchen and French doors to the garden. Lounge with HOME OFFICE space. EN SUITE main bedroom, further double bedroom and a single. Comes with parking. Plot 11 | The Maidstone | Winnycroft | Barratt Homes...."
"**£14,499 KEY WORKER DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION & FLOORING INCLUDED.** SPACIOUS home with open plan kitchen and French doors to the garden. Light and airy lounge and lots of STORAGE space. EN SUITE main bedroom, further double bedroom and a single. Comes with two parking spaces. Plot 419 | The Ellerto..."
Robinson David Estate Agents are delighted to present this semi-detached THREE double bedroom home situated within the high demand area of Tuffley in Gloucester.
"NEW ROOF & BOILER! This well proportioned three-bedroom bungalow is offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Off-road parking leads to the front door and into an entrance hall with three bedrooms, bathroom, living room, conservatory and kitchen. The property benefits from a very pleasant west-facing rear ga..."
A detached FAMILY HOME on a GOOD SIZED South backing corner plot but in NEED OF UPDATING Penny Close is a very popular and small cul de sac situated just off Greyhound Gardens and the Cheltenham Road approximately 2 miles to the East of Gloucester City centre. Some of the areas best schools ...
"STUNNING THREE BEDROOM TERRACE - Plot 30 THE BOHON III - INTEGRATED APPLIANCES, VINYL FLOORING TO KITCHEN. (Please note that pictures do not represent exact plot) 'The Bohon III' is a 2 storey, 3 bedroom terrace property with 4 PARKING SPACES situated on the exclusive Earls Park development..."
"Situated in the Heart of the Historic Gloucester Docks, this generously sized, two double bedroom, penthouse apartment boast views across the Barge Arm Inlet, secure allocated off road parking and flexible living accommodation throughout. With rarely available duel balconies, the apartment is bro..."
Located in a popular cul-de-sac of Abbeymead is this spacious three bedroom semi-detached house. The property is within short driving distance of local amenities and transport links to both Gloucester City Centre and the M5 motorway network. Internally the property comprises of entranc...
"A three bedroom semi-detached home set in the popular area of Saintbridge Close. This property is situated close to local amenities, good bus routes to the City Centre and surrounding area and in a popular catchment area for both primary and secondary school. The accommodation which i..."
"Semi Detached town house, Two Reception Rooms, Kitchen/diner, Four Bedrooms, Family Bathroom, Ensuite. Rear and front Gardens, Garage  "
"A three bedroom semi detached family home set in a quiet cul de sac location in Abbeymead. The accommodation within the property comprises of entrance hall leading to a separate kitchen, lounge diner and a conservatory leading to an enclosed rear garden. To the first floor are two double be..."
"6 YEAR OLD THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM THREE STOREY SEMI DETACHED HOUSE situated on a level plot within a popular development. Inside the property you have a COMFORTABLE LOUNGE at the front, a FITTED KITCHEN/DINER at the rear overlooking the garden and a handy cloakroom. Upstairs you h..."
"*** AN EXCEPTIONAL & EXTENDED HOME LOCATED IN BARNWOOD*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS welcome to the market this absolutely beautiful terrace home located in BARNWOOD. The accommodation comprises of: Entrance hallway, lounge/diner, modern fitted kitchen/breakfast room. Upstairs a..."
"Modern three storey townhouse, commanding a good size plot located on the North side of Gloucester giving great commuter access to the M5, Cheltenham & Gloucester. Step over the threshold into an entrance hall to meet & greet guests, that in turn leads to a usable living room. ..."
"A well located 3 bed semi detached home in this popular Brockworth cul de sac. Providing great access to Cheltenham, Gloucester and the motorway network the position of the property will certainly appeal to those who commute. The accommodation is of pleasing proportions and offers 3 bedroom..."
THREE BEDROOMS - SEMI DETACHED - DRIVEWAY PARKING A beautifully presented three bedroom semi detached family home located within a cul-de-sac of Longford. The property has been finished to a high specification where the owner took additional upgrades from new.
"Michael Tuck Estate Agents Quedgeley are delighted to welcome to the market this immaculate three bedroom semi detached townhouse that is situated in Kingsway. In brief the property comprises of; entrance hall, kitchen/breakfast room, downstairs cloakroom, lounge, two double bedrooms, one sing..."
"*** MODERN 3 BEDROOM MID TERRACE HOUSE, EXTENDED KTICHEN, BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED, PART CONVERTED GARAGE *** Perfect starter home for first time buyers or the growing family, this extremely well presented property is light & airy throughout and benefits from a part converted garage which is current..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to offer for sale this well presented home built by Taylor Wimpey situated in the popular Kingsway development and is close to local amenities. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, cloakroom, fitted kitchen, lounge, master bedroom benefitting from..."
"**£14,249 KEY WORKER DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION** SPACIOUS home with open plan kitchen and French doors to the garden. Lounge with HOME OFFICE space. EN SUITE main bedroom, further double bedroom and a single. Comes with parking. Plot 410 | The Maidstone | Maidstone | Barratt Homes. Full description:..."
** IMMACULATELY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM TERRACED HOME SITUATED IN A QUIET & POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC with NO ONWARD CHAIN ** REMAINING NHBC GUARANTEE ** ALLOCATED OFF ROAD PARKING ** ENCLOSED GARDEN **
"CHAIN FREE very well presented and extended three bedroom semi detached house. Inside the property there is a LIGHT LOUNGE at the front that leads via double doors to the WELL FITTED KITCHEN/DINER, the UPVC DOUBLE GLAZED CONSERVATORY is off the kitchen via patio doors, finally downstairs..."
"TWO BEDROOM LINK DETACHED BUNGALOW WITH GARDEN AND OFF ROAD PARKING FOR SEVERAL VEHICLES. The Property Centre are delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this well-proportioned, two bedroom link detached bungalow situated in a popular location of Gloucester. Within easy reach of a dire..."
"Please quote ref DS0168 Three bed semi detached bungalow, a fantastic family home with a lovely garden.
"
"Located in the popular Saintbridge Road, is this well presented 3/4 bedroom home. The property which boasts a generous garage comprises - Ground Floor - Entrance hall, stairs to first floor and under stairs storage, front aspect lounge / diner and through to a breakfast room, with door to re..."
THREE BEDROOMS - GARAGE WITH DRIVEWAY - GREEN FARM DEVELOPMENT A spacious three bedroom family home which is offered for sale in excellent decorative order throughout and benefits from a garage with driveway parking. FULL VIRTUAL TOUR ONLINE
"Situated on the popular Copeland Park development in Tuffley, is this three bedroom, three storey townhouse with a garage and parking. Accommodation comprises of kitchen/breakfast room and WC on the ground floor. On the first floor there is a lounge and bedroom three (with built in wardrobes..."
"The Property Centre is pleased to offer for sale this well presented three bedroom semi detached house in the popular Church drive area and is situated in a cul de sac location. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, kitchen, lounge/diner, conservatory, three bedrooms, bathroom, ga..."
"SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH AMPLE OFF ROAD PARKING The Property Centre are delighted to welcome to the market this well appointed family home. The property is located within short walks of local schools, shops and other local amenities. The accommod..."
" Michael Tuck Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic three bedroom semi detached property that is situated on the popular Tuffley Avenue in Gloucester and offered to the market with No Onward Chain! In brief the property comprises of; entrance porch, entrance ha..."
This property is situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac location in popular Longlevens. It has been in the same family ownership since the 1930's and so would now benefit from a comprehensive programme of modernisation and improvement. The accommodation briefly comprises: entra...
"***TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM, SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW OCCUPYING A GENEROUS CORNER PLOT WITH AMPLE PARKING - CHAIN FREE *** The Property Centre is delighted to welcome to the market this impressive semi detached bungalow situated within a prime and sought after ""Upper Tuffley"" locatio..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to present to the market this well presented three bedroom semi-detached house in Brockworth. Accommodation comprises of a kitchen, lounge-diner, downstairs w/c, three bedrooms, main with ensuite and a family bathroom. Outside the property offers parking for sever..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain within the popular Waterfront development, this immaculately presented two double bedroom apartment boasts stunning views over the Gloucester & Sharpness Canal. Further benefitting from generous open plan living accommodation and an allocated parking spa..."
"The Property Centre are delighted to offer to the market for sale this beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached home in Abbeydale. Within close proximity to Heron Primary School, shopping and medical amenities, the property has a lot to offer. The Property has undergone a com..."
"Gloucestershire Property Online are pleased to offer to market this fantastic 3 bedroom link detached house located in Kingsway. Marketed as CHAIN FREE, this spacious, property comprises: Entrance hall, WC, lounge, dining room, modern kitchen, 3 bedrooms (with ensuite to master) and a fa..."
"**£13,999 KEY WORKER DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION** SPACIOUS home with open plan kitchen and French doors to the garden. Lounge with HOME OFFICE space. EN SUITE main bedroom, further double bedroom and a single. Comes with parking. Plot 411 | The Maidstone | Winnycroft | Barratt Homes. Full description..."
"**£13,999 KEY WORKER DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION** SPACIOUS home with open plan kitchen and French doors to the garden. Light and airy lounge and lots of STORAGE space. EN SUITE main bedroom, further double bedroom and a single. Comes with parking. Plot 414 | The Ellerton | Winnycroft | Barratt Homes.
..."
"Very well presented spacious three bedroom three storey family home located in a popular residential location. Benefits include an en-suite to the master bedroom, garage, off road parking, upvc double glazing, gas fired central heating, an enclosed rear garden and no onward chain."
"An attractive well maintained SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW which has been set in a QUIET POSITION Snowdon Gardens is a popular no through road situated just off the Cheltenham Road East on the outskirts of the popular village of Churchdown. Cheltenham, the M5 and Gloucester are all within easy rea..."
" NO ONWARD CHAIN! This good sized three-bedroom semi-detached house sits in a popular location within Barnwood and benefits from off-road parking, garage and attractive rear garden. With a large sitting room, modern kitchen and conservatory this property provides plenty of living space downstair..."
"CHAIN FREE!! Gloucestershire Property Online are thrilled to offer this delightful three bedroom semi-detached house, located on a popular road in Kingsway, Gloucester. Offering stylish and modern accommodation throughout, this property has been beautifully maintained by the current owne..."
"THREE BEDROOMS - LOW MAINTENANCE GARDEN - EN-SUITE - VIRTUAL TOUR ONLINE Offered for sale in beautiful condition is this spacious three bedroom property. Master with En-suite and built in wardrobes, enclosed rear garden and parking for serval vehicles."
"Overlooking the Gloucester & Sharpness canal, this ground floor luxury apartment provides light and airy accommodation throughout and offered to the market with no onward chain. The newly developed Waterfront Crest Nicholson development further benefits from generous living accommodation and an a..."
"Martin & Co are delighted to offer this modern 3 bedroom home in the sought after location of Longlevens, ideally situated for access to Cheltenham, Gloucester city centre and M5 access for commuters.In brief the property comprises; Entrance hall, downstairs W/C, modern fitted kitchen, lounge..."
"The Property Centre are delighted to offer to the market, this three bedroom terraced house in a quiet cul-de-sac location and is within walking distance of the popular Barnwood Arboretum, the property is also CHAIN FREE. Upon entering the property through the front door, there is entr..."
"CGT sales are pleased to present to the market this three bedroom semi-detached home situated in Innsworth. Benefitting from a LARGE SOUTHERLY FACING GARDEN, this bright and airy property is conveniently located set back from Innsworth Lane and offers the new owner an exciting opportunity to put ..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to present to the market this three bedroom semi-detached property located in the heart of Brockworth. Accommodation comprises of a kitchen/diner, lounge, cloakroom, three bedrooms and a family bathroom. Further benefits include a garden with side access and off r..."
"A fantastic opportunity has arisen to purchase this two bedroom bungalow in Tuffley. On entering the property via the car porch there is a welcoming entrance hall which leads into a large, light and spacious living room, with bi-folding doors leading to the large enclosed garden. The ki..."
"LARGELY EXTENDED BAY FRONTED VICTORIA HOUSE situated in a popular convenient location with a 50FT REAR GARDEN, TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS, ONE SINGLE BEDROOM, open plan lounge/diner, fitted kitchen/diner with built in appliances, DOWNSTAIRS SHOWER ROOM and UPSTAIRS BATHROOM"
" Michael Tuck Estate Agents Gloucester are delighted to bring to the market an excellent Investment opportunity. Currently divided into 4 Apartments, we are selling TWO spacious Apartments and the Freehold Interest. Flat 2 & Flat 3 both comprise of Entrance Hall, Lounge, Kitchen, Shower Room a..."
"YOPA are pleased to offer this SEMI-DETACHED 3 BEDROOM HOUSE with PRIVATE GARDEN, GARAGE & DRIVEWAY for sale. This well presented family house is located Pevensey Place, in a quiet cul-de-sac in the popular Kingsway area of Gloucester, with good local facilities all close at hand."
"This well presented three bedroom semi-detached family home has a converted garage that gives the benefit of a kitchen diner to the property and externally a driveway for two cars. Situated in a quiet residential position the accommodation comprises; entrance hall, kitchen diner, loun..."
" NO ONWARD CHAIN MICHAEL TUCK ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to welcome to the market this immaculate Two DOUBLE Bedroom Extended Semi Detached Bungalow situated down a quiet no through road in Hardwicke! The property comprises of Entrance Porch/Utility Room, Modern Kitchen/Breakfast Room, Lo..."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** The Potter is a beautiful new home complete with OPEN-PLAN living/dining area with FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden, a modern fitted kitchen, TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS and EN-SUITE to bedroom 1."
"Situated one mile from CHURCHDOWN VILLAGE CENTRE and 15 minutes' drive from CHELTENHAM, the Azalea benefits from off-road PARKING for up to 2 cars, a generous OPEN-PLAN living area, separate kitchen and TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS. "
"Welcome to this traditional three bedroom semi-detached property, nestled in the heart of the highly sought-after neighborhood of Linden, Gloucester. This charming and well-maintained home offers the perfect balance of classic elegance and modern living, making it a must-see for families looking ..."
"The Property Centre are delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this three bedroom semi detached house tucked away in Arundel Close, a quiet cul-de-sac in Tuffley. Offering generous living accommodation, as well as a large driveway, this would make an excellent family home. The accomm..."
SELLARS BRIDGE DEVELOPMENT - NO ONWARD CHAIN - ALLOCATED PARKING A very well presented three bedroom family home located on the sought after Sellars Bridge development. offered for sale with two allocated parking spaces and chain free.
"Representing a unique opportunity to acquire a move-in ready semi-detached property in Gloucester, this home is ideal for any house hunter looking for a stress-free move into a highly desirable location. With no modernisation required, this attractive home will provide a huge range of benefits t..."
"This nicely presented home is situated in the popular and convenient location of Longford Mews, Gloucester. This Townhouse offers ample amounts of space and would make a perfect family home or investment purchase. Downstairs the property comprises of: Driveway, garage, storage cupboar..."
"Substantial and versatile three double bedroom period semi detached townhouse with parking. The Property Centre is delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this well presented family home situated on a no through road. Offering generous accommodation arranged over three floors the acco..."
"The Property Centre are delighted to bring to the market this two bedroom semi-detached bungalow which has been re-furbished throughout by the current owners and finished to an excellent standard. The property has been re-wired, has a new heating system, newly fitted kitchen with built in ap..."
" Well Presented three bedroom semi detached property in a quiet road on the sought after Hunts Grove Development in Hardwicke! In brief the property comprises of; entrance hall, cloakroom, lounge, kitchen/diner, two double bedrooms, one single bedroom, modern fitted bathroom and en-suite to..."
** Three Bedroom Semi Detached House with No Onward Chain ** Spacious Accommodation In Need Of Modernisation ** Enclosed Garden ** Garage and Ample Off Road Parking ** Call To View:
"The Property Centre is delighted to bring to the market this lovely property situated in the popular area of Hunts Grove. The accommodation comprises an entrance hallway, cloakroom, living room, kitchen/diner. Upstairs is a lovely master bedroom with ensuite, two further bedrooms and ..."
"*** 2 BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW, CUL-DE-SAC, SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION, NO ONWARD CHAIN *** Michael Tucks Estate Agents are pleased to welcome to the open market this 2 bedroom detached bungalow in the extremely popular suburbs of Abbeydale and offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Situated in tuck ..."
"*** THREE BEDROOM HOME ON THE POPULAR GREEN FARM ESTATE CHAIN FREE*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to offer for sale this chain free, well looked after three bedroom property located in a quiet & highly desirable cul-de-sac. The accommodation comprises of: Entrance h..."
"THREE/FOUR BEDROOM TOWNHOUSE IN SOUGHT AFTER TUFFLEY LOCATION OFFERED CHAIN FREE The Property Centre are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic family home which offers an abundance of living space. The property is located within short walks of local schools, shop..."
"*** THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME, CHAIN FREE, WITH 2 PARKING SPACES AND MASTER BEDROOM EN-SUITE *** This 3 bedroom semi-detached home is very well presented internally, as you enter the property into the hallway the stairs are in front of you and door leading into the living room w..."
"Outstanding, three bedroom, modern end terrace in popular Hempsted location.... The Property Centre are delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this beautifully appointed, modern end terrace situated in the popular area of Hempsted. The accommodation briefly comprises; entrance hall, c..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain this rarely available two double bedroom apartment is offered to the market. Boasting a generous amount of living space and large balcony offering views toward May Hill, viewing is highly advised for residential buyers and investors alike with a potentia..."
"*** 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY, FANTASTIC FAR-REACHING VIEWS, DESIRABLE LOCATION, GARAGE, CHAIN-FREE *** MICHAEL TUCK ESTATE AGENTS are very pleased to present this fabulous opportunity to purchase this CHAIN-FREE 3 bedroomed semi-detached property, located just underneath the slopes of ..."
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN! 3 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED, GREAT SIZE REAR GARDEN, PERFECT FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS OR A GROWING FAMILY *** Michael Tucks Estate Agents are pleased to welcome to the market this great size 3 bedroom semi-detached house, offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN!! This property has been extreme..."
A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED BUNGALOW IN ABBEYDALE WITH GARAGE & PARKING!! MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to welcome to the open market this exceptionally well presented bungalow located on a CORNER PLOT with parking & a garage to rear. The accommodation comprises of: Entrance H...
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is this three bedroom semi detached property with off road parking and a good size rear garden. Accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, 23ft lounge/diner, conservatory and kitchen on the ground floor. Upstairs there are three good size bedrooms and..."
"Excellence in over 50's living in a community full of friendly faces. Orchard Park offers an independent, worry-free lifestyle, providing more time for enjoyment, relaxation and travel. The beautiful Oakgrove Waverton with low maintenance exterior, will give you the time to focus on the more..."
BRAND NEW Oakgrove Waverton (42'x22') | FULLY-FURNISHED | Two Double Bedrooms | Garage with power | Exclusive for over 50s | Modern Fitted Kitchen | Community living with like minded people | Highly sought-after location | Safe and Secure | Pet Friendly | Part Exchange Available
The Property Centre are delighted to offer to the market this modern three bedroom end of terraced property. Located in a popular cul-de-sac of Hucclecote this property is within a short drive or walk of local amenities and transport links. This is an ideal property for first time buyers or even ...
"Move Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the market this spacious town house positioned in a popular cul de sac close to local amenities, shops and schools. This property is tucked away at the end of a cul-de-sac in Abbeydale, and is generously proportioned over 3 floors. The accommoda..."
Extended and very well presented two bedroom semi detached bungalow situated in a very popular slightly elevated location. Inside the property you have a light lounge to the rear overlooking the garden. The extended well fitted kitchen is off the lounge and also overlooks the garden. At ...
"A three bedroom mid terrace family home located in a cul-de-sac location in Quedgeley, benefitting from an enclosed rear garden and allocated off road parking. "
"A GOOD SIZED semi detached house built in the 1950's on this very POPULAR DEVELOPMENT The property offers good sized accommodation in this very popular position and has the benefits of gas central heating, double glazing and to the exterior good sized gardens and parking for 2/3 cars to the ..."
" Immaculate three Double bedroom Townhouse that is situated down a quiet no through road on the ever popular Copeland Park Development in Tuffley and is offered to the market with No Onward Chain! In brief the property comprises of; entrance hall, downstairs cloakroom, modern fitted kitchen/d..."
"ATTRACTIVE three bedroom semi detached property in need of complete renovation situated in a DESIRABLE LOCATION having a REAR GARDEN MEASURING 120FT. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, three bedrooms and family bathroom. Additional benefit..."
"*** GREAT SIZE 4 BEDROOM TOWNHOUSE, CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION, SPACIOUS LIVING SPACE *** This property is position tucked away at the end of a cul-de-sac in Abbeydale, conveniently located to all local amenities such as, schools and bus routes. The accommodation is spacious throughout and is generously..."
"*INVESTORS ONLY* A freehold investment opportunity positioned on the ever popular Oxford Street on the edge of Gloucester City Centre. The Grade II listed terraced property comprises of a one bedroom ground floor apartment, with private courtyard garden, and a three bedroom duplex style ..."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** Situated one mile from CHURCHDOWN VILLAGE CENTRE and 15 minutes' drive from CHELTENHAM, the Azalea benefits from off-road PARKING for up to 2 cars, a generous OPEN-PLAN living area, separate kitchen and TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS. "
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** Available in mid and end terrace - The Potter is a beautiful new home complete with OPEN-PLAN living/dining area with FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden, a modern fitted kitchen, TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS and EN-SUITE to bedroom 1."
"The bungalow is deceptively spacious and is presented in good condition. Briefly comprising an entrance hall, living room, three bedrooms, refitted kitchen and shower room. To the front of the property there is a drive providing parking. There is also a generous 41ft x 30ft rear garden. The..."
" An End Terraced DOUBLE FRONTED property offering an ideal INVESTMENT for an incoming purchaser with potential DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITIES.Currently configured to the Ground Floor are FOUR ROOMS and a Utility/Storage Room & Cloakroom. Upstairs provides a 20ft DUAL ASPECT Room, Further Room, Kitch..."
***BLOCK VIEWINGS- SATURDAY 18TH MARCH 1-4 BY APPOINTMENT ONLY*** MURDOCK & WASLEY welcome to the market this well presented three bedroom semi detached property located on Stanmoor in Abbeydale. The accommodation offers generous space for first time buyers or growing families. On the gr...
*** THREE BEDROOM END OF TERRACE HOUSE IN ABBEYMEAD WITH GARAGE AND OFF ROAD PARKING *** This three bedroom end of terrace house is located in the popular suburb of Abbeymead and within short walking distance of local amenities. The internals of the property briefly compris...
"A well-presented three bedroom semi-detached property set in the sought after location of Abbeydale. Ideal for first time buyers and families, this three bedroom home is positioned in a quiet cul-de-sac location. The property is convientely located within close proximity to all local ..."
*** FANTASTIC PLOT- THREE BEDROOM HOME IN ABBEYDALE*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS offer to the market this attractive opportunity for first time buyers to purchase this generous size three bedroom property located on a good size plot in Abbeydale. The accommodation comprises of:...
"THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH AMPLE OFF ROAD PARKING IN TUFFLEY OFFERED CHAIN FREE The Property Centre are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic family home, located within walking distance to local schools, shops and other local amenities. The ac..."
"This very well presented family home has been modernised by the current vendors to include a new kitchen, bathroom, windows and doors. The living space briefly comprising; welcoming entrance hall, inviting lounge diner and along the hallway is the newly fitted kitchen with quartz stone wor..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom semi detached house built by Westbury homes to the Sutton design. The property is situated in the popular Kingsway development. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, cloakroom, lounge, kitchen/diner, ensuite to ..."
"Occupying a cul-de-sac position is this well presented three bedroom extended semi detached property situated in the popular Robinswood area of Gloucester. The accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, cloakroom, lounge, 15ft kitchen/diner and utility room on the ground floor. ..."
Taylors Estate Agents welcome to the market this two bedroom semi-detached bungalow situated in the sought after location of Abbeydale. This well appointed two bedroom bungalow is offered to the market for sale and is well presented throughout. The property occupies a good sized plot a...
"A well presented three bedroom semi detached house, situated at the end of a no through road and only a short walk away from various local amenities. The property briefly consists of an entrance hall, living room and kitchen/dining room. Whilst upstairs has three bedrooms and a modern..."
Located down a small CUL DE SAC commanding a good size plot is this modern much loved semi detached BUNGALOW. Your viewing starts under a large storm porch then into an entrance hall where all rooms lead from. Comprising of three good sized bedrooms serviced by a modern shower room. T...
"Investment Opportunity - 3 individual 1 bedroom flats with parking. All the flats are currently let and giving a rental yield in excess of 7%. Each flat has, lounge and kitchen area with a double bedroom and bathroom and gas central heating. The property is located within a close distance to amen..."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain, KJT Residential are pleased to offer for sale this lovely semi detached bungalow, the property benefits from 2 double bedrooms, 10ft fitted kitchen, conservatory and wet room, the property further benefits from a garage, off road parking for several vehicles..."
A surprisingly GOOD SIZED end terrace VICTORIAN TOWNHOUSE which has been well maintained and recently improved Deans Walk is a very popular and highly convenient residential road situated just to the North of Gloucester city centre. All the City's facilities are within walking distance and ...
"The Property Centre are delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this exceptional modern townhouse. Located a stones throw away from Gloucester city centre and the popular Gloucester Quays development, this well appointed house would make an ideal first time buy. The versatile living s..."
A very well MAINTAINED three storey TOWNHOUSE on the Northern edge of Gloucester offering practical accommodation Longford Mews is a small cul de sac of residential properties situated just off the Tewkesbury Road just over 1 mile to the North of Gloucester City centre. Access to the Northern...
"Morgan Associates is delighted to offer 'For Sale' this charming two-bedroom bungalow offered CHAIN FREE in the sought after cul-de-sac, Rodney Close. Rodney Close is a quiet cul-de-sac situated off Oxtalls Drive and Oxtalls Way, a very popular part of Longlevens."
"***£1,000 PER MONTH MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION FOR UP TO 12 MONTHS^*** Ideally located just 15 minutes' drive from CHELTENHAM, and 12 minutes from GLOUCESTER STATION, the joiner is a brand new home featuring an OPEN-PLAN kitchen/dining area with FRENCH DOORS on to the rear GARDEN, a spacious lounge. "
"**£14,999 KEY WORKER DEPOSIT CONTRIBUTION** Comfortable home with OPEN PLAN KITCHEN and French doors to the garden. A lounge, cloakroom and some handy understairs STORAGE completes the ground floor. Upstairs you'll find TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS and a bathroom. Comes with parking. Plot 417 | The Roseb..."
"Located in the popular area of Kingsholm, this three bedroom terraced property has much to offer residential buyers and investors alike offering a potential rental income of £895 pcm. Further benefitting from generous living accommodation and an enclosed rear garden, viewing is highly advised."
"The Property Centre are delighted to present to the market,with No Onward Chain, this well presented three bedroom property in the heart of Churchdown. This property offers kitchen/diner, lounge, three bedrooms and a family bathroom. Further benefits include a garden, garage and off road parking...."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is this extended four bedroom semi detached property offering generous accomodation throughout Accomodation comprises of an entrance hall, 27ft lounge, 15ft dining room, 12ft kitchen and a shower room on the ground floor. Upstairs there are three bedroom..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to offer for sale this well presented three bedroom semi detached house built by Abbey Homes and situated in the popular Kingsway development. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, cloakroom, lounge/diner, kitchen, ensuite to master bedroom, two fu..."
A 3-bedroom semi detached home with lovely garden & conservatory. 
"Spacious 2 bedroom first floor flat with bike store. This surprising property has entrance porch with video entrance phone, hallway, 2 double bedrooms, generous open plan lounge/dining/kitchen, bathroom, electric heating and useful secure bike storage. Council Tax A, EPC - E, 184 yr lease, Ground..."
A WELL PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM HOME IN A QUIET & POPULAR LOCATION CHAIN FREE! MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS welcome to the open market this nicely presented end terrace property located in Hempsted. The property offers generous living space & is free flowing throughout & perfectly suite...
"The Property Centre are delighted to bring this three bedroom terrace property to the market with no onward chain. Situated in a popular, non-estate location in Quedgeley this property benefits from three double bedrooms, driveway parking and a garage. The garden is also a great size..."
"The property Centre are delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this nicely presented, three bedroom semi detached house situated along the always popular Marlborough Road in Gloucester. This fantastic home would make an ideal first time buy. The accommodation briefly comprises of an ..."
"No onward chain. This good size three bedroom property, with off road parking and a garage is located in a quiet cul-de-sac location. 
"
"The Property Centre are delighted to bring to the market this well appointed extended semi detached property. Accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, 20ft lounge/diner, 14ft conservatory and a modern kitchen on the ground floor. Upstairs there are three bedrooms with a loft room access..."
"Gloucestershire Property Online are thrilled to offer this spacious three bedroom mid-terrace house, located within a sought after cul-de-sac in Quedgeley. Perfectly suited toward those looking to secure their next family home or first purchase, the property is light and airy, with the further be..."
** Extended Three Bedroom Semi Detached Chalet Style Bungalow ** No Onward Chain ** In Need Of Modernisation ** Popular Location ** Enclosed Garden ** Call To View:
"***THREE ONE BEDROOM APARTMENTS ON THE OUTSKIRTS OF GLOUCESTER QUAYS*** ***INVESTORS ONLY*** We are delighted to welcome to the open market this sure to be popular, exciting opportunity to purchase these three one bedroom apartments with potential for Air Bnb serviced flat oppor..."
Well proportioned semi-detached bungalow with good size private rear garden and off road parking for two cars. The garden has a sunny aspect and is surrounded by other bungalows so affords a good deal of privacy and local shops and a main bus route are all within walking distance. The Property...
"The Property Centre are pleased to bring this fantastic, three bedroom end of terrace property to the market. Situated in a popular Quedgeley location, close to outstanding Ofsted schools and all local amenities, this house is not to be missed. The downstairs accommodation comprises ..."
"Move Sales and Lettings are offering yet another superb 3 bedroom house to the market, this spacious home has been finished to a fantastic standard and would make an ideal first time home or investment purchase. When Inside, the property boasts an entrance hall, cloakroom, Kitchen/Diner/Breakf..."
"**INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY** KJT Residential are pleased to offer for salethis substantial semi detached family home, the property benefits from 3double bedrooms, separate reception room, fitted kitchen and downstairsfamily bathroom, the property further benefits from gas centralheating, double gla..."
"BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED - LOW MAINTENACE GARDEN- OPENPLAN LIVING A individually built detached property offering bright and spacious accommodation over two floors with an impressive open plan, lounge/diner and kitchen across the ground floor. Benefiting two parking spaces and a low maintenance ..."
"This semi-detached house is situated in a no through road in popular Linden. As you enter the property there is a useful covered porch which leads into the property. Downstairs there is also the sitting room, dining rom, kitchen and bathroom. On the first floor there are thr..."
 IDEAL INVESTMENT PROPERTY – 3 FLATS - CLOSE TO GLOUCESTER DOCKS Michael Tuck Estate Agents Gloucester are pleased to bring to the market a Grade II Listed Victorian Townhouse located in close proximity to Gloucesters Historic Docks which has been split into THREE APARTMENTS (2 x One Bedr...
"Move Estate Agents are delighted to market this exquisitely refurbished Victorian house in the heart of Churchdown Village, now arranged as ten, one and two-bedroom apartments. Each apartment has been sculpted in its own way and finished to a high standard throughout by the well-renowned develope..."
Bay fronted red brick family home located at the top end of Seymour road giving great access to town & the Docks. Once over the threshold the scene is set to what is about to unfold. The entrance hall delivers a great area to meet & greet family and friends boasting the original orna...
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is this extended semi detached period property which is need of complete refurbishment but has ample living space and three generous size bedrooms. The property itself briefly consists of an entrance hall, bay fronted living room, extended open plan kitc..."
"BAY FRONTED FOUR BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN SOUGHT AFTER LINDEN The Property Centre are delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this lovely four bedroom, semi-detached, family home situated in popular Linden. Ideally positioned within close proximity to high achieving seconda..."
"This extended THREE bedroom property is ideal for a growing family. Having recently been decorated throughout it is ready to move into! More benefits to include, OFF ROAD parking and GARAGE, being situated in a NO THROUGH ROAD in popular Abbeydale close to all the local amenities ***CHAIN FREE***"
"STUNNING HIGH QUALITY NEWLY BUILT two double bedroom detached house with BLOCK PAVED OFF ROAD PARKING for two vehicles. Step through the double glazed front door into the generous hallway with a door to the handy downstairs cloakroom, the BEAUTIFULLY FITTED KITCHEN comes next with BUILT..."
Apartment 5 Whitefriars is a newly constructed two bedroom apartment with a private balcony accessible from the second bedroom and living space. Whitefriars is a state-of-the-art residential development brought to Gloucester by Reef Group in partnership with Gloucester City Council. The developm...
"This is a great example of a very affordable 3 bedroom home situated in a no through road. Armscroft Road is a quiet road with on street parking. It would make a great first time buy, investment or small family home. Downstairs consists of 2 reception rooms, kitchen and a bathroom. Upstairs boast..."
"In a quiet corner of Hucclecote, this surprisingly spacious two bedroom bungalow comes to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN and would benefit from some modernisation and updating. A driveway leads to the front door and into an entrance hall. Two double bedrooms sit at the front of the property ..."
"Three bedroom semi detached house that is situated on a quiet road in Kingsway! In brief the property comprises of; lounge, kitchen/diner, utility, two double bedrooms, one single bedroom, bathroom and en-suite to master. Further benefits include; Upvc double glazing, gas central heating, enc..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom semi detached home situated on the edge of the Kingsway development. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, utility room, kitchen/diner, lounge, three bedrooms, ensuite to master, family bathroom and driveway to ..."
"THREE BEDROOM END TERRACE - ALLOCATED PARKING - SECLUDED POSITION Located in the corner of a cu-de-sac offering allocated parking, conservatory & three bedrooms. This property is also available with no onward chain"
"This two bedroom end terrace home is ideally located near to the shops and bus routes on Hucclecote Road. Tucked away at the end of a cul de sac it offers lounge, kitchen and conservatory downstairs and two bedrooms and shower room upstairs. Outside is a fairly private rear 24ft x 16ft..."
"CHAIN FREE - SEMI DETACHED - GARDEN STUDIO A well presented two double bedroom semi detached property which is available in good decorative order, benefits driveway parking and no onward chain. FULL VIRTUAL TOUR ONLINE"
BEAUTIFULLY APPOINTED THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR ROBINSWOOD LOCATION WITH GARAGE AND PARKING The Property Centre are delighted to welcome to the market this stunning family home that simply must be viewed. The property is located within short walks of Robinswood Hi...
"A four bedroom staggered terraced property for sale set in Kingsholm, Gloucester. This deceptively spacious terraced home is arranged over three floors and offers versatile living accommodation throughout. The property would make a fantastic Buy To Let, HMO, or equally a great family ..."
"REF DH0109; For sale through the modern method of auction is this three bed family home situated in the heart of Tuffley, having undergone a programme of refurbishment and offers beautifully presented, well balanced accommodation throughout. The accommodation consists of enclosed entrance..."
Move Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this rarely available detached bungalow in Tuffley. Available with no onward chain and tucked away at the end of the cul de sac the bungalow provides an entrance hallway with doors off to all rooms. The two bedrooms can be located at the...
"*** A PERFECT STARTER HOME IN CHURCHDOWN*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to welcome NEW TO THE MARKET this exceptional size two double bedroom property located in a popular position in Churchdown. The accommodation currently comprises of: Entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen..."
"*** AN EXCEPTIONAL TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM STARTER HOME*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to welcome NEW TO THE MARKET this beautifully appointed semi detached property built by ""David Wilson Homes"" The accommodation comprises of: Entrance hallway, cloakroom, kitchen & lounge/di..."
Located in an ideal location in Hucclecote is the two bedroom semi detached home. The property is well presented offering lounge and kitchen breakfast room downstairs and two bedrooms upstairs with En-suite to main bedroom and separate garden. Outside in the 40ft x24ft rear garden is a...
**** OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN THIS ATTRACTIVE 3 BEDROOM TERRACE HOME ALSO HAS A GARAGE AND PRIVATE GARDEN VIEWINGS ARE RECOMMENDED**** Michael Tuck Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this 3 bedroom home with garage and private garden. Located just of Lobbleys Dive in the po...
The Property Centre welcome to the market a perfect opportunity for landlords looking to increase their property portfoilo or even first time buyers looking to get onto the property ladder. This property is situated to local ammenities and good transport links to Gloucester and the M5 motorway. <...
 A GOOD SIZED EDWARDIAN SEMI DETACHED HOUSE IN NEED OF UPDATING. Ebor Road is a small and quiet cul-de-sac situated off Armscroft Road and the Barnwood Road approximately a mile to the east of the city centre. The property is within walking distance of the hospital and Cheltenham and the M5 a...
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** A modern terraced home situated in ever popular Kingsholm, the property benefits from 3 double bedrooms, 13ft living room, 10ft kitchen and family bathroom, the property further benefits from garage, off road parking and gardens. EARLY VIEWING ESSENTIAL."
"TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW situated in a popular cul-de-sac location and offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, lean to, two double bedrooms and a shower room. Additional benefits include gas fired central heating, alum..."
"MICHAEL TUCK ESTATE AGENTS are pleased to welcome to the market this lovely two bedroom semi-detached property that is situated on a popular no through road in Quedgeley! In brief the property comprises of; spacious lounge, kitchen/breakfast room, two bedrooms, bathroom and en-suite to bedroom..."
"The Property Centre are delighted to bring this two bedroom property with driveway parking and a garage to the market. Situated in the heart of Quedgeley, this lovely property comprises an entrance hall, spacious lounge, kitchen with a door leading to the garden, two bedrooms and a fa..."
A superb two bedroom apartment with a kitchen/dining/living room and bathroom in the heart of Gloucester city centre
"*** TWO BEDROOM END TERRACE PROPERTY WITH GARAGE AND DRIVEWAY, SITUATED IN A COURTYARD WITH GREEN OPEN SPACE TO THE FRONT IN POPULAR ABBEYMEAD LOCATION - CHAIN FREE *** Viewing is highly recommended for this 2 double bedroom end terrace property, benefiting from garage and driveway to ..."
"Coming to the market with the benefit of NO ONWARD CHAIN, this period home has accommodation set over three floors and briefly comprises: Entrance Hall, a through lounge/diner, kitchen, downstairs shower room, 3 bedrooms, upstairs WC and a loft conversion/bedroom 4. Outside there is a pleasant r..."
"*** PERFECT STARTER HOME*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS are delighted to welcome for sale this exciting opportunity for first time buyers to purchase this well presented, two double bedroom semi detached home with a garage. The accommodation internally comprises of: Entrance hallway, ..."
"*** A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED STARTER HOME IN HUCCLECOTE*** MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS welcome to the market this extremely well appointed two bedroom home which is positioned in a popular position in Hucclecote. The accommodation comprises of: Entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen/diner, ..."
A well presented three bedroom terraced property located in a cul-de-sac location in Quedgeley. The property benefits from two allocated parking spaces. This property is well suited to a variety of buyers and in particular both first time buyers and inve...
THREE BEDROOM HOME IN NEED OF MODERNISING- HUGE POTENTIAL!! MURDOCK & WASLEY ESTATE AGENTS welcome to the market this exciting opportunity to purchase this chain free three bedroom home located in a quiet & extremely popular location. The accommodation offers generous living space & if y...
"*** 3 BEDROOM MID TERRACE, GARAGE, CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION *** Michael Tuck Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market a THREE BEDROOM mid terraced property located down a quiet cul-de-sac in Robinswood. The property comprises of Lounge / Diner, Kitchen, Two DOUBLE bedrooms and a single bedro..."
Ideally located within the popular development of Friars Orchard in the heart of Gloucester City Centre is this beautifully presented two double bedroom top floor apartment. Benefitting from open-plan living accommodation with multiple Juliet balconies providing stunning views towards Gloucester ...
This property has been recently refurbished by its current owners and comes to the market with no onward chain. Armscroft Road situated in a no through road in a quiet location. The city centre is a short drive and you have great access to Cheltenham. The property itself consists of 2 reception r...
"The Property Centre are delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this modern terrace house situated in the ever popular city suburb of Abbeymead. The property has good transport links to the M5 motorway as well as bus routes to Gloucester City Centre. Internally the property briefly co..."
"*** MODERN TWO BEDROOM TERRACE HOUSE WITH GARDEN AND ALLOCATED PARKING IN HUCCLECOTE CUL DE SAC *** This property is located in the ever popular location of Hucclecote, close to local shopping amenities and transport links including access to the M5 motorway. Internally the..."
"A warm welcome to Scudamore place, built in 2021 this modern apartment is exclusively for the over 60's being able to maintain independent living. This McCarthy & Stone development offers a stylish lounge, guest suite and house manager, with the added benefits of increased security and low mainte..."
"STUNNING TWO BEDROOM NEW BUILD CALL US TO VIEW ON ......Basswood Court has been built by a very reputable local developer and is positioned in a quiet development In Linden with two parking spaces. The ground floor accommodation comprises; A entrance hallway, spacious living room, a..."
"Robinson David Estate Agents are delighted to present a charming two bedroom mid-terraced house in Quedgeley, Gloucester, which is the perfect place to call home."
" OFFERS INVITED! Situated in a quiet residential cul-de-sac in the heart of Hucclecote, this semi detached 3 bedroom property offers great potential for an investment or family home. Well maintained by its owners, the property benefits from off-road parking and a mature rear garden. Upstairs th..."
"Located in a cul-de-sac position this two bedroom terraced property with garage and driveway is marketed CHAIN FREE and viewings are highly recommended as it will be of popular interest. The property comprises of entrance hall, kitchen to the front of the property and lounge dining roo..."
"Youtube video tour. Great investment opportunity. Crica £23,000 per annum. Currently configured as two apartments within a terraced property and an additional converted outbuilding with a kitchen and bathroom."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is this very well presented two bedroom property located close to the City Centre. The terraced house is tucked away in a private courtyard just off London Road, and within walking distance of many local amenities including Gloucestershire Royal Hospital. "
"Move Sales & Lettings are delighted to bring to the market this three bedroom terraced house offered for sale with no onward chain. The house, located in popular Robinswood and just a short walk from the hill itself also boasts a garage and driveway. Entering through the front door you find y..."
"This spacious semi detached property is situated in the popular location of Armscroft Road, Gloucester. This property does need modernisation to bring it up to it's full potential and due to this it would make a great renovation project for an investor or a first time buyer. With modernisation th..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to offer for sale this two double bedroom semi-detached house situated in the popular Kingsway development. The property is situated in a cul de sac location. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, cloakroom, kitchen, ensuite master, further double ..."
"This modern mid-terrace house is located in a lovely cul-de-sac with just two other properties in popular Quedgeley. Quedgeley has a range of local shops, schools, takeaways and supermarkets, as well as convenient access to the M5 and Gloucester city centre."
Move Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the market this four bedroom semi detached house spread over three floors. Offered for sale with no onward chain the accommodation comprises :- Entrance hallway with stairs rising to the first floor. Off the hallway a door leads into the open plan...
"PLEASE QUOTE REF LHO563; A classic, bay fronted, three bedroom, semi-detached house in Howard Street, Tredworth. This family home offers THREE separate reception rooms, a modern fitted kicthen, two bathrooms and three bedrooms. Externally there is a private enclosed garden with large timber sh..."
" Michael Tuck Estate Agents Quedgeley are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic two double bedroom semi detached property that is situated on a private cul-de-sac in Kingsway! In brief the property comprises of; entrance hall, downstairs cloak room, kitchen, lounge/diner, two do..."
"TWO BEDROOMS- GARAGE WITH PARKING - NO ONWARD CHAIN Located on the sought after ""Dales Wharf"" development with no onward chain is this two bedroom property, ideal for a first time buyer or investment. Full virtual tour online"
"A three bedroom semi detached bungalow offered for sale with no onward chain. The accommodation briefly compromises of an entrance hall, 18ft lounge, three bedrooms and a modern kitvchen and bathroom. To the rear is a generous garden,whilst to the front is a driveway providing ample of..."
"This well presented family home is ideally located  in Quedgeley. with a range of local amenities on hand with restaurants, bars, shops and a good selection of local schools to cater for all ages, there are good road and public transport links to the city centre where there can also be ..."
" A THREE Bedroom End Terraced House with a TWO Reception Rooms, REFITTED Shower Room, GARAGE to the rear and benefits from TRIPLE GLAZING Accommodation comprises of Lounge, Dining Room Open to Kitchen, Shower Room and Three Bedrooms. Externally is a good sized rear garden with Garage to the re..."
"CGT sales would like to welcome to the market this fantastic two bedroom apartment with views over Gloucester Docks, With secure gated access with telephone entry, stairs or lift leading you to the front door. Located on the 3rd floor once inside there is an open plan living area with a built-in..."
"Finished to a high standard throughout, this two double bedroom apartment is located on the second floor of the impressively converted Grade II listed Double Reynolds building. Further benefitting from a secure allocated parking space and waterside views over the main water basin, this apartment ..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, this two bedorom home would make the ideal buy to let investment or first time buy. Whilst in need of some modernisation/ refurbishment this property has vast potential and would be ideal for those looking for a project. Outside offers a garden and off ..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, this property is of Hawksley Construction and is therefore only available to CASH BUYERS ONLY. Located in the heart of Brockworth, this property would ideally suit a family or alternatively make a fantastic buy to let investment. Accommodati..."
"**IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY/INVESTMENT** Situated in ever popular kingsholm, KJTResidential are pleased to offer for sale this lovely older style terracedhome, the propertybenefits from 2 double bedrooms, 22ft lounge/dining room, 10ft modern fittedkitchen, upstairs bathroom & downstairs W.C, the prope..."
"Gloucestershire Property Online are thrilled to market this eye catching two bedroom mid-terrace house, positioned within the sought after area of 'Green Farm', Quedgeley. Marketed with the benefit of NO ONWARD CHAIN, the property has been tastefully maintained, providing a light and airy space t..."
"GOOD SIZE KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM, 2 BEDROOMS MASTER WITH EN SUITE! This good sized two bedroom terraced house sits in a popular location within Hucclecote and benefits from off-road parking and a rear garden. A living room sits on the ground floor with the kitchen to the rear of the property over..."
"PLEASE EMAIL YOUR ENQUIRY IN THE FIRST INSTANCE - A period terrace property located within walking distance of the town centre and transport routes. The accommodation offers entrance hall, living room open to dining room, kitchen, garden/utility room, a large bathroom and two bedrooms on the fir..."
"**INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY** Offered for sale with long term tenant insitu (10 years), situated in ever popular kingsholm the propertybenefits from 2 double bedrooms, 22ft lounge/dining room, 10ft fittedkitchen, upstairs bathroom & downstairs W.C, the property furtherbenefits from double glazing, g..."
"With superb views over Gloucester Docks, this 2 bedroom apartment is waterside living at its finest. Built by Crest Nicholson in 2011 this wonderful apartment is an ideal investor purchase with tenants in situ! The property comprises - Secure gated access with telephone entry, stairs or lift ..."
"Watch the sun rise over the canal from your balcony, then take the 15-mintue waterside stroll to Gloucester Quays for breakfast. Life at The Waterfront has everything you need on your doorstep. Contact Guinness for latest availability and apply today!"
"Offered for sale is this spacious semi-detached family home which overlooks the village green and Coopers Hill. Cash buyers only due to the property being of Hawkesley construction. The property itself consists of an entrance hall, cloakroom, large lounge/dining room, sun room, three g..."
"Situated on a no through road in the popular Linden area of the city is this two bedroom extended semi detached property presented in good order throughout. Offered for sale with no onward chain, accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, two reception rooms,conservatory,kitchen & bath..."
"Move Sales and Lettings are delighted to offer to the market a Three double bedroom semi detached house in the heart of Linden, needing FULL RENOVATION the property offers a huge amount of potential for the next owner. Cash buyers preferred due to the condition of the property, this spacious f..."
" The Property Centre are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic family home, located within walking distance to local schools, shops and other local amenities. The accommodation briefly comprises entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen and shower room. The fir..."
"Occupying a corner plot and presented in very good order throughout, The Property Centre are delighted to bring to the market this two bedroom semi detached. Accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, modern fitted kitchen/diner, lounge and utility room on the ground floor. Upstairs..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to offer for sale this well presented two double bedroom terrace house situated in a cul de sac location and being sold with no onward chain. The property has been redecorated and had new flooring fitted. The accommodation comprises entrance porch, loun..."
" Immaculate Two Double Bedroom Terraced Property that is situated down a quiet No Through Road in Quedgeley! In brief the property comprises of; entrance hall, modern fitted kitchen, spacious lounge/diner, first floor landing, two double bedrooms and a modern fitted bathroom. Benefits inclu..."
"This beautifully presented three bedroom apartment is located in the popular location of Oxstalls Way, Longlevens. This property has been lovingly renovated by the current owner and MUST be viewed to appreciate the space that it has to offer. The property comprises of: Private entranc..."
"***THREE BEDROOM END TERRACED PROPERTY FOR SALE WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN*** Taylors Estate Agents welcome to the market this impressive three bedroom end terraced property occupying a superb corner plot. If you are a family or couple that love to entertain, then this property ma..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, this characterful two bedroom apartment is situated within the Grade II listed building of Double Reynolds within the heart of the ever popular Gloucester Docks. Further benefitting from a secure allocated parking space and basement storage, viewing is ..."
"EweMove Exclusive - Looking for a first-time buy, or perhaps a solid rental investment? Check out this beautifully presented, newly refurbished semi-detached house in a popular central Gloucester area, with 2 double bedrooms, 2 Reception and an upstairs bathroom this is an absolute cracker!"
" TWO BEDROOM TERRACED HOUSE LOCATED ON POPULAR ROAD IN HARDWICKE, GLOUCESTER! In brief the accommodation comprises of; entrance hall, kitchen, lounge/diner, landing, two DOUBLE bedrooms and family bathroom. Further benefits are; gas central heating, off road parking for TWO cars, private en..."
"Offered to the market for sale is this spacious THREE BEDROOM mid terraced house situated in a popular location of Matson. Within short walking distance of local shops, bus routes and schools this property is located to many local amenities. The property offers internally, small enclo..."
"SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM END TERRACED HOUSE situated in a convenient location. Inside you have a LIGHT LOUNGE that opens to the DINING ROOM, the kitchen is also at the rear of the property. Upstairs there are three bedrooms serviced by a bathroom and separate toilet. Outs..."
"**** 3 BEDROOM MID-TERRACED PROPERTY, CHAIN-FREE, MODERN KITCHEN & BATHROOM, AMPLE GARDEN, PERFECT FIRST-TIME BUY, VIEWING STRONGLY ADVISED! **** MICHAEL TUCK ESTATE AGENTS are extremely pleased to welcome to the open market, this 3 bedroomed mid-terraced property, located in ever popular ..."
Private living with a sense of community for the over 70's can be found in this beautifully presented retirement apartment offering spacious accommodation with lovely views from both bedrooms and the living area towards Llanthony Secunda Priory and the surrounding grounds. An allocated parking sp...
"IDEAL INVESTMENT - THREE BEDROOM DUPLEX APARTMENT IN SOUGHT AFTER CENTRAL LOCATION - SOLD WITH TENANT IN SITU AND CURRENTLY GENERATING A 6% YIELD The Property Centre are delighted to offer this spacious, well presented, three bedroom, duplex apartment situated on the popular Brisol Roa..."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is this good sized end terraced period property which would make an ideal family home or investment opportunity. Accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, two reception rooms, 14ft kitchen, cellar, and a cloakroom/utility room on the ground floor. "
"BRAND NEW Ground floor 2 bedroom APARTMENT for sale on a SHARED OWNERSHIP scheme. Designed around OPEN-PLAN living, you'll love the cosy feel of this lovely apartment with its spacious living room with a dining area and modern kitchen. This home also benefits from a double and a single bedroom..."
"*** STUNNING TOP FLOOR WATERSIDE APARTMENT, WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO GLOUCESTER QUAYS AND ALL THE LOCAL AMENITIES *** Built by Crest Nicholson just over a year ago, this spacious apartment is modern throughout and boasts open plan living, a balcony area overlooking the waterfront and one alloc..."
"PUBLIC NOTICE - 64 Myrtle Close, Gloucester, GL4 6YP - We have received an offer of £200,000. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contracts takes place. A four bedroom semi detached house set in Robinswood. T..."
"The Property Centre are delighted to bring chain free, two double bedroom property situated in the ever popular area of 'Green Farm'. Situated close to the canal as well as local schools and amenities, this property is well presented throughout and not to be missed. The downstairs ..."
"BRAND NEW Second floor 2 bedroom APARTMENT for sale on a SHARED OWNERSHIP scheme. Designed around OPEN-PLAN living, you'll love the cosy feel of this lovely apartment with its spacious living room with a dining area and modern kitchen. This home also benefits from a double and a single bedroom..."
" Offered to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN this THREE bedroom semi detached property in the popular Linden area has great SCOPE and POTENTIAL. The property comprises of; entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, downstairs shower room, lean to area, two double bedrooms an..."
"Offered to the market for sale with no onward chain is this two bedroom apartment located in Robinswood, Gloucester. This first floor apartment is positioned next to the popular and picturesque Robinswood Hill, surrounded by greenery and and stunning views. The property is deceptively..."
"Ideal investment or home. Offered for sale with no onward chain, is this 3 bedroom family home. A 3 bed house with an impressive 58ft x 23ft rear garden which backs onto a park. The accommodation briefly comprises 3 bedrooms, family bathroom and landing upstairs, and lounge/diner and kitchen..."
"The Property Centre is pleased to offer for sale this two double bedroom terrace house that is being sold with no onward chain and situated in the popular Kingsway development. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, kitchen, lounge, ensuite to master bedroom, further double bedroom..."
"This well-presented three-bedroom terrace home benefits from a modern kitchen, bathroom and a lovely family garden. Ideal for first-time buyers, families or investors. Investment income: circa £950 per month."
"With No Onward Chain this two bedroom terraced home is situated in a popular area of Quedgeley. On the ground floor you enter the property where you are greeted with the entrance hall, On the right you have the kitchen. Continue forward and you enter the lounge/diner with a door that accesses t..."
"A well presented mid-terrace house in a fantastic central location, being within walking distance to Gloucester town centre and the shops, restaurants, leisure centre and amenities it has to offer. Enter the property into open plan living room/dining room with internal door to kitchen and bathro..."
CASH BUYERS ONLY EXCELLENT RENTAL OPPORTUNITY ACHIEVING APPROX £1000PCM A recently redecorated three bedroom property with attractive front and rear gardens. The front door opens into a good sized entrance hall with stairs leading up to the first floor landing. Through from the...
"Situated within the popular residential Georgian square location of Brunswick Square this unique two double bedroom duplex apartment is offered to the market with no onward chain. Boasting characterful features and modern finishes throughout, this property would make for an ideal residential or i..."
"Occupying a courtyard position is this modern two bedroom property with off road parking. Accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, 15ft lounge and kitchen on the ground floor. Upstairs there are two double bedrooms and a bathroom. The property is double glazed and warmed by gas central h..."
"Offered for sale is this well presented two bedroom end terrace property, which would make an ideal investment or starter home. The property itself consists of an entrance hall, living room, kitchen/breakfast room which overlooks an attractive rear garden, two double bedrooms and famil..."
"A beautifully presented and little used SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT in this recently built built block with LOVELY VIEWS across the Docks Albion Apartments is a block of 7 which was built approximately 5 years ago, part of a small but popular development which overlooks the Victoria basin of The Qu..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, this three double bedroom terraced property is situated in the ever popular location of Linden. Further benefitting from spacious living accommodation & enclosed rear garden, this property is ideal for first time buyers and investors alike with a potent..."
A modern two bedroom terraced property with off road parking situated in the popular Linden area of the city. The property would make an ideal first time buy or investment opportunity with accommodation comprising of a lounge and kitchen on the ground floor whilst upstairs there are two bedr...
"Impressive, modern, ground floor apartment built by Crest Nicholson. Ideally positioned within walking distance of the fashionable Gloucester Quays, Gloucester City Centre and other local amenities. The accommodation briefly comprises: spacious entrance hall, double bedroom with large ..."
" Investors Only Michael Tuck Estate Agents are pleased to welcome to the market this fantastic investment opportunity that is comprised of a one double bedroom ground floor flat and a two double bedroom duplex flat. Ground floor flat comprises of; spacious lounge, one double bedroom, bathroo..."
"The Property Centre are delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this two double bedroom, terraced property situated in a quiet cul-de-sac situated with easy access to motorway links, bus routes and the City Centre. The accommodation briefly comprises of an entrance hall, kitchen, cloak..."
"A three bedroom terraced property situated in the popular Tuffley area of the city. Accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, lounge and kitchen/diner on the ground floor. Upstairs there are three bedrooms and a bathroom. The property is double glazed and warmed by gas central heat..."
"Situated in the heart of the Historic Gloucester Docks, this two double bedroom apartment is located in the Grade II listed Vinings Warehouse building boasting water views over the main basin. Offered to the market with no onward chain, the property would make an ideal residential or investment p..."
"This semi-detached house is situated in a pleasant 'no through road' in Linden and has the benefit of OFF ROAD PARKING. The property, which is offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN requires updating and modernisation throughout, but has the potential to become a lovely family home or investment..."
"YOPA are pleased to offer the TERRACED 3 BEDROOM HOUSE with PRIVATE REAR GARDEN for sale. This mid terraced property had a open-plan lounge / dining room, kitchen and upstairs 3 bedrooms and a bathroom, and a private rear garden. The house is in need of some modernisation, is available chain free."
"The Property Centre is pleased to offer for sale this good sized two double bedroom terrace house situated in a cul de sac location. The accommodation comprises entrance porch, lounge, kitchen, two double bedrooms, bathroom, allocated parking for two cars. Ideal first time ..."
" Move Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this ground floor flat set in a popular location just a stones throw away from Gloucester City Centre, the Quays shopping centre and other local amenities. Open plan windowed Living / kitchen and bedroom with separate bathroom. The kitch..."
The Property Centre bring to the market an extended three bedroom semi detached property with off road parking and a garage offered for sale with no onward chain. The property does require a full refurbishment but offers huge potential with the accommodation on offer. Accommodation comp...
"Wonderful period middle terrace which has been very well maintained, and upgraded by the current vendor with lovely character features. Situated within close proximity to the fashionable Gloucester Quays, multiple amenities and a wide choice of schools this property is ideally positioned. The pr..."
"A three bedroom terraced property tucked away on a no through road on the outskirts of the city centre. Accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, lounge,dining room, kitchen and cloakroom on the ground floor. Upstairs there are three good size bedrooms and a shower room. The ..."
An attractive turn of the century red brick terraced home conveniently situated close to the city centre and cathedral in a no through road and being offered for sale in excellent decorative order throughout and with the benefit of no onward chain. The Property The front of this property is u...
"TWO BEDROOMS - WELL PRESENTED - NO ONWARD CHAIN A well presented two double bedroom terraced property located in a cul-de-sac of Quedgeley. Benefiting two off road allocated parking spaces, an enclosed rear garden and no onward chain"
"Located within the suburb of Hardwicke is this two bedroom freehold house. The property compromises of a kitchen, lounge, two bedrooms and family bathroom. It benefits further from an enclosed rear garden and an allocated parking space. The property is being offered to the ..."
A lovely well planned SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT in better than new condition Mariners Court is a very popular development of 14 apartments situated close to the entrance to the Docks overlooking the inner basin. All the facilities of the Docks are within walking distance and Gloucester City cen...
"Staverton Park is our second - largest park in Cheltenham. The park is located just off Bamfurlong Lane, a 10-minute drive away from the town centre. There is also a bus stop a short walk from the park entrance."
A lovely GROUND FLOOR MAISONETTE in a period building set close to and within the community of Kingsholm Square Kingsholm Square and Edwy Parade are set in a lovely hidden position just off the Kingsholm Road and within walking distance of the city centre. The Cathedral and exciting Docklands de...
"Offered for sale, is this rarely available two bedroomed cottage at the popular Pegasus Court retirement development. The property offers generous accommodation to include a large lounge, kitchen, spacious hallway, landing and two very good-sized bedrooms as well as a full bathroom. Within the re..."
"The modern mews-style cottage is in a lovely development exclusively for the over-50's in popular Hucclecote. Hucclecote has a range of local aminities, including, shops, a baker, pharmacy, takeaways, restaurants, a local library, GP surgery and a dental practice. It also offers conven..."
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY Homemove Sales & Lettings are delighted to offer for sale this lovely 2 bedroom mid terraced house, located in the popular area of Hardwicke, Quedgeley.The property is being sold with tenants in place"
"LANG EASY FORM CONSTRUCTED THREE BEDROOM (bedroom one is a walk through) TERRACED HOUSE situated at the end of a cul-de-sac. Inside there is an EXTENDED LOUNGE with French doors onto the garden, a dining room that overlooks the cul-de-sac and finally downstairs the fitted kitchen. <..."
"** Three Bedroom Terraced House with a Generous Enclosed Garden ** Murdock & Wasley Estate Agents are delighted to welcome to the open market this three bedroom family home of Laing Easiform situated in a popular location close to local amenities. Offering spacious accommodation, enclose..."
"Double fronted well appointed unique home conveniently located directly opposite The Gloucester park for those long lazy sunny summer days. Park on your very own driveway for easy living then step inside. To your right is a double aspect living room where the light floods in, to your l..."
"Brought to the market with no onward chain is this two bedroom over 55's terraced house, located in the heart of Hucclecote. The property is situated in the sought after Hucclecote Mews complex and briefly comprises an entrance hall, kitchen, living room, two bedrooms and a shower roo..."
" This beautifully presented top floor apartment is situated in the popular and sought-after location of Hyatt Close, Longford. This property would make a perfect first time purchase or investment. The property comprises of: Allocated off road parking, entrance hall, generous size..."
Dream of a life by the waterside? The Trent is close to the canal and just a 15 minute stroll to Gloucester Quays. Life at The Waterfront has everything you need on your doorstep. Contact Guinness for latest availability and apply today!
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, this immaculately presented character two bedroom apartment originally built circa 1860 offers ample natural light and fully integrated contemporary kitchen. Set within the heart of the historic city centre a stones throw from the charming Cathedral gar..."
" Michael Tuck Estate Agents Quedgeley are pleased to welcome to the market this two bedroom terraced property that is situated in Hardwicke on a quiet no through road and offered to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN! In brief the property comprises of; kitchen, spacious lounge, one double bedro..."
"**INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY** KJT Residential are pleased to offer for salethis older style bay fronted terraced home, the property benefits from 3double bedrooms, 10ft lounge, 11ft dining room, 10ft fitted kitchen andbathroom, the property further benefits from double glazing, gascentral heating an..."
A suprisingly GOOD SIZED victorian townhouse in a very CONVENIENT POSITION Vauxhall Road is a popular residential road situated off Barton Street less than 1/2 mile to the South of Gloucester City centre. All the City's facilities are within easy reach.  
"**CALLING ALL FIRST TIME BUYERS** KJT Residential are pleased to offerfor sale this lovely terraced home, the property benefits from 2 doublebedrooms, 19ft lounge, fitted kitchen and family bathroom, the propertyfurther benefits from gas central heating, double glazing and enclosedrear garden. EA..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, this unique two bedroom duplex style apartment is positioned within the popular Pridays Mill development. Benefitting from spacious living accommodation and a secure allocated parking space, this apartment has much to offer residential buyers and invest..."
"This beautifully presented 2 bedroom apartment is situated in the popular location of London Road, Gloucester. This property is offered for sale with no onward chain and would make a brilliant investment or first time purchase. This property is positioned within walking distance from ..."
"Barney Estates and Auctioneers are delighted to bring to market approximately 3.7 acres of roadside land. The property is situated in Upper Rea, on the outskirts of the beautiful village Hempsted, Gloucestershire. The land is not in Green belt and benefits from vehicular access off Rea Lane. T..."
"A beautifully presented, recently built, three storey town house situated on the Twigworth Green Bloor Homes development. Twigworth provides excellent access to the M5, Gloucester, Cheltenham and Tewkesbury. Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN. A 50/50 shared ownership home, the accommodat..."
"Gloucestershire Property Online are delighted to offer this spacious one bedroom mid terrace house, situated within a quiet cul-de-sac in Quedgeley. Offered to the market as CHAIN FREE, this ideal starter home provides potential buyers with a South facing rear garden and two off-road parking spac..."
"Barney Estates and Auctioneers are delighted to bring to market approximately 3.5 acres of roadside land, benefiting from a large outbuilding with hard standing concrete foundation."
" TG Sales & Lettings are delighted to offer ‘FOR SALE’ this beautifully presented one DOUBLE bedroom apartment located on the first floor of this impressively converted Warehouse building in Gloucester docks. Albert warehouse offers great views out over the main basin, character feat..."
WELL APPOINTED TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME WITH OPEN LIVING DINING SPACE AND EXCEPTIONAL ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN OFFERED CHAIN FREE The Property Centre are delighted to welcome to the market this stunning family home located within walking distance to Gloucester City centre. 
"With superb views over Gloucester Docks, this 1 bedroom apartment is waterside living at its finest. Built by Crest Nicholson in 2011 this wonderful apartment is an ideal investor purchase with a tenant in situ! The property comprises - Secure gated access with telephone entry, stairs or lift..."
LAST PLOT REMAINING (PLOT 171) Are you fed up with renting? Shared Ownership could be the help you need to purchase your own home.
"Now available, 4 bedroom family homes for shared ownership! Viewings availably by appointment!"
"Tucked away on a no through road is this two bedroom terraced property. Accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, 21ft lounge/diner, 14ft kitchen and a shower room on the ground floor. Upstairs there are two double bedrooms and a bathroom. Further benefits include gas central heating and ..."
"Detached living with the benefit of a garden, this delightful coach house is positioned in popular Hempsted with NO ONWARD CHAIN"
"Super opportunity to purchase a TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM house (Leasehold) offering Modern fitted kitchen with appliances, spacious front to back lounge/diner with Juliet balcony, cloakroom (wc), main bedroom with en suite and fitted wardrobes, second double bedroom and a bathroom. Also benefitting fro..."
SPACIOUS 4 BEDROOM FAMILY HOMES FOR SHARED OWNERSHIP!
"A stylish first floor one bedroom apartment with open plan living, kitchen and dining area. Bedroom with en suite shower room."
"A 2 bedroom house situated conveniently for the City Centre or Hospital. The property consists of a lounge/diner, kitchen, small courtyard garden, 2 bedrooms and bathroom. Further benefits include GCH and a quiet location just off London Road."
"**IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY/INVESTMENT** Situated on the outskirts ofGloucester City centre, KJT Residential are pleased to offer for salethis Victorian end terraced home, the property benefits from 2bedrooms, separate reception rooms, 13ft kitchen, downstairs bathroomand large rear gardens, the prope..."
"*** NO CHAIN, 2 BEDROOM MODERN APARTMENT, ENSUITE TO MASTER, OPEN PLAN LIVING SPACE *** Michael Tuck Estate Agents are pleased to welcome to the open market this spacious two bedroom apartment offered with TWO parking spaces. The property is located at the Whittle Square development in Brockworth..."
"**CALLING ALL INVESTORS** KJT Residential are pleased to offer for salethis older style end terraced home, the property benefits from 2 doublebedrooms, 21ft lounge/dining room, 18ft kitchen and upstairs bathroom,the property further benefits from gas central heating, double glazingand easy mainte..."
"***VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED*** TG SALES are pleased to offer this TWO BEDROOM mid terraced property which has been modernised throughout. In brief the accommodation consists of entrance lobby, open plan lounge/diner with the staircase to the first floor, modern fitted kitchen with built in ..."
A Beautifully presented SECOND FLOOR two bedroom apartment situated in this sought after development of Hamlet Lodge. Hamlet Lodge is a prestigious development of retirement properties situated in Heathville Road only 1/2 mile of Gloucester City centre. Bus routes to Cheltenham and Gloucester...
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is this recently decorated, two bedroom terraced property, which would make an excellent investment or starter home. The property itself briefly consists of an entrance hall, kitchen/breakfast room, living room, two double bedrooms and a refitted b..."
"Ground floor RETIREMENT flat (minimum age for applicants is 60 years). Offering a small entrance hall, a large storage cupboard to the right, to the left is the bathroom with shower over. The living/dining room is a very good size with plenty of space for a dining area and there is a rear door l..."
"***TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PERIOD PROPERTY WITH LOFT ROOM AND CELLAR OFFERED FOR SALE CHAIN FREE*** The Property Centre are delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this two bedroom house with a loft room and cellar situated in close proximity to Gloucester City Centre, which comes to..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN A Two DOUBLE Bedroom SEMI DETACHED with TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, CELLAR & ATTIC ROOM Ground Floor Comprises of Entrance Hall, Lounge, Dining Room, Kitchen/Breakfast Room, Utility Room and a cellar. Upstairs offers two Bedrooms, Family Bathroom and an Attic Room. Further benefits in..."
"A TWO bedroom apartment with ALLOCATED PARKING and within close proximity to local bus routes and amenities.
Accommodation comprises; entrance hallway, storage cupboard, two generously sized bedroom, modern bathroom and open plan lounge / kitchen ( with dishwasher and washing machine included ). ..."
"Spacious FULLY REFURBISHED - New electrics, new central heating system, new windows, new kitchen, freshly decorated, increased insulation, dividing wall upstairs to give independent access to the bathroom for both bedrooms. Please note this property is owned by a member of Martin & Co. Chain ..."
"***MODERN TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT, IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR BUY TO LET*** Taylors Estate Agents welcome to the market this two bedroom first floor apartment situated within Fitzalan House, Gloucester. This impressive and spacious apartment is modern throughout and is presented..."
Attractive Grade II Listed former Methodist Church and school room. OFFERS DUE by 12 noon on Monday 13th March 2023.
The home would warrant some updating but is currently rented out to the same tenant of 16 years. A storm porch gives access to the entrance hall that helps keep the cold out and the warmth in. On your left is a cosy lounge complemented by a separate dining room that is spread across the back from...
"IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR BUY TO LET A SEMI-DETACHED House located on Melbourne Street West with OFF ROAD PARKING and available with NO ONWARD CHAIN! Ground Floor comprises of a spacious Lounge Open to Kitchen, Utility Room and Bathroom. Upstairs are Two DOUBLE Bedrooms. Further benefits include..."
"Located directly between the Gloucester Quays vibrant nightlife and the historic City Centre this apartment is an ideal location for both young professionals, first time buyers and those seeking a secure investment with a potential rental income of £825 pcm. Offering generous living accommodation..."
"**** ONE BEDROOM COACH HOUSE, IMMACULATELY PRESENTED WITH GARAGE & PARKING FOR 2 CARS, IDEAL FIRST TIME BUYER HOME **** This one bedroom coach house is presented to a very high standard. Accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, landing, open plan lounge/diner, separate kitchen,..."
"A very well presented two-bedroom, three storey mid terraced home. Offered to the market with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The property sits close to local amenities and offers easy access to Gloucester town centre and the popular Quays area.
Accommodation comprises; lounge, dining room, ground floor w.c and..."
"Available on the sales market and offered with no onward chain is this light and airy first floor apartment which overlooks the Barge Arm inlet at the historic Docks and Quays. The beautifully presented apartment briefly consists of a double bedroom, spacious lounge dining room, kitche..."
" RETIREMENT APARTMENT Great opportunity to live independently in a well maintained and established retirement community in central Gloucester. Located on a leafy residential street, this 2-bedroom apartment gives space and a quiet location with the reassurance of supported living if and when ..."
*** NO ONWARD CHAIN **** A well-presented two bedroom terrace house in the heart of Coney Hill. The property is an ideal first home or investment opportunity. Situated just a short distance from local amenities and regular bus routes. Accommodation comprises of entrance...
"The Property Centre are delighted to bring to the market this two bedroom semi detached property situated on a no through road and offered for sale with no onward chain. The accommodation briefly compromises of an open plan lounge/dining room with kitchenette, utility space and a bat..."
"Situated on a one way street, this accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, lounge, re-fitted kitchen and re-fitted bathroom on the ground floor, upstairs there are two double bedrooms with a staircase leading to an attic room. Further benefits include gas central heating and double glaz..."
"***MODERN TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT FOR SALE WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN, ONE ALLOCATED PARKING SPACE, IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR BUY TO LET*** A stylish two bedroom first floor apartment situated within the popular Fitzalan House, Gloucester. This modern two bedroom apartment is offered..."
"*** A FANTASTIC BUY TO LET INVESTMENT PROPERTY, OFFERED FOR SALE WITH A TENANT IN SITU. FOR INVESTORS ONLY *** IMMACULATELY PRESENTED TWO BEDROOM TOP FLOOR APARTMENT WITH ALLOCATED PARKING. Taylors Estate Agents welcome to the market this impressive two bedroom top floor apa..."
A very well maintained FIRST FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT in one of the best positions within this block with a sitting room and JULIET BALCONY which overlooks the westerly facing garden.   Hamlet Lodge is a very popular development of retirement properties situated on Heathville and Denmar...
"GREAT FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS!
Currently tenanted.
A one bedroom house. Hallway.
Open plan kitchen and living room with patio doors to the garden. Double bedroom and bathroom. Off road parking
Front garden
Double glazing
EPC e
Council Tax Band e. To view please call option 2."
"CHAIN FREE - ONE DOUBLE BEDROOM -GARAGE - PRIVATE GARDEN A recently re-decorated and re-carpeted one double bedroom property benefiting from it sown private garden, garage and parking space."
"**IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY/INVESTMENT** Offered for sale with no onwardchain KJT Residential are pleased to bring to the market thissubstantial 1st floor maisonette, the property benefits from 3 bedrooms,16ft living room, 10ft kitchen and family bathroom, the propertyfurther benefits from gas central..."
"Located within the Historic Gloucester Docks on the edge of the Main Basin Waterside this characterful, yet modern one double bedroom apartment has views leading down the Sharpness Canal, the nature reserve and across to Gloucester Cathedral. With fully integrated kitchen and an allocated parking..."
"*** FIRST TIME BUYERS, NO STAMP DUTY TO PAY *** Very well presented two double bedroom top floor apartment, situated in the popular Market Place Development, close to the City Centre and the Gloucester Quays, benefitting en-suite to master bedroom, allocated OFF ROAD parking. This property would ..."
"Move sales and Lettings are delighted to offer to the market this 3 bedroom top floor flat in the City Centre of Gloucester.A short walk from Gloucester Quays and the constantly improving City Centre, you can enjoy a good social life and have the benefit of having all amenities on your door step,..."
"Staverton Park is our second - largest park in Cheltenham. The park is located just off Bamfurlong Lane, a 10-minute drive away from the town centre. There is also a bus stop a short walk from the park entrance. "
"Gloucestershire Property Online are delighted to offer this spacious two bedroom Victorian apartment, located a stones throw from Gloucester City Centre. Perfectly suited towards first time buyers and investors alike, the accommodation is modern and well maintained, whilst maintaining the propert..."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is this two bedroom terraced property situated in the Tredworth area of the city. Accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, two reception rooms, re-fitted kitchen and re-fitted bathroom on the ground floor. Upstairs there are two double bedrooms ..."
LAST PLOTS!! Shared Ownership could be the help you need to purchase your own home.
"Youtube video tour. Great investment opportunity. Circa £21,000 per annum. Currently configured as 4 bedroom HMO with ensuite to master bedroom and wash hand basins in each room. Large upstairs shower room. Kitchen with gas hob and combination boiler. "
"Youtube video tour. Great investment opportunity. Crica £21,000 per annum. Currently configured as 4 bedroom HMO with additional part converted outbuilding. "
"This top floor, two bedroom apartment along with the front of the building and communal areas have undergone recent refurbishments to a very high standard. Internally you will find two bedrooms, an open plan living/kitchen area and a large bathroom. The property is being sold with a share of the ..."
 Move Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market this impressive park home on a generous plot offered with no onward chain. The Stately Albion Celtic Cottage home is sited on a popular park for the over 50's in the Twigworth area of Gloucester. Entering the Ashmeade complex through t...
"VERSATILE TWO BEDROOM PROPERTY IN POPULAR CITY CENTRE LOCATION OFFERED CHAIN FREE The Property Centre are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic property, which would make an ideal first time buy or investment. The accommodation briefly comprises entrance hall, tw..."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is the spacious and well presented ground floor maisonette. Situated in a highly convenient location close to the city centre and various local amenities. The property briefly consists of an entrance hall, large living room, recently refitted wet r..."
"The Property Centre is pleased to offer for sale this one bedroom gallery style terrace house that is being sold with tenant in situ which would make a great investment opportunity. The current monthly rent is £625 PCM. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, ..."
"Offered to the market with no onward chain, this first floor property would make the ideal investment and is offered to buy to let investors only. With a tenant in situation currently paying £675pcm, this property is the perfect opportunity to either start or add to a property p..."
"REF DH0109 - A mid floor apartment in this convenient location within Kingsway. Offering 2 good sized bedrooms (master en-suite) complemented by a well appointed bathroom, with a semi open plan living space of kitchen and lounge/diner. The property would lend itself to a first time buy, downsi..."
TOP FLOOR - ALLOCATED PARKING - EN-SUITE TO MASTER A well presented two bedroom apartment locate within a modern development in Kingsway.. Benefiting allocated parking.
"The Property Centre are delighted to bring this second floor apartment to the market. Situated in a popular Kingsway location and benefitting from allocated parking, this lovely property would suit either a first time buyer or an investor. The accommodation comprises a spacious entran..."
** Two Double Bedroom Top Floor Apartment ** Situated Within Walking Distance To The City Centre ** Spacious Accommodation ** Allocated Off Road Parking ** Perfect For FTB or Investor ** Current Rental Income Of £750pcm ** Call To View:
A delightful one bedroom first floor maisonette with the added benefit of a SINGLE GARAGE and off street parking situated on the ever popular Highgrove Development. Offering a potential rental income of £650pcm this would make an ideal investment or the perfect first time buy
"This 2nd floor flat is an ideal investment or first time buy. There currently is a tenant living in the property but will be vacating on sale. the current tenant is paying £750pcm. The property boasts 2/3 bedrooms, a large shower room, a modern kitchen and great size living room. the home i..."
"The Property Centre are pleased to bring this chain free, two bedroom apartment to the market. Situated on the Bristol Road in Quedgeley, this apartment is on the ground floor and benefits from being positioned at the rear of the building with an open outlook. The accommodation compr..."
"Move Estate Agents are delighted to offer to the market this impressive park home offered with no onward chain. The 2011 38 x 20 Prestige Sonatta home is sited on a popular park for the over 45's in the Staverton area of Cheltenham. The property comprises L shaped living room / diner, fitted ..."
"A CONTEMPORARY BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT in this desirable landmark building being The Post House. The apartment comprises of entrance hall, open plan lounge/kitchen/diner, bedroom and shower room. Additional benefits include communal entrance hal..."
"**TWO BEDROOM MAISONETTE WITH PARKING** TG Sales & Lettings are pleased to bring to the market this purpose built, GROUND FLOOR two bedroom MAISONETTE with PARKING. Presented in good condition throughout, the property is accessed via its own entrance which then opens into a good sized loung..."
"We are pleased to offer this well presented terraced house located in the Derby Road area of Gloucester and close to Gloucester Royal Hospital. The property offers lounge, separate dining room and modern fitted kitchen. Upstairs there are two bedrooms. One double and one single both have built..."
"This beautifully presented TWO DOUBLE bedroom second floor apartment is located close to Gloucester city centre. The accommodation overall benefits a secure communal entrance, hallway, LOUNGE/DINER, TWO DOUBLE bedrooms and bathroom. ***FIRST TIME BUYERS NO STAMP DUTY***"
"CHAIN FREE- Rarely available we a are pleased to offer this modern and spacious maisonette with parking, walking distance along the canal side to the ever popular Gloucester Docks area, open plan lounge/dining area, modern fitted kitchen, double bedroom, modern bathroom, double glazing and gas c..."
"CHAIN FREE - Beautiful ground floor flat in this landmark building. This light and spacious modern apartment is ready to move straight into, accommodation comprises a nice sized hall, fitted kitchen with appliances and open plan lounge with to large windows, a good sized double bedroom, modern sh..."
"Unexpectedly Re-available- this spacious 2 double bedroom top floor flat close to Gloucester Royal Hospital, lift or stairs, entrance hall, open plan lounge/kitchen/dining area, master bedroom with en-suite shower room, second double bedroom and family bathroom. The property benefits a telephone ..."
1st Floor Flat l 2 Bedrooms (with fitted wardrobes) | En-Suite to Main Bedroom | 14'4 (max) x 11'1 (max) Living Rm (Juliet Balcony) | Kitchen (with appliances) | Main Bathroom | Parking Space l No Onward Chain l Likely Rental: £750 pcm
"Located in the heart of the city centre, tucked at the rear of the main property and off the main road, is this wonderful 1 bedroom mews cottage, with its own front door, locked driveway and courtyard garden! The accommodation, which needs to be seen to be fully appreciated. The layout and space..."
"THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW having gardens measuring 60ft and is offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. The accommodation comprises entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/diner, three bedrooms, bathroom and separate w.c. The property benefits from gas fired central heating. CASH BUYER..."
"** Two Double Bedroom Ground Floor Apartment, Offered To The Market with No Onward Chain ** Open Plan Kitchen/ Living Area ** Allocated Parking ** Perfect for FTB or Investors ** Call To View:"
A PURPOSE BUILT FIRST FLOOR TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT FOR THE OVER 55'S. BENEFITS INCLUDE:-LOUNGE/DINER: KITCHEN: TWO BEDROOMS: BATHROOM: COMMUNAL GARDENS: COMMUNAL PARKING: NO CHAINMarleyfield Close is a small very quiet pleasant private cul-de-sac consisting of retirement apartments...
"***MODERN ONE BEDROOM APARTMENT FOR SALE, IDEAL FIRST TIME BUY OR BUY TO LET*** Taylors Estate Agents welcome to the market this modern one-bedroom first floor apartment situated in Kiln close, Gloucester. This immaculately presented and well maintained apartment is located..."
"Attention all BUY TO LET INVESTORS as we bring to the market a TWO Bedroom Terraced House with a TENANT IN SITU. Comprises of Entrance Hall, Lounge, Dining Room, Kitchen, Utility Room, Two Bedrooms and Family Bathroom. Further benefits include double glazing, gas radiator central heating and REA..."
"The accommodation comprises of; the entrance hall, two bedrooms, the bathroom and open plan living/kitchen area. The apartment further benefits from communal grounds and a garage. "
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - CURRENTLY LET at £850 pcm. Close to Gloucestershire Royal Hospital is this delightful purpose built second floor flat with allocated parking. The accommodation offers entrance hall, living room open to kitchen (with appliances), bathroom and TWO BEDROOMS. HIGHLY RECCOME..."
A good sized SECOND FLOOR apartment in a QUIET POSITION in this popular over 55's development Cathedral Court is a very popular residential development for the over 55’s situated on the London Road just over ½ mile to the East of Gloucester City centre. Transport facilities are ...
"We are pleased to present this two-bedroom apartment located in Gloucester. The property consists of – Living Room, Kitchen, Two bedrooms, Shower Room and a Garage. This property offers contemporary first floor accommodation and a garage and is situated close to the Cotswolds Na..."
"Hidden within the popular Brunswick Square in Gloucester, Robinson David Estate Agents are delighted to present this spacious ground floor apartment that offers a comfortable and convenient living experience."
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN, MODERN 1 BEDROOM APARTMENT, ALLOCATED PARKING, LOCAL AMENITIES *** Michael Tuck Estate Agents are pleased to offer this one bedroom apartment for sale in the popular location of Coopers Edge. The property is situated on the first floor and offers spacious accommodation compri..."
Situated in Priday Mills on Commercial Road in the Gloucester Quays development this one bedroom fourth floor apartment is well presented throughout and perfectly situated for access to the wide variety of bars and restaurants in the Quays.
INVESTORS ONLY - TENANT IN SITU. A very GOOO SIZED second floor (top) APARTMENT in this popular and convenient 1970's development Heathville Road is a popular residential road situated just off the London Road less than ½ mile to the East of Gloucester City centre. Excellent schooling an...
Viewings available by appointment!
"Well presented 2 bedroom apartment located in Gloucester, perfect for investment purposes. Comprises of: Warm and welcoming porch and entrance hall way Well-appointed open plan kitchen / dining with base and wall units Spacious master bedroom Additional good sized..."
"*** NO ONWARD CHAIN, MODERN 1 BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT, OPEN PLAN *** Michael Tuck Estate Agents are extremely delighted to offer for sale this stunning 1 bedroom apartment in the extremely popular location of Barnwood. This modern apartment is perfect for the first time buyer and buy-to-le..."
" Michael Tuck Estate Agents are pleased to welcome to the market this recently renovated one bedroom ground floor flat that is situated within walking distance to Gloucester City Centre and offered to the market with No Onward Chain! In brief the property comprises of; entrance hall, modern f..."
"Over 55's property being sold with no onward chain in this small development which is extremely convenient for the supermarkets, doctors and other essential amenities as well as a regular bus route to town. The Property This is an end terrace property on two floors and situated in this small ..."
Property Ref: 11366 40% Shared ownership with 100% staircasing available. We are glad to to present a delightful semi-detached property ...
"This one double bedroom ground floor apartment is located in the popular area of Churchdown, just a short walk to local shops, bus routes and good local schools. Offered to the market chain free, this would make the ideal first home or investment property with a potential yield of at least 6%. ..."
LAST FEW PLOTS!! Shared Ownership could be the help you need to purchase your own home.
LAST PLOT! Shared Ownership could be the help you need to purchase your own home.
"Barney Estates and Auctioneers are delighted to bring to market approximately 3.5 acres of roadside land. The property is situated in Upper Rea, on the outskirts of the beautiful village Hempsted, Gloucestershire. The land is not in Green belt and benefits from vehicular access off Rea Lane. T..."
"PLEASE QUOTE REF LH0563; A Grade II Listed ground floor, garden apartment in the highly sought after regency Brunswick Square in Gloucester. Within walking distance to the fashionable Gloucester Quays outlet, Gloucester city centre and Gloucester Train Station this apartmart commands..."
"If you are looking for low maintenance living in a gorgeous countryside location, look no further than this brand new park home at Swallow Lakes which is licenced for use 365 days a year."
Barney Estates and Auctioneers are delighted to bring to market approximately 3.5 acres of roadside land on the outskirts of Upper Rea. 
"A great flat for first-time buyers or those looking for a solid investment opportunity, this one-bedroom flat is a perfect step up the property ladder. This property also has a small utility room separate to the main rooms for washing machine/freezer.  This lovely apartment is fu..."
" This TWO Bedroom First Floor Apartment is an ideal first time or Investment buy available with NO ONWARD CHAIN Accommodation comprises of Entrance Hall, Lounge Diner, modern fitted kitchen, refitted family bathroom and Two Bedrooms. Further benefits include UPVC Double Glazing, new electric r..."
"An ideal first time buy, this ground floor flat benefits allocated OFF ROAD parking for two vehicles and communal garden, having recently been updated, all being situated in a popular village location ***CHAIN FREE*** If you are looking for a BUY TO LET investment, rent of £575.00 based ..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to present to the market this studio apartment that has been modernised to the highest of standards. Accommodation comprises of a living area/ bedroom, kitchen and bathroom. The property benefits from a new gas boiler and underfloor heating. The property also has ..."
"Situated on a quiet road in Kingsway, this lovely home is close to all local amenities, including supermarkets, post office, and doctors, as well as the M5 and good local schools... Property Ref: GL2 2BNTHA For viewing arrangement, please use..."
" This lovely and well presented 1 bedroom apartment is situated in the popular and convenient location of Victoria House, Mayhill Way, Gloucester. This property is positioned within walking distance to Gloucestershire Hospital and would make a brilliant first time purchase or investment. "
"A beautifully presented park home on the ever popular Staverton Park complex. Accommodation comprises lounge, kitchen-diner, two bedrooms and a bathroom. Outside offers a large shed with power/ lighting, new fencing, an outside tap, and a wrap around south facing garden with patio, decking and gr..."
A well positioned BUILDING PLOT with PLANNING CONSENT for a CONTEMPORARY ARCHITECT DESIGN and echo friendly DETACHED BUNGALOW Kenilworth Avenue is a very popular residential road of individual properties situated just 1/2 mile to the East of Gloucester City Centre. All of the areas faciliti...
Offered for sale with no onward chain is this ground floor one bedroom apartment with its own private garden. Situated within walking distance of the city and great links to Gloucester Docks and the Outlet shopping centre. This property would be an ideal first time buy or investment opportun...
Move Property Sales & Lettings are proud to present to the market this one bedroom ground floor flat ideally located in the highly sought after village of Churchdown. This property is entered through a secure door entry system and has been completely refurbished and redecorated throughout and ...
"Fantastic detached park home, licenced for use 365 days a year for the over 45's, situated in a quiet location within easy reach of Cheltenham, Gloucester and Tewkesbury"
"A rarely available TWO BEDROOM First Floor Maisonette situated in a GATED COURTYARD DEVELOPMENT with PARKING and NO ONWARD CHAIN Accommodation comprises of Entrance Hall, Lounge Diner, Kitchen and Family Bathroom Properties of this nature are in high demand from INVESTMENT BUYERS and FIRST TIM..."
"Situated on a no through road and enjoying an open aspect to the front,The Property Centre are delighted to offer ""For Sale"" this fantastic starter home or buy to let investment. The accommodation briefly comprises of an open plan 19ft x 13ft lounge/diner/kitchen area with rear lobby l..."
"Licenced for use 365 days a year, is this lovely 2 bedroom detached park home for the over 45's. If you are looking for low maintenance living then look no further!"
"Situated between the heart of the historic Gloucester City Centre and the ever popular Gloucester Docks, the development of the Black Swan is ideally located for both First Time Buyers and Buy to Let Investors with a potential rental income of £625 pcm. Previously a hotel, the residential Grade I..."
"Situated in a gated courtyard development is this well presented first floor one bedroom apartment with parking which has been modernised by the current owner. The property benefits from a re-fitted kitchen, re-fitted bathroom, double glazing and electric heating. Outside there is allo..."
"***ONE BEDROOM APARTMENT, FANTASTIC BUY TO LET OPPORTUNITY, COMMUNAL GARDEN, ALLOCATED PARKING*** A spacious one bedroom top floor apartment located in coopers court, Brock worth. This one bedroom apartment will make a fantastic Buy to let and has a potential rental income ..."
**A ground floor one bedroom flat in central location near the hospital with gross return of 5%+** This is a perfect investment opportunity located close to the hospital and city centre with long freehold (960 years). The property has been owned by the current vendor for 20 years and has been...
FOR SALE BY MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION An excellent opportunity for a developer or someone looking to build/have built a two bed detached bungalow. Planning permission has been granted for a 2 bedroom detached bungalow. Plans available at Stroud district council website. https://publ...
AVAILABLE FOR VIEWING - Shared Ownership could be the help you need to purchase your own home.
"Would you like to own your own home but find you're struggling to afford a home on the open market? Shared Ownership could help. You may only need a deposit from just £5,313, apply now to avoid missing out. These new homes are part of the Oaklands development in Hunts Grove, Gloucester"
"This apartment is situated on the first floor in this popular and conveniently located retirement development. It offers well-presented accommodation throughout and briefly comprises: Entrance hall, sitting/dining room, kitchen, a double bedroom with built in wardrobes and a shower ro..."
"Set within the charming and leafy Georgian Brunswick Square, this privately positioned ground floor apartment offers buyers the potential to make their own mark, with secure and private entrance. Viewing is highly advised for both first time buyers and buy to let investors with a potential rental..."
"CHAIN FREE two bedroom park home for people of the age of 50 and over sitting on a GENEROUS PLOT within a beautifully maintained site. Inside the property you have a generous lounge with patio doors to the garden, the fitted kitchen is at the rear and leads to the handy lean to utility r..."
"Licenced for use 365 days a year, is this lovely 2 bedroom detached park home for the over 45's situated on popular Norton Park."
Licenced for use 365 days a year is this detached park home situated at the popular Norton Park development.
"The Property Centre are delighted to welcome to the market this spacious first floor one bedroom apartment, located in the popular suburb of Podsmead. The property briefly comprises of a generous living room, double bedroom, kitchen, and bathroom., further benefits from gas central heating a..."
"Modern, purpose built one bedroom ground floor apartment located in a a cul-de-sac. The accommodation comprises lounge with access to kitchen, double bedroom and bathroom. The property also benefits storage, front garden, electric thermostat radiators, double glazing and parking for one car."
"Well presented first floor flat in Kingsholm, with easy access to City Centre and local amenities. The flat benefits from ALLOCATED OFF ROAD PARKING. Briefly comprising of living room, modern fitted kitchen, double bedroom and shower room. IDEAL INVESTMENT BUY Currently the flat..."
An attractive THIRD FLOOR (TOP) apartment in this highly convenient historic converted buillding. The Black Swan is an attractive conversion of a historic building situated on the corner of commercial road and close to the exciting Docklands development. All of the City centre's facilities a...
"A well presented second floor TWO BEDROOM apartment in this desirable retirement complex.Situated in the heart of Churchdown Village this popular retirement complex is available for the over 55's. Communal facilities include a lift, rooftop garden with stunning views, a communal lounge and laun..."
" A GROUND FLOOR Maisonette situated in a COURTYARD DEVELOPMENT in Linden available with NO ONWARD CHAIN Accommodation comprises of Entrance Hall, Open Plan Lounge & Kitchen, DOUBLE Bedroom and Wet Room. Further benefits include Double Glazing and Modern Electric Heating. Ideal First Time Bu..."
"Whilst in need of some updating, this two bedroom static home has huge potential and would make the perfect project. Accommodation comprises kitchen-diner, sitting room, two bedrooms and a family bathroom. Outside offers off road parking and an enclosed rear garden. "
A GROUND FLOOR ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT OVERLOOKING THE GARDEN Castlemeads Court is well positioned in a convenient city centre location within proximity of the city centre shops. It is well located for the pedestrianised shopping area of Westgate Street with a range of traditional shops ...
"Situated between the heart of the historic Gloucester City Centre and the ever popular Gloucester Docks, the development of the Black Swan is ideally located for both First Time Buyers and Buy to Let Investors with a potential rental income of £550 pcm. Previously a hotel, the residential Grade I..."
"The Property Centre is delighted to present to the market, with No Onward Chain, this well presented two bedroom apartment situated on the ground floor of this over 55's complex. This property is situated in the heart of Churchdown Village with local amenities, including shops and bus..."
Move Estate Agents are delighted to bring to the market this well presented ground floor flat available with no onward chain. Ideally suited to a cash buyer due to its short lease the property would make an excellent home or investment buy. Entering into the hallway you have the bedroom with ...
"Beautifully presented over 55's flat ideal for anyone who wants to move straight in and make themselves comfortable as it has been tastefully and fully refurbished to a high specification throughout. The Property New carpets, new kitchen, new bathroom and fully redecorated prior to marketing ..."
" MICHAEL TUCK ESTATE AGENTS are pleased to welcome to the market this one bedroom top floor flat situated in Gloucester over looking greenery, which is only a stones throw away from the ever popular Gloucester Docks! In brief the property comprises of; spacious lounge, kitchen, bathroom and o..."
" Michael Tuck Estate Agents are pleased to welcome to the market this lovely two double bedroom over 55's apartment that is located on Westgate Street, Gloucester City Centre and offered to the market with No Onward Chain! In brief the property comprises of; entrance hall, spacious lounge, ki..."
A ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT WITH JULIETTE BALCONY Cathedral Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 32 properties arranged over 4 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each property in...
"This retirement flat for the over 60's has been well looked after and is presented in a good condition, it has only had one owner since Cathedral Court was constructed in 2006 by McCarthy & Stone Developments Ltd. The communal areas have recently been redecorated throughout also."
A ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT Cathedral Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 32 properties arranged over 4 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each property in the case of an emergen...
"First-floor, 2-bedroom apartment in Brockworth. Make your move this summer with a 5% deposit: £4,000 and purchase a 40% share for £80,000. BUILD YOUR OWN OFFER!Reserve an apartment before the 31st of March.We'll give you £750* towards:White goods | Legal fees | Flooring | Ring Security Package*"
"Offered for sale with no onward chain is a ground floor retirement flat, which is conveniently located on the main Gloucester to Cheltenham bus service and close to various local amenities. The property consists of an entrance hall, living room, large double bedroom with built in wardr..."
This first floor apartment sits in the popular Over-60s development on Hucclecote Road. The property has been freshly decorated with new carpets laid throughout along with a good-sized kitchen and modern bathroom. Hucclecote Lodge offers attractive communal gardens and a resident's lounge. Reg...
LAST PLOT!! Shared Ownership could be the help you need to purchase your own home.
LAST FEW PLOTS!! AVAILABLE MARCH 2023 Shared Ownership could be the help you need to purchase your own home. 
A well presented RETIREMENT APARTMENT in the heart of Churchdown Village. No 11 is a GROUND FLOOR apartment that benefits from a REFITTED KITCHEN and SHOWER ROOM and new carpets throughout. The property further benefits from Communal facilities including a communal lounge and ROOF TERRACE
Gloucester's Dockside has had a transformation. The Trent is a 2-bedroom home available through shared ownership with Guinness Homes.
"**INVESTORS & CASH BUYERS ONLY!** £475pcm - yield of 7.1%
Central Gloucester with a tenant in situ, close to local amenities, second floor apartment lounge, kitchen, bathroom and two bedrooms. Term : 999 years from 1.1.2003
Charges : £50.00 pcm
Management company : CMG
"
A THIRD FLOOR ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT Castlemeads Court is well positioned in a convenient city centre location within proximity of the city centre shops. It is well located for the pedestrianised shopping area of Westgate Street with a range of traditional shops and High Street names.C...
Sweetbriar House is situated in Chapel Hay Lane in the heart of Churchdown Village ideally located for commuting to both Cheltenham and Gloucester alike and served by good local amenities. No. 26 is a SECOND FLOOR one bedroom retirement apartment for the OVER 55'S to include an 16ft sitting room...
Sweetbriar House is situated in Chapel Hay Lane in the heart of Churchdown Village ideally located for commuting to both Cheltenham and Gloucester alike and served by good local amenities. No. 30 is a SECOND FLOOR one bedroom retirement apartment for the OVER 55'S to include an 16ft sitting room...
" Proudly Presented To You By Move Estate Agents; a one bedroom park home with potential to improve in Staverton Park with no onward chain. The accommodation comprises of open plan living kitchen area, a double bedroom with fitted wardrobes to rear and a shower room/ wet room. The site itse..."
A TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE SECOND FLOOR Sovereign Court was constructed by Weldon Leigh Homes and comprises 27 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each property in the case of an emerge...
"If you are looking for low maintenance living for the over 55's within easy reach of Cheltenham, Gloucester and Tewkesbury, then look no further than this lovely detached park home situated on Norton Park."
***SHARED OWNERSHIP TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT FOR SALE AVAILABLE TO PURCHASE AT A 40% SHARE*** We welcome to the market this two bedroom apartment situated in the heart of Gloucester City Centre. This deceptively spacious modern apartment is only a few years old and is beautifully presented throug...
"A one double bedroom first floor retirement apartment with a lift set within this attractive red brick period property. The apartment benefits from use of communal lounge and laundry services inside and outside parking, landscaped gardens, drying area and bin storage. Located on the Huc..."
CHAIN FREE - WELL PRESENTED - OVER 55'S A well presented retirement apartment located on the second floor within Sovereign Court and benefiting from lift access. FULL VIRTUAL TOUR ONLINE
CGT sales are pleased to present to the market this one double bedroom first floor retirement apartment located in a popular area in Hucclecote. The flat benefits the use of communal lounge and laundry area and outside parking and communal gardens. Also the property benefits from a no onward ch...
"***STUDIO APARTMENT FOR SALE, BTL INVESTORS ONLY, CITY CENTRE LOCATION*** A modern one bedroom studio apartment for sale located in Gloucester City Centre. The apartment is in good decorative order throughout and is located within walking distance to all local amenities and..."
"***STUDIO APARTMENT FOR SALE, NO ONWARD CHAIN, BTL INVESTORS ONLY. CASH BUY ONLY *** Offered to the market for sale with no onward chain is this one bedroom studio apartment located in Gloucester City Centre. The apartment is in good order throughout and will make an ideal..."
"** 1 BED GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT, OVER 60'S WARDEN CONTROLLED COMPLEX, CHAIN-FREE ** MICHAEL TUCK ESTATE AGENTS are pleased to welcome to the open market this chain-free, 1 bedroom ground floor apartment, located within the very sought after Hucclecote Lodge. The apartment is located to the re..."
"The Avon is a light and airy 1-bedroom apartment at the Waterfront, Gloucester. This home is in a prime location close to the canal and just 15 minutes stroll to Gloucester Quays and the Peel centre, with plenty of restaurants, shops and leisure activities. Apply today with Guinness Homes."
Reserve now and you can take advantage of our £750 offer - (Offer ends 31st March) and be in your new home this summer.BUILD YOUR OWN OFFER!We'll give you £750* towards:White goods | Legal fees | Flooring |
Move in this summer to a 2-bedroom Shared Ownership apartment in Brockworth BUILD YOUR OWN OFFER!Reserve an apartment before the 31st of March and we invite you to build your own offer.
"TO BE OFFERED BY ONLINE AUCTION ON THE 15/03/2023 10:45 - One bedroom second floor apartment for the Over 55's
* VIDEO TOUR AVAILABLE UPON REQUEST*The property comprises a one bedroom second floor apartment within a purpose built development for the Over 55's. The development benefits from many ..."
1.26 acres of level grassland with road access. There are currently no services connected to the land ** OFFERS TO BE RECIEVED BY NOON ON WEDNESDAY 29TH MARCH 2023 **
A fenced plot of land measuring 17'3 x 31'4 in a prominent location with dropped curb access to the front.
0.49 of an acre parcel of land suitable for a variety of uses subject to the relevant permissions.
"Set on a modern and exclusive development on the edge of the Whitecross district. This beautiful and modern semi-detached home comes with a generous open plan living area at the heart of the home, as well as a separate lounge for those quieter moments."
"18th Century Grade ll* Listed Principal House, with Tudor origin, having Reception Hall with ornate rococo ceiling, 5 Reception Rooms, Kitchen, Butler’s Kitchen, 2 Ancillary Kitchens, Wine Cellars, 12 Bedrooms, 9 bathrooms, Nanny Wing."
The Good Estate Agent is proud to offer the oppoutunity to purchase a block of apartments situated on Newtown Road in Hereford!
" Commanding a Stunning Elevated Position with Breathtaking Countryside Views over Terraced Gardens cascading down to the River Wye, this remarkable Detached 4 Double Bedroom Family Home is quietly set in most sought after Hampton Park, revelling in a rural feel while close to all City amenities...."
" A Captivating Detached 5 Double Bedroom Victorian Country House, masterfully reimagined and extended to create a stunning modern Family Home including potentially fully self-contained Annexe, basking in encircling rural views across Haywood & Belmont Country Park, yet set deceptively close to n..."
"Situated on Vineyard Road, a five bedroom arts and crafts style property. Featuring kitchen with Aga, music room/snug, sitting room, dining room, original features throughout and internal swimming pool. Gated private driveway and double garage."
Comprises 2 Town Houses (1 sold-off) and 3 Residential Apartments (1 sold-off)
A Superb Detached Family Home Located in the Sought After Area of Hampton Park | Kitchen/ Dining Room | Living Room | Dining Room | Study | Large Conservatory | 5 Double Bedrooms plus 2 Attic Rooms | 3 Ensuites | Family Bathroom | Downstairs Shower Room | Potential Annex Development | Large Gard...
"A thriving guest house business set within the leafy conservation area of the cathedral city of Hereford, Charades is a fine example of Victorian elegance with period features throughout and a flexible lay out including 6 en-suite guest bedrooms along with a spacious dining room leading through t..."
"Close to the city centre, a very handsome and largely unspoilt grade II listed period townhouse, offering spacious family accommodation throughout, all set in large and established gardens of just under half an acre."
"Set in an elevated position with southerly views over Hereford city, a stunning 5 bedroomed detached family house with gardens and grounds of 1.5 acres, enjoying swimming pool and studio/playroom, plus additional outbuildings. "
"Highly attractive site with three building plots in slightly elevated, tucked away location About an acre site with lovely views to the South Exciting contemporary designs with planning for 2x 5 bed houses & a 4 bed, all with double garages. Set in this sought after leafy subur..."
"'Located to the east of the city centre in a prime residential locality, on a prestigious development, a substantial detached house offering extensive accommodation including five bedrooms and a double garage, set on a half acre of gardens which run down to the River Wye.'"
"An Exceptionally Well Presented Modern Detached House Situated In A Quiet Residential Area Close To The Centre Of Hereford Offering Family Orientated Accommodation Of Four Bedrooms, With One Benefitting From An En-Suite, Separate Garden Room/Office, Mature Private Garden And Ample Off Road Parkin..."
"Trivett Hicks is pleased to offer this is a very exiting opportunity for BTL investors to purchase a block of four very unusual terrace houses and potentially to increase rental yield. 2 NEWTOWN RD, 173, 175, & 177 WIDEMARSH STREET offering very spacious accommodation on three floors only 0.5 mil..."
"Situated down a country lane with paddocks, stables and country style garden. Featuring three bedrooms, with potential for a fourth, lounge,"
"A freehold investment opportunity to acquire 5 individual flats comprising; 3 two beds, a 1 bed and a studio flat. Income is currently circa £35,000 PA, but we do believe this could be further enhanced. The properties are all in fair order, benefitting from gas central heating and are co..."
"'Located off Whitecross Road just west of the city centre in an established residential district a superb detached five bedroom, three storey Victorian home with driveway and south-west facing rear gardens with raised entertaining area.'"
" Individually designed detached house in an exclusive residential location about 1600 square feet including garage, 4 bedrooms, 1 en-suite, versatile living accommodation, small, manageable garden. "
"'Located to the west of the City, in the highly favoured Kings Acre district, an exceptional detached house in terms of the level of accommodation offered and its presentation.'"
"This is a wonderful opportunity to own an immaculately presented penthouse apartment in the centre of the City of Hereford Located in Hereford city centre, with stunning views over the river and cathedral grounds. This two storey pent house apartment, boasting underfloor heating and garden terrace."
" Extended detached house in prime residential location with 4 good sized bedrooms, 3 reception rooms, gas central heating, double glazing, very large gardens, detached garage. "
" Convenient central location a superb 3 bedroom Penthouse Apartment with two en-suite shower rooms, fine views across the River Wye, rooftop garden with Cathedral views. Internal inspection highly recommended."
" A Spacious Detached 4 Bedroom House, situated in a peaceful cul-de-sac just off the desirable area of Aylestone Hill, Hereford. Entrance Hall – Sitting Room – Kitchen/Breakfast Room – Dining Room – Conservatory – Snug – Utility Room – Downstairs WC &..."
"Situated on the popular Kings Acre Road, close to countryside, is this four bedroom detached property. A kitchen/breakfast room, utility, lounge, dining room, four bedrooms - two of which are on the ground floor and three with en-suite. A garage and gated driveway with room for multiple vehicles."
This wonderful detached family home is positioned in a popular lower Bullingham area. Offering large rooms throughout and off road parking to the front this is the perfect home for growing families to enjoy so call now to book an early viewing to avoid disappointment.
This lovely detached home offers great sized rooms throughout and is located near the beautiful Belmont Pools in a quiet and select cul-de-sac position. Generous parking frontage and lovely landscaped rear gardens this wonderful home is one you don't want to miss.
The Good Estate Agent is proud to bring to the market this four bedroom detached house to the east of Hereford City. 
"'Situated in the popular location of Breinton Lane and to the west of central Hereford, an established detached family home which is centrally heated and double glazed, with four bedrooms, off-road parking and a good sized rear garden.'"
"Situated in a highly sought-after location a superb detached house with 4 bedrooms, 1 en-suite, 2 Reception rooms, kitchen/diner, garage, off-road parking. Must be viewed. "
"'Situated in a highly sought after residential location, off Penn Grove Road, to the north of Hereford City centre, a superbly presented three bedroom detached family home which is centrally heated and double glazed with off-road parking, garage and gardens.'"
"Occupying a convenient City location, a 1930’s family house, extensively refurbished with double glazing, central heating, off road parking, garaging and numerous outbuildings/offices"
The Good Estate Agent is proud to offer to the market this lovely 4 bedroom detached property with fantastic gardens situated on Ross Road! Viewing Highly Recommended
"A large kitchen dining area and separate study, the Manford 4 bedroom home has plenty of space for the family."
"Our Harwood homes at Hereford Point are selling fast - so don't miss your chance to secure this energy efficient, new family home!"
"Situated on Ross Road, a detached 1930's style property set back from the road. Featuring off road parking for four cars, a garage, rear lane access to a workshop, kitchen diner, conservatory, large lounge and private garden. In need of some modernisation; but would make an ideal home."
" A Beautifully Presented Detached 5 Bedroom House, with garage, driveway and private gardens, all situated in a popular residential area close to countryside on the outskirts of Hereford City. Entrance Hall – Sitting Room – Kitchen/Breakfast Room – Dining Room – Conser..."
"The Point is located at the top of the leafy suburb of Aylestone Hill being a landmark development only a short distance from the City centre. The property boasts spacious accommodation over three floors including open plan kitchen, living, dining space, top floor master suite with balcony to ..."
"Need to sell your home? We'll handle everything, including the fees, when you buy the Burns with our Assisted Move scheme!"
OUSTANDING INVESTMENT YIELDING NEAR 7% NET! Fully licensed and tenanted high quality HMO within walking distance of the city centre.
Growing families will feel right at home in the spacious Trusdale with its four bedrooms and practical ground floor layout.
"** INVESTORS LOOK NO FURTHER ** A Fantastic opportunity has become available to own a FREEHOLD, beautiful, ""Victorian Style"" Semi Detached property. Located near the heart of Hereford City Centre, Offering a total of Five / Six bedrooms and a further potential to further develop."
Families or couples looking for practical and generous living space will find all they need in the well proportioned 4 bedroom Midford.
This beautiful detached bungalow is situated in the popular residential area of Aylestone Hill. Contemporary home with far-reaching views in a sought-after residential location this is one you wouldn't want to miss. So call now to book an early viewing to avoid disappointment.
" A 4 Double Bedroom Bungalow with Extensive Gardens, enjoying stunning far reaching countryside views across the Lugg flats. Offered With No Onward Chain. Entrance Hall – Sitting Room – Kitchen/Dining Room – Pantry – Cloakroom – 4 Double Bedrooms – Family B..."
"In a highly sought after location, a 3/4 bedroom detached property standing in a great sized plot with double garage, utility room, downstairs shower room, lovely views towards Haugh Wood and Dormington. Directions: Leave the city on the Ledbury Road turning right into Eign Road. Proceed un..."
" An immaculate detached family home in a sought-after residential location with 4 bedrooms, en-suite, open-plan kitchen/dining/family room, downstairs WC, garage & garden - MUST BE VIEWED!! "
"A new development of bespoke detached bungalows, situated on Ross Road in Hereford."
"This two bedroom mid-terrace home is pleasantly located in a cul-de-sac in a well-established residential area about a mile and a half northwest of the Cathedral City of Hereford. Constructed in the 1970s, the property has replacement double-glazing and gas central heating,"
" Situated in popular residential location a 4 bedroom detached house with views across Hereford, very large gardens, detached garage and driveway. Viewing highly recommended. "
"Located in a highly sought after residential location, This delightful, extended, modernised 1930's period property offers fantastic family accommodation, The property has a large south facing garden, downstairs cloakroom, multiple reception rooms all with a greater further potential."
An immaculate extended 4 bedroom detached bungalow situated on Ross Road in Hereford. Must be viewed!
"Offering a luxurious top floor MASTER SUITE, with larger bedrooms on the first floor perfect for guests, the Morris really does offer plenty of space for the whole family."
"'Located on the northern outskirts of Hereford, a historic dwelling with 'contemporary' single storey extension to the rear, which is centrally heated and double glazed with parking and an attractive garden.'"
"'Set in a cul-de-sac on the eastern outskirts of Hereford in a highly sought residential location, a well presented four bedroom detached house which is provided with gas central heating and double glazing, with off-road parking, garage and rear garden.'"
" >Superb development site within easy reach of the City with Detailed Planning Consent for 10 Apartments, 8 Parking spaces. All main services available. "
" A Beautifully Presented Detached 4 Double Bedroom House, situated in a quiet cul-de-sac at the heart of the ever popular Hampton Dene district in Hereford. Entrance Hall – Kitchen – Sitting Room – Study/Dining Room – Downstairs WC – Under-Stairs Storage – ..."
A predominantly level area of pastureland with good access extending to approximately 8.69 acres in this prominent location.
EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - FULLY TENANTED AND LICENSED HMO! Beautiful six bedroom property which has recently benefited from full renovation.
"A wonderful opportunity for large families and investors. We are proud and honour to market this wonderful detached family home which is currently being used as a HM0 and brings an income of £37,000 a year and wouldn't take a lot to change back into a family home."
"Situated behind electric gates, a three double bedroom property with conservatory, separate dining room, double garage with self-contained one bedroom annex on first floor. With private gardens backing on to a lake and off road parking for at least 5 cars."
"Williams are delighted to present this spacious, well presented family home that boasts 4 bedrooms, a large kitchen dining area, and further well proportioned reception rooms.The property commands plenty of off-road parking, a detached garage and a good sized rear garden. Directions: Leave th..."
" A Spacious Detached 3 Double Bedroom Family Home, located off the Roman Road in North Hereford, with great travel connections. Porch – Entrance Hall – Kitchen/Dining Room – Sitting Room – Conservatory – Utility Room – Downstairs WC – Storage – ..."
" Highly sought-after location a spacious 4/5 bedroom semi-detached house with a large kitchen/diner, private rear garden, ideal family home. Must be viewed!! "
"No.1 - 'The East Wing' A newly completed 4-bedroomed town house with its own entrance, originally part of the main Estate house with exceptionally large terrace, garden and magnificent views. 141.86 sq m 1527 sq ft"
"A very well presented detached property, recently completed and enjoying a cul de sac position. The property benefits from an en suite shower room off the main bedroom, a lovely kitchen/ dining area with integrated appliances, a downstairs Wc, Utility room, central heating and double glazing. ..."
" A Detached 4 Bedroom Family Home, nestled in the corner of a popular cul-de-sac just a stone’s throw from the Herefordshire Colleges and within walking distance of the City Centre. Entrance Hall – Sitting Room – Dining Room – Kitchen – Downstairs WC – Stor..."
Purplebricks are pleased to offer onto the market this well presented and spacious detached family home in Bredon Drive which is located to the west of the city centre and close to Whitecross School and provides excellent transport links across the city as well as being close to all local ameniti...
"Four bedroom townhouse conversion with great terrace and magnificent views in small country Estate, close to Hereford City Centre"
" Outskirts of city an impressive 4 bedroom detached house with modern kitchen/diner, garage, ample parking, ideal family home. Must be viewed!!! "
A most impressive Victorian semi detached residence retaining many original features directly overlooking the River Wye.
"Situated on Portland Street, a Grade II listed, four double bedroom, mid terrace property. This well presented character property briefly comprises of downstairs W.C. & utility area, private walled garden and off-road parking. Viewing is highly recommended to fully appreciate what is on offer."
"'Set to the north west of Hereford City in the popular district of Kings Acre an extended three bedroom semi detached family home with superb kitchen/breakfast room, off road parking, garage and good sized enclosed rear garden'"
This apartment is an ideal opportunity to get onto the property ladder via this low cost home ownership programme from Herefordshire Council.
"Situated off the popular Kings Acre Road, a three bedroom semi-detached property. Featuring off road parking and garage, landscaped gardens, kitchen/breakfast, snug, formal lounge, downstairs wc and utility. Viewing is highly recommended to fully appreciate the potential in this ideal family home."
" Popular edge of city location a spacious 4 bedroom detached house with luxury kitchen/breakfast room, en-suite shower-room, detached double garage. Ideal family home. "
"'An individual well appointed detached residence which is centrally heated and double glazed with driveway, garage and gardens.'"
"With a play area nearby, this traditional home is perfect for family life."
"A Beautifully Presented, Extended, Semi Detached Family Home offering Versatile Accommodation | Living Room | Kitchen Dining Room | Converted Garage to Provide Further Reception Room/ Bedroom, Downstairs Shower Room and Utility | 4 First Floor Bedrooms | Family Bathroom | Great Size Garden Overl..."
"Located on Hinton road south of Hereford City Centre, a 3 bedroomed extended bungalow which has been renovated throughout to a high standard. The property benefits from open dining/lounge area, kitchen, 3 bedrooms and shower room. "
"ANDREW MORRIS offer to the market this three-bedroom, semi-detached house having well-presented and adapted accommodation in a sought-after area on the north-east fringe of Hereford city limits. | HALL | LIVING ROOM | KITCHEN & DINING ROOM | UTILITY & CLOAKROOM WC | GARDEN ROOM | WORKSHOP | THRE..."
"This lovely link-detached home is being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Situated on the southern outskirts of the City in the popular residential area of Belmont, with great local amenities. Being well presented throughout this is one you don't want to miss. Call now to book an early viewing!!"
" Extended detached house in popular residential location with 3/4 bedrooms, large attic, gas central heating, good sized garden, garage. A lovely family home. Must be viewed. NO ONWARD CHAIN. "
" Stunning Penthouse Apartment in a landmark Grade II Listed building, 3 bedrooms, en-suite, study, over 1500 sq ft., recently comprehensively renovated, designated parking, private garden. "
"Four bedroom detached property with driveway, conservatory and converted garage. Located in a vibrant community, ideal for young families or a starter home with a park, community centre and amenities."
"'Located in a highly sought after residential district to the east of central Hereford, a three bedroom inner terrace property, with two reception rooms, conservatory, off-road parking and garden.'"
" Outskirts of the city a spacious 4 bedroom family house with 3 reception rooms, en-suite shower room, private rear garden, garage. Must be viewed. "
"The Lawrence is one of our larger 3 bed homes for sale, with a corner position style WEST FACING GARDEN and a dual aspect sociable lounge."
"A lovely three bedroom semi detached property located in this sought after area. The property benefits from gas central heating, double glazing, a downstairs wc, utility room, two main reception rooms with traditional features, plentiful off road parking, garage and lovely gardens with rural outl..."
"Situated on the southern outskirts of the city an impressive 4 bedroom detached house with newly fitted kitchen and bathroom, gas central heating, double glazing, ideal family home, with no onward chain! "
" Excellent detached house in popular location with 4 bedrooms, gas central heating, double glazing, good sized rear garden, garage, parking. Must be viewed. "
A Detached 4 Bedroom Family Home Location the Popular Residential Area of Kings Acre | Living Room | Dining Room | Kitchen | Cloakroom | Garage | Off Road Parking | Gas Heating | Enclosed Rear Garden | In Need of Some Modernisation | Viewing Highly Recommended
"A spacious 2 Bedroom Ground Floor Apartment with large wrap around decked terrace and garden areas, adjoining open countryside with lovely views."
"SOUGHT AFTER RESIDENTIAL LOCATION WITH AMENITIES CLOSE BY. This is a well maintained detached house that offers flexible accommodation of either two bedrooms, two reception rooms or three bedrooms, one of which would then be downstairs and living room across the front of the property. Furthe..."
"A much altered and extended 3 bedroom family home set along a quiet road just away from Whitecross Road. The property itself briefly comprises; Entrance Porch, Entrance Hall, Lounge, Dining Room, Kitchen, impressive wooden Conservatory, Shower Room with WC and large Garage with Utility space."
"This exceptional house has been completely updated by the current owners, with an almost no expense spared approach and now truly represents spacious modernity and open plan style! Viewing of this property is the only way to fully appreciate what is being offered. Please be aware that the asking ..."
Exceptional country house conversion in prime rural location with outstanding views across the Hereford city borders. Easy access into the city.
This lovely mid-terraced property is situated just one mile South of Hereford city centre in a popular residential area. Being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN and its easy access to the city as well as other local amenities nearby this is the perfect home for first time buyers
"'Situated in a highly sought after Belmont residential district and to the south of central Hereford, a well presented detached home which is centrally heated and double glazed, with four bedrooms, off-road parking and enclosed rear garden.'"
"Located in the popular residential area of Holmer, a beautifully presented 3 bedroomed semi detached property which provides accommodation over 3 floors. The property benefits from lounge, kitchen/dining space which opening to utility, 2 double bedrooms with family bathroom and the second floo..."
A superb third floor three bedroom apartment in a convenient city centre location overlooking the River Wye and adjacent parks
" Situated on the outskirts of the city a spacious 4 bedroom detached residence with 2 large reception rooms, breakfast kitchen, good sized corner plot, ideal for family or retirement. Must be viewed!"
"Reduce your energy bills by thousands with an energy efficient new build home just like the Makenzie available at Hereford Point,"
"The Makenzie is our largest 3 bed home at Hereford Point, offering space across 3 flexible floors and a luxurious master suite with en suite on the top floor!"
"With 3 bedrooms and a sociable kitchen diner, the semi-detached Gosford is perfect if you're looking for a little extra space."
"'Situated to the south of central Hereford in the established Hinton residential district, a well presented four bedroom detached home, with off-road parking and enclosed rear garden.'"
" Stunning first floor apartment, purpose built for over 50's, exclusive residential development, 3 bedrooms, 2 en-suite, garage, covered balcony, lovely communal gardens. Viewing advised. "
" Outskirts of the city an impressive 3 bedroom detached house with luxury open plan kitchen/diner, en-suite shower room, good sized rear garden, ideal for family or retirement. "
" Highly sought after location a spacious 3 bedroom older-style semi-detached house with 2 large reception rooms, conservatory, good sized rear garden, no onward chain! Ideal family home. "
" A Modern and Fully Licensed 5 Bedroom House of Multiple Occupation, currently being run as a successful business and available with No Onward Chain. This fully compliant and licensed, 5 bedroom HMO, is located in a great location near the City Centre, perfect for working professionals. Entr..."
"ANDREW MORRIS offer for sale this spaciously planned, semi-detached house having two receptions and three bedrooms located 1.5 miles NE of Hereford city centre. | HALL | LIVING ROOM | DINING ROOM | CONSERVATORY | KITCHEN | THREE BEDROOMS | BATHROOM | GARDENS | PARKING | GARAGE |"
"A detached, three bedroomed family home in an ideal location with nearby schools and amenities. Featuring lounge, separate dining room, conservatory, downstairs wc and family shower room, garden accessible through the garage and rear double gates."
" Situated in a peaceful cul-de-sac position an impressive 4 bedroom detached house with refitted kitchen and bathroom, private rear garden, ideal family house. Viewing advised."
"This lovely detached bungalow is situated 1½ miles east of Hereford city centre within a well-established area. Situated off Lichfield Avenue, just off Ledbury Road. Offering three good size bedrooms and being well presented throughout this is one you don't want to miss."
"***MUST BE VIEWED*** A beautifully renovated and highly spacious four bedroom, Victorian townhouse having a generously sized rear garden. Wealth of nearby amenities and being located just over 1 mile north of Hereford city centre.   | ENTRANCE HALL | LIVING ROOM | OPEN-PLAN KITCHEN DINING ROOM |..."
"Well-presented accommodation | CLICK HERE for more information on this well-presented, detached, three bedroom bungalow located 1½ miles east of Hereford city centre. | Hall | Lounge | Conservatory | Kitchen | Three Bedrooms | En-Suite Cloakroom WC | Bathroom | Driveway Parking | Garage | Rear G..."
"RETIRE IN STYLE TO THIS SPACIOUS APARTMENT - WITH BALCONY VIEWS OVER GARDENS & POND. (Over 50's) Located in the popular residential area of Belmont, set within the grounds of Belmont Abbey. This surprisingly spacious first-floor apartment features gas central heating, double glazing, communal..."
3 bedroom detached house situated on Ledbury Road. Features off road parking and garage with workshop along with a large private garden.
" A Stylish and Beautifully Presented 2 Double Bedroom Executive Apartment, with a contemporary open plan style and boasting lovely elevated riverside views, near to the City Centre of Hereford and all Offered With No Onward Chain. Entrance Hall – Open Plan Kitchen/Dining/Sitting Room &n..."
Beautifully Presented 3 Bedroom Family Home | Popular Residential Area to the North of Hereford City | Ground Floor Extension | Open Plan Kitchen / Dining Area | Garage & Off Road Parking | Attractive Rear Garden | Gas Heating
'Located on the western outskirts of Hereford and adjoining fields to the rear an established detached three bedroom home with generous rear garden.'
Detached | Four Bedrooms | Living Room | Kitchen/Dining Room | Family Bathroom | En-Suite Shower Room | WC | Rear Garden | Double Glazing | Gas Central Heating | Freehold | EPC Rating C Set within the popular Saxongate development is this immaculately presented family home offering spacious livi...
"PUBLIC NOTICE - 71 Sheridan Road, Hereford, HR4 0NH - We have received an offer of £ 115,000.00. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contracts takes place. EPC Rating (E)"
Beautifully presented Four bedroom detached family home | Popular residential area to the South of Hereford City | Tastefully updated throughout | Open plan kitchen / dining area | Detached single garage & off road parking | En suite shower room | Attractive rear garden | Call Connells!
"Pleasantly located in the Holmer area of Hereford a spacious three bedroom detached house built by Crest Homes in the early 1990's. The property enjoys two reception rooms, kitchen/breakfast room, three bedrooms, shower room, good size gardens, garage and large driveway providing parking for 4..."
"A well presented three bedroom semi detached house located in this sought after after North East of the city. The property benefits from an extended ground floor, double glazing, central heating, outside Wc, Garage and well kept gardens. Location: With excellent local amenities to include pos..."
"Act fast to make the most of our £7,000 CASHBACK offer, helping make your new home more affordable right from the start."
You could save thousands on your energy bills with an energy efficient new home just like the Kilburn at Hereford Point.
"Reserve now to receive £7,000 CASHBACK to use however you need to help you get moving to the Kilburn at Hereford Point."
"Riverview Court was built by Perfection Homes Limited which comprises 25 luxury apartments. Being in close proximity to the Hereford Cathedral, The Mappa Mundi Museum and The Bishops Palace & Cloisters The main feature of the apartment is the southerly facing aspect with easterly facing 5 ft p..."
The Good Estate Agent is excited to offer this traditional 3-bedroom semi-detached property situated on Welb...
"Situated in the Eign Hill area of Hereford, a three bed semi detached property with off road parking, single garage and a South facing landscaped garden. Conveniently located one a half miles to Hereford city centre."
" PLOT 9 - An exclusive development of just 9 properties in this exclusive residential area close to excellent local amenities, traditionally constructed with timber-frame storm porch, 2 bedrooms, family accommodation with extends to over 1000 sq ft (TBC) garden, parking."
"'Located between Kings Acre Road and Three Elms Road, on an established development, a very well presented detached house with rear extension and generous garden area.'"
" Great family house within easy reach of the city centre, 4 good-sized bedrooms, gas central heating, double glazing, gas central heating, large rear garden."
"Situated 100 yards from Belmont Park, a beautifully presented three bedroom detached property. Featuring off road parking and garage with utility area. Occupying a corner position with an enclosed garden. Three bedrooms, one with en-suite."
"This is a unique opportunity for applicants to purchase a ground floor apartment, situated within the hear of Hereord City centre. The property benefits from two/three bedroom accommodation with family bathroom along with one shower room en-suite together with a highly bespoke-designed kitchen..."
"'Situated to the south of Hereford city a five bedroom semi detached family home with two reception rooms, en-suite to the principal bedroom, gas central heating and enclosed rear garden'"
"NO WATER ENTERED THE PROPERTY DURING RECENT FLOODING (15/1/23) A spacious and very well-presented, semi-detached house offering three bedrooms and a converted loft room. Convenient location near city centre and benefiting from a government grant flooding defence. Anti-flood devices are installed...."
"DESIGN OPTIONS AVAILABLE | an opportunity to purchase a ground-floor apartment offering spacious three bedroom accommodation located within the city centre. Currently being converted, there is the opportunity for design input for finishing touches | Lobby | Hall | Two Principal Bedrooms, one wit..."
"***INVESTMENT PROPERTY*** Superb opportunity to purchase a Six En-suite Room multiple occupancy property located next to the city centre in Hereford. Each room has En-Suite facilities. Briefly comprising:Ground Floor: Hallway , Room to front, downstairs Wc, Kitchen with two ovens and hobs with..."
" A Spacious Modern 4 Bedroom Town House, offering generous living space set across 3 storeys and with private garden, garage and off-road parking, set in a quiet residential area of Holmer, North Hereford and Offered With No Onward Chain. Entrance Hall – Kitchen/Dining Room – Stud..."
A Well Presented Detached Family Home in a Cul De Sac Location just South of Hereford City Centre | Living Room | Kitchen/ Breakfast Room | Second Reception Room/ Bedroom 4 | Dining Room | 3 Bedrooms | Family Bathroom | Enclosed Rear Garden | Off Road Parking | Gas Heating | Double Glazing | Cloa...
"Situated within a City Centre Location. An extended, semi-detached home with approved planning permission to further extend is offered for sale. Overlooking the local ""widemarsh common"". Multiple reception rooms throughout, large rear garden and conveniently positioned. We highly recommend a viewing"
"VICTORIAN HOUSE WITH THE MODERN TOUCH OF A DOWNSTAIRS CLOAKROOM. A lovely example of a three bedroom Victorian house in a popular residential area within walking distance of the City Centre. There are stairs to an attic room, upstairs family bathroom, a recently added downstairs cloakroom, tw..."
"A well-presented semi-detached home which is in need of updating but could be made into something special. Located in the North Side of the City Centre and positioned close to the local schools, transport links and amenities this is the perfect home for first time buyers and growing families."
"Whether you are looking for a starter home, investment property, city bolt-hole, rental or maybe a holiday home, this special barn conversion on the western outskirts of Hereford city will be just the ticket."
"A PROPERTY TO SUIT FIRST TIME BUYERS, INVESTMENT BUYERS & BUYERS DOWNSIZING. An immaculately presented and spacious three bedroom semi detached house located on the popular Northern edge of Hereford. Countryside walks are close by and on a nice evening you can take a stroll to The Secret Gard..."
A Well Presented Mid Terrace House | Kitchen/ Dining Room | Utility Room | Cloakroom Living Room | 2/3 Bedrooms | Bathroom | Courtyard Garden | Parking | Garage | Popular Residential Area | Viewing Recommended | No Onward Chain
"A two bedroom detached bungalow located in this sought after area. The property benefits from central heating, double glazing, a lovely garden room, a garage and generous gardens. In need of modernisation, this property offers a lovely blank canvass for anyone looking to move to this premier loca..."
" Outskirts of city a spacious detached bungalow with 2 reception rooms, fitted kitchen, 2 double bedrooms, garage, attractive gardens. Ideal for retirement! "
"ANDREW MORRIS present this three-bedroom, two reception, detached bungalow which offers the opportunity for updating. Conveniently located less than 1 mile from the city centre near to a variety of amenities. | PORCH | HALL | LIVING & DINING ROOM | SITTING ROOM | KITCHEN | CONSERVATORY | THREE B..."
"A luxury two double bedroom apartment located in the centre of the city. The property benefits from an En Suite shower room, a main bathroom, open plan living area with fully integrated appliances including a built in cooker and hob with hood over, dishwasher, washing machine and fridge / freeze..."
" Stunning Victorian property situated in popular Whitecross residential area with 2 bedrooms, 2 reception rooms, converted cellar, Gas central heating, double glazing, recently refurbished throughout. Viewing essential!! "
"Exclusively designed for the over 60s, this is a stunning new development of one and two bedroom retirement apartments located close to the city."
"Exclusively for the over 60's William Grange by McCarthy and Stone is a fabulous new retirement development just a 10-minute walk from the city centre, offering 20-one bed and 34 two-bed apartments. Apartment 36 offers 2 bedroom accommodation and is situated on the first floor with south facing o..."
"Exclusively for the over 60's William Grange by McCarthy and Stone is a fabulous new retirement development just a 10-minute walk from the city centre, offering 20-one bed and 34 two-bed apartments. Apartment 50 offers 2 bedroom accommodation and is situated on the second floor with sou..."
Situated to the North of Hereford City a spacious and modern three bedroom semi-detached home which offers ideal family accommodation. The property benefits large rooms throughout and a low maintenance rear garden. Being finished to a high standard throughout this is one you don't want to miss.
"This single plot is for sale with full planning permission for a 3 bedroom detached dwelling measuring 1275 sqft, located in a sought after location with countryside views."
"A traditional three bedroom extended semi-detached house located in this established area. Benefiting from a superb, extended kitchen with utility room, central heating and double glazing. Upstairs there are three bedrooms, one being en-suite with a family bathroom and downstairs there are two re..."
"Situated on Greyfriars Avenue, a three bedroom semi-detached property. In need of renovation this would make an ideal development project. A new kitchen has been fitted, but the potential opportunities available are endless. Please contact branch for full details."
" Popular residential location, semi-detached Victorian house with 2 bedrooms, attic & cellar room, gas central heating, double glazing. Viewing advised. No onward chain! "
"A freehold building plot with consent for the construction of a detached dwelling of 1492 sq ft with garage, gardens and rural views. Accessed via an existing small rural development, the plot sits to the rear of the car park for Graftonbury Mews and adjacent to 11 Graftonbury Mews, bounded by fa..."
BRAND NEW Park Home (42'x20') | Residential development | Over 45s | Pet friendly | Fully furnished | Small development | Countryside views | Bus stop at park entrance | Town facilities nearby | Decking | Premium plots | Part exchange available
"COMING SOON: brand new, two-bedroom homes to occupy the premium plots on this redeveloped park home site which will boast stunning panoramic countryside views."
"Recently converted first floor 2 bedroom apartment with balcony, lovely countryside views, communal gardens and allocated car parking"
"A superb three bedroom semi detached house located in the sought after Kings Acre area. This very well presented property benefits from central heating, double glazing, plentiful off road parking, private gardens and a garage. EPC - 65/81 : Rating D. / Council Tax: C https://find-ener..."
"Located in a popular residential area off Kings Acre road, approximately 1.5 northwest of Hereford City, a beautifully presented 3 bedroom semi detached property which benefits from 2 reception rooms, kitchen, updated bathroom, garage and off road parking for 2 vehicles."
"'A beautifully presented 1930's semi-detached house which is centrally heated and double glazed. Parking area, shortened garage and attractive gardens to the rear.'"
" Popular residential location a 3 bedroom detached house with en-suite, garage, off road parking, garden. No onward chain. "
"The Good Estate Agent is proud to bring to the market this lovely 3/4 bedroom terraced property situated in Whitecross, Hereford. "
New Two Bedroom Flat offered to the market
" Extended semi-detached house in popular location with large ground floor space, 3 Bedrooms,gas central heating, double glazing, garage & gardens. "
A Well Presented Mid Terrace House | 3 Bedrooms plus Cellar Room | Living Room | Dining Room | Kitchen with Utility Area | Partially Converted Cellar | Family Bathroom | Gas Heating | Double Glazing | Enclosed Rear Garden | Viewing Recommended | No Onward Chain
"Situated in a popular residential location, this deceptively spacious 4 bedroom 3 storey town house offers an ideal family home. The property is offered for sale with no onward chain and benefits from an en-suite master bedroom, fitted kitchen and garage. The property in brief offers; fitted kitc..."
"Exclusively for the over 60's William Grange by McCarthy and Stone is a fabulous new retirement development just a 10-minute walk from the city centre, offering 20-one bed and 34 two-bed apartments. Apartment 31 offers 2 bedroom accommodation and is south facing situated on the first floor."
"Situated to the North side of Hereford this wonderful semi-detached home has been finished to the good standard throughout. Positioned close to local schools, transport links and local amenities this is the perfect home for first time buyers who are looking to get onto the property ladder."
"This three bedroom, Semi-Detached home is a fantastic opportunity for first time buyers! With a modern fitted kitchen, low maintenance garden to the rear. There are three bedrooms and family bathroom upstairs. With a single garage, parking to the front of the property and well presented throughout."
"NEW HOME: If you are looking for low maintenance bungalow with rural living, look no further than this fully residential, fully furnished park home for the over 45's."
"ANDREW MORRIS offer to the market this stunning, two-bedroom, detached park home located on the executive Green Crize park home site offering the perfect blend of country living with modern conveniences. | ENTRANCE HALL | LIVING ROOM | KITCHEN / DINER | TWO BEDROOMS | EN-SUITE | SHOWER ROOM | PA..."
BRAND NEW Park Home (42'x20') | Residential development | Over 45s | Pet friendly | Fully furnished | Small development | Countryside views | Bus stop at park entrance | Town facilities nearby | Home available now | Part exchange available
Located in Saxongate is Staddlestone Circle which is located not too far from Hereford City Centre this large home offers access to a large variety of amenities whilst also offering flexible living. Being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN this is one you don't want to miss!
CASH BUYER INCENTIVE If you are a cash buyer and purchase this property we will instruct you with one of our panel of solicitors and pay their fee! Terms & Conditions apply - contact us for more information
Attractive Period Detached Property | Sought After Location on the Edge of the City | Good Schooling Nearby | Two Double Bedrooms | Potential to Extend (subject to permission) | Large Garden | Period Features | Sold with No Onward Chain
"A beautiful semi-detached home which is located in a popular and well established residential area. Located with excellent local amenities, buses and schooling all nearby this lovely family home is one you don't want to miss. Call now to book an early viewing to avoid disappointment."
" Mid-terraced house in sought-after residential location with 3 bedrooms, gas central heating, double glazing, off road parking, enclosed rear garden, off-road parking. Viewing advised."
"A spacious and well presented detached home situated within a short walk from the city centre and train station. Having been designed by leading architects this open plan, spacious and modern detached home offers open plan living with bifold doors that open on to a large private rear garden. Id..."
"Investors only! 1 of 5 modern three bedroom semi detached family homes, located in an exclusive development within walking distance of the City Centre. With accommodation spread over three floors the property is well suited to a family or a professional couple. This would also make an ideal Buy t..."
" Situated on the outskirts of the city a spacious 3 bedroom house with large ground floor extension with off-road parking, private garden, ideal family home with no onward chain! "
"'Located to the south of Hereford City centre, a three bedroom semi-detached home which is centrally heated and double glazed, with off-road parking and enclosed rear garden.'"
"Forming part of a small exclusive courtyard development of historic former riverside warehousing, an outstanding three bedroom townhouse with communal gardens and a lovely location adjacent to the River Wye"
"The Good Estate Agent is proud to bring to the market this lovely 3 bedroom semi detached property situated in Hoarwithy Road, Hereford. "
"A Well Presented, Mid Terrace House Located in the Popular Residential Area of Kings Acre | Modern Kitchen | Living Room | Conservatory | 3 Bedrooms | Family Bathroom | Gas Heating | Double Glazing | Communal Parking | Garage to Rear of Property | Low Maintenance Rear Garden | Viewing Recommended"
" A Modern 3 Bedroom Semi-Detached House, situated in a quiet-cul-de-sac in the popular area of Saxon Gate, Hereford. Offered With No Onward Chain. Entrance Hall – Sitting/Dining Room – Kitchen – Downstairs WC – Under-Stairs Closet – 2 Double Bedrooms – Sing..."
" Popular residential location a spacious 3 bedroom end terraced house with 2 reception rooms, fitted kitchen, ideal family home, no onward chain. Must be viewed!! "
BRAND NEW Park Home (40'x20') | Residential development | Over 45s | Pet friendly | Fully furnished | Small development | Countryside views | Bus stop at park entrance | Town facilities nearby | Home available now | Part exchange available
"ANDREW MORRIS present this brand new, detached park home situated on an executive site offering stunning countryside views whilst located just 1 mile from amenities on Holme Lacy Road.   | ENTRANCE HALL | LOUNGE / DINER | KITCHEN | TWO BEDROOMS | EN-SUITE | BATHROOM | GARDENS | PARKING |"
"A three bedroom end property which benefits from central heating, double glazing, good sized garden and a GARAGE. "
"Located along Edgar Street, along the fringe of the city, with only 5 minutes walk to Hereford City itself, a substantial 3 bedroomed end of terraced property, currently being used as an investment property, having the benefit of an alarm system which is hardwired to the mains, double glazing ..."
"'Situated to the south of central Hereford, a well presented three bedroom semi-detached home which is centrally heated and double glazed, with off-road parking and enclosed rear garden.'"
" Excellent semi-detached house in mature residential locality. 3 bedrooms, lounge, dining room, good-size garden, gas central heating and double-glazing. Ideal family house. "
"'Situated to the south of central Hereford in the Redhill residential district, a two bedroom semi-detached bungalow which is centrally heated, with off-road parking, garage and enclosed rear garden.'"
Three Bedroomed Terrace Home | City Centre Location | Rear Garden | Permit Parking | Spacious Living Accommodation | Period Features | Ideal for First Time Buyers or Investors
"Trivett Hicks is pleased to offer this three bedroom Victorian style terrace home. The property is situated in the heart of Hereford city centre and has been improved to include decoration and carpets throughout. The accommodation briefly comprises of; living room, dining room, fitted..."
The Good Estate Agent is proud to bring to the market this 3 bedroom terraced property in Edgar Street Hereford. 
"ANDREW MORRIS are offering for sale this well-presented, three bedroom home which is located 2 miles SW of the city centre. The property boasts spacious accommodation with a garage and driveway to the rear. | HALL | LIVING ROOM | DINING ROOM | KITCHEN | CLOAKROOM WC | THREE BEDROOMS | SHOWER ROO..."
" Elegant ground floor apartment close to the city centre with 2 bedrooms, gas central heating, communal gardens, allocated parking. Viewing advised."
"Trivett Hicks is pleased to offer this well presented two bedroom house with character and period features. The property is situated on the Grandstand Road, the area has many amenities nearby and is approximately one mile from Hereford city centre. The home has recently had a gas boiler fitted ..."
"The Good Estate Agent is proud to bring to the market this 2 bedroom terraced property in Grandstand Road, Hereford. "
"Located in St James this property, offered with no onward chain, is ideally located to benefit from city living with amenities nearby including shops, the duck pond, the Castle Hotel, Left Bank restaruant and the St George playing fields."
"The Good Estate Agent is proud to bring to the market this 2 bedroom terraced property in Grandstand Road, Hereford."
" A Beautifully Presented 3 Bedroom Terrace Home, located approx. 2 miles south of Hereford City Centre, offering well maintained front & rear gardens, modern Kitchen/Diner and good storage. Open Porch – Entrance Hall – Sitting Room – Kitchen/Dining Room – Pantry &ndash..."
"Situated in the popular area of Redhill, a three bedroom end terrace property. Featuring lounge/diner, kitchen, three bedrooms, conservatory and private rear garden. Viewing highly recommended to fully appreciate its full potential."
Trivett Hicks is pleased to offer this well presented two bedroom house with character and period features. The proeprty is situated on the Grandstand Road. The area has many amenities nearby and is approximately one mile from Hereford city centre. The accommodation briefly includes living roo...
" Convenient central location a spacious older style house with 3 good sized bedrooms, requires modernisation, ideal for FTB or investment. No onward chain! "
"Trivett Hicks is pleased to offer this two bedroom cottage style residence situated in Priory Place with planning permission to convert into a four bedroom home. The accommodation currently offers living room, dining room, kitchen to the ground floor. To the first floor two bedrooms and a bathr..."
"Situated close to St Pauls's and Bishops schools, a three bedroom mid-terrace property. Set back from the road the property offers a lounge, dining room, kitchen with access to the garden. Rear garden with storage shed and access to a parking area."
"Within easy reach of Hereford City Centre, a well presented two bedroom terraced house with loft room and cellar, gas central heating & good sized rear garden. Must be viewed to fully appreciate."
"A period three bedroom terraced property which benefits from recently fitted double glazing, central heating, two reception rooms, a downstairs bathroom and gardens. Directions: Turning left off A49 Edgar St into Canonmoor St, turn left into Moorfield St and Walmer st. is on your right hand s..."
Situated on Grandison Rise approx. 2.1 miles north of Hereford city centre is this 3 bedroom terraced house.
"The Good Estate Agent is proud to bring to the market this 2 bedroom semi detached property in Polton Terrace, Hereford. "
"Offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN, this penthouse apartment with views overlooking Hereford from the roof top balcony is perfect for someone looking for a central location and outside space."
"A light, spacious and well presented apartment | Located in a sought after position within walking distance of Hereford city centre | Separate Kitchen & Lounge Diner | 2 Bedrooms & Bathroom | Allocated Parking & Communal Grounds"
"NO CHAIN Trivett Hicks is pleased to offer this modern style two bedroom house. The property is situated to the south of the city in the popular residential area of Belmont. This property is ideal for first time buyers, people who are looking to downsize and investors. Belmont hosts a varie..."
" Convenient central location an impressive over 60's retirement apartment with spacious lounge/dining room, one double bedroom, excellent decorative order. No onward chain! "
"Williams Estate Agents offer this very well presented, two bedroom, modern terraced house in Belmont. Double glazed, centrally heated, modern kitchen and bathroom, rear garden with decked area and feature wooden covered pergola. Viewing recommended! EPC - D ( CHECK OUT THE VIDEO TOUR) Located..."
"Located in the popular location of bobblestock, a two bedroom mid terraced property which benefits from kitchen, lounge-dining room, conservatory and allocated parking space."
"ANDREW MORRIS offer for sale this three bedroom, end-terrace house with garage located just 1.5 miles south-west of Hereford city centre. | HALL | LIVING ROOM | KITCHEN / DINING ROOM | CLOAKROOM WC | THREE BEDROOMS | BATHROOM | GARDENS | GARAGE |"
"Offered For Sale With Tenants In Situ, A well presented three bedroom end terraced house offering ideal family accommodation. The property benefits from no onward chain, two reception rooms, good sized rear garden and to fully appreciate this property we highly recommend a viewing."
" Superb third floor apartment within easy reach of the city with 2 bedrooms, pleasant outlook, exclusive retirement complex, extensive on-site amenities. Viewing advised."
"A well presented two bedroom mid terraced house is situated in a popular residential location in North West Hereford.The property comprises of entrance hall, living room, kitchen/diner, rear porch, bathroom and two bedrooms.Additional benefits include gas heating, rear garden and..."
"A pleasingly spacious two-bedroom apartment featuring remarkable views of the river and Hereford Cathedral. This lovely top-floor apartment features high ceilings throughout the accommodation and includes a welcoming hallway, an open-plan kitchen/living/dining room, two double bedrooms and a bat..."
" A Charming 2 Bedroom Victorian Cottage, full of character features and including off-road parking, set back from the road in Lower Bullingham, Hereford. Entry Lobby – Downstairs WC – Utility Closet – Sitting Room – Kitchen – Under-Stairs Storage – 2 Bedroo..."
" Modern terraced house in popular residential location, 2 bedrooms, gas central heating, double glazing, parking, garden. "
"FOR SALE BY AUCTION ON 9th February at 12:00 £185,000 PLUS A FLYING FREEHOLD FORMER PLACE OF WORSHIP"
Bungalow | Mid Terraced | Two Bedrooms | Living/Dining Room | Kitchen | Shower Room | Courtyard | Off Road Parking | No Onward Chain | Double Glazing | EPC TBC Set in a small and quiet cul de sac to the west of the city centre this terraced bungalow is offered on to the market with no onward cha...
An End of Terrace House in Need of Modernisation and Updating | 3 Bedrooms | Living Room | Dining Room | Kitchen | Utility Room | Bathroom with Separate WC | Enclosed Rear Garden | On Street Parking | Gas Heating | Double Glazing | No Onward Chain
'Located within walking distance of central Hereford a two bedroom inner terrace house which has the benefit of a modern gas fired central heating system and replacement double glazed windows. Garden and garage.'
"In need of modernisation and is being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN this mid terraced home is located within walking distance of a bus service, public house and schooling. The Cathedral City of Hereford offers a wide range of educational, recreational and shopping amenities."
"Trivett Hicks is pleased to offer this generous two bedroom town house situated in Hereford city. The property has recently had brand new carpets, underlay, new vinyl flooring to the kitchen, bathroom and cloakroom. The residence has also just been decorated throughout. The accommodation offer..."
" Retirement bungalow on exclusive development with 2 bedrooms, electric heating, double glazing, site manager. Over 60's."
Two bedroom first floor apartment | located in a popular position within walking distance of the city | Telephone entry system & private hallway | Allocated secure parking | Open plan living room & two bedrooms with built in wardrobes | Currently tenanted but available to all
A Well Presented Third Floor Apartment | Views Over the City Centre | Living Room | Kitchen | 2 Bedrooms | Bathroom | Allocated Parking Space | Double Glazing | No Onward Chain
"** COMING TO THE MARKET ** Soon to be available to view, this two bedroom mid terraced home is offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Comprising two bedrooms, bathroom, kitchen, lounge dining space and a rear garden with allocated off road parking, we highly recommend viewing!"
"Trivett Hicks is pleased to offer this generous two bedroom town house situated in Hereford city. The property has been recently decorated throughout and offers spacious accommodation with some character features. The accommodation offers in more detail, living room/diner, fitted kitchen to the..."
"'Located near to Bobblestock's amenities, an inner terrace house with two well proportioned bedrooms which is in need of some refitting and upgrading, with rear garden and garage.'"
" 2 bedroom apartment with fitted kitchen, gas central heating, garden, allocated parking space. No onward chain. Ideal for investment. "
Situated to the South side of the river this semi-detached home is being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN and is in need of work throughout but is a very spacious inside and out. Call Connells now to book an early viewing to avoid disappointment.
" Popular residential location a one bedroom end terrace house with good sized rear garden, gas central heating, double glazing. Ideal for first time buyer or investment. No onward chain"
" Highly sought-after location a well maintained retirement apartment with 2 bedrooms, lounge, breakfast-kitchen, gas central heating, double glazing. Must be viewed!! "
" Popular location close to local amenities an elegant Victorian upper floor apartment with 2 bedrooms, garage and off-road parking. Viewing highly recommended."
This well presented back to back one bedroom house is located in a popular residential area on the Southern fringes of Hereford City and within walking distance of local amenities.
"An Exclusive Development of4 Apartments with Individual RoofGardens at 55 Commercial Street (Formerly A Natwest Bank) Hereford, HR1 2DJ Management Company Ground Rent/ Maintain Costs tba. ServicesMains water and drainage, and mains electricity with individual electric heating systems withe..."
"A very well presented two double bedroom middle terraced home which benefits from double glazing, recently fitted bathroom, storage heaters and gardens with hardstanding on front garden. Located to the South West of the city with excellent local facilities in nearby Belmont. Directions: Le..."
"Conveniently located being 1.5 miles from Hereford, a two bedroom, mid terrace property. A low maintenance garden, verandah, storage sheds and inside featuring fitted kitchen/diner, lounge and front garden."
" A Beautifully Presented 1 Bedroom End-Terrace House, with off-road parking and private front gardens, all set in the popular area of Bobblestock, Hereford. Open Plan Ground Floor: Kitchen/Dining/Sitting Room – Pantry Cupboard Storage – Double Bedroom – Boiler Cupboard/Wardr..."
"NO CHAIN Trivett Hicks is pleased to offer this two bedroom well presented apartment situated and ideally located for the city of Hereford, which provides many amenities. The accommodation in brief comprises hall, open plan living room/fitted kitchen with integrated appliance's, two..."
" Highly sought-after location a charming top floor apartment with large living space and separate kitchen, 2 bedrooms, wealth of character, ideal for 1st time buyers! "
A Well Presented Mid Terrace House | One Double Bedrooms | Open Plan Living/ Kitchen | Off Road Parking | Gas Heating | Rear Garden | Modern Bathroom | Ideal FTB / Investors | Viewing Recommended | No Onward Chain
"This wonderful top floor apartment has been finished to a high standard throughout. Located to the South side of Hereford this lovely home is perfect for first time buyers looking to get onto the property ladder, Call now to book an early viewing to avoid disappointment."
"'Set within the prestigious Rose Garden community a purpose built development which offers a wealth of amenities and facilities, a well proportioned second floor one bedroom apartment with private balcony'"
"Trivett Hicks are pleased to offer this one bedroom home, which is situated in the area of Lower Bullingham, south of Hereford city. The property would benefit from some improvement. The accommodation briefly comprises of entrance hall, open plan living room, fitted kitchen all to the g..."
" Victorian terraced house in popular residential location with 2 bedrooms, enclosed gardens, requires modernisation and renovation. No onward chain. "
"A very well presented two bedroom detached park home set on this popular residential development, to the North West of the city. The property benefits from central heating, double glazing, a lovely kitchen/ breakfast room, recently fitted boiler, off road parking and gardens with off road parking..."
"IDEAL FIRST TIME OR INVESTMENT PURCHASE! This well presented, first floor one bedroom apartment sits in the popular area of St James and is within walking distance of the City centre. Further features include, original windows and one allocated parking space. SOLD WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN."
"'Located in a cul-de-sac to the west of central Hereford, a well presented one bedroom first floor flat, which is centrally heated and double glazed with parking and garden.'"
"Great buy to let or first time buyer opportunity. This Well-presented, Two Bedroom first floor apartment benefits from an open plan Kitchen, Living & Dining Room, Shower Room, allocated parking space, private Garden area and 101 years left remaining on the lease plus no charge to extend the..."
"A two bedroom detached park home set on this popular residential development, to the North West of the city. The property benefits from central heating, double glazing, a new kitchen, boiler and shower room, off road parking and gardens. The property is subject to usual site rules.Over 50's O..."
"City Centre - Available NOW This well-presented one bedroom top floor apartment is ideally situated within the heart of Hereford City, a stones throw away from a wide range of shops, restaurants, bars, as well as Hereford County Hospital."
"City CentreThis well-presented one bedroom first floor apartment is ideally situated within the heart of Hereford City, a stones throw away from a wide range of shops, restaurants, bars, as well as Hereford County Hospital."
"A second floor, one double bedroom apartment located in a popular retirement development near Hereford city centre. Benefiting from communal rooms, gardens and parking.  | HALL | LOUNGE & DINING ROOM | KITCHEN | BEDROOM | SHOWER ROOM | COMMUNAL GARDENS & PARKING |"
Top Floor Apartment | Beautifully Presented | One Bedroom | Outstanding Views | Parking | Open Plan Living | Walking Distance to Hereford City Centre | Sold with No Onward Chain
"The swift is a wonderful semi-detached home which is being sold at a 40% share ownership. The Paddocks is our latest collection of new homes, built by Bromford and located in the civil parish of Herefordshire. Surrounded by green fields, but with easy access to a useful range of local amenities."
"'A third floor, purpose built retirement apartment in central location and in a position from which a westerly view is enjoyed. The property accommodation includes a living room, fitted kitchen, double bedroom and bathroom room along with ample storage. Communal garden areas and shared parkin..."
"FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCTION - GUIDE PRICE £120,000 - £150,000. 2 Guildford Street is a two bedroom end terrace town house, The property does require some improvements however has the benefit of a rear garden and is in close proximity to Hereford city centre. No chain"
"IDEAL PROPERTY FOR INVESTORS. A one bedroom ground floor apartment that is situated on the edge of Hereford's City Centre. The property has open plan kitchen and living space and would be ideal for first time buyers, buyers looking to downsize and be close to amenities and also investment buy..."
The Good Estate Agent is proud to offer this great one bedroom apartment to the market. Viewing is highly recommended!
"A two bedroom Park Home measuring at 28"" x 20"" (8.53m x 6.09m) offering retirement accommodation on a popular site located just 2 miles west of Hereford's city centre.  | LOUNGE DINER | KITCHEN BREAKFAST ROOM | TWO BEDROOMS | BATHROOM | GARDENS | PARKING |"
"Located south of Hereford City centre, part of the Low Cost Housing Scheme. A beautifully presented, two bedroom ground floor apartment. The property benefits from open plan living, including recently fitted kitchen, two bedrooms, bathroom and allocated parking space. "
"A two bedroom ground floor apartment which benefits from double glazing, modern kitchen and is available on the low cost housing scheme of 70% market value. Directions: Head South on Ross Road, proceeding until turning left in to Bullingham Lane. Take the 2nd exit on the roundabout then the f..."
"'Located on the established Brook Farm Court retirement development, a ground floor two bedroom apartment which is presented in good order throughout, with modern kitchen and wet room.'"
"Within the grounds of former small country house estate EXCEPTIONAL SMALL BUILDING PLOT with long frontage to the private driveway of the original Estate. The Gatehouse, Graftonbury Court, Grafton Lane, Hereford HR2 8FA. Any house to be built on this rather unique shaped plot wi..."
"The Swallow is a wonderful semi-detached home which is being sold at a 40% share ownership. The Paddocks is our latest collection of new homes, built by Bromford and located in the civil parish of Herefordshire. Surrounded by green fields, but with easy access to a useful range of local amenities."
"TO BE OFFERED BY ONLINE AUCTION ON THE 15/03/2023 11:00 - One bedroom vacant semi-detached back to back house
The property compromises a one bedroom vacant semi-detached back to back house that requires refurbishment."
"Building plot formerly Graftonbury Gate House, for sale with outline planning for a 2 bedroom detached dwelling. Ideally lends itself to a self-build"
" First floor flat, one bedroom, gas central heating, double glazing. No onward chain. Investors only. "
" Sold via Secure Sale Online Bidding – Terms & Conditions Apply – Starting Bid: £80,000 A Recently Converted Modern First Floor Apartment, set within an iconic building in Hereford City Centre. The central location offers easy access to shops, restaurants, hospital and trans..."
"In a popular residential location, this second floor apartment is offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN. With a potential to achieve over 7% Yield as an investment, and a perfect buying opportunity for first time buyers! Call Connells today to book a viewing!"
"A Recently Converted Modern First Floor Apartment, set within an iconic building in Hereford City Centre. The central location offers easy access to shops, restaurants, hospital and transport links such as the Bus and Railway Station. All Offered With No Onward Chain. Entrance Hall – Open Plan..."
"Offers Invited on this Retirement accommodation for over 55's, within close proximity to Hereford City Centre. A well presented one bedroom ground floor apartment with no onward chain. The property comprises of entrance hall with airing cupboard, bedroom, bathroom, lounge, and modern kitchen. Do..."
"'Conveniently located close to the city centre, a one bedroom ground floor flat, which is in need of a schedule of refitting and upgrading works. Garden area and parking space.'"
Reversionary FREEHOLD INTEREST ONLY. Subject to long Leases of three separately owned flats
"Student portfolio comprising 21 Freehold Houses and Flats in multiple occupation Comprising 109 bedrooms in a mix of 4, 5 and 6 bedroom terraced houses and 1, 2, and 3 bedrooms flats Currently advertised as student accommodation and let to students Contracted Rent: £373..."
"Opportunity to acquire 93.13 acres (37.69 hectares) thereabouts of land in a single block situated on the edge of the urban fringe of the City of Kingston Upon Hull, East Yorkshire. The land has been in arable production but it is considered it holds long term 'hope value' for alternative uses, i..."
"Offering a prominent West Ella Road position upon a 0.55 acre plot, is this detached family property complete with private South facing gardens. Built in the classic Alma Jordan style and retaining a wealth of 1930’s features internal viewing is highly advised to appreciate the opportuni..."
"An eye-catching 4 bedroom detached farmhouse with a range of stables, outbuildings and land. This property has recently undergone a scheme of renovation by the current owners. The spacious accommodation comprises entrance lobby, cloakroom, kitchen and dining area with a log burning stove, dinin..."
"Offers Over £750,000- AN EXCITING REFURBISHMENT OPPORTUNITY IN THE CENTRE OF THE VILLAGE ON NEARLY HALF AN ACRE CLOSE TO THE GOLF COURSE"
"HIDDEN GEM - A totally unique detached residence built in the late 1980's located on a mature well kept plot of approximately 0.46 acres and accessed via a private drive off Main Street, Willerby. Best described as unusually shaped this delightful property has been designed in such a ma..."
"A truly unique detached house in delightful grounds of approx. 0.3 acre with a sunny south facing aspect! Significantly extended and immaculately presented, the property has a great deal of character and many period features together with an extensive and flexible layout which could afford a grou..."
"Significantly enhanced detached family home, close to the village centre, opposite Hull Golf Club and with fields to the rear. Many attractive features including a formal lounge. Contemporary open plan kitchen/dining/living area, 2 ensuite bedrooms and a fabulous long rear garden. Viewing rec..."
"Offers invited in the region of £640,000 to £670,000 STANDING ON A SUPERB SOUTH FACING PLOT APPROACHING QUARTER OF AN ACRE AGUABLY THE MOST DESIRABLE LOCATION IN THE REGION TASTEFULLY FINISHED AND VASTLY EXTENDED"
"Inviting Offers Between £590,000-£620,000"
"FABULOUS WEST ELLA LOCATION, this lovely FIVE BEDROOM family home offers GREAT POTENTIAL with well established, sizeable and private WEST FACING rear garden. Some selective modernisation and remodelling would create a fantastic home in this most desirable area. This could be a wonderful family h..."
"Situated within the delightful village setting of West Ella is this lovely four bedroomed detached home. Forming part of an exclusive development, the property is tucked away off West Ella Road. Generous accommodation with three reception rooms, kitchen & utility, four double bedrooms, two en-s..."
"Located in the beautiful village of Kirk Ella, The Watchmaker features a detached double garage, open-plan kitchen/dining/family area with bi-fold doors, utility room, study, plus five double bedrooms with en-suites to bedroom 1 and 2."
"Imposing detached family home with four double fitted bedrooms, two bathrooms, spacious lounge, study/family room, bespoke kitchen and conservatory. Stunning gardens and integral garage - make this the top of your viewing list."
"Inviting offers between £525,000 & £535,000"
"Introducing the Kettlewell, a spacious new home featuring a detached double garage, open-plan kitchen/dining/family area with bi-fold doors to the rear garden, a dedicated study, utility plus an en-suite to both bedroom 1 and 2"
TRULY OUTSTANDING FOUR BED DETACHED HOME - FINISHED TO THE HIGHEST STANDARD - SUPERBLY EXTENDED - HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER KIRK ELLA LOCATION - OFF STREET PARKING AND INTEGRAL DOUBLE GARAGE Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this outstanding four bedroom family home. Si...
"PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE AND £14,700 MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION* INCLUDES SHOW HOME STYLE INTERIOR! It won't be around for long, as not only does it have a GREAT LOCATION, it has A BEAUTIFUL FLOW from the entrance hall into one of our most STUNNING KITCHENS!"
"*Rarely available* Completely renovated and bursting with character and beautiful period features is this stunning residence, one of Sutton-on-Hull's most unique homes! Comprehensively and sympathetically refurbished the accommodation extends to well over 2800 sq feet and is fit for modern living."
"SUCH A BEAUTIFUL HOME! This STUNNING and individual detached house has been SIGNIFICANTLY EXTENDED and is complimented by a superb SOUTH FACING garden. Features include 2 lovely reception rooms, breakfast kitchen, 2 ENSUITE bedrooms and a stylish bathroom. A twin resin driveway provides ..."
"Situated in a tucked away cul-de-sac off Carr Lane this wonderful detached residence sits on a generous plot and offers flexible and generous accommodation throughout. Presented to the highest of standards both internally and externally, making this property a magnificent family home. B..."
"Inviting Offers Between £480,000 - £520,000 THIS UNIQUE PROPERTY WITHIN THE SOUTHFIELD CONSERVATION AREA PROVIDES VERSATILE ACCOMMODATION TO INCLUDE A NEWLY DEVELOPED SELF-CONTAINED ANNEX"
 Wow! What a property! Don't miss out on this rare opportunity! With 3 bedrooms to the main house and 3 bedrooms to the Annex! Fab location with breath-taking views! House speaks for its self so must view! 
"These white fronted Alma Jordan traditional semis are such a beautiful local landmark. Owned for over 40 years which truly speaks volumes! With two receptions, modern breakfast kitchen and downstairs w.c. There are FOUR bedrooms and house bathroom with separate w.c. Large SOUTH facing beauti..."
"***SAVE £18,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Lorimer features an integral garage, open-plan kitchen/dining/family area with adjoining utility and french doors to the rear garden, plus an en-suite to bedroom 1 & 2. "
"Inviting Offers Between £380,000 -£400,000 Check out the video to fully appreciate this masterpiece!"
"An absolutely stunning 4 bedroom detached family home which has been the subject of a well-planned, high end refurbishment program in recent years. The property has been extended to the rear with added features such as bi-folding doors to the mainly lawned, south facing rear garden and an oranger..."
"Attractively presented, beautifully laid out, highly specified family house in quiet cul-de-sac location."
"* FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS * A superlative detached dormer bungalow which provides an excellent range of spacious accommodation which stands in a very good sized plot, close to Anlaby's amenities. Comprehensively remodelled with features including a fabulous open plan living kitchen, large lounge, en..."
" ***NO CHAIN***Check out this fantastic 5 bedroom detached property! With lots of potential this property could make an amazing family home. Briefly offering entrance hall, study, lounge, sitting room, 2 kitchens, cloakroom, dining room and bathroom to the first floor. Individual 5 bedrooms, en-..."
"The Sandringham is a 4-bedroom home that offers an open-plan kitchen, dining and family area with adjacent utility room, a living room, study and cloakroom to the ground floor. On the first floor, bedroom 1 boasts an en-suite shower room. Complete with a detached double garage."
"It won't be around for long, as not only does it have a GREAT LOCATION, it has A BEAUTIFUL FLOW from the entrance hall into one of our most STUNNING KITCHENS with so much NATURAL LIGHT."
"Includes interior design package over £22,000UPGRADE WITH PART EXCHANGE!! It's all about SPACE & STORAGE here. We give you FOUR GOOD SIZED bedrooms and even have an EN SUITE to the master bedroom. The layout downstairs has a great flow and you will definitely want to show off your KITCHEN/DINER"
IMMACULATELY APPOINTED LIFESTYLE HOME WITH ESTUARY VIEWS. An impressive and executive-style Detached House forming part of this desirable Victoria Dock development. Having undergone a full programme of modernisation and upgrade internally with attention to detail evident throughout. 
"A TRULY AMAZING PROPERTY ! This fabulously stylish and spacious detached three storey ""New York Style Apartment"" offers numerous architectural features including an ""Infinity Atrium Staircase"" and superb second floor Sun Terrace offering a large ""alfresco"" living space. Interesting design concept..."
" Presenting this rare opportunity to the market! This fabulous detached property is full of unique features including secret doorways throughout! Located in the popular Avenues conservation area down Park Avenue, facilities are a stones throw away, public transport and local amenities are withi..."
"Offers invited in the region of £425,000 - £455,000 A FANTASTIC LIFESTYLE PROPERTY DISCREETLY TUCKED AWAY DOWN A LONG PRIVATE ROAD YET ON THE DOORSTEP OF WILLERBY'S EXCELLENT AMENITIES"
An ideal opportunity has arisen for the growing family seeking to upsize into a home situated in the highly sought-after Kirk Ella village which is renowned for its proximity to highly accessible transport links that connect to the city centre/surrounding West Hull villages along with local leisu...
"This deceptively spacious double fronted detached property occupies an envious position on the corner of Anlaby road and Anlaby Park Road South, set back from the road with a wrap around garden in this much sought after location. The main features include, large entrance with stained gla..."
"It's got the lot. Five bedroom luxury, double integral garage, imposing street presence and the drama of the master suite opening out onto a glass balcony. A very special home."
"The Alder is an elegant family home with four double bedrooms, including a dressing area and en-suite shower room to bedroom 1, plus an integral garage, open-plan kitchen/dining/family area with french doors to the rear garden, utility room and living room with bay window. "
"Inviting Offers Between £410,000-£425,000 THIS VASTLY EXTENDED PROPERTY HAS BEEN THE SUBJECT OF CONSIDERABLE INVESTMENT PROVIDING A SUPERB FAMILY LIFESTYLE"
"We are delighted to offer to the market this well presented detached home situated in a quiet residential cul-de-sac off Jenny Brough Lane within a popular development. This beautiful home briefly comprises an entrance hall, cloaks/W.C, living room, dining room, conservatory and a very ..."
"The popular Bradgate's modern open-plan layout is perfect for growing families. Discover a light and spacious lounge with a bay window, a great space for all the family to relax. Enjoy the open-plan kitchen with breakfast bar, dining and French doors open to the garden. There's also a separate s..."
"The popular Bradgate's modern open-plan layout is perfect for growing families. Discover a light and spacious lounge with a bay window, a great space for all the family to relax. Enjoy family meals in the open-plan kitchen with breakfast bar, dining and family areas. A walk in bay makes this roo..."
Occupying A Corner Plot This Extended Detached House Offering Ideal Family Accommodation With The Added Attraction Of No Chain Involved So Early Viewing Advised
"**GUIDE PRICE 400,000 - 425,000** ** STUNNING FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED WITH DOUBLE GARAGE ** We are delighted to present this beautiful family home located in the sought after location of Hessle.  Overlooking the Green space and play park. With off street parking, close to local amenit..."
"Don't miss out on your chance to own this superb detached family home in West Hull, overlooking the picturesque Pickering Park. Originally built in 1922, the property has retained many of its original features, whilst benefitting from sympathetic contemporary upgrades. Boasting four fantastic ..."
"A well presented 1 bedroom first floor flat within this purpose built development located between the extensive facilities of Springfield Way and the open fields at Anlaby Common. The property will suit a wide range of buyers including those looking to downsize, first time buyers or an investor. ..."
"Lot 3 - Live Stream Auction 28th February 2023 - OPEN VIEWING 14th Feb - 14.30 - 16.00 - Around 6,415 sq ft - Full PP & LB consent - Conversion into 8 apartments - 6 x 2 bed, 1 x 1 bed , 1 x studio - Buyers fee £750 + VAT"
"STUNNING FIVE BED EXECUTIVE DETACHED HOUSE! This pristine, modern home is a true credit to its owners! Immaculately presented to the the highest of standards throughout! Much improved and updated by the long term owners, to offer five bedrooms, Master with En-suite luxurious bathroom,..."
"This simply fabulous detached bungalow has been brought to market with no forward chain! With a good size plot and West facing garden, the property has in excess of 1,400 square feet of well presented accommodation. With two reception rooms, breakfast kitchen, utility and THREE bedrooms, house ..."
"A rare opportunity! Tucked away in the centre of the beautiful village conservation area is this very spacious 3 bedroom home, complete with sunny walled garden and a garage. Only linked to its neighbour through a bedroom wall, this lovely home is ideal for those looking for ease of maintenan..."
Located in such a convenient position. This superb semi-detached house provides particularly spacious accommodation of great character with modern fittings. Beautifully appointed with 4 reception rooms and 4 bedrooms. Excellent parking and garage. Lovely garden to rear.
FEATURING AN INCREDIBLE EXTENSION!* This impressive three bedroom family home (plus loft space) is very rarely available and is situated in the heart of the Garden Village Conservation Area. This Property has had a full professional refurbishment completed in 2020.
"This fine period semi detached house is ready to move straight into having undergone a comprehensive refurbishment which has created a stunning family home. Stylishly presented, the property has been redecorated and new flooring/carpets fitted throughout plus upgraded electrics, new roof, new rad..."
"IMMACULATE FOUR BED AVENUES PROPERTY - BURSTING WITH STYLE, CHARACTER, CHARM AND ORIGINAL PERIOD FEATURES - OFF STREET PARKING Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this beautiful end terraced home. Located on the highly sought after and prestigious Victoria Avenue,..."
"Introducing the Hambleton, a beautiful 4 bedroom detached home featuring a detached single garage, an open-plan kitchen, family and dining area with adjacent utility room, a living room, dedicated study and an en-suite to bedroom 1. "
"Introducing the forever home in arguably one of the most coveted Cul de sac positions in the popular Victoria Dock location! Offering in excess of a whopping 170sq meters of living space!Including 3 reception rooms, four double bedrooms, two bathrooms, a double Garage and a spectacular view! "
"***Guide Price £390,000- £410,000 plus Reservation Fee***
"
"This immaculate four bed detached property was built by reputable builders David Wilson Homes in 2018, meaning that it still benefits from some of its 10 year warranty available, giving any buyer the piece of mind the property is still covered, and ready to move straight into and enjoy. ..."
"A stunning five bedroom detached property in the sought-after Clear View Close just off Saltshouse Road. With beautiful views of the golf course from the rear garden, industrial grade laminate flooring, large garage, stylish sun room extension, and driveway with access for many vehicles. Ready to..."
"**Save up to £12,000 through our Mortgage Assist!** Receive FREE Flooring** OPEN PLAN Kitchen/ Dining Area with Integrated Appliances, UTILITY & French Doors to the Rear Garden. Separate Lounge, Downstairs WC & Store to Hall. Master Bedroom with EN-SUITE, Single GARAGE & Off-street Parking"
"Introducing The Acacia, a beautiful new home featuring an open-plan kitchen, dining and family area with adjacent utility room, integral garage, french doors opening out to the rear garden plus two en-suites to bedroom 1 and 2. "
*** MANY UPGRADES & ENCHANCEMENTS FROM NEW *** Executive style detached residence situated on the recently constructed Beal Homes site in the sought after Village of Kirk Ella. The property which is the Beal Homes 'Haxby' design has been superbly presented and improved by the p...
"The spacious and luxurious Radleigh offers plenty of room for all of the family. Downstairs, the welcoming lounge is ideal for relaxing in, whereas the separate study is the perfect place to keep remote working separate from the rest of the home. For those who like to entertain, the open-plan k..."
"PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE AND £11,100 MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION* It's all about SPACE & STORAGE here. We give you FOUR GOOD SIZED bedrooms and even have an EN SUITE to the master bedroom. Lots of room for you to grow into. The layout downstairs has a great flow."
Homes Estates are delighted to offer to the market this superb property which is arranged to three floors. The property is set well back from the road with an attractive leafy tree lined lawned divid...
"This beautiful executive detached home is situated on the prestigious Brooklands development, a quiet residential community of self-build properties that are rarely available. Boasting spacious rooms throughout, the hub of the home is at the rear of the house with a huge open plan moder..."
"LOVELY TWO BED TERRACED - MODERN THROUGHOUT - LARGE BATHROOM - PERFECT FOR FIRST TIME BUYER/INVESTOR Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this lovely two bedroom, mid-terrace property. Situated on Edgecumbe Street near Newland Avenue, this property is well placed for..."
"Situated on a secluded plot in Hessle whilst maintaining proximity to the local leisure facilities and amenities the village is renowned for, this four bedroom detached home is ideal for the growing family seeking to fall into the catchment area of the prestigious local schools. The pro..."
"A opportunity has arisen to purchase this extremely well presented three bedroom detached true bungalow, situated on a generous and substantial plot and located in the popular and desirable location of Anlaby. The property has the benefit of gas central heating, double glazing, briefly comprises ..."
A GREAT OPPORTUNITY! Standing in a plot of approx 0.43 acre on the west side of Elveley Drive is this detached bungalow in need of refurbishment or ripe for extension/remodelling (subject to appropriate permissions). Currently with 4 bedrooms and there is a double garage.
STUNNING 4 BED SEMI OPEN PLAN LIVING KITCHEN. SOUTH FACING GARDEN. SUCH A CONVENIENT LOCATION. Viewing is a must of this fabulous family home in the heart of Anlaby Centre.
"BEAUTIFUL FOUR BED DETACHED HOME - FINISHED TO THE HIGHEST STANDARD - HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER KIRK ELLA LOCATION - OFF STREET PARKING AND INTEGRAL GARAGE - NO ONWARDS CHAIN! Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this outstanding four bedroom, fully renovated detached home..."
This grand four bedroom semi-detached family home situated in a highly desirable area of Hessle.
"RETAIL SHOP & FOUR FULLY-TENANTED, TWO-BEDROOM FLATS // SPRING BANK, HU3 1BH // INVESTMENT PROPERTY YIELDING 8%"
"Stunning bay fronted semi-detached with superb living kitchen to the rear and westerly facing rear garden. Beautifully appointed accommodation including an entrance hall, lounge, open plan living kitchen, utility room, cloaks/W.C., three bedrooms and bathroom. Excellent parking to the front and..."
***AN EXCEPTIONAL THREE BED DETACHED BUNGALOW/FAMILY HOME - HOLDERNESS HIGH ROAD LOCATION - STUNNING AND READY TO MOVE INTO - BE QUICK TO VIEW!!!!***
"AVENUES accommodation on a grand scale, this exceptionally well-maintained terraced property provides a UNIQUE OPPORTUNITY and invites the closest inspection. Currently providing 9 letting rooms on a ..."
"28 HARTSHOLME PARK IN EVER POPULAR KINGSWOOD, IS FABULOUS, NOT ONLY ARE THERE SIX (YES 6) BEDROOMS, BUT THIS DELIGHTFUL HOME COMES WITH A LARGE CONSERVATORY OPENING FROM THE OVERSIZED KITCHEN/DINER/FAMILY ROOM. Originally the show home, with many upgraded features. Be the envy of your friends w..."
"**Save up to £12,000 through our Mortgage Assist!** Receive FREE Flooring** Open Plan Kitchen/ Family Room with French doors to rear garden, UTILITY Area and Downstairs Cloakroom. Spacious Lounge with French Doors leading through to the Kitchen, EN-SUITE to Master Bedroom, INTEGRAL GARAGE"
New to the market is this beautifully presented five bedroom detached property situated in the sought after location of Kingswood. The property is perfectly placed for easy access to plenty of local amenities including reputable primary and secondary schools and has fantastic public transport and...
"What a truly stunning detached house! Check out this exceptional property in such a highly regarded residential area. The property enjoys Entrance Hallway, Lounge and Dining room off, Conservatory, modern fitted Kitchen, rear Lobby with WC off, outdoor Utility Room. To the first floor the land..."
"You could simply turn the key, move in and thoroughly embrace living in what is a truly exceptional property. Three reception rooms, modern kitchen, three bedrooms, first floor bathroom - this property ticks all the boxes and early viewing is a must."
"A unique opportunity has arisen for the growing family wishing to procure a sizeable four bedroom property in the highly sought after Willerby village. Benefitting from close proximity to leisure facilities, local amenities and prestigious schools , all of which are connected to highly accessible..."
Old Town Three Storey Home With Roof Terrace And No Forward Chain Ideal Air B and B/Business Downstairs and Great For City Living Steeped In History Rarely Available Set On A Quiet Cobbled Street Within A Short Walk of Attractions and The City Centre Large Living Spaces and Th...
"SIX ONE-BEDROOM FLATS // FULLY TENANTED, TWO BUILDINGS // HOLDERNESS ROAD, HU8 7NE"
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £350,000 - £370,000 IMMACULATELY PRESENTED THIS FOUR-BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME ALL NEWLY RENOVATED THROUGHOUT GOOD AS NEW FINISHED TO AN EXTREMELY HIGH SPECIFICATION MUST BE SEEN TO BE BELIEVED NO ONWARD CHAIN"
"Detached Bungalow In Anlaby with - Entrance Porch, Entrance Hall, Lounge, Fitted Kitchen, 3 Bedrooms ( Master With En Suite), Family Bathroom, Gardens, Off Street Parking & Garage! - Call today to book your viewing!"
"GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £360,000 Wonderful Home In Kirk Ella with - Entrance Hall, Lounge, Dining Room, Family Room, Fitted Kitchen, 4 Bedrooms, Family Bathroom & Ground Floor Cloakroom, Gardens, Off Street Parking & Garage! - Book your viewing now!"
"Located In This Popular Part Of Kingswood, This Modern Three Storey Detached House Offers Ideal Family Accommodation"
"Beautiful Home In Willerby with - Entrance Porch, Entrance Hall, Lounge, Dining Area, Sitting Area, Kitchen/Diner, 4 Bedrooms, Family Bathroom & Ground Floor Cloakroom, Lovely Gardens, Garage & Off Street Parking - Call to book your viewing now!"
"WOW just check out this immense plot. With a good size garden, driveway to the front, three bedrooms, first floor wet room and scope for extension subject to planning this property really does offer a lot of potential to which an early viewing is a must."
No Onward Chain! This TRULY UNIQUE four bed semi detached house stands on the western side of the HIGHLY DESIRABLE Elms Drive and enjoys a BEAUTIFUL GARDEN to the rear bounded by a FEATURE BRICK WALL. There are 2 reception rooms and a loft room also which provides plenty of space and flexibility...
"Stunning Home In Anlaby In Excess Of 1400 Sq Ft With - Entrance Hall, Reception Hall, Lounge, Sitting Area, Conservatory, Fitted Kitchen, Utility Room, 4 Bedrooms, Family Bathroom & Cloakroom, Gardens, Workshop, Garage & Off Street Parking - Book your viewing now!"
"PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE AND £10,380 MORTGAGE CONTRIBUTION* A STYLISH three-bedroomed home, The Dalby raises the standard on NEW BUILD living. Move through the WELCOMING entrance hall and into the generous, LIGHT living space. "
"It won't be around for long, as not only does it have a GREAT LOCATION, it has A BEAUTIFUL FLOW from the entrance hall into one of our most STUNNING KITCHENS."
If you are looking for an Avenues property with charm and character and many original features this property will be perfect for you. The current owners have managed a successful blend of the ori...
"IMMACULATELY PRESENTED, this stunning modern detached house is ready to move straight into! Part of this recent prestigious development and with MANY EXTRAS INCLUDED, this lovely home must be viewed. Features include a SUPERB OPEN PLAN DINING KITCHEN with doors out to the garden, utility, downsta..."
"When you list a property which has been owned for over 60 years by the same family, this truly has to be the best advert that one could ever read! This detached 1930's true bungalow has 2/3 bedrooms, good sized garden, side driveway and garage, and offers so much scope to redevelop and provide no..."
"Lovelle are delighted to offer for sale this FANTASTIC family home on the popular Summergroves development. This house has it all! FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS, en-suite and dressing area to the Principal, FOUR PIECE FAMILY BATHROOM, FOUR RECEPTION ROOMS, ground floor WC, high gloss Kitchen, spacious ..."
"A delightful four bedroom semi detached family home, which has been vastly extended over the years and is a credit to it's current owner. The property is situated on a good size plot and offer an amazing and manicured south westerly rear garden. The property is situated in a lovely cul de sac loc..."
Standing in a sought after cul-de-sac of Dunston Drive in the popular West Side of Hessle off Ferriby Road is this most appealing and immaculately presented detached house. The property has been significantly enhanced by the current owners and early viewing is recommended. The accommodation boast...
"WOW! This superb, executive five bedroom detached home has the enviable plot at the end of this quiet residential cul-de-sac! Ample off road parking, double garage, this beautifully presented home is in 'move in condition'! Undergone vast improvements by the current owners, the house has thre..."
"Detached bungalow with contemporary fittings. Well planned accommodation with three bedrooms, shower room, en-suite bathroom and a stunning open plan living kitchen. Lovely gardens, driveway and store."
"The Knightsbridge is a detached four-bedroom home with an open-plan kitchen/breakfast/family room as well as separate living and dining rooms and a downstairs WC. Upstairs, bedroom one has its own en suite, the other three bedrooms share the family bathroom and there’s a fitted storage cupboard."
"A lovely extended family detached house, perfectly situated a stone's throw from riverside walkways and access to the bustling Marina and Humber Street. With 4 great bedrooms, the house is ideal for the expanding family or those now working from home. Comprises entrance hall, 2 separate re..."
"A striking five bedroom home spanning three storeys. Quality kitchen dining space and a large lounge with tranquil garden views through not one, but two sets of French doors."
"Beautiful Detached Bungalow In Kirk Ella with - Entrance Porch, Lounge, Kitchen/Diner, Sun Room, 2 Bedrooms, Shower Room, Gardens, Off Street Parking & Garage - Call now to book your viewing as we expect interest to be high!"
"We are proud to present this Five Bedroom Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. *Guide Price £330,000 - £360,000*"
"** Viewing highly recommend **
Location, location, location set in the heart of the ever popular WILLERBY The Property is a link detached bungalow that has been fully refurbished to a very high standard by the present owner with no expense spared. The property has under floor heating throughou..."
"An excellent four bedroom detached home, with large private driveway, offering well-designed family accommodation of the highest quality. Occupying a superb plot with a well-screened garden to the rear which is perfect for entertaining with outdoor summer house & hot tub. This beau..."
"*INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY*GUIDE £330,000 to £360,000*SIX 2 BED 2 BATH UNITS AVAILABLE*PORTFOLIO FOR SALE OR CAN BE SOLD SEPARATELY*MODERN & WELL-MAINTAINED APARTMENTS MANAGED BY SAME AGENT FOR AROUND 15 YEARS*OPEN PLAN LAYOUTS* PARKING*PRODUCING RENTAL INCOME CIRCA £30,600*POTENTIAL TO INCREASE RENTS*"
"OFFERS INVITED BETWEEN £330,000 - £350,000 BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED FIVE BEDROOM THREE STOREY DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN A POPULAR LOCATION - CALL NOW TO AVOID DISAPPOINTMENT"
"Our latest development Parklands brings a selection of stunning three, four and five-bedroom homes to Hessle, a popular town on the banks of the Humber, 20 minutes from Hull.  
With its attractive centre, many independent shops and eateries, and proximity to both Hull and scenic walking..."
"ASSISTED MOVE SCHEMES AVAILABLE. RESERVATIONS BEING TAKEN. A select landscaped development of 5 stunning energy efficient luxury, detached homes in this sought after area. Close to the iconic Malet Lambert School. Sympathetically styled replicating the traditional surrounding area, the prop..."
"A beautiful four-bedroom family home, The Kingsley provides lots of room for all the family and any visiting guests.
The large open-plan kitchen and dining area is the perfect space in which entertain or simply enjoy a family meal, whilst the good size lounge is ideal for relaxing at the end of t..."
"This superb property awaits its new owners and an early viewing is a definite must. With spacious lounge, dining room, fitted modern kitchen, three bedrooms, modern bathroom, parking, garage and well tended rear garden."
The Copenhagen - Beautifully balanced family living. A wide fronted four bedroom detached home with a kitchen dining and family area wraps around you like a warm hug.
"This extended traditional bow fronted semi-detached property which has been improved by the current owners to now include a stunning open plan family / dining / kitchen to the rear overlooking the mature gardens. The accommodation, in this well presented home, briefly comprises: recess p..."
++ EPC GRADE D ++ COUNCIL TAX BAND D ++ DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS TRUE BUNGALOW ++ WITH PLENTY OF OFF STREET PARKING ++ AND PRIVATE GARDENS ++ THERE IS PLENTY OF LIVING SPACE ++ WITH THE ADDED BENEFIT OF A SPACIOUS CONSERVATORY ++ THIS BUNGALOW MUST BE VIEWED TO FULLY APPRECIATE THE ACCOMMODATION ON O...
"Stunning Four Bedroom Home - With Two Bathrooms and an Annex with further Bedroom and Bathroom! Newly Fitted Kitchen High Ceilings, Ornate Ceiling Roses, Beautiful Fireplaces This Property Has Such Flexible Living Accommodation Off Street Parking Wrap Around Garden With D..."
Truly stunning double fronted detached family bungalow with established gardens and presented to the market in top quality order throughout.
"Traditional Semi Detached with generously proportioned accomm including three good sized bedrooms, two bath/shower rooms, two reception rooms, kitchen and cloaks/WC. Excellent parking forecourt. Large Rear Garden and garage. No onward chain!"
"A superb and much improved 5 bedroom detached family home situated on this select cul-de-sac development built by local reputable builder, Scrutons, in 2006. The property provides modern and spacious accommodation over two floors further complimented with private driveway parking and an enclosed ..."
"STUNNING FOUR BED DETACHED HOME - DETACHED GARAGE AND DRIVE - GENEROUS REAR GARDEN - ONLY TWO YEARS OLD - QUIET CUL DE SAC LOCATION Sutton Village has long been one of the most sought after places to live in Hull and this beautiful, four bed, detached family home is perfectly nestled awa..."
"Modern detached house with south facing rear garden. Accomm includes a kitchen and utility, lounge, three good sized bedrooms, bathroom and en-suite. Double width driveway, single garage. Viewing a must!"
*** SIMPLY STUNNING- JUST TAKE A LOOK AND ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING!!!***
"INCLUDES GARAGE CONVERSION! This fantastic 3 bedroom home comes with great features like 3 double bedrooms, family bathroom, and a contemporary OPEN PLAN Kitchen Diner with BI-FOLD doors opening up onto your garden. DONT MISS OUT, CALL TODAY!"
***No Onward Chain*** New to the market is this well presented four bedroom property situated in the heart of Hull close to local amenities including reputable primary and secondary schools and with fantastic public transport and road links both in and out of Hull. The property is arranged ...
"An outstanding example of an idyllic family home situated on the popular Summergroves development. Beautifully presented throughout, the ground floor accommodation boasts a contemporary dining kitchen, three further receptions rooms and a useful utility with WC, to the first floor there are fo..."
"The photos give a hint, but a viewing essential!"
"A stunning modern detached home! Features include a fabulous dining kitchen and a luxurious main bedroom with en-suite. Two further double bedrooms and bathroom with bath and separate shower. Rear garden, excellent parking and garage. Viewing essential!"
"**Save £6,000 through our Mortgage Assist on this home!**Receive FREE Flooring** Open Plan Kitchen/ Dining Area with INTEGRATED APPLIANCES and French Doors to Rear Garden, Separate Lounge, Downstairs WC & Storage cupboard to the Hall. Master Bedroom with EN-SUITE. 2x OFF-STREET PARKING spaces."
"MODERN FAMILY 3/4 BEDROOM HOME WITH OPEN FIELD VIEWS. Built in 2020 this family home for sale offers a well specified interior with a versatile layout to three floor levels. Situated on a quiet cul-de-sac adjoining open fields, The Meadows benefits from excellent local amenities..."
"A fabulous detached family home, located on a quiet cul-de-sac within an ever popular development of Hessle. Upgraded throughout with a stunning dining kitchen, generous living space, utility room and cloakroom all to the ground floor. To the first floor there are three double bedrooms including ..."
"This attractive four bedroom detached property was built in 2018, to modern energy efficiency standards, built with the latest eco-friendly materials making this a cost effective property to run. The main features include; entrance, front lounge, modern open plan fitted kitchen / diner w..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £315,000- £325,000******RARELY AVAILABLE DETACHED PLOT WITH COUNTRYSIDE VIEWS***Lovelle are delighted to offer onto the market, this impressive three bedroom detached home presented in a show home standard throughout! Situated on a superb, private plot ..."
"DELIGHTFUL SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME - THREE BEDROOMS - HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - OFF STREET PARKING - SOUTH FACING GARDEN Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this superb semi detached home, located on the highly desirable Allderidge Avenue, close to well reg..."
"Inviting Offers Between £310,000 - £330,000 INTRODUCING 38 WEELSBY WAY, LOCATED IN THE PEACEFUL AND QUIET AREA OF HESSLE. THIS PROPERTY OFFERS EASY ACCESS TO MOTORWAY LINKS, MAKING IT AN IDEAL LOCATION FOR THOSE WHO COMMUTE REGULARLY."
"Inviting offers between £310,000-£330,000 Welcome to your dream family home! Located in St Anthony's Close, this stunning 4-bedroom property is set on a spacious corner plot, making it the perfect place for you and your loved ones."
Forming part of this flagship city living development at City Exchange in Hull this Penthouse apartment is located on the top floor with rooftop views over the city to the south from the 39ft balcony. The development was the first of its kind in the city and this Grade II listed building remains at
"Inviting offers between £310,000-£330,000 - IMPRESSIVE FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN A POPULAR SPOT IN KINGSWOOD"
"A stunning property which has been the subject of tasteful enhancement throughout. The property is offered to the market with a bright and tasteful, stylish finish with much charm and character, ..."
"SET IN THE DESIRABLE VILLAGE OF KIRK ELLA IS THIS SPACIOUS MODERN TRUE BUNGALOW OCCUPYING A GENEROUS PLOT WITH EXTENSIVE DRIVEWAY, SINGLE GARAGE AND SUBSTANTIAL REAR GARDEN, HAVING AN OPEN LIVING DINING ROOM WITH BAY WINDOW OVERLOOKING THE CUL DE SAC. WELL EQUIPPED MODERN KITCHEN ..."
"Immaculately presented detached house. Well proportioned accommodation including a spacious lounge, dining room, kitchen, utility, W.C., four good bedrooms, bathroom and en-suite. Driveway, garage and lovely rear garden."
"The sister home to the Catania. Modern four bedroom detached family living. Imposing good looks, elegantly proportioned around a central entrance and staircase. Quality kitchen dining space with a large lounge with tranquil garden views."
"This detached 3 bedroom true bungalow enjoys a head of cul-de-sac position, a southerly rear garden and is positioned in a quiet spot just off Ashgate Road in Willerby. The property provides deceptively spacious and versatile accommodation which includes a rear extension, a conservatory and plent..."
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £300,000-£320,000 NO CHAIN - LARGELY EXTENDED FOUR BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE - LARGE CORNER PLOT WITH WEST FACING REAR GARDEN PLUS GARAGE - FANTASTIC SCOPE TO ADD YOUR OWN STAMP ON - GENEROUS FAMILY ACCOMMODATION."
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £300,000 - £305,000"
"New instruction GUIDE PRICE £300,000 £320,000 Are you looking for a large traditional family home? This could be the one do not delay a viewing is only a click away. This superb property located on Anlaby high Road in close proximity to Anlaby Common. This spacious property retaining lots..."
"If you're looking for something very bespoke and unique then look no further. This fine former coach house has been owned since new by the current owners and is now presented to the market with no chain. With two reception rooms, breakfast kitchen, two bedrooms, modern shower room, beautiful sout..."
" GUIDE PRICE £300,000 TO £310,000 PRICED TO SELL.DO NOT DELAY A VIEWING IS JUST A CLICK AWAY. This modern ready to move in property briefly comprises entrance hall ground floor WC, lounge, open plan kitchen dining integral garage, for first floor bathrooms ensuite and family bathroom Large area..."
"Positioned on a prime spot in the sought after Kingswood village, this four-bedroom detached home will tick many boxes. Nestled in a quiet residential cul-de-sac, this property is ideal for the growing family seeking to reside within the catchment areas of well-regarded local schools. T..."
"This deceptively spacious, extended, semi-detached family home boasts 4 double bedrooms - 2 have the luxury of ensuite bathrooms, lounge/diner, modern kitchen, family bathroom, a low maintenance rear garden, tandem garage and a driveway."
"This exceptional four-bedroom detached home in Brompton Park, Hull offers a luxurious and spacious living space that is perfect for families and those who love to entertain.  Upon entering, you'll be greeted by a bright and welcoming hallway that leads to the heart of the home. The ..."
Back to the market is this beautifully presented four bedroom detached property situated in the sougt after location of Kingswood.  The property is perfectly placed for easy access to plenty of local amenities including reputable primary and secondary schools and has fantastic public tran...
"A well presented detached family home with 4 bedrooms, parking, garage and gardens on the popular Kingswood development."
"We are pleased to make available this large 5 Bedroom, traditional house, built circa 1904 providing deceptive and spacious accommodation with huge potential for a growing family. The property requires further modernisation and refurbishment yet offers interesting features relating to it's age. ..."
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £300,000-£325,000 STUNNING FOUR-BEDROOM LARGE DETACHED FAMILY HOME PREVIOUSLY BUILT BY BEALS HOMES, STUNNING INTERIOR THROUGHOUT & OFFERS FANTASTIC LIVING ACCOMMODATION - CALL NOW TO AVOID DISAPPOINTMENT!"
"Traditional semi-detached house with gardens, drive and garage. Requiring some modernisation, the extended accommodation includes four double bedrooms, bathroom plus separate shower room, spacious through lounge, dining room, kitchen and rear lobby with W.C. No Onward Chain!"
"£4,800 Paid towards mortgage and utility costs (T&C's apply)..SHOWHOME Now OPEN! Visit us Thursday through to Monday 10am - 5pm, book your visit with us online where ever possible to avoid dissapointment. £4,800 Paid towards mortgage and utility costs (T&C's apply).T&C's apply."
"We offer onto the market this modern, 3/4 Bedroom Detached Bungalow which must be viewed to appreciate the substantial accommodation provided. ""Tucked-away"" in a cul-de-sac setting and offered with NO CHAIN INVOLVED, the accommodation which benefits from uPVC double glazing and gas cen..."
"Guide price £295,000 - WELCOME TO YOUR STUNNING PERIOD 3 BED SEMI DETACHED HOME ON WESTFIELD RISE! THIS PROPERTY IS PRISTINE THROUGHOUT AND PROVIDES EVERYTHING YOU NEED FOR A CONTEMPORARY FAMILY LIFESTYLE"
"Wow! Just look at this property! If you're looking add your own stamp on a family home within a great area then look no further. Having been owned for over 20 years by the current family, the property is now offered for sale. With a southerly facing rear garden, integral garage, three reception r..."
"Introducing The Hadley, a semi-detached 3 bedroom home popular with young families and downsizers alike. Step inside and you'll be greeted by a bright entrance hall with handy WC. To your left you'll find an open-plan kitchen diner with a utility room and French doors to the garden. On the righ..."
"Inviting offers between £145,000-£155,000. Welcome to your new home in this quiet cul-de-sac, with off-street parking to the front! This property boasts an open-plan dining kitchen, perfect for family living and entertaining guests."
" You will be completely blown away by what lies behind this front door! Providing the best of modern contemporary living this property briefly offers entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/diner, utility and cloakroom to the ground floor. 4 bedrooms and family bathroom to the first floor. Rear West faci..."
"Backing onto Springhead Park Golf Course, this traditional bay fronted 3 bedroom semi-detached family home has been altered and much improved by the current owners and now makes the most of modern open plan living. The property has a good size plot with large rear garden ideal for entertaining in..."
"Combining a traditional exterior look with a modern, flexible interior, the 3 bedroom Eckington offers the best of both worlds. On the ground floor, a spacious lounge gives room for all to relax in, and leads into the contemporary open-plan kitchen and dining area. The garden is easily accessed ..."
"A beautiful three bedroom, semi-detached character property in the popular Garden Village area. With fantastic decoration throughout and extremely well maintained, and a brilliant rear garden, the house is ready to move into. Additionally comprising lounge, dining area, sitting room, kitchen, thr..."
"Introducing The Hadley, a 3 bedroom home popular with young families and downsizers alike. The ground floor features a bright entrance hall, with handy WC, an open-plan kitchen diner with French doors to the garden, a separate utility room and a spacious lounge that's the perfect place to relax...."
"This property represents a magnificent example of a Victorian middle terrace residence situated in The Avenues area to the West of Kingston-upon-Hull. Having been improved over the years by the current owners, the property seamlessly blends many original period features together with con..."
"*GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £310,000* Back on the market is this beautifully presented five bedroom detached property, sitting on a corner plot. Situated in the sought after residential location of Kingswood. It is well placed for easy access to plenty of local amenities including repu..."
"Agreed are delighted to offer for sale a well presented four bedroom detached house situated in the well sought after town of Kingston upon Hull, City of. The property is within walking distance of local schools and amenities. Offering one reception room and two bathrooms, the property benefits f..."
"Inviting offers between £290,000-£310,000 ARE YOU LOOKING FOR THE CHARACTER OF THE AVENUES BUT IN A MORE WEST HULL LOCATION, THEN THIS IS THE PROPERTY FOR YOU. OFFERING OVER 2000 SQ FT WITH MORE CHARACTER THAN YOU CAN IMAGINE AND TASTEFUL FITTINGS AND DECOR THROUGHOUT -JUST LOOK AT THE FLOORPLAN"
"Stunning Home In Willerby - Built In 2020 - with Entrance Hall, Lounge, Modern Kitchen/ Diner, Fitted Kitchen, 3 Bedrooms ( Master With En Suite), Family Bathroom & Ground Floor Cloakroom, Gardens, Garage & Off Street Parking - Call now to book your viewing!"
"++ THIS EXCEPTIONAL MODERN SEMI- DETACHED FAMILY HOME IS SITUATED WITHIN THIS HIGHLY REGARDED LOCATION ++ CLOSE TO SUTTON VILLAGE ++ DECEPTIVE FROM FIRST GLANCE ++ GREAT SITTING ROOM, FAMILY ROOM AND AN AMAZING DINING KITCHEN WITH UTILITY AREA AND BI-FOLD DOORS ++ FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOMS (MASTER WI..."
"Introducing the Baxter, the perfect 3 bedroom detached home, featuring an integral garage, open-plan kitchen/dining area with french doors to the rear garden, separate living room and an en-suite to bedroom 1. "
"Steeped in history, this unique and iconic property is one of Hessle's oldest and most distinct. Dating back to the late 19th Century with many original features still in place today. This picturesque property offers a versatile and extensive living space with 3 reception rooms to the ground floo..."
"The Hawthorne is a 3-bedroom home, offering an open-plan kitchen and dining area with adjacent utility room, a separate living room and a cloakroom to the ground floor. Upstairs, bedroom 1 boasts an en-suite shower room. Bedrooms 2 and 3 share the family bathroom. "
"Our new development Trinity Pastures brings a selection of one, two, three and four-bedroom new homes to a fantastic location on the outskirts of Hull. 
The development is located within the Boothferry Ward, within the constituency of Kingston upon Hull and Hessle. One of the main draws..."
"A well presented and improved FOUR BEDROOM detached family house, highly recommended for internal and external inspections to fully appreciate this lovely home. Located off Kesteven Way in the Kingswood area of Hull the property occupies a pleasant cul de sac position. The accommodation comprises..."
"Kingsland Estates are delighted to offer to the market this spacious and well presented, four bedroom family home. Situated in the ever popular area of Willerby this is the perfect oppurtunity for a home buyer or investor to acquire a property in a prime location. Internally the property on o..."
"WOW WOW WOW! Just check out this truly exceptional family home. Having been extended and modernised to provide stylish exacting specifications throughout, which can only be truly appreciated by booking a viewing! With three reception areas, contemporary kitchen with a host of built-in applian..."
"This immaculate four bed detached property has been altered and enhanced from its original design, perfect for the growing family looking for more space in this much sought after location. The main features include - entrance, fitted kitchen / diner with utility room and useful W.C locat..."
"This super detached bungalow has three bedrooms - the Master bedroom has the luxury of an ensuite shower room - a spacious lounge, dining room, new modern kitchen, utility room, cloakroom, a good size private rear garden, a single garage and driveway parking for 3+ cars. No onward chain."
"Inviting Offers Between £285,000-£295,000 BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN A POPULAR LOCATION WITH GARAGE TO THE REAR - CALL NOW TO AVOID DISAPPOINTMENT!"
"Prime location. Located towards the bottom of this extremely popular cul-de-sac overlooking the 'green', and westerly to the rear, this property will be in demand. A traditional 3 bedroomed semi with 3 separate reception rooms, fitted kitchen, family bathroom, gas central heating a..."
"Ground floor flat in a very convenient location. Requires some cosmetic updating. Accommodation includes a lounge, kitchen, fitted bedroom and shower room. Designated parking."
"*Plot 345 - Move in 6 weeks & part exchange your current home* This home has serious kerb appeal. A unique first impression is backed up by cosy dining, spacious lounge and four bedrooms. Designed to mould to family life as you live and grow."
"***SAVE £12,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Thespian is a new home featuring an open-plan kitchen/dining area with french doors, dual-aspect living room with bay window, plus an en-suite to bedroom 1. Complete with a detached single garage."
"The Willow is a 3-BEDROOM home that features an open-plan kitchen/dining area with adjacent utility room, a living room and cloakroom to the ground floor level. On the first floor, bedroom 1 offers an en-suite shower room. "
A True Hidden Gem!
"Inviting offers between £280,000-£290,000 THREE WELL PROPORTIONED BEDROOMS TO THIS IMMACULATE DETACHED HOME WITH A SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN OFFERING GOOD PRIVACY - TASTEFUL FITTINGS AND DECOR THROUGHOUT - JUST LOOK AT THE PHOTOS AND FLOORPLAN!!"
++ THIS IS TRULY A BEAUTIFUL THREE BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW ++ GREAT CORNER PLOT ++ CUL-DE-SAC POSITION ++ SET WITHIN SPLENDID GARDENS OF EXCELLENT PROPORTIONS ++ LOVINGLY RENOVATED ++ TASTEFULLY RECONFIGURED ++ PRESENTED WITH GREAT TASTE AND STYLE ++ SPACIOUS AND VERSATILE ACCOMMODATION ++...
A lovely spacious family house in an excellent residential area.
"This wonderful semi-detached family home is situated on a larger than average plot, enjoying an elevated position in an ever popular location. Presented to the highest standards throughout with flexible and generous living accommodation, a fabulous rear garden, ample off-street parking and a gara..."
"Superb, spacious family home! This lovely, well-presented home is looking for a new family! Tucked away at the end of a cul-de-sac position, overlooking the green, the house had been updated by the current owners to offer two spacious receptions, four double bedrooms, two bathrooms and ut..."
Moving Made Easy are delighted to present this stunning three bedroom semi-detached home!Call now to enquire/view 
"This beautifully presented traditional three bed semi detached property offers generous sized accommodation throughout and sits in a prominent Hessle location. The well appointed and spacious interior accommodation comprises of a bright reception hall, generous lounge, lovely family/dining roo..."
Four bedroom detached family home in sought after location! New to the market is this beautifully presented and impressive four bedroom family home in a quiet part of the ever popular Kingswood neighbourhood. The property is perfectly placed for easy access to plenty of local amen...
***4 BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE- MODERN FITTED KITCHEN- QUIET CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION- GENEROUS GARDEN WITH HOT TUB- OUR ADVICE IS TO ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING TODAY!!!***
"What an immense semi detached true Bungalow, offered with no chain! Refurbished throughout. Two double Bedrooms both with modern sliderobes, Lounge with modern integral flame fire, stunning Bathroom, contemporary Dining Kitchen with range cooker. Well tended gardens with store/summerhouse. Dr..."
"£4,000 Paid towards mortgage and untility costs . Flooring package. Turf to rear. £750 towards legal fees. Appliance package. (Subject to mortgage lenders criteria T&Cs apply).£4,000 Paid towards mortgage and untility costs . Flooring package. Turf to rear. £750 towards legal fees. Appliance pack..."
"An absolutely stunning property which has been much improved by it's current owners. This delightful extended three bedroom, semi-detached home is perfect for the growing family. Situated in the ever popular village of Kirk Ella and is conveniently located within close proximity to schools, ameni..."
++ EXPECT TO BE IMPRESSED!! THIS STUNNING EXTENDED FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME OFFERS A GREAT DEAL MORE THAN FIRST GLANCE SUGGESTS ++ ARRANGED OVER THREE FLOORS ++ CHOICE CUL-DE-SAC POSITION ++ TASTEFULLY IMPROVED OFFERING A HIGH STANDARD THROUGHOUT ++ ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN OF EXCELLENT PRO...
"The Charnwood has a stylish open-plan kitchen/breakfast room and separate utility with garden access. There is a bright dual-aspect living room with French doors leading to the garden, handy storage cupboards and a downstairs WC. Upstairs, there are three bedrooms - one is en-suite - and a bathroom."
"With lots of free-flowing space, The Denby is a flexible family home. The lounge seamlessly merges into the open-plan contemporary kitchen and dining area, perfect for either relaxing in or for entertaining family and friends. French doors take you into the secluded garden. A separate utility ro..."
"A stylish three-bedroomed home, The Dalton raises the standard on new build living. Move through the welcoming entrance hall and straight into the generous, light living space, then through into an open plan kitchen dining space perfect for entertaining"
"Rarely available. Occupying an enviable position on one of Hessle's most sought after locations. This traditional three bedroom family home is full of charm and warmth. With scope to improve and put your own stamp on this already magnificent property. There are 3 flexible reception rooms, plus a ..."
"Inviting Offers Between £275,000 - £285,000, WOW! A PERFECT OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A SUBSTANTIAL SPACIOUS AND EXTENDED FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM DETACHED PROPERTY SITUATED ON A GREAT SIZE PLOT AT THE HEAD OF THIS QUIET CUL DE SAC"
"Wow! Just check out this exceptional property. Beautifully presented and refurbished to a high standard throughout, good sized private gardens, newly refurbished kitchen, shower room and additional WC. The property enjoys entrance hallway, spacious lounge, two double fitted bedrooms and good size..."
***4 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE- 3 DOUBLE BEDROOMS- 3 RECEPTION ROOMS PLUS A CONSERVATORY- DOUBLE GARAGE-IF YOU ARE LOOKING FOR A SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME IN EAST HULL THEN LOOK NO FURTHER!! TAKE A LOOK AT THE 360 TOUR AND ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING!!!***
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £275,000-£285,000 SPACIOUS AND WELL PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW IN A QUIET CUL-DE-SAC OFF DUNSWELL LANE"
"This superbly presented semi-detached dormer bungalow affords spacious and versatile living accommodation arranged over two storeys and briefly comprises: enclosed entrance porch, entrance hall, principle bedroom, lounge, living / dining / kitchen and well appointed bathroom to the ground floor w..."
"Modern townhouse offering generous accommodation over three floors. Three/four bedrooms, two bath/shower rooms, study, cloaks/W.C. and an open plan living kitchen. Garden, drive and garage."
*** A 4 BEDROOM DETACHED PROPERTY- POPULAR BILTON LOCATION-PROMINENT CORNER PLOT- PRIVATE DRIVE- VIEWINGS NOW INVITED***
Stunning and spacious five bedroom property in the desirable Kingswood area! This large family home is great value for money and comes complete with off street parking with garage and a large garden space. The property comprises of:A well decorated living area with lots of natural light. Room ha...
"£4,000 mortgage subsidy. .£4,000 mortgage subsidy. T&C's apply."
Flooring package. £750 towards legal fees. Appliance package. Turf to rear. .Flooring package. £750 towards legal fees. Appliance package. Turf to rear. T&C's apply.
"£4,000 Paid towards mortgage and untility costs . Flooring package. Turf to rear. £750 towards legal fees. Appliance package. (Subject to mortgage lenders criteria T&Cs apply). .£4,000 Paid towards mortgage and untility costs . Flooring package. Turf to rear. £750 towards legal fees. Appliance pa..."
"**Save £6,000 through our Mortgage Assist on this home!**Receive FREE Flooring** Open Plan Kitchen/ Dining Area with Integrated Appliances & French Doors to the Rear Garden, Separate Lounge, Downstairs WC & Store to Hall. Master Bedroom with En-suite, 2 x Off-street Parking Spaces. Show Home Open!"
"This beautifully appointed double fronted semi-detached home sits on a lovely plot nestled away within an ever popular development of Hessle. To the ground floor there is a fabulous upgraded dining kitchen, handy utility room, generous living room and a cloakroom. To the first floor there are 3 w..."
"Inviting Offers between £270,000 - £280,000"
"NEW INSTRUCTION THIS TRADITIONAL SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME do not delay a viewing is just a click away. The property briefly comprises, entrance hall, lounge/dining room, large kitchen, utility room, WC. First floor split level landing, Family bathroom, two double bedrooms, second floor third bedroom...."
***A FANTASTIC 4 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE- POPULAR GARDEN VILLAGE LOCATION-PRIVATE DRIVE- GARAGE- TWO RECEPTION ROOMS-THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS-BE QUICK!!***
"GUIDE PRICE £270,000 - £280,000 Lovely & Extended Semi-Detached Home In Willerby with - Entrance Hall, Lounge, Dining Room, Fitted Kitchen, Conservatory, 3 Bedrooms & Dressing Area, Family Bathroom, Gardens, Off Street Parking & Garage. Call us today to book your viewing!"
"This fantastic 3 bedroom home comes with great features like a large master bedroom, Family bathroom, and a contemporary OPEN PLAN Kitchen Diner with BI-FOLD doors opening up onto your garden. DONT MISS OUT, CALL TODAY!"
"Benefiting from a large integral garage, an open-plan living/dining room with French doors leading into the garden, and three double bedrooms, The Stafford is a popular family home. The downstairs cloakroom, first-floor storage, family bathroom and en suite to bedroom one make this a practical home."
A stunning 3 double bedroom family home which has been extensively remodelled and extended by the current owners to create an exceptional home which delivers on so many levels. A full width extension has been added to the rear with bi-folding doors and orangery style skylight roof. This is open p...
"Ideal for a young, growing family or couples looking for room, The Moresby delivers elegance and comfort .
 
The good-size lounge is the perfect evening retreat,  whilst the open-plan kitchen and dining area, just across the hall, is set for family meals and entertaining. French doors lead to the..."
"The elegant Moresby is the ideal home for a young, growing family or couples looking for room and comfortable.
 
On the ground floor, the good-size lounge is perfect for relaxing in the evening, whereas, just across the hall, the open-plan kitchen and dining area lends itself to family meals and ..."
"Perfectly balanced four bedroom detached family home. Elegantly proportioned, with a kitchen dining area that opens out into your own serene garden. "
"Wow! Stunning detached house with extended and stylishly presented accommodation. Fantastic open plan kitchen to the rear, lovely garden and excellent parking. This is one not to miss!"
"Modern double fronted detached family home situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac location in a popular residential location to the West of Hull. This property has been superbly presented by the current owners and briefly comprises: entrance vestibule, entrance hall, fitted dining kitchen, lo..."
"Well presented semi-detached house with off street parking, rear garden & garage. Two reception rooms, kitchen and conservatory, three bedrooms and modern bathroom."
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £160,000-£170,000 BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED DORMER STYLE HOME WITH OFF-STREET PARKING AND LANDSCAPED GARDEN - SIMPLY UNPACK YOUR BAGS AND MOVE INTO THIS GORGEOUS HOME IN A POPULAR LOCATION CLOSE TO SOME OF HULL'S HIGHLY REGARDED SCHOOLS"
"NO ONWARD CHAIN In need of some modernisation, this three bedroom semi-detached dormer bungalow is the ideal opportunity for anyone wishing to make the transition from a multi storey property to a home which is primarily on the ground floor without compromising on living/storage space th..."
Deposit unlock - you could buy your new home with just a 5% deposit (subject to lender criteria). .Deposit unlock - you could buy your new home with just a 5% deposit (subject to lender criteria). T&C's apply.
"Rarely available three bedroom semi-detached house situated in a much sought after area! Offering an exceptional plot with plenty of potential, the property does requires modernisation throughout. Already benefitting from uPVC double glazing throughout, the property briefly comprises entrance ..."
"*** NEW INSTRUCTION, MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! - FREE MORTGAGE ADVICE AVAILABLE ON THIS PROPERTY. SPACIOUS 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY, NOT TO BE MISSED, IDEAL PROJECT / REQUIRES UPDATING / MODERNISATION, spacious accommodation, ga..."
"Inviting Offers Between - £260,000-£275,000 WELCOME TO MARLBOROUGH AVENUE, LOCATED IN THE HIGHLY SOUGHT-AFTER AVENUES AREA. THIS SPACIOUS END TERRACE PROPERTY BOASTS PLENTY OF ORIGINAL RUSTIC FEATURES SUCH AS TWO LOG BURNERS TO KEEP YOU WARM AND COSY THROUGHOUT THE WINTER MONTHS."
" This spacious semi-detached property is not to be missed!! Briefly comprises Lounge, Dining room, cloakroom and Kitchen to the ground floor. 3 Bedrooms and bathroom to the first floor. Private enclosed extensive rear garden spanning 100 meters and driveway providing off street parking.Popula..."
" Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this modern and well presented detached family home, built by Barratt Homes in 2018. Located in this popular and sought after area, close to many amenities including shops, schools, transport links and road networks. Internally, the property boasts thre..."
"*** VACANT PROPERTY *** Situated on a popular residential location in the Anlaby village and benefiting from close proximity to good amenities, leisure facilities and transport links, this well presented three bedroom detached property is immaculate throughout and was built by the reputa..."
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £260,000-£265,000 SUPERB EXTENDED FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN A CUL DE SAC POSITION - CALL NOW TO AVOID DISAPPOINTMENT"
"NEW INSTRUCTION OFFERED TO THE MARKET AT A GUIDE PRICE £260,000 TO £270,000. DO NOT DELAY A VIEWING IS JUST A CLICK AWAY. we are pleased to offer this large 3 bed detached property to the market. Tucked away in this secluded cul-de-sac of just 4 properties within this well regarded and much sou..."
"£260,000 - STUNNING FOUR BEDROOM THREE STOREY SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH A BEAUTIFUL INTERIOR THROUGHOUT, GORGEOUS LANDSCAPED GARDEN, OFF-STREET PARKING AND GARAGE -NO CHAIN- CALL NOW TO AVOID DISAPPOINTMENT"
"A modern four-bedroom semi-detached house, set over three floors, set with a popular residential area in Eastfield Court, Hessle. To the side of the property is a single garage and parking for 4 cars. In excellent decorative order throughout and modernised kitchen and bathrooms. Ground f..."
"£4,000 Paid towards mortgage and untility costs . (Subject to mortgage lenders criteria T&Cs apply).SHOWHOME Now OPEN! Visit us Thursday through to Monday 10am - 5pm, book your visit with us online where ever possible to avoid dissapointment. £4,000 Paid towards mortgage and utility costs (T&C&ap..."
Carpet package. Turf to rear garden. Appliance package. £750 towards legal fees. .This home includes FREE EXTRAS of:Carpet package. Turf to rear garden. Appliance package. £750 towards legal fees. T&C's apply.
"Modern detached family home situated in a pleasant cul-de-sac in a popular residential location of Anlaby Common. This property briefly comprises: entrance hall, lounge, kitchen dining room, conservatory, W.C. to the ground floor with three bedrooms and bathroom to the first floor. To the front..."
"The Moresby is double fronted semi-detached home, designed on a corner overlooking open-space and with a bright, south facing garden. Relax in your dual-aspect lounge or open the French doors in your open-plan kitchen diner and enjoy a coffee in the morning sun. Upstairs, your bedroom has an en..."
An extremely spacious traditional semi detached house in need of some refurbishment but located within an outstanding residential area.
"A rarely available detached family home with ample off street parking and double garage in the highly sought after Garden Village area; offered with no onward chain and boasting two spacious reception rooms, three double bedrooms and private corner gardens."
"6 Bedroom HMO Investment property Refurbished Summer 2021 Currently let to Students for academic year 2022/2023 Gross Rental Income £24,675 Gross Yield 9.87% pa Documented historic use as C4 HMO Article 4 Consent Granted Rents correct at time of listing<..."
"Modern four bedroom detached family living. Imposing good looks, elegantly proportioned around a central entrance and staircase. Quality kitchen dining space with a large lounge with tranquil garden views."
"An opportunity to acquire a student investment property 0.5 miles from Hull University Campus. Six rooms currently producing £22,464 per annum but with license received to increase to 9 bedrooms."
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: Mid Terrace House Three Bedroo...
"*** SPACIOUS HOME YOU WILL NOT WANT TO MISS!! *** Well presented and spacious traditional style terraced house with improvements made by the sellers since purchased comprising; entrance hall with hardwood flooring, stairs and store cupboard. Lounge with stunning fireplace and an additional recept..."
"6 Bedroom HMO Investment property Refurbished Summer 2021 Currently let to 5 Students for academic year 2022/2023 Gross Rental Income £20,625 Gross Yield 8.25% pa Potential to let to 6 tenants if lounge changed back to a bedroom Documented historic use as C4..."
".NEW INSTRUCTION OFFERED TO THE MARKET AT A GUIDE PRICE £250,000 to £270,000
This large family home is currently tenanted until June 2023 The property briefly comprises entrance hall, living room, dining room, kitchen, family room, conservatory To the first floor is a family bathroom four bedr..."
"Best Bids Invited by 5pm Wednesday 15th March 2023 Substantial detached single-storey building 3 large ‘halls’, smaller rooms, kitchen, WCs and stores Total accommodation c.882 sq m (9,495 sq ft) GIA Frontage to both Endike Lane and 21st Avenue with vehicular access/parking off both Suitable..."
"The largest and grandest of our townhouses - intimate dining, huge lounge and four double bedrooms. Fantastic design without compromise."
"Located In This Exclusive Development Within The Avenues, This Modern End Townhouse Offers Accommodation Over Three Floors, Viewing Is Highly Recommended"
"A vacant, approximately 0.57 acre site previously having planning permission approved for 9 dwellings, being a mix of houses and bungalows. Can be sold 'subject to' planning approval being granted again. Located on Orchard Park, an area that has seen significant recent regeneration, b..."
This superb detached family home is situated within an ever popular cul-de-sac location within Victoria Dock. Sitting on a larger than average corner plot and enjoying a southerly aspect to the rear garden. This home offers open and flexible accommodation comprising of a living room and dining ki...
"SENSATIONAL FAMILY HOME - HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - EXTENDED LIVING ROOM WITH SKYLIGHTS Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this outstanding three bedroom three storey townhouse. Located on Wolfreton Mews, this property is ideally placed for its popular vill..."
"++ EXPECT TO BE IMPRESSED, THIS BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED FOUR BEDROOM/TWO BATHROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME ENJOYS A LOVELY POSITION WITHIN A NICHE DEVELOPMENT TUCKED AWAY OFF MARFLEET LANE, HOLDERNESS HIGH ROAD ++ TASTEFULLY AND CONSIDERABLY IMPROVED ++ TWO RECEPRION ROOMS PLUS A LARGE CONSERVATORY ++ ..."
"This turnkey bungalow awaits its new owners. Beautifully presented throughout with two double bedrooms, spacious lounge dining room, modern shower room and kitchen, lovely conservatory, driveway and garage, low maintenance gardens. With no forward chain this property is an absolute MUST VIEW!"
"***SAVE £6,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** This beautiful 3-bedroom home offers a bright, open-plan kitchen and dining area, a living room and cloakroom to the ground floor. Plus an en-suite and modern family bathroom. "
"WOW - A little gem!! A simply pristine property lovingly cared for by the current owners located on a quiet cul-de-sac. Recently updated bathrooms and decor throughout, private westerly facing gardens and solar panels installed helping to keep your bills down. We strongly advise an early viewi..."
"This immaculate four bed property has been the subject of vast improvement over the years, much enhanced from its original design to now incorporate four double bedrooms, ideal for the growing family looking to be in this ever popular location. The main features include - entrance, front..."
"This three bedroom semi-detached home includes an open plan kitchen with a dining area and French doors to the garden. A spacious lounge and a cloakroom completes the ground floor.
Upstairs you'll find an en suite main bedroom, a further double bedroom, a single bedroom and a family bathroom. Se..."
"This popular three bedroom semi-detached home includes an open-plan kitchen with a dining area and French doors to the garden. A spacious lounge and a cloakroom completes the ground floor.
Upstairs you'll find an en suite main bedroom, a further double bedroom, a single bedroom and a family bathr..."
Splendid Victorian home full of character!
"NEW INSTRUCTION OFFERED TO THE MARKET AT A GUIDE PRICE OF £240,000 TO £250,000 DO NOT DELAY A VIEWING IS JUST A CLICK AWAY. This beautifully presented four bedroom terrace property briefly comprises: an entrance hall, WC, a spacious kitchen-diner, a lounge with double-French doors opening to an ..."
"This three bedroom semi detached home includes an open plan kitchen with a dining area and French doors to the garden. A spacious lounge and a cloakroom completes the ground floor.Upstairs you'll find an en suite main bedroom, a further double bedroom, a single bedroom and a family bathroom.See a..."
***ABSOLUTELY STUNNING AND READY TO MOVE INTO - THREE BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME -ORANGERY-GARDEN BAR- WE LOVE THIS PROPERTY AND KNOW YOU WILL TOO - ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING TODAY!!!!***
"WOW - Impressive home through-out - NOT TO BE MISSED!!!. This Victorian style end terraced property is deceptively spacious boasting a rear double storey extension. The Accommodation comprises: entrance hall, open plan living/breakfast kitchen, two further reception rooms plus utility room to the..."
"FULLY REFURBISHED, THREE BED, SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN EXCELLENT LOCATION WITH OFF STREET PARKING, A STUNNING SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN AND 35 FOOT OPEN PLAN GROUND FLOOR!!! This wonderful semi-detached home is located on Cottingham Road close to well regarded schools, Hull University..."
"Stunning 8 bedroom house located 20 minutes from University features a spacious open plan kitchen and living room, 2 immaculate modern bathrooms and beautifully presented bedrooms throughout, each with their own TV's "
"Inviting offers between £170,000-£180,000"
Fabulously appointed spacious first floor apartment within traditional residence dating back to 1869 with views of private grounds and the Humber Bridge. Remote controlled access via entry and exit points. Viewing essential to appreciate the quality of accommodation offered by this fine...
" ***SAVE £6,000 WHEN YOU RESERVE BEFORE 31ST MARCH^*** The Beswick is a modern home, offering an open-plan kitchen and dining area, a separate, bright living room and guest cloakroom."
*SUPER 3 BED DETACHED HOUSE*FINISHED TO A VERY GOOD STANDARD*DESIRABLE LOCATION *SITUATED ON A POPULAR DEVELOPMENT*VERY WELL MAINTAINED *DINING KITCHEN WITH INTEGRATED APPLIANCES*GOOD SIZED BEDROOMS*EN-SUITE*CONSERVATORY*PRIVATE LANDSCAPED REAR GARDEN ON CORNER PLOT*GARAGE*SOLAR PANELS* MUST VIEW*
"GUIDE £240,000 to £250,000*KINGSWOOD LOCATION* STUNNING DETACHED FAMILY HOME *FANTASTIC ROOM PROPORTIONS* Well presented 4 bed home situated in a QUIET CUL-DE-SAC in the established & WELL-REGARDED location. Large lounge/diner, new spacious kitchen, Conservatory & 4 good sized bedrooms.A MUST VIEW"
"6 Bedroom HMO Investment property Currently let Students for academic year 2022/2023 Gross Rental Income £21,298 Gross Yield 8.87% pa Documented historic use as C4 HMO Article 4 Consent Granted Rents correct at time of listing 6 bedroom and 2 bathrooms ..."
"*** ONE NOT TO BE MISSED - LUXURY/HIGH QUALITY STANDARD & FITTINGS THROUGH-OUT *** Immaculately presented, Modern four bedroom, three storey semi-detached house with the wow factor!! Viewing essential for full appreciation of the stunning home. High standard through-out with quality fittings. Com..."
New to the market is this beautifully presented two bedroom detached bungalow situated in the heart of Hull. The property is perfectly placed for easy access to plenty of local amenities including reputable primary and secondary schools and fantastic public transport and road links both in and ou...
"6 Bedroom HMO Investment property Currently let to 5 Students for academic year 2022/2023 Gross Rental Income £17,825 Gross Yield 7.43% pa Documented historic use as C4 HMO Article 4 Consent Granted Rents correct at time of listing 6 bedroom and 2 bathro..."
"This four bedroom detached property is brought to the market in show home standard! Situated in the popular castle grange development close by to local shops & amenities. Benefiting from having a conservatory extension, two en suites and three reception rooms!"
"This four bedroom townhouse has the kitchen of dreams. Farmhouse style, with brickwork character and calming views of the garden. Followed up with three floors of luxury that command attention as well as space for a home office."
"** Stunning Detached Three Bedroom Property ** Guide price £240,000 - £250,000 ** Garage and Additional Parking Spaces ** Superb Kitchen/Day Room ** Over 1,400 sq/ft with excellent room proportions **"
"Positioned in a private cul-de-sac location off the well-connected Willerby Road, this three-bedroom home is ideal for the growing family seeking a property that falls into the catchment area of well-regarded local schooling and proximity to local amenities and leisure facilities. Brief..."
" DO NOT DELAY A VIEWING IS JUST A CLICK AWAY. GUIDE PRICE £240,000 to £250,000. This stand alone detached property boasting over 1,400 square feet with excellent room proportions and stylish presentation. Fabulous Kitchen/Family Room and super additional first floor room overlooking the rear wit..."
"STUNNING 3 BED SEMI DETACHED - POPULAR LOCATION - BEAUTIFUL MODERN KITCHEN AND BATHROOM Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this sensational 3 bed semi detached property. Located on Tennison Walk, the property is a stone's throw from the centre of Hessle, home to..."
STUNNING DETACHED HOME - THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS - MODERN FAMILY BATHROOM - GENEROUS WEST FACING REAR GARDEN - OFF STREET PARKING AND GARAGE - BEAUTIFUL KITCHEN/DINER This beautiful detached house would be perfect for a small family to move straight in with no work required whatsoever. The...
"Inviting offer between £240,000-£250,000 ARE YOU LOOKING FOR A BEAUTIFUL AND TRANQUIL FAMILY HOME IN A DESIRABLE AREA OF ANLABY? THEN LOOK NO FURTHER! THIS BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM, TWO BATHROOM PROPERTY ON PETFIELD DRIVE IS JUST THE PLACE FOR YOU. BOASTING AN IMPRESSIVE LOW MAINTENANCE"
"OUTSTANDING THREE BED DETACHED - FANTASTIC CORNER PLOT - POPULAR LOCATION Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this outstanding, three bed, detached home. Situated on Conifer Close, this property is ideally placed for amenities with shops, supermarkets, cafes, bars ..."
"Absolutely stunning! This vastly extended four bed semi-detached house has the 'wow' factor! If you are looking for more space, then this gorgeous home is for you! Four double bedrooms, utility, wc, spacious kitchen/dining/living, 2nd lounge, conservatory, stunning bathroom, generous gard..."
"This immaculate three-bedroom semi-detached house is situated in Hessle, a village renowned for its proximity to highly accessible transport links that connect to well-regarded local schooling, leisure facilities and amenities. The property was built by the reputable David Wilson builders and has..."
"Brought to the market with NO CHAIN involved! This stylish home is situated close by to local amenities, excellent bus routes and highly sought after schools! With views overlooking East Park! Benefiting from having off street parking to the side driveway and garage!"
"A delightful, spacious two bedroom detached bungalow! Situated in this sought after residential location on Cherry Lane off Lambwath Road, close to East park, amenities and Sutton village, local transport and sought after schools! The bungalow has mature, well stocked gardens with a degre..."
"Immaculately presented and offering extended accommodation including two reception rooms modern fitted kitchen, 3 bedrooms all having fitted wardrobes and a contemporary bathroom with four piece suite. Lovely south westerly facing rear garden."
"This much altered and enhanced property has been the subject of vast improvement and investment by the current owners over the years, it has been meticulously thought out using every spare inch of space. The immaculate accommodation briefly comprises - entrance hall, lounge with bay wind..."
"We are pleased to present this three-bedroom family home situated in the popular residential area of Bransholme, close to all amenities including local schools. Features include: front and rear forecourts, entrance hall, ground floor WC, modern kitchen/diner with an integrated oven and hob, l..."
"Simply ready to move into - this detached dormer bungalow has been lovingly maintained by the same owner for many years and is now offered for sale. Ready to move into with entrance hallway, utility cupboard, spacious lounge, modern fitted kitchen with built-in appliances, ground floor bedroom w..."
"Inviting Offers between £235,000-£245,000 - Stunning four bedroom semi detached home with off street parking and garage, uninterrupted open views to the front modern interior throughout call now to avoid disappointment!"
"No Onward Chain! This modern three bed property is offered to the market with the potential for no onward chain, situated in a prime central residential location on Beverley Road, well placed to access the city centre, both the Hospitals and the University. The main features include ..."
"OUTSTANDING FOUR BED SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY - DECORATED AND FINISHED BEAUTIFULLY - GARAGE - OFF STREET PARKING Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market with superb four bedroom semi detached property. Situated on Richmond Lane in the popular development of Kingswood, th..."
"We offer onto the market this traditional-style 3 Bedroom end house providing good-size family accommodation which benefits from gas radiator central heating and majority uPVC double glazing. The freshly-decorated accommodation briefly comprises:- Enclosed Porch, Entrance Hall, Lounge, Dining Ro..."
"Three bedroom detached family house, HIGHLY RECOMMENDED for an early viewing to fully appreciate this lovely home. Offering GROUND FLOOR EXTENDED accommodation, pleasant garden plot with off road parking and attached GARAGE. Located off Beverley Road, the property is well placed for local ameniti..."
EPC GRADE C ++ COUNCIL TAX BAND D ++ PRIVATE PARKING ++ DETACHED GARAGE ++ POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION ++ FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME ++ CUL-DE-SAC POSITION ++ MODERN DINING KITCHEN ++ MASTER BEDROOM WITH EN-SUITE ++ NO ONWARD CHAIN ++ GREAT FAMILY HOME ++ MUST BE VIEWED ++
"Stunning family property in a very sought after location. Viewing is a must!  A beautiful, well presented 3 bedroom family home situated down a quiet sought after street in a popular location. The property benefits from 2 car parking spaces in a private courtyard. A generous family friend..."
Home Estates are pleased to welcome to the market this exceptionally well-presented period property with so much charm and character. This outstanding property has been subject to a stylish and taste...
"++ LOCATED ON THE POPULAR DEVELOPMENT OF KINGSWOOD, THIS BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM DETACHED HOME WOULD MAKE A GREAT FAMILY HOME ++ STYLISH ACCOMMODATION COMPLETE WITH MANY FEATURES ++ FABULOUS KITCHEN/DINING ROOM WITH APPLIANCES ++ MASTER BEDROOM WITH EN-SUITE ++ ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN +..."
** Substantial Four Bedroom Family Home With Ensuite Master Bedroom ** Dual Aspect Living Room ** Separate Dining Room with Conservatory Off Four Generous Bedrooms ** Driveway and Single Garage with Multiple Car Parking Space ** Quiet Cul-de-sac In Fantastic Summergroves ...
"Inviting Offers Between £230,000 - £250,000"
"***WOW, WOW, WOW!!! ONLY TWO YEARS OLD!!***"
This beautiful semi-detached home is situated within the heart of Hessle and sits on a larger than average plot. Rarely available this wonderful family home has been well loved and enhanced over the years with many traditional features added. Benefitting from ample and generous living accommodati...
"**WOW, THIS STUNNING THREE BED SEMI DETACHED HOUSE MUST BE VIEWED TO FULLY APPRECIATE IT ALL IT HAS TO OFFER - NEW DOUBLE GLAZING AND DOORS IN 2022, BE QUICK!!!!***"
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £230,000 - £240,000 ONE OF THE BEST MASTER SUITES I HAVE SEEN ON A MODERN HOUSE - AN AWESOME THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME NESTLED AT THE END AND NOT OVERLOOKED AT THE REAR - PERFECT FOR A FAMILY!!!"
"++ HIGH QUALITY DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH THREE RECEPTION ROOMS, LUXURY KITCHEN/DINING ROOM. THREE BEDROOMS AND GORGEOUS GARDENS ++ PRESENTED WITH GREAT TASTE AND STYLE ++ TRULY IMMACULATE INSIDE AND OUT ++ CHOICE CUL-DE-SAC POSITION HANDY FOR ACCESS TO EXCELLENT NEAR-BY FACILITIES ++ LAVISHLY AP..."
"This stylish and immaculate four bedroom semi-detached family home has recently been constructed by Strata Homes in 2021. With much of the NHBC warranty remaining, boasting a host of enhancements benefitting from proximity to the highly accessible transport links that connect residents ..."
"One of our most popular designs. A three bedroom home with a study that strikes a great balance, trendy and modern with a superb loft master suite."
"GUIDE PRICE £230,000 - £240,000 Lovely Four Bedroom Home In Willerby with - Entrance Hall, Lounge, Kitchen/ Diner, 4 Bedrooms, Family Bathroom & Ground Floor Cloakroom, Gardens & a Garage - Call now to book your viewing!"
"
Overlooking playing fields and set well back from the Main road , this four double bedroomed town has been much improved by the current owners to create spacious and flexible family living in a much sought after, seldom available location. Arranged over three floors, the property briefly compris..."
*SUPER DETACHED 3 BED HOME*QUIET LOCATION*2 RECEPTION ROOMS*VERY WELL MAINTAINED THROUGHOUT*RARELY AVAILABLE*CONTEMPORARY KITCHEN & BATHROOM*CONSERVATORY* FINISHED TO A VERY HIGH STANDARD*LANDSCAPED GARDEN WTHCOMPOSITE DECK & LOTS OF PRIVACY*PARKING & GARAGE*MUST VIEW*DON'T MISS THIS HOUSE*
"WOW! THIS IS YOUR DREAM HOME! Former show home! Perfect for the growing family! This three bedroom detached house has the 'wow' factor! Take a look at this stunning home, ideal for the growing family, turn the key house! Selling with no chain involved, and ALL FITTINGS & APPLIANCE..."
"£4,000 Paid towards mortgage and utility costs (T&C's apply). .£4,000 Paid towards mortgage and utility costs (T&C's apply). T&C's apply."
"Inviting offers between £210,000-£220,000. RECENTLY REFURBISHED AND MODERNISED THREE BEDROOM DETACHED PROPERTY IN THIS SUPERB AND CONVENIENT LOCATION WITH NO STONE BEING LEFT UNTURNED IN PROVIDING A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED PROPERTY IN MOVE INTO CONDITION"
"£4,000 Paid towards mortgage and utility costs (T&C's apply). .SHOWHOME Now OPEN! Visit us Thursday through to Monday 10am - 5pm, book your visit with us online where ever possible to avoid dissapointment. £4,000 Paid towards mortgage and utility costs (T&C's apply). T&C's apply."
"** Fabulous Extended Two-Bedroom Bungalow ** Recently Fitted Kitchen ** Garage ** Conservatory ** Additional Garden Room ** Modern Decor ** Open Views to Rear ** Located in this most sought-after area of Willerby with all of its amenities, shops and transport links, this super..."
++ GREAT FOUR DOUBLE BEDROOM/TWO BATHROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME ++ SITUATED ON THIS EVER POPULAR DEVELOPMENT BUILT BY STRATA HOMES AND IDEALLY PLACED TO EMERGE YOURSELF INTO ALL THAT KINGSWOOD HAS TO OFFER ++ MODERN AND STYLISH ACCOMMODATION ARRANGED OVER THREE FLOORS ++ MODERN DINING KITC...
"** DO NOT MISS OUT ON THE OPPORTUNITY TO OWN 18 LANGSETT ROAD ** Rarely available in this ever popular area of Howdale Road, a FOUR BEDROOM DELIGHTFUL FAMILY HOME. Set within a sought after primary school catchment area with all the amenities close by, that Sutton village has to offer. The pr..."
"Inviting offers between £225,000-£230,000 LOVELY DETACHED HOME ON A GENEROUS CORNER PLOT WITH OFF STREET PARKING AND GARAGE - NO CHAIN INVOLVED"
"This impressive 4 bedroom semi detached family home is ideal for the growing family! Benefiting from having ample off street parking! Situated in this popular area close by to local shops, amenities and excellent bus routes!"
++ AN ABSOLUTE GEM! ++ BEAUTIFUL FOUR BEDROOM PERIOD TERRACE OF OUTSTANDING CHARACTER AND QUALITY ++ PLETHORA OF ORIGINAL FEATURES ++ LOVINGLY RESTORED ++ PRESENTED WITH GREAT TASTE AND STYLE ++ PACES AWAY FROM HULL'S LARGEST PARK ++ ABUNDANT IN ACCOMMODATION ++ TWO FABULOUS RECEPTION ROOMS ++ ST...
"If you're looking to add your own mark to a property on a splendid plot and in a great area, then this house is definitely one for your viewing list. Three bedrooms, first floor bathroom, spacious lounge dining room, kitchen, gardens to three sides, driveway and garage, no chain - call now for an..."
"**Saved a 5% or 10% deposit? We'll boost it with a further 5% when you purchase this home!** In this home you will find a Kitchen/ Dining Area with Integrated Appliances, Spacious Lounge, Downstairs Cloakroom, Master Bedroom with EN-SUITE and 2x Off-street Parking Spaces. Find out more!"
"DELIGHTFUL THREE BED FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR AVENUES LOCATION PERFECT FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS OR A SMALL FAMILY This wonderful home would be perfect for first time buyers or a small family looking to move to the desirable ""Avenues"" area with ample living space on offer. The property is situ..."
"This very well presented end property has been well maintained throughout, and offered to the market as move into condition, situated in this prime residential area, ideal for the growing family. The main features include - entrance, front lounge, dining room and open plan contemporary f..."
New to the market is this absolutely stunning three bedroom  detached family home situated in the sought after location of Sutton Park. The property is well placed for easy access to plenty of local amenities including reputable primary and secondary schools and has fantastic public transpor...
"Inviting Offers Between £225,000 - £235,000"
A truly lovely traditional semi-detached house which has been the subject of a tasteful refurbishment with many additional extras. The property is perfectly located in a highly regarded r...
WOW...STUNNING SEMI-DETACHED HOME REFURBISHED BY THE CURRENT OWNERS TO AN INCREDIBLE STANDARD WITH OFF STREET PARKING AND A MASSIVE REAR GARDEN WITH SUMMER HOUSE This semi-detached home is located on Windsor Road close to well regarded schools and local amenities with good transport link...
"No Chain Involved This deceptively spacious three bedroom detached property is situated on a large plot in a much sought after location on Anlaby Park Road South, well placed to access A63 / M62 motorway networks and only a short distance to Hessle with its wide array of amenities it has to o..."
"A four bedroomed town house with garden, parking and garage in the Liberty Green area."
"A unique opportunity has arisen to acquire this three bed semi-detached property, which is situated in a much sought after semi-rural position in Dunswell, with open aspect views front and rear over fields, twixt between Beverley and Hull enjoying easy access to both. The property has un..."
NO ONWARD CHAIN - This three bedroom semi-detached family home is situated within an ever popular cul-de-sac location. Within close proximity to all of Hessle's amenities. Situated on a corner plot with immense privacy. Generous and flexible living space throughout and well proportioned bedrooms....
"***** DETACHED DOUBLE WIDTH GARAGE & OFF ROAD PARKING ***** Stunningly presented extended middle terrace property situated in the popular Township of Hessle, in close proximity to an abundance of local shopping and recreational facilities together with excellent schools and transportatio..."
Only a full inspection will reveal the quality and decorative standard offered by this stunning family property.
"5 Bedroom HMO Investment property Currently let to 5 Students for academic year 2022/2023 Gross Rental Income £16,800 Gross Yield 7.64% pa Documented historic use as C4 HMO Article 4 Consent Granted Rents correct at time of listing 5 bedroom and 2 bathro..."
"Inviting Offers Between £220,000 - £240,000 TRADITIONAL THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN A POPULAR LOCATION OFFERING PLENTY OF POTENTIAL WITH NO CHAIN INVOLVED"
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £90,000 - £100,000 FANTASTIC FIRST TIME BUYER OR INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - THIS PROPERTY IS TO BE PURCHASED VACANT AND HAS NO CHAIN INVOLVED"
"BEAUTIFUL DETACHED FAMILY HOME - OFF-STREET PARKING - FANTASTIC REAR GARDEN - EN SUITE AND FAMILY BATHROOM Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this wonderful three bed detached home on the quiet Coppice View, located off Spring Bank West, close to well regarded s..."
"The Property is on a modern development, this well presented 3 bedroom detached house is an ideal family home offering, entrance hall, lounge, kitchen,cloakroom, bathroom, driveway, low maintenance garden backing onto fields situated in a cul de sac.
Viewing Recommended"
2 Storey 7 bedroom HMO HMO License granted Historic Tenancies available in order to prove permitted rights to be used as HMO as per Planning Directive art. 4 2 full bathrooms 1 kitchen with two sets of facilities Mains wired interlinked fire detection Large separate living...
"WHAT A STUNNER! This beautiful three bed two bath detached house has been vastly improved by the current owners to offer 'move in' condition throughout! New kitchen, windows, décor, floorings, bathroom, kitchen and En-suite, there is nothing to do but bring your belongings! Ideal for ..."
"Inviting offers between £220,000 - £230,000"
"This 6 bedroom period property that showcases many original features, is a fantastic investment opportunity. The master bedroom accommodates an en-suite, with the property lying on a popular location of Princes Avenue close to local amenities! Viewing is a MUST to see this properties true bea..."
"There are townhouses but there is only one Barcelona/Madrid. An outstanding, luxurious three bedroom home that demands attention."
"STUNNING! Take a look at this modern, move in, three bedroom semi-detached home! Gorgeous décor throughout, you will need to view to appreciate the space on offer! Master bedroom with En-suite facilities, cloakroom/Wc and open plan lounge/dining and kitchen with a range of integral applia..."
** Detached Deceptively Spacious Home Sold With No Forward Chain ** Three/Four Bedrooms With The Potential Office/Playroom/Snug/Extra Bedroom Downstairs ** With a Through Lounge Diner and Conservatory To The Rear ** Large Family Breakfast Kitchen ** Huge Potential For Another ...
Popular Location Within A Cul De Sac No Forward Chain Detached Two Bedroom Bungalow With Single Garage and Private Rear Garden Conservatory To The Rear Shower Room With Double Shower Enclosure Close To Bus Routes and Pickering Park Viewing Is Highly Recommended ...
"Beautifully presented three bedroomed detached family home situated overlooking an area of public open space, in close proximity to an abundance of local shopping and recreational facilities together with well regarded schooling and excellent transportation links. The property property briefl..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £210,000 ** ****NEW TO THE MARKERT**** This well presented Three/Four bedroom semi-detached property make a perfect family home.
|It is tucked away at the end of a cul-de-sac jus off the Beverly High Road close to local schools, amenities and Kingswood retail Park and ..."
"A wonderfully presented three bedroom semi detached family home located within an ever popular development. This property has been extended to the rear creating a versatile and spacious home. Stunning Kitchen and Shower Room, fitted bedrooms and flexible accommodation. One not to be missed."
"DO NOT MISS OUT!!!! Detached bungalows on the ever popular Victoria Dock very rarely become available and we don't expect we will have this one for long, so please register your interest early to avoid disappointment. Immaculately maintained and presented throughout!"
"LOVELY, THREE BED FAMILY HOME - LIVING SPACE IN ABUNDANCE - POPULAR AREA Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this lovely, three bedroom semi-detached home. Situated on Chanterlands Avenue, this property finds itself well placed for a plethora of local amenities, sho..."
"Inviting offers between £220,000-£230,000 Heavily extended semi-detached home in a popular location with off street parking, this charming home boasts a spacious ground floor extension offering a modern open plan living and kitchen area measuring 21 feet."
*TRULY UNIQUE PROPERTY*SITUATED ON CORNER PLOT*CURRENT OWNER HAS EXTENDED & IMPROVED FAMILY HOME OVER NUMBER OF YEARS*NURTURED & WELL MAINTAINED*3 RECEPTIONS*LOFT CONVERSION*CONSERVATORY*GARAGE*UTILITY*PRIVATE GARDEN WITH MATURE SHRUBS*RARELY AVAILABLE*
"INVESTMENT PROPERTY FOR SALE Tenanted investment property for sale in Hull's most prestigious building, The Glass House offers the most contemporary living to all it's residents, offering stunning south facing views of Queen's Gardens, the best of open-plan living, on-site gymnasium, din..."
** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** A rare opportunity has arisen for the growing family to acquire this sizeable four bedroom end terrace home which is situated in a popular residential location renowned for falling into the catchment area of prestigious schooling and its proximity to local amenities...
"OUTSTANDING THREE BED TRUE BUNGALOW - WONDERFUL CORNER PLOT - OFF STREET PARKING AND GARAGE Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this outstanding, three bed true bungalow. Situated on Evergreen Drive, this property is ideally placed for amenities with shops, supermar..."
"This LUXURY APARTMENT forms part of an excellent purpose built complex set in its own LANDSCAPED GARDENS in a highly regarded area, well placed for a host of amenities. HIGH QUALITY FITTINGS and particularly spacious. Includes CONTEMPORARY KITCHEN. A balcony overlooks the gardens. There is also a..."
"EXCELLENT LOCATION.. Modern open plan living.. This three bed end townhouse boasts a Victoria Dock location close to the City Centre, quiet riverside walks and the vibrant Fruit Market with plenty of restaurants and bars. Victoria Dock always attracts a huge amount of interest so dont delay an..."
"Lovelle are delighted to offer for sale this fabulous three bedroom property, with a recent kitchen extension of dreams! Boasting an Open plan living kitchen diner with desirable island, Quartz work tops and Bi-fold doors onto the garden, as well as separate lounge and utility. Externally, the..."
"Inviting offers between £215,000-£225,000"
House + Love = Home
WELL DECORATED SEMI-DETACHED HOME OCCUPYING AN EXCELLENT CORNER PLOT ON THE POPULAR VICTORIA DOCK! - HUGE WEST FACING REAR GARDEN - OFF-STREET PARKING - NO CHAIN! This semi-detached home would be perfect for a family looking for a home that is ready to move into. The property is situated...
"Prepare to be amazed, this gorgeous three bed semi-detached house has been vastly improved by the current owners to offer 'move in' condition. The also property has planning permission for a double storey extension, allowing scope for further alterations if desired. To the ground floor ..."
"OUTSTANDING THREE BED SEMI - MODERN THROUGHOUT - SUPERB BRICK BUILT GARDEN ROOM Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this outstanding three bed, semi-detached home. Situated within the East Riding part of Kendal Way, this property is ideally placed for amenities with..."
This wonderful three bedroom semi-detached property is located on an ever popular development within the village of Anlaby. Sitting on a generous plot with a fantastic rear garden including an entertainment area. Flexible and modern living style with a stunning dining kitchen and a contemporary b...
This is one most definitely NOT to miss! This modern semi-detached house is offered with no chain! Stylish elevations throughout with THREE Bedrooms. Cul-de-sac Location and great popular position!
"The home of great value! The four bedroom Longford boasts a large living room leading from a separate entrance hall, taking you to a stunning contemporary kitchen-dining area with French doors opening onto the rear garden. There is also a useful utility room and WC to the downstairs s..."
£750 towards legal fees. Turf to rear. Flooring package. Appliance package. .£750 towards legal fees. Turf to rear. Flooring package. Appliance package. T&C's apply.
This stunning three bedroom property has been extensively remodelled and renovated to create a modern home perfect for a family. Presented to the highest of standards throughout with a fabulous open plan living/dining kitchen which is the hub of this superb property. A cosy living room with cast ...
"Located in a quiet, end of cul-de-sac position is this well presented 2 bedroom detached true bungalow with driveway, garage and a west facing rear garden. The property has been much improved and well maintained by the current owners and incudes gas central heating (modern Ideal Boiler), uPVC dou..."
Don't delay in viewing this substantial semi detached family home in this highly sought after tree lined Garden Village avenue.
"++ STAR BUY, TRY THIS ONE FOR SIZE AND QUALITY WITHOUT COMPROMISING ON A FIRST CLASS LOCATION! ++ FABULOUS THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM/THREE BATHROOM FAMILY HOME OFFERING BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED ACCOMMODATION ARRANGED OVER THREE-FLOORS ++ SITUATED WITHIN A PRESTIGIOUS DEVELOPMENT BUILT BY DAVID WILSON HOM..."
***AN AMAZING OPPORTUNITY TO OWN A GREAT FAMILY HOME THAT BACKS ON EAST PARK- DON'T DELAY!!***
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £210,000 - £215,000 SMART MOVE-IN CONDITION THREE BEDROOM HOUSE - FURTHER LOFT AREA VIA FIXED STAIRCASE - GARAGE PLUS OFF-ROAD PARKING - GAS CENTRAL HEATING - UPVC DOUBLE GLAZING - CLOSE TO LOCAL SHOPS, TRANSPORT AND SCHOOLS"
++ EPC GRADE D ++ COUNCIL TAX BAND C ++ TWO BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW WITH A CONSERVATORY ++ ORIGINALLY BUILT AS A THREE BEDROOM ++ OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO CHAIN ++ A WONDERFUL OPPORTUNITY NOT TO BE MISSED ++ SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION ++ CLOSE TO KINGSWOOD RETAIL PARK ++ OFFERING SO MUCH MORE THAN...
"A substantial sized four bed semi-detached house! Requiring a degree of updating, this spacious home offers potential! Situated in this desirable, sought after residential location with sought after schools in walking distance, East park and a wealth of amenities. Chain free, two rece..."
**VIEWING SLOTS AVAILABLE FROM SUNDAY 4TH DECEMBER** New to the market is this well presented modern 2 bedroom bungalow in a lovely move into condition. The rear garden is west facing and is low maintenance. It has a Mediterranean style to it with mature plants and shrubs and also...
"*** REDUCED TO £210,000.00 - MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! 3 BEDROOM MID TERRACE - IDEAL FOR YOUNG / GROWING FAMILIES, NOT TO BE MISSED, spacious accommodation, gas central heating / double glazing, living room, modern kitchen diner, ..."
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Situated in the heart of the Anlaby village and benefitting from proximity to local amenities and leisure facilities, this three bedroom semidetached property is ideal for the growing family seeking to reside in a home that they can add their own stamp onto which al..."
"Inviting offers between £210,000-£230,000 A FABULOUS THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY SET IN THIS EXTREMELY POPULAR LOCATION WITHIN THE FANTASTIC VICTORIA DOCK DEVELOPMENT"
++ THIS FABULOUS THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM/TWO BATHROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME HAS A GREAT DEAL TO OFFER ++ SITUATED WITHIN A PRESTIGIOUS DEVELOPMENT BUILT BY CHARLES CHURCH AND IDEALLY PLACED TO EMERGE YOURSELF INTO ALL THAT KINGSWOOD HAS TO OFFER ++ MODERN AND STYLISH ACCOMMODATION ARRANGED OVER ...
"A large 3 bedroom semi-detached family home within easy reach of all the amenities Kingswood has to offer. Summary The property briefly comprises impressive entrance hall, lounge, kitchen/diner, downstairs WC, three good sized bedrooms to the first floor, an en-suite and a family bathro..."
ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS - RARELY AVAILABLE - HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - END TERRACE Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic 3 bed end terraced property in the heart of HU5 on the highly desirable Ella Street. This property is perfectly placed fo...
"Large 5 bedroom house located off Newland Avenue within a 2 minute walk to Sainsburys and 15 minutes to the University of Hull. The property features a large lounge, modern kitchen, 6 bedrooms and 2 bathrooms."
"***IT'S A BEAUTY, BLINK AND YOU WILL MISS IT!!! - TAKE A LOOK AT THE GARAGE TOO, NO WORRIES ABOUT PARKING WITH THIS EXCEPTIONAL PROPERTY!!!***"
STUNNING 3 STOREY PROPERTY - SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - GENEROUS REAR GARDEN Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this delightful 3 bed semi detached family home situated on the east Hull development of Kingswood close to well regarded schools and a host of local ame...
NOT TO BE MISSED - a Stunning THREE DOUBLE BED townhouse with THREE BATHROOMS and generous living accommodation. This beautifully designed house also features garden views from the first floor balcony. Quietly tucked away boasting an excellent Kingswood Location which is within easy reach of t...
"*** ONE YOU WILL NOT WANT TO MISS & NO CHAIN INVOLVED ***. Modern double fronted detached house on the popular Boothferry Park Halt development, situated on a good plot with tandem drive and good size rear garden with the potential of creating more off road parking with alterations to the fence. ..."
"***REDUCED TO £210,000, NO CHAIN *** MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! 3 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME, NOT TO BE MISSED, spacious accommodation, WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT, modern kitchen, living room, downstairs wc, good size bedroo..."
*EXTENDED 3 BED SEMI-DETACHED *ESTABLISHED LOCATION *AMAZING CONTEMPORARY DINING/LIVING KITCHEN WITH BI-FOLDS & ROOF LANTERN* 2nd FLOOR LOFT ROOM* * LOUNGE WITH FEATURE BAY*FAMILY BATHROOM & SEPARATE EN-SUITE*GARAGE & SOUTH FACING GARDEN*PARKING FOR 2 CARS *HIGHLY REGARDED PRIMARY/SECONDARY SCHOOLS.
"*No stamp duty to pay on this home* Introducing the Joiner, a beautiful new home benefiting from an open-plan kitchen/dining area with french doors to the rear garden, a separate living room, two double bedrooms and a modern family bathroom."
"++ STAR BUY, THIS IS BY FAR THE MOST COMPETITIVELY PRICED FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE ON THE POPULAR CASTLE GARAGE DEVELOPMENT - GRAB A BRAGAIN! ++ THIS BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED FOUR BEDROOM/TWO BATHROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME CHOICE CUL-DE-SAC POSITION ++ ESTABLISHED PLOT TOGETHER WITH DRIVEWAY AND G..."
"Home Estates are pleased to offer to the market, this truly fine example of a period property. The internal accommodation has many characterful features and additional fixtures and fittings...."
"Beautifully presented and substantially extended end of terrace family home, situated in close proximity to an abundance of local shopping and recreational facilities, schooling and excellent transportation links. The accommodation, which is arranged over three storeys, briefly comprises..."
"A rare opportunity has arisen to acquire this spacious four bedroom mid terrace family home which is situated in the highly sought after Anlaby village, renowned for boasting proximity to prestigious local schools, leisure and shopping facilities. The property, which has been enhanced f..."
"This extended two bed semi-detached true bungalow is situated in a much sought-after location in Anlaby Common, well placed to access Anlaby shopping retail park with its wide range of shops and amenities it has to offer. The property has been well maintained throughout and briefly compr..."
"This modern three bedroom townhouse is situated in a popular cul-de-sac location within Hessle. Boasting accommodation spread across three floors with a fabulous dining kitchen, cloakroom, storage cupboard and access to the integral garage to the ground floor. Generous living room, double bedroom..."
++ THIS FABULOUS THREE BEDROOM/TWO BATHROOM DETACHED HOUSE HAS DESIRABILITY WRITTEN ALL OVER IT ++ ENJOYING A CHOICE CUL-DE-SAC POSITION IDEALLY PLACED TO EMERGE YOURSELF INTO ALL THAT KINGSWOOD HAS TO OFFER ++ EXTREMELY WELL PRICED WITH NO CHAIN INVOLVED ++ 19 FOOT SITTING ROOM ++ WELL FITTED KI...
WELL PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN A POPULAR LOCATION OFFERED TO THE MARKET WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN
"SAVE £6,000 - WAS £210,995 - NOW £204,995. Flooring package. £750 towards legal fees. Turf to rear. Appliance package. £350 monthly mortgage contributions for a whole year!. .SAVE £6,000 - WAS £210,995 - NOW £204,995. Flooring package. £750 towards legal fees. Turf to rear. Appliance package. £35..."
"Asking Price: £200,000 A great size three bedroom bungalow in the sought after and rarely available area of Bilton. Boasting a large driveway with parking for multiple vehicles, and access to a garage at the rear for off street parking. Additionally comprising a very spacious open-plan l..."
++ A FABULOUS OPPORTUNITY! ++ FOUR BEDROOMS ++ CONSERVATORY ++ THIS ICONIC PROPERTY OFFERS HANDSOME POTENTIAL TO CREATE A HOME TO SUIT YOUR OWN TASTES AND REQUIREMENTS WITHIN SUCH A POPULAR LOCATION ++ SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION WITH CHARACTER IN ABUNDANCE ++ ESTABLISHED GARDENS ++ GARAGE ++ NO CHAI...
***LOOKING FOR A SPACIOUS HOME??? THEN LOOK NO FURTHER- 4 BEDROOMS- 3 BATHROOMS- A GARAGE AND A LOVELY GARDEN- ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING TODAY!!!***
"Lovelle are delighted to offer onto the market this fabulous terrace property located close to Hull Marina! Situated within walking distance of the bustling Humber Street, with its eclectic mix of bars, restaurants and shops, this unique property is ready to move straight into! Having recently..."
"***Guide Price £200,000 - £220,000 plus Reservation Fee***
"
"OFFERS OVER £200,000 BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED DETACHED HOME SET IN A CUL DE SAC LOCATION WITH OFF STREET PARKING AND GARAGE, CALL NOW TO AVOID DISAPPOINTMENT."
"NEW INSTRUCTION OFFERED TO THE MARKET AT A GUIDE PRICE £200,000 to £205,000 DO NOT DELAY A VIEWING IS JUST A CLICK AWAY. Looking for a beautiful family home, move in ready? This could be the one. The property briefly comprises entrance hall, Lounge dining room, kitchen, first floor landing three ..."
"Home Estates are pleased to offer to the market, this lovely, traditional end of terrace, Dukeries property. The accommodation is arranged to two floors and briefly comprises of an entrance hall,..."
"Check out this beautifully presented property! Recently refurbished and would make a fantastic family home! Briefly offering a generous sized lounge/diner, cloakroom and kitchen to the ground floor. 3 double bedrooms and family bathroom to the first floor. Rear garden and large garage. Fab lo..."
***CIRCLE THIS PROPERTY AND ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING TODAY!!! - 3 BED SEMI- DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE- 2 RECEPTION ROOMS- SOUGHT AFTER JAMES RECKITT LOCATION -A GREAT BUY!!!***
This 3 bedroom semi-detached house is in a sought after 'Avenues' location. The property has an open plan lounge dining area and off street parking with local amenities just a short walk away.
"Vacant Possession & No Chain Involved *** Deceptively spacious and well presented, extended end terraced house. *** Comprising; entrance hall, lounge, open plan dining kitchen (integrated fridge and freezer) plus additional reception room/garden room, looking out and leading to rear garden. From..."
"We have a particular soft spot for this luxury three bedroom townhouse as it was the first ever Strata design to come off the drawing board. Barring a few tweaks it has never lost its popularity. Fluid, seamless design with a beautiful loft master suite: loved by everyone."
"GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £220,000 Detached Bungalow with - Entrance Porch, Entrance Hall, Lounge, Fitted Kitchen, Conservatory, 2 Double Bedrooms, Family Bathroom, Gardens, Off Street Parking & Garage - Book your viewing today!"
"This deceptively spacious three bed property has been altered and enhanced from its original design, perfect for the growing family looking to be in this ever popular location in Anlaby Common. The main features include - entrance, front lounge, dining room and extended fitted kitchen wi..."
" This beautifully present property is now available! Mid-terraced with garage and allocated parking slot. Briefly offering entrance hall, cloakroom and kitchen/diner to the ground floor. Lounge, bathroom and bedroom to the first floor. 2 bedrooms, en-suite and WC to the second floor. Locate..."
"***Guide Price £200,000-£225,000 plus Reservation Fee***
"
This Superb Cottage Style True Bungalow Which Has Been Greatly Improved By The Current Owners And Internally Inspection Is Highly Recommended
"Inviting offers between £200,000-£210,000 FANTASTIC FAMILY ACCOMMODATION AT AN EXCELLENT PRICE OFF STREET PARKING FOR TWO CARS AND CLOSE TO AMENITIES!!!"
***TAKE A LOOK AT THIS 3 BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY WITH USABLE LOFT SPACE- A MODERN FITTED KITCHEN- TWO RECEPTION ROOMS-SINGLE GARAGE- NO CHAIN INVOLVED-DON'T DELAY CALL AND ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING TODAY!!!***
"SIMPLY WOW STUNNING VICTORIAN TERRACE This impressive, beautifully presented house on a tree-lined Boulevard has not to be missed. The house, which is fitted with gas central heating, is set out over three floors. The ground floor comprises spauious, entrance hall, an open plan lounge/sit..."
"Located in a picturesque village location with excellent links to Leeds, York and Hull, The Milton is a beautiful new 2 bedroom home featuring a spacious living room with french doors to the rear garden, a modern fitted kitchen plus two double bedrooms. "
"A perfect opportunity to acquire an appealing, generously proportioned semi detached house, with lovely vistas to the rear. The property has undergone a series of extensive work recently to inclu..."
This three bedroom semi detached property has recently undergone professional extensions and is ideal for the growing family! Presented to a high standard throughout and is in move in condition! Situated in the heart of garden village! Benefiting from having off street parking to the garage!
Ask us about our EasyMove scheme to help you sell your current home so you can buy new. .Ask us about out EasyMove scheme to help you sell your current home so you can buy new. T&C's apply.
Flooring package. £750 towards legal fees. Appliance package. Turf to rear garden. .Flooring package. £750 towards legal fees. Appliance package. Turf to rear garden. T&C's apply.
Buy with just a 5% deposit with the Deposit Unlock scheme (T*C's apply)..Buy with just a 5% deposit with the Deposit Unlock scheme (T*C's apply).T&C's apply.
" Impressive three bedroom semi detached property offered for sale with no onward chain, located in the ever popular Victoria Dock area of Hull. Having been recently refurbished, the property is immaculately presented and boasts a newly fitted kitchen, new carpets and flooring throughout, an enc..."
This detached bungalow provides attractive accommodation and gardens which are comfortably manageable together with a single garage and parking. Part of a small cul-de-sac off Cawthorne Drive opposite Pickering Park.
"Three bedrooms, Great condition, Easy access to the centre, coast & countryside, Good-sized garden, No Chain, Searches available upfront"
"GUIDE PRICE £195,000 - £210,000 CHECK OUT VIDEO!!! FORMERLY TWO BEDROOMS NOW A HUGE ONE-BEDROOM APARTMENT WITH AN OUTSTANDING LIVING/DINING AND KITCHEN AREA, SOUTH FACING SUN PATIO IN ONE OF THE MOST STUNNING PERIOD BUILDINGS IN THE AREA!!!"
"An opportunity to acquire a 6 bedroom student investment property is 1.5 miles from Hull University, fully let at £20,592 per annum excl."
"This three double bedroom mid terraced property is deceptively spacious and is perfect for the growing family! In move in condition! With recently fitted modern kitchen! Situated in this popular residential area close by to local shops, amenities and excellent bus routes to the city centre!"
"Two bedroom semi detached bungalow, occupying a pleasant cul de sac position off Normanton Rise. Offered for sale with No Forward Chain, the accommodation comprises:- Side entrance hall, front facing lounge and kitchen, two rear facing bedrooms and a shower room. Outside, there are garden areas t..."
"++ PRESENTED WITH GREAT TASTE AND STYLE, THIS GORGEOUS THREE BEDROOM THREE-STOREY SEMI DETACHED CONTEMPORARY HOME IS FINISHED TO THE HIGHEST STANDARD! ++ TASTEFULLY RECONFIGURED WITH A HUGE OPEN PLAN SITTING ROOM/KITCHEN EXTENDING TO 25 FEET IN LENGTH ++ THE ENTIRE SECOND FLOOR HOSTS A LUXURIOUS ..."
"Inviting offers between £195,000-£205,000 This beautiful and unique three-bedroom family home is located on Larard Avenue, a perfect sought-after area for families. It offers a spacious living room to the front, hallway with WC, and snug located off the hallway and kitchen."
"Offered For Sale With No Chain Involved, This Modern Semi Detached House Located In This Sought After Location For Both Primary And Secondary Schooling"
"Great investment oppurtunity! A commercial unit fully fitted out to be a takeaway with tenants paying £600pcm. It has a rear garden also with gates and room to fit a vechile in. A 4 bed flat sits above the shop with two sittings tenants paying £600 PCM combined, if the flat ..."
"*** NEW INSTRUCTION, MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! - FREE MORTGAGE ADVICE AVAILABLE ON THIS PROPERTY. LOVELY 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY, NOT TO BE MISSED, IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS / YOUNG FAMILIES, spacious accommodation, WELL PRES..."
"SAVE £5,000 - WAS £197,995 - NOW £192,995. Flooring package. £750 towards legal fees. Turf to rear. Appliance package. £4,000 towards mortgage subsidy. .SAVE £5,000 - WAS £197,995 - NOW £192,995Flooring package. £750 towards legal fees. Turf to rear. Appliance package. £350 monthly mortgage contr..."
"SAVE £5,000 - WAS £197,995 - NOW £192,995. Flooring package. £750 towards legal fees. Turf to rear. Appliance package. £4,000 towards mortgage subsidy. .SAVE £5,000 - WAS £197,995 - NOW £192,995Flooring package. £750 towards legal fees. Turf to rear. Appliance package. £4,000 towards mortgage sub..."
"SAVE £5'000 - WAS £195,995 - NOW £190,995. .SAVE £5'000 - WAS £195,995 - NOW £190,995. T&C's apply."
"Modern, presented to the highest standard, ready to move into immediately - simply perfect for first time buyers, people looking to downsize or equally for those simply looking to have a change of home, Purple Bricks are delighted to offer 34 Lumley Avenue to the open market, situated on the ever..."
Constructed in 2022 is this three storey family house finished to a high specification and occupying a prime site on this new development.
"Superb, Spacious, this beautiful home requires a little TLC, yet potential! Chain free! Situated in a very sought after highly regarded location within popular school catchments, ideal for the growing family! With generous rear garden, garage, off road parking, and open views to the rear!..."
BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED - THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS - GENEROUS REAR GARDEN - IDEAL FAMILY HOME Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic three bed semi detached property. Located off Spring Bank close to well regarded schools and local amenities with good trans...
**STUNNING FAMILY HOME WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN** Located on the much sought after Kingswood development 
"Must be viewed to be fully appreciated - TAKE A LOOK AT THE 3D TOUR *** NO CHAIN INVOLVED *** Traditional style semi-detached house comprising entrance hall, open plan lounge diner and modern style fitted kitchen to the ground floor. From the first floor landing are three bedrooms and modern styl..."
"THIS WONT HANG AROUND FOR LONG. Smart three bed semi, extended and a generous conservatory extension. An early viewing is strongly advised."
"A fabulous opportunity to own a spacious TWO Bedroom First Floor Apartment in this highly desirable area, offering a modern, well equipped and maintained property with neutral decor, an abundance of storage, own private entrance and external rear balcony overlooking the well-trimmed communal gar..."
"Inviting Offers Between £190,000 - £200,000"
"Lovelle are delighted to offer onto the market this traditional three bedroom semi-detached house, close to the well regarded Rokeby Park Primary School and Sirius Academy West. The property has benefitted from a number of upgrades over the years, including the addition of a new driveway and f..."
"++ OFFERING SO MUCH MORE THAN FIRST GLANCE SUGGEST, THIS EXCEPTIONAL SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME HAS DESIRABILITY WRITTEN ALL OVER IT ++ SIGNIFICANTLY EXTENDED AND RECONFIGURED TO PROVIDE SO MUCH SPACE FOR FAMILY LIVING ++ MODERN AND STYLISH ++ FABULOUS 19 FOOT COMBINED KITCHEN/BREAKFAST ROOM ++ TH..."
Brought to the market with NO CHAIN involved! This three bedroom semi detached property is situated in the desirable area of Western Gailes Way at the head of a cul-de-sac. Close by to local schools and Wilberforce Sixth Form.
Detached Three Bedroom Family Home With Garage and Driveway Conservatory Added to the Rear Popular Established Residential Location Close to Sibelius School and Supermarket At the Head Of A Quiet Cul-De Sac Close To Road Links For Beverley Bypass and Kingswood Retail Park 
Attractive Family Home With Recently Installed Stunning Kitchen With Quartz Worktops Located Off Summergroves Way Popular Residential Area Spacious Three Bedrooms Large Lounge and Dining Room and Added Conservatory Driveway and Single Garage Not Overlooked And Situated To...
Stunning Family Home With Master Ensuite Top Floor Bedroom Suite Three Storey Spacious Bedrooms And Study Area Double Driveway To the Front Popular Residential Location To Schools and Amenities Beautiful Modern Home With Modern Decor Throughout
"Offers in Excess of £190,000 A modern three bedroom semi-detached property with a front driveway providing access to parking, a beautiful rear garden, and delightful neutral decor throughout. The property is both ready to move into and perfect for families. Comprising to the ground floor..."
Stunning Views From This Incredibly Spacious Apartment With Huge Living Space Two Double Bedrooms With Fitted Wardrobes Master Bedroom With Balcony and En Suite Full Length Balcony Overlooking The Rose Bowl Queens Gardens No Onward Chain Parking Included Share of Th...
"A three bedroomed semi-detached house with gardens, parking and a garage with no onward chain involved."
"*** TAKE A LOOK AT THE 3D TOUR *** Traditional style Semi-detached house, well presented and spacious through-out. Comprising; entrance porch, hall, two reception rooms, luxury modern fitted kitchen with integrated and fitted appliances and rear lobby area with utility area complete with integrat..."
"Inviting Offers Between £190,000-£200,000 BEAUTIFUL SEMI-DETACHED TRADITIONAL PROPERTY REQUIRING COSMETIC UPGRADE - GENEROUS GARDEN WITH OFF STREET PARKING AND GARAGE - OFFERED TO THE MARKET WITH NO CHAIN INVOLVED"
++ THIS TRULY IMMACULATE THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME HAS DESIRABILITY WRITTEN ALL OVER IT ++ SIGNIFICANTLY IMPROVED AND ENHANCED ++ ENJOYING A CHOICE POSITION OPPOSITE A CHILDREN'S PLAYPARK AND WITHIN STRIKING DISTANCE OF A WELL REGARDED PRIMARY SCHOOL ++ ONE OF HULL’S MOST DESI...
++ COMPARE THIS ONE FOR SIZE AND QUALITY! ++ THIS TASTEFUL AND IMMACULATE THREE BEDROOM/TWO BATHROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME CANNOT FAIL TO IMPRESS ++ MASSIVELY IMPROVED FOLLOWING CONSIDERABLE INVESTMENT ++ BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED ++ 21 FOOT SITTING/DINING ROOM ++ FABULOUS CONSERVATORY ++ LUXURY ...
"***NO CHAIN*** Lovelle are delighted to offer on to the market this fantastic detached three bedroom family home, on the popular Summergroves development. Offering spacious living accommodation throughout, the property benefits from a modern Kitchen Dining room, downstairs WC, large garden and..."
"The home of great value! The Brandon is a stunning three bedroom home perfectly designed for modern living. Benefitting from a beautiful kitchen-diner with French doors out to your own garden, a separate living room and downstairs WC this home has everything you need and more. Upstair..."
"£4,000 cashback upon completion. Flooring package. £750 towards legal fees. Appliance package. Turf to rear garden. .£4,000 cashback upon completion. Flooring package. £750 towards legal fees. Appliance package. Turf to rear garden. T&C's apply."
Ask us how you can buy your new home with just a 5% deposit using the Deposit Unlock scheme. .Ask us how you can buy your new home with just a 5% deposit using the Deposit Unlock scheme. T&C's apply.
"Superb, detached bungalow! We are delighted to bring to the market, this beautiful bungalow, offered with no chain involved! This two-bed detached bungalow is situated in this very sought-after location, within a quiet residential cul-de-sac position, yet having amenities very close by in..."
"Situated on a generously proportioned plot and boasting fantastic room sizes throughout, this semi detached property enjoys a South facing rear garden, has ample off street parking, a large garage and offers scope for a buyer to add their stamp to it! "
"Situated on a highly sought after residential location, this two bedroom semi-detached bungalow is an ideal opportunity for anyone wishing to make the transition from a multi-storey property to a home primarily on the ground level and wishing to benefit from close proximity to transport links con..."
"Situated in a prime location on the ever-popular Willerby Road, this three-bedroom family home boasts proximity to local amenities and leisure facilities with transport links that lead to and from the city centre and surrounding villages. Briefly comprises recess porch, entrance hall, s..."
"William H Brown Estate Agents are proud to offer to the market this fantastic upcoming new development of terraced and semi-detached homes situated off James Reckitt Avenue, Hull."
"PREPARE TO BE AMAZED! This stunning extended three bed semi-detached house has so much more to offer! Perfect for working from home, with fully equipped studio office or extra accommodation with annexe, for family! Double garage to the rear, ample off road parking to the front, and ..."
"A lovely three bedroom mid terrace family home, situated on the popular Cottesmore Road in Hessle, within easy access of all the amenities Hessle town has to offer. The property has gas central heating, double glazing and briefly comprises, entrance porch and hall, lounge, dining room/separate si..."
"New to the market is this beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached house, situated on the border of Hull in the sought after location of Anlaby Common, East Riding of Yorkshire.  This modern property is perfectly situated on a secluded road of private houses which were ..."
Brought to the market with NO CHAIN INVOLVED! This stunning three bedroom town house is arranged over three floors! Situated in this tucked away cul-de-sac location. Ideal for the growing family! Benefiting from having spacious accommodation throughout and having parking to the garage / driveway!
***SUPERB MARINA APARTMENT - STUNNINGLY DESIGNED AND READY TO MOVE INTO - TWO BEDROOMS - TWO BATHROOM AND PARKING - VIEW IMMEDIATELY***
"OUTSTANDING THREE BED SEMI - LOVELY ORANGERY - MODERN KITCHEN Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this outstanding three bedroom, semi detached home. Situated on Brompton Park, Kingswood, this property is ideally located for local amenities with shops, supermarkets..."
"INVITING OFFERS IN THE REGION OF £185,000 Beautifully presented town house, with off street parking and garage, two newly refurbished bathrooms, newly installed boiler plus conservatory to the rear, call now to avoid disappointment."
"A beautiful designed three bedroom home. Spacious, confident and well-proportioned throughout."
"LOVELY THREE BEDROOM END HOUSE - POPULAR KINGSWOOD LOCATION - OFF STREET PARKING FOR TWO VEHICLES - MODERN THROUGHOUT Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this lovely, three bedroom, end of terrace home. Situated on Pools Brook Park, this property is ideally located ..."
"Deceptively spacious! This home is a clear example of 'do not judge a home by its appearance'! Three floors of living! This much improved, modern home has been updated by the current owner to offer 'move in' standards throughout! Situated in a very desirable, residential location with..."
"Inviting Offers Between £185,000 - £190,000"
GUIDE £185K to £190k**NO CHAIN*SUPER 2 BED SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW* REFURBISHED TO INCLUDE RE-WIRE & NEW BOILER/HEATING SYSTEM*BRAND NEW FITTED KITCHEN WITH APPLIANCES*CONTEMPORARY BATHROOM WITH SHOWER & MODERN TILING*LARGE LOUNGE*2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS*QUIET STREET*GARAGE & BASE*PRIVATE GARDEN & DRIVEWAY
*NEW TO THE MARKET*SUPERB FAMILY HOME*POPULAR WEST HULL LOCATION * RARELY AVAILABLE* WELL-PRESENTED 3 BED/3 STOREY* OPEN ASPECT TO FRONT*MODERN DINING KITCHEN*2nd FLOOR MASTER SUITE WITH EN-SUITE BATHROOM*DOUBLE BEDROOMS*GARAGE & GARDEN *10 MINS DRIVE OF HULL CITY CENTRE *A MUST VIEW!
An extremely spacious contemporary apartment in a superb residential area.
"Wigwam Homes are delighted to present to the market this beautiful three bedroom semi detached property on the popular Inglemire Lane. Perfect for first time buyers or a family home! Renovated to a very high standard making the property fresh, inviting, and ready to move into. Comprising a spacio..."
"BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED - FANTASTIC REAR GARDEN - HUGE GARAGE AND OFF-STREET PARKING - HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this sensational three bed end terraced property. Located on Ancaster Avenue, this property is ideally located for..."
"WOW! THIS IS YOUR DREAM HOME! Former show home! The Hadley, three bedroom, three storey home! Take a look at this stunning home, ideal for the growing family, turn the key house! Selling with no chain involved, and ALL FITTINGS & APPLIANCES! Perfect for 'Just move in'! Ideally..."
"Inviting offers between £180,000-£185,000"
"** MODERN AND EXTENDED FAMILY HOME WITH LOFT AREA WITH FIXED STAIRCASE ** Offering modern living accommodation in a ready to move in condition and smartly appointed throughout is this three bedroom family home, located in a prominent Anlaby location. Offering a blend of traditio..."
"WOW - this turn key property awaits its new owners, being on the first floor and providing great space and versatility which includes two reception rooms, modern fitted breakfast kitchen, two double bedrooms, one of which is fitted, and modern bathroom. Single garage and beautifully maintained c..."
"If you are looking for a very spacious property with lots of charm and character which has been updated with tasteful quality fixtures and fittings, this property will be perfect for you! A..."
"A lovely three bedroom semi detached house situated on the lovely tree lined Pickering Road with views over the Park and open aspects to the rear. The property has gas central heating, double glazing and briefly comprises entrance hall, through lounge incorporating dining area, fitted kitchen, la..."
++ A SUPERB THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME OF OUTSTANDING CHARACTER AND APPEAL ++ TRULY DELIGHTFUL 1920'S SEMI DETACHED HOUSE SITUATED WITHIN AN EXTREMELY DESIRABLE LOCATION ++ IMPRESSIVE FROM FIRST GLANCE ++ CONSIDERABLY IMPROVED AND ALTERED ++ TWO RECEPTION ROOMS PLUS A SPLENDID CONSERVATORY ++ QUAL...
"Inviting Offers Between £180,000 - £190,000 BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED DETACHED HOME - CUL-DE-SAC POSITION - MODERN INTERIOR THROUGHOUT - NEW KITCHEN AND BATHROOM - CONVERTED GARAGE ALLOWING FOR EXTRA LIVING SPACE"
"A fabulous, spacious cottage situated in the sought after village of Sutton. Ideal for the growing family, the property has a through lounge/ dining room, gorgeous kitchen dining room and handy W.C. to the ground floor. The first floor has two double bedrooms and an outstanding bathroom ..."
"FOUR FULLY TENANTED FLATS/STUDIOS // FOUR UNITS // MORPETH STREET, HU3 1RF"
"WOW - Boasting a much LARGER than expected sheltered rear garden, this three bed semi detached with ample off road parking simply must be viewed. With a well appointed kitchen and a ground floor cloakroom this property will make a fantastic home for the new owners. "
"Viewing Essential to appreciate the standard of accommodation provided by this super home. Located in Heart of The Old Town, This Grade 2 Listed Building is the home for this Stunning City Centre Apartment. Call us today to book your viewing!"
"*** REDUCED TO £180,000, MUST BE VIEWED *** - 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME, PRICED TO SELL, NOT TO BE MISSED, to arrange a viewing please call our head office from 7am to 11pm today. 3 Bedroom Semi-detached family home, well presented spacious accommodation, IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME B..."
"6 bedroom HMO investment property - Popular location for students - Vacant since 2019 and being sold as seen - Subsidence issues at the property - Subsidence Report available THE PROPERTY COMPRISES OF: Entrance hallway, Bedroom 1; Bedroom 2; Living room; Kitchen/dining - two sets of fac..."
"***Guide Price £180,000  - £190,000 plus Reservation Fee***
"
"++ STAR BUY ++ LOCATED WITHIN ONE OF THE NEWEST PARTS OF KINGSWOOD, THIS BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME BOASTS CONTEMPORARY ELEVATIONS ++ STYLISH ACCOMMODATION COMPLETE WITH MANY FEATURES ++ FABULOUS KITCHEN/DINING ROOM WITH APPLIANCES ++ SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN ++..."
"Situated in this ever popular location, the property is close to local amenities and has fantastic transport links to the City centre."
A two bedroomed sem-detached house in the Victoria Dock area with off street parking and a garage.
Beautifully Presented Well Maintained Extended Family Home With Bespoke Fitted Kitchen Having The Benefit Of An Extensive Living Space with Living Room Opening To a Snug/Office and Then Dining Area Looking Onto a Stunning Garden All Bedrooms Fitted with Bedroom Furniture Attractive...
ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS - RARELY AVAILABLE - HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic 2 bed terraced property in the heart of HU5 on the highly desirable Ella Street. This property is perfectly placed for access to the un...
"Inviting offers between £180,000-£190,000"
"The home of great value! The Kilkenny is a beautiful three bedroom home perfect for modern living. A bright living room featuring a stunning exposed staircase leads through to an open-plan kitchen-diner, where French doors open onto the garden creating an flexible living space. Upstai..."
*SUPER SEMI-DETACHED 3 BED HOME*QUALITY FINISH THROUGHOUT*OPEN ASPECT TO REAR*MODERN LOUNGE & DINING KITCHEN*GOOD SIZED BEDROOMS WITH FITTED FURNITURE*AMAZING BATHROOM*LANDSCAPED GARDEN*PARKING & UNDER COVER AREA*QUIET STREET*MUST VIEW*
"We are delighted to offer onto the market this beautifully presented 3 Bedroom, bay-windowed, semi detached house which is offered with NO CHAIN INVOLVED. A wonderful family home benefiting from gas radiator central heating and uPVC double glazing and briefly comprising the following accommodati..."
"In an extremely popular location, only a short distance for access to Hessle's amenities and with supermarkets nearby, this modern semi is ideal. In a cul-de-sac position and, importantly, southerly to the rear, it has been enhanced from the original with the addition of a conservatory an..."
"This immaculate family home has undergone a full programme of refurbishment to a high standard, now offered to the market as move into condition in this much sought after location. The property briefly comprises - entrance hall with mood lighting and glass balustrade, front lounge with b..."
"CORNOR PLOT! This spacious three bedroom home has potential! Requiring a degree of updating, this house could be your 'forever home! Situated in a very desirable location in the East of the City, with very sought after schools nearby, GARAGE to the rear and drive, two reception rooms, the..."
"Looking to step onto the housing market or invest in your hard earnt cash? Look no further. This beautifully presented end terraced house has three bedrooms, a spacious lounge, modern kitchen, cloakroom, family bathroom, a low maintenance south facing rear garden and off street parking for two cars."
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £175,000-£185,000 BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM, THREE STOREY TOWN HOUSE OFFERED TO THE MARKET WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN - PREVIOUSLY BUILT BY BEAL HOMES."
"Stunning three bedroom semi-detached dormer bungalow! This lovely home will impress! Spacious, with three/two reception rooms, two bathrooms, and extended to the rear with conservatory! Much improved by the current owners to offer 'move in' condition! Situated on the ever sought a..."
++ A FABULOUS OPPORTUNITY! ++ THIS GREAT PROPERTY OFFERS HANDSOME POTENTIAL TO CREATE A HOME TO SUIT YOUR OWN TASTES AND REQUIREMENTS WITHIN SUCH AN ASPIRATIONAL LOCATION ++ CLOSE TO SUTTON VILLAGE AND LOCAL SHOPS ++ ALSO POPULAR FOR LOCAL SCHOOLS ++ SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION WITH CHARACTER IN ABUND...
"Three-bedroom mid-terrace home in Station Road, Hessle. Front garden with lawn and path to the front door. In excellent decorative order throughout. Ground floor - entrance to the hallway, downstairs cloakroom with w/c and hand basin, a large utility room which has a separate entran..."
"EXCLUSIVE CITY-CENTRE APARTMENTS - FINISHED TO THE HIGHEST STANDARD - SITUATED WITHIN A STUNNING BUILDING Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this brand new selection of high-end, city-centre 1 & 2-bedroom apartments. Situated in the heart of the City-Centre, this p..."
"FANTASTIC FAMILY HOME - EXCELLENT WILLERBY ROAD LOCATION - CONVERTED LOFT SPACE - GENEROUS REAR GARDEN Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this fantastic three bed home with converted loft space. Situated on Willerby Road, this property is located perfectly for well..."
"Superb location! This delightful, spacious two bed semi-detached bungalow is situated in the heart of Sutton village, with amenities and local transport a short stroll. Offered to the market with no chain involved. These bungalows are rarely available! With generous front and private ..."
"Offers over £175,000 WELL PRESENTED EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACE PROPERTY IN A POPULAR LOCATION OFFERED TO THE MARKET WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN"
"An opportunity to acquire a 7 bedroom student investment property 1.6 miles from Hull University campus. ERV when fully let £29,400 per annum"
"We are delighted to offer this superb three bedroom family home to the market. Situated within an ever popular location with good local facilities and amenities. This semi-detached property offers flexible and generous accommodation throughout. Benefitting from a lovely South facing rear garden, ..."
"Investment Property, 3 self contained apartments. This property has been sympathetically converted from a single dwelling into three self contained apartments all benefiting from their own utility supplies. The building is not listed but is in the St Andrews Ward Conservation Area. ..."
This 2 bed terraced property is a great first time buyer and investment opportunity alike. The property has the benefit of no chain and is in a great location close to local amenities.
"Great Location For Kingswood Village Centre And Walking Distance Of The Primary School, Making This Smart Townhouse A Ideal Purchase, So Don't Delay Request Your Viewing Today!!!"
"This spacious three bedroom semi-detached house is stunning! Situated in the rarely available location in a quiet residential cul-de-sac, the house is perfect for the growing family, offered to the market with no chain involved! Drive and garage, generous front and rear gardens, and in 'm..."
"No Onward Chain! This deceptively spacious family home has been altered and enhanced from its original design, extended to the rear, making this an ideal home for the growing family. The main features include - large entrance hallway, lounge with bay window and open plan to the ..."
" This beautifully presented semi-detached property is now available!Briefly comprises of lounge, dining area and kitchen to the ground floor. 3 bedrooms and family bathroom to the first floor. Rear garden, garage and drive way to the side aspect. Great transport links, close to many amenities an..."
"A beautiful designed three bedroom home. Spacious, confident, and well-proportioned throughout."
"This rarely available, first floor apartment, would make a great home or investment opportunity. In a popular location in Kirk Ella with single garage and parking, set in superb communal gardens. Two double bedrooms, lounge with balcony, study area, breakfast kitchen, modern bathroom - book your ..."
"This impressive four bedroom plus loft space mid terraced property is a perfect family home! Presented to in an immaculate standard throughout, this property benefits from having large accommodation and high quality fixtures & fittings."
"Detached single-storey building 2 large rooms, stores, office, kitchen & toilets Total accommodation c.210 sq m (2,260 sq ft) Site area c.0.115 ha (0.285 acres) Considered suited for a range of alternative uses or site redevelopment subject to consents"
"A beautiful three bedroom semi-detached property in Marfleet. With fantastic modern decoration throughout, downstairs WC, a large garden, and a stunning kitchen. Perfect for families and first time buyers thanks to its great location, and being ready to move into. Briefly comprising lounge, kitch..."
BEAUTIFUL THREE BED SEMI - GENEROUS REAR GARDEN AND OFF STREET PARKING - EN SUITE TO THE MASTER BEDROOM - MODERN BATHROOM AND KITCHEN Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this outstanding three bed semi-detached home. Situated on Pioneer Way within the popular Kingsw...
"This lovely, spacious semi-detached home has a rear double extension to offer a great family home. We strongly advise viewing to appreciate the space on offer! This well maintained home has been in the same family for many years, updated over the years to offer 'move in' condition! The p..."
"This luxury property is simply stunning and is unrivalled by the features it offers, the lavish bedrooms are out of this world, each having the most beautiful handmade, bespoke fitted furniture which creates a living experience like no other. Absolutely no expense has been spared in creating five ul"
"Situated off Springhead Avenue, off Willerby Road with - Entrance Hall, Lounge, Fitted Kitchen, 2 Bedrooms, Family Bathroom, Gardens, Off Street Parking & Garage - Call now and book your viewing!"
"A modern three bedroom end of terrace property that makes an ideal first home. Situated within a very sought after location close to local amenities and popular schools. With three well proportioned bedrooms, stunning dining kitchen, contemporary bathroom and a generous living space this propert..."
"PHENOMENAL FOUR BED SEMI DETACHED - IDEAL FAMILY HOME - ADVANTAGEOUS CORNER PLOT - NO ONWARD CHAIN Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this outstanding four bedroom family home. Located on Ryde Avenue off Clough Road, this property is ideally situated for a range ..."
"Inviting offer sbetween £170,000 - £180,000 - OFFERED WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN THIS LOVELY TRADITIONAL THREE BEDROOM SEMI IS SURE TO APPEAL TO THE GROWING FAMILY WITH LOTS OF SPACE BOTH INSIDE AND OUT"
"Inviting Offers Between £170,000 - £180,000 STUNNING FULLY RENOVATED, BRAND NEW INTERIOR THROUGHOUT INCLUDING NEW KITCHEN AND SHOWER ROOM WITH SOUTH FACING GARDEN AND BAR AREA - CALL NOW TO VIEW"
"NEW INSTRUCTION OFFERED TO THE MARKET AT A GUIDE PRICE OF £170,000 to £175,000 The property is currently tenanted until June 2023 The property briefly comprises, entrance hall, lounge, fitted kitchen, ground floor WC, landing, family bathroom, three first floor bedrooms, garden. The property is ..."
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £170,000-£180,000"
"This fabulously presented home has recently undergone a full renovation throughout and is now presented to the highest of standards. Enjoying an open plan style with versatile living space, with two reception rooms, a kitchen and utility/shower room to the ground floor. To the first floor there a..."
"Inviting offers between £170,000-£180,000 THREE BEDROOM THREE STOREY END TERRACE TOWN HOUSE WITH OFF STREET PARKING AND CORNER PLOT - CALL NOW TO AVOID DISAPPOINTMENT"
"SUPERB TWO BED SEMI - HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - HUGE REAR GARDEN AND GARAGE Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic two bed semi detached property. Located on The Ridings, just off Springhead Avenue, this property is ideally placed for a wealth of..."
"WOW! THIS IS YOUR DREAM HOME! Former show home! Take a look at this stunning 1st time buyers home or 'down sizers' turn the key house! Selling with no chain involved, and ALL FURNISHINGS, FITTINGS & APPLIANCES! Perfect for 'Just move in'! A ready made home! Ideally place for a..."
"***A FANTASTIC 3 BEDROOM TERRACE, SOUGHT-AFTER LOCATION, MODERN FITTED KITCHEN- NO CHAIN INVOLVED!!!***"
"A double fronted, three bedroom mid terraced property in need of some modernising but situated on the popular Well Lane in Willerby with open views to the front. The property has gas central heating, double glazing and briefly comprises entrance hall, lounge kitchen, downstairs bathroom, lan..."
A Modern End Townhouse Enjoying Two Parking Spaces Within This Popular Development With No Chain Involved
What a find! Presented to a very high standard with lovely kitchen and bathroom fittings and situated in this highly desirable residential location.
"Inviting offers between £170,000-£175,000"
"STUNNING 2 BED BUNGALOW - OPEN PLAN LIVING - OFF STREET PARKING - HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this outstanding two bed semi detached bungalow. Situated on Fieldside Garth, this property is ideally placed for amenities with shop..."
"Superb 'downsizer' or starter home! This gorgeous two double bed semi-detached house has the 'wow' factor! Beautiful, mature, private rear garden, garage and off road parking with driveway. Situated in a very desirable, sought after location in the East of the City within walking dist..."
"A three bedroom end terraced house which is situated on the popular Richmond Road in Hessle, close to all amenities that Hessle town has to offer. The property is in need of some updating but offers great sized family accommodation. It has the benefit of gas central heating, double glazing and br..."
"We are pleased to present this two-bedroom property located in Hull. The property consists of a Sitting Room, Kitchen/Diner, Two Bedrooms and a Bathroom. This property offers modern, attractive accommodation arranged over two floors and is situated close to the Humber. It is a..."
"NO FORWARD CHAIN. Modern three bed townhouse located in the heart of Victoria Dock close to local shops and within easy access of the City Centre and the trendy Fruit Market with numerous bars and restaurants. Boasting en-suite facilities, private rear garden, garage and off road parking, An e..."
"A substantial sized family home! Offered to the market with no chain involved, this spacious home is worthy of an internal inspection to appreciate the accommodation on offer! Situated in a sought after area in East Hull, close to East Park, all the amenities you could wish for, local tra..."
"Only an internal inspection could fully-appreciate this beautifully presented and spacious 2 Bedroom semi detached house (which could be altered to provide 3 Bedrooms subject to minor alterations). The property which benefits from gas central heating and uPVC double glazing, briefly comprises En..."
++ DO NOT MISS THIS OPPORTUNITY TO OWN THIS FAMILY HOME ++ WITH AN ABUNDANCE OF POTENTIAL TO BECOME A DREAM HOME IN A SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION WITH LOCAL HIGHLY REGARDED SCHOOLING ++ BOOK A VIEWING TODAY TO AVOID DISAPPOINTMENT ++ ONE NOT TO BE MISSED ++ NO CHAIN! ++ EPC GRADE 'D' ++ COUNCIL TAX BA...
"A fantastic, spacious property presented to a high standard throughout! Ideal for a growing family, the house benefits from three good size bedrooms, gas fired central heating, two bathrooms, off street parking and a brilliant loft space. Offered for sale with no onward chain, the property als..."
"PRESENTED FOR SALE WITH A GENEROUS LOFT AREA TO THE SECOND FLOOR LEVEL, SITUATED IN A PEACEFUL RESIDENTIAL CUL-DE-SAC POSITION. The property on offer provides well proportioned living space to both ground and first floor levels, having undergone a continued programme of improvement by th..."
"IMMACULATE three bed terrace. Be the envy of all your friends with this one, the best on the street! A stunning property finished to an exceptional standard. BOASTING a sleek high spec kitchen, modern bathroom and a splendid open plan layout - great for families and entertaining. The property ..."
"The home of great value! The Fergus is a beautiful three bedroom home benefitting from a bright living room, which leads into a contemporary open-plan kitchen-diner. Enjoy seamless indoor-outdoor living with French doors leading out onto the garden and a handy downstairs WC. Upstairs ..."
"Upgraded kitchen included! Plus, choose from one of our amazing offers* The stunning three bedroom Lisburn offers a bright living room plus a contemporary open-plan kitchen-diner with French doors leading to the garden. A handy cloakroom completes the downstairs space..."
"*** An Investment Opportunity Not To Be Missed! *** This 5 bedroomed HMO property situated in the popular student area of Hull is the ideal investment opportunity. The property is freehold under ""tenure"" This property has tenants in situ and turns over a gross yield of appr..."
"**Investment Property** 5 Bedroom HMO currently generating a gross income of circa £18,000 PA - 11% Yield The property is in a desirable location, next to the popular Newland Avenue and Hull University is a short walk away. All the bedrooms are large doubles and the pro..."
"++ BUILT BY BEAL HOMES AND PRICED TO SELL, THIS FABULOUS PROPERTY IS IDEALLY PLACED TO EMERGE YOURSELF INTO ALL THAT KINGSWOOD HAS TO OFFER ++ MODERN AND STYLISH THREE BEDROOM END OF TERRACE HOUSE WITH A GREAT DEAL TO OFFER ++ FORMING PART OF THE NOW NICELY MATURED 'VILLAGE' DEVELOPMENT ++ SPACI..."
"Inviting offers between £165,000-£175,000 A SUPERB HOME THAT RECENTLY MODERNISED THREE-BEDROOM SEMIS TRADITIONAL DETACHED PROPERTY LOCATED IN A FABULOUS LOCATION CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES AND HIGHLY REGARDED SCHOOLS PROVIDING BRIGHT AND MODERN ACCOMMODATION THROUGHOUT VIEWING ESSENTIAL"
"LOVELY TWO BEDROOM SEMI - POPULAR KINGSWOOD LOCATION - DRIVEWAY WITH TWO PARKING SPACES - MODERN THROUGHOUT Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this lovely, two bedroom, semi-detached home. Situated on Runnymede Lane, this property is ideally located for amenities w..."
"RARELY AVAILABLE IN THIS LOCATION.... Tucked away in a quiet cul-de-sac this smart two double bedroomed semi detached property with recently installed kitchen, pleasant westerly facing rear garden and a recently constructed garage with additional off road parking to the front of the property f..."
"Inviting Offers Between £165,000 - £175,000 WELL PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME WITH OFF STREET PARKING, MODERN BATHROOM, GENEROUS GARDEN AND CONSERVATORY T0 THE REAR"
"We are proud to present this Two Bedroom End Terrace House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED. *Guide Price £165,000 - £170,000*"
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £165,000-£175,000 SMART THREE BEDROOM MID HOUSE - BUILT BY AWARD WINNING BEAL HOMES - CUL DE SAC LOCATION ON THE EDGE OF OPEN FIELDS - PARKING FOR TWO CARS - EARLY VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED"
"NEW INSTRUCTION OFFERED TO THE MARKET AT A GUIDE PRICE £165,000 to £170,000 This beautifully presented property briefly comprises, entrance hall, lounge, kitchen dining room, WC, first floor landing, family bathroom, three first floor bedrooms, master bedroom ensuite. To the front is the garden w..."
"HUGE GARDEN - SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - STUNNING, MODERN KITCHEN - PERFECT FAMILY HOME - PLANNING PERMISSION FOR SINGLE STOREY EXTENSION Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic 3 bed semi detached property. Located off Howdale Road in Sutton, the propert..."
***OUTSTANDING EXTENDED FAMILY HOME WITH USABLE LOFT SPACE - BE QUICK!!!!!***
"BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED - TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS - OFF STREET PARKING AND GARAGE - NO ONWARD CHAIN Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic two bed semi detached property. Located on Yorkshire Close off Priory Road, this property benefits from close proximity..."
"OFFERS INVITED BETWEEN £165,000 - £170,000 STUNNING UPPER FLOOR APARTMENT WITH BEAUTIFUL VIEWS OVER QUEENS GARDENS OFFERING AN ENVIABLE LIFESTYLE IN THE HEART OF HULL CITY CENTRE IN THE POPULAR BBC BUILDING - OFFERED TO THE MARKET WITH NO CHAIN INVOLVED"
"Inviting Offers between £165,000-£175,000 IMMACULATE AND SPACIOUS TWO BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT WITH VIEWS OVER PEARSON PARK"
"MAKE THIS YOUR NEXT HOME! You could really add your own stamp on this property and create a superb, contemporary family home. Offered with no forward chain, the property has three bedrooms, first floor bathroom, two reception rooms, kitchen, rear utility area, WC, gardens and driveway."
BEAUTIFUL FULLY REFURBISHED THREE BED HOME - BEAUTIFUL KITCHEN AND BATHROOM - DOWNSTAIRS UTILITY AND W/C - NO ONWARD CHAIN! This beautiful and spacious mid-terraced home is situated off Holderness road close to well regarded schools and local amenities with good transport links to ...
"Situated in a quiet cul-de-sac location within this established residential area, this three bedroom semi detached property benefits from having a south facing rear garden, multiple off street parking and garage."
"Inviting offers between £160,000-£170,000 BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED SEMI DETACHED HOME ON A GENEROUS CORNER PLOT WITH POTENTIAL FOR OFF STREET PARKING, PRIVATE GARDEN AND GARAGE. MODERN INTERIOR THROUGHOUT. CALL NOW TO AVOID DISAPPOINTMENT"
"***Guide Price £160,000 - £170,000 plus Reservation Fee***
"
"Extended middle terrace property situated in the Township of Hessle in close proximity to local schooling, shopping and recreational facilities together with excellent transportation links. The accommodation briefly comprises: entrance hall, lounge through dining room and fitted kitchen..."
***A BEAUTIFUL TWO BED SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW - QUIET CUL-DE-SAC POSITION JUST OFF HOWDALE ROAD - IT'S STUNNING!!! TAKE A LOOK AT THE PHOTOS AND 360 DEGREE TOUR AND ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING TODAY!!!!***
"Stunning! CHAIN FREE! This recently built two bed end terrace house is immaculately presented! Move in condition, generous garden to the rear, off road parking, ideally suited to the 1st time buyer or 'downsizer'! Situated on the ever sought after Kingswood development, within a quiet res..."
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY • High standard 4 bedroom HMO (Historic multi-let precedent [pre dating October 2013] • Great student location • 12.3% yield • £19,760 PA • 2 Bathrooms • Fully Furnished- Each room has fitted wardrobes and basin"
"LOVELY FOUR BEDROOM HOME - POPULAR LOCATION - LOFT BEDROOM WITH ENSUITE DONE TO REGS Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this lovely, three bedroom, mid-terrace home. Situated on Dryden Street, this property is ideally placed for amenities with shops, supermarkets, ..."
" Beautifully presented, three bedroom semi detached property, situated on this modern development, close to many local amenities including shops, schools, transport links and road networks into the city centre. Built in 2019, the property boasts well proportioned accommodation with a modern kit..."
"SUPERB THREE BED END TERRACE - SUPERB REAR GARDEN - LARGE GARAGE - POPULAR LOCATION - OFF STREET PARKING Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this outstanding three bedroom mid-terrace home. Situated on Hayburn Avenue, this property is ideally located for a host of l..."
"Purple Bricks are delighted to offer 245 CORONATION ROAD NORTH, a three double bedroomed, end terrace home to the market. Simply stunning, extended to both the first and ground floor and ready for its new owners to move into immediately. This immaculately presented home has a large modern whi..."
"A very well presented mid terraced family home situated on Savery Street which is within easy access of Holderness Road with numerous amenities, regular bus routes to the wide area and the City Centre. The popular East Park and the Woodford leisure centre is only a short walk away. The property h..."
Attractive Three Bedroom Semi detached Home Sold With No Forward Chain Master Bedroom With En-Suite Shower Room Two Further Bedrooms Of Good Sizes Spacious Dining Kitchen Conservatory To the Rear Single Detached Garage and Driveway Close to Pickering Park EPC Gr...
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £160,000 - £170,000"
"GUIDE PRICE £160,000 - £170,000 BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED - THREE BED SEMI DETACHED - POPULAR LOCATION Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic three bedroom semi detached property. Located on Chesterton Street, this property benefits from close proxim..."
"New to the market is this beautifully presented and spacious two bedroom end of terrace property situated on a corner plot with off street car parking and has easy access to the A63, hessle and hull city centre.  The property briefly comprises entrance hall, lounge opening ..."
This mid terrace home with three bedrooms situated in the popular Garden Village Area.
"Have you been looking for a house which needs nothing doing, which you can just move into and enjoy? If so, we have found the house for you. Check out the photographs... you will not be disappointed!"
"A fantastic two bedroom residence with off street parking, in a popular Location. This superb home offers great potential for new owners, making it a great choice for families or first time buyers."
"North Hull Semi-Detached True Bungalow In Quiet Cu-De Sac Location With No Onward Chain. Private Garden, Low Maintenance and Detached Single Garage and Long Driveway. Large Kitchen and Spacious Lounge Dining Room Potential For Improvements, Cosmetic Work Will Be Required Withi..."
"OUTSTANDING THREE BED SEMI - MODERN KITCHEN - GARDEN BAR - POPULAR LOCATION Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this outstanding three bedroom, semi-detached home. Situated on Ferry Meadows Park within the popular Kingswood development, this home is ideally placed f..."
***** FABULOUS FIRST TIME BUY ***** This attractive 2-bedroom home is nestled in a sought-after area and is well placed for easy access to local amenities whilst having excellent transport links. This impressive and beautifully proportioned property offers a gas heating system&nbs...
THREE-BEDROOM FAMILY HOME A STONE’S THROW AWAY FROM THE VILLAGE GREEN WITH OFF STREET PARKING FOR TWO CARS CONTEMPORARY FEEL THROUGHOUT WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO ALL OF THE AMENITIES KINGSWOOD HAS TO OFFER OFFERED TO THE MARKET WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN
"GUIDE PRICE £160,000 - £170,000 Mid Terrace Home On WIllerby Road with - Entrance Hall, Lounge, Dining Room, Fitted Kitchen, 3 Bedrooms, Family Bathroom and Gardens. Call now to book your viewing!"
"*** GUIDE PRICE £160,000 - £170,000, MUST BE VIEWED *** - 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY HOME, PRICED TO SELL, NOT TO BE MISSED, to arrange a viewing please call our head office from 7am to 11pm today. 3 Bedroom Semi-detached family home, well presented spacious accommodation, IDEA..."
"ATTENTION AESTHETICS LOVERS - PERFECT FIRST TIME HOME - TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS - OFF STREET PARKING - NO ONWARD CHAIN !!! Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this sensational two bed end terraced property. Located on Harbottle Way, this property benefits from excell..."
Don't delay in booking your viewing to fully appreciate this lovely 3 bedroomed traditional family home.
"No Onward Chain! This deceptively spacious three bed property has been altered and enhanced from its original design, ideal for the growing family looking to live in the ever-popular location. The main features include - entrance, through lounge diner, fitted kitchen and conservato..."
MODERN FAMILY HOME to THREE FLOOR LEVELS WITH THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS. VIEWING ADVISED. Well positioned and offering an open aspect to the frontage with smartly appointed living accommodation provided to three floor levels. The vendors have created a modern and well maintained family home...
"NO CHAIN INVOLVED! Only an internal inspection could fully appreciate this deceptive 3 Bedroom end house, which is arranged on three levels and includes a 3rd Bedroom loft conversion with Building Regulation Approval. This great family home, which benefits from gas central heating and uPVC doubl..."
FANTASTIC STARTER/FAMILY HOME in this MOST POPULAR LOCATION with VACANT POSSESSION and NO ONWARD CHAIN *** INVITING OFFERS *** GENEROUS ROOM SIZES - 3 BEDS WITH GARAGE TO REAR *** GOOD TRANSPORT LINKS INTO HULL CITY CENTRE AND NEARBY KINGSWOOD RETAIL PARK *** 
"**Reduced for a quick sale and offering No Chain** A spacious three-bedroom semi-detached house! Extended to the rear, and three floors of living space, this lovely home has generous gardens, a private drive and is situated in a very sought-after residential area close to link r..."
"An EXCITING HMO investment property in Hull, available CHAIN FREE with TENANTS in situ for IMMEDIATE investment. Call to enquire! Bettermove are proud to welcome to the market this charming six bedroom terraced house in Hull, available with no forward chain.The property ..."
"A great investment opportunity to purchase a large middle terraced house currently achieving a gross annual income of £21,060 which will be increasing to £22,100 in July. The property provides two separate self-contained flats/apartments which are arranged on three levels. Having been ..."
"Lovelle are delighted to offer for sale this MODERN two double bedroom end terrace house, situated on the edge of a small development, with views over the green. Immaculately presented throughout and in move in condition, this property would be an ideal investment opportunity or first time buy..."
See how you can reserve with just a 5% deposit on Deposit Unlock. .See how you can reserve with just a 5% deposit on Deposit Unlock. T&C's apply.
"The home of great value! The Tyrone is a contemporary three bedroom house style that is ideal for family life and perfect for entertaining. The open-plan kitchen-diner features a large L-shaped worktop, while French doors open from the bright living room onto the rear garden, for seam..."
" This stunning semi-detached property is now available!Perfect family home!Briefly comprises: Spacious lounge, kitchen and dining area with access to large rear garden to the ground floor and downstairs WC. Stairs to first floor lead to 3 bedrooms and bathroom. Driveway to the rear of the property."
"Inviting offers between £155,000-£165,000 TWO BEDS PLUS HUGE LOFT AREA CLOSE TO HIGHLY REGARDED SCHOOLS NO CHAIN A WEALTH OF OFF-STREET PARKING WHAT MORE DO YOU NEED?"
" This lovely semi-detached property is now available! Ideal for first time buyers! Situated in the very sought after area of Victoria Dock within walking distance to Hull's popular Marina and a very short walking distance from the Hull City Centre! Briefly providing entrance hall, lounge and kit..."
"Inviting offers between £155,000-£165,000 THIS LOVELY PROPERTY LOCATED IN HESSLE IS SURE TO IMPRESS WITH ITS MODERNISED FEATURES AND CLOSE PROXIMITY TO LOCAL AMENITIES. IT OFFERS THREE BEDROOMS, A MODERN BATHROOM, AND A GARAGE WITH REAR ACCESS."
"This much altered and enhanced property is offered to the market as move into condition, situated in a prime residential location in Hessle, only a short distance from great local schools and within easy access to a wide range of local amenities, making this an ideal first step onto the ladder or..."
"A lovely three bedroom end terraced house, situated off the popular Willerby Road within easy access to Willerby or the Hull City Centre. The property has the benefit of gas central heating double glazing and briefly comprises entrance hall, lounge through to the dining area, fitted kitchen and b..."
"*** PART EXCHANGE AND ASSISTED MOVE SCHEMES AVAILABLE ***The 2nd phase release of 29 new homes due for completion Summer 2023, following on from the exceptional interest in the now completed phase 1.Prices start at £155,000 and consist of 2 bed town houses, 3 bed semi's and 4 bed detached h..."
*FABULOUS TOWNHOUSE IN EAST HULL* Ideally situated close to the Kingswood Retail Park with an array of shops and restaurants and also with excellent road links to the City Centre! Modern & Neutrally Decorated throughout and benefits from low maintenance rear garden and off street parking!
"Brilliant two bedroom semi-detached house situated in the centre of Hessle, close by all its local amenities, bars & restaurants. The property enjoys a West facing garden and benefits from having its own drive way, uPVC glazing and spacious living accommodation throughout. Further benefitting ..."
"Lovely Home In West Hull with - Entrance Hall, Lounge, Dining Room, Fitted Kitchen, 3 Bedrooms, Family Bathroom, Gardens and Off Street Parking To The Front - Call now and book your viewing!"
**EXCEPTIONAL TWO BED SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT - BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED - NO CHAIN INVOLVED - OUR ADVICE IS VIEW IMMEDIATELY!!!!**
A home is made of love and dreams 
"Grandale, Hull, HU7 4BL - INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £155,000 - £160,000 Beautifully presented spacious semi detached dormer bungalow with a garage with electric door, popular location within walking distance to the local amenities."
"LAST 2 BED AVAILABLE!!!! SUPERB TWO BED STARTER HOME - PERFECT FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS - 10 YEAR NEW BUILD WARRANTY - MOVE IN SUMMER 2023 - FREE MORTGAGE ADVICE AVAILABLE FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS Situated in the buoyant HU5 area of Bricknell avenue, there will be three two bed terrac..."
"This immaculate three bed terraced property is offered to the market as move into condition, well presented throughout perfect for the growing family looking to be in this ever sought after location. The main features include - entrance, front lounge, full width dining room and fitted ki..."
"Well Presented Throughout Featuring Modern Fitted Kitchen, Contemporary Bathroom and Two Double Bedrooms. Low Maintenance Rear Garden and Allocated Parking."
"++ OOZING WITH CHARACTER AND STYLE, THIS GORGEOUS GARDEN VILLAGE PROPERTY HAS DESIRABILITY WRITTEN ALL OVER IT! ++ OUTSTANDING APPEAL ++ ONE OF HULL’S FINEST LOCATIONS ++ COMFORTABLE SITTING ROOM ++ SUPERBLY FITTED KITCHEN/DINING ROOM, UTILITY ROOM AND GUEST CLOAKS ++ TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS ++..."
"A two bedroom modern end terraced property situated in a pleasant cul de sac location off Windmill Way in Hessle. The property has gas central heating double glazing and briefly comprises, entrance hall, cloakroom/w.c., fitted kitchen,, lounge, landing, two bedrooms and bathroom. Outside are gard..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £150,000 - £155,000 **
*** OPEN HOUSE VIEWING BY STRICT APPOINTMENT ONLY THURSDAY 16TH FEBRUARY 12-12.30PM . VIEWINGS TO BE BOOKED VIA PURPLE BRICKS *** BOOK YOUR VIEWING NOW!! 59 Wellington Lane is an absolutely stunning three bedroomed semi-detached property located within a sho..."
"An opportunity to acquire a 6 bedroom student investment property 1 mile from Hull University campus, fully let at £19,284 per annum excl."
Brought to the market with NO CHAIN involved! This two bedroom semi detached property is an ideal first home! Benefiting from having off street parking and being positioned on a large plot!
"++ EXPECT TO BE IMPRESSED, THIS TRULY IMMACULATE THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME IS SIMPLY A CUT ABOVE ++ ENJOYING A CHOICE POSITION SET BACK FROM THE ROAD ++ LOVINGLY MAINTAINED AND CAREFULLY IMPROVED BY THE SAME OWNERS OVER SEVERAL DECADES ++ TWO RECEPTION AREAS ++ SUPERB BREAKFAST KITC..."
"FOR SALE BY AUCTION ON 30th March at 12:00 £150,000 plus LONG LEASEHOLD VACANT PENTHOUSE APARTMENT"
"We introduce to the market this impressive family home, ideal for entertaining! The show stopping dining kitchen area, offering an array of integrated appliances is a key feature and looks on to the well-maintained rear gardens. The property also has a separate lounge and modern downstairs bathro..."
"Investment Opportunity 6 bedroom terraced HMO property in Morrill Street, off Holderness Road HU9 Theb property is a Licensed HMO and benefits from HMO License and planning consent for C4 use, gas central heating and double glazing 2 bedroms on the ground floor and 4 bedrooms an..."
TUCKED AWAY FROM THE MAIN ROAD. THIS WONDERFUL PERIOD SEMI-DETACHED COTTAGE STANDS WITHIN AN EXTREMELY ATTRACTIVE PLOT CLOSE TO ALL LOCAL AMENITIES
"• For Sale by Auction – T & C’s apply • Subject to an undisclosed Reserve Price • Buyer’s fees apply • The Modern Method of Auction • Excellent Sized Family Home With No Forward Chain • Two Reception Rooms, Three Bedroom..."
"GUIDE PRICE £150,000 - £160,000 Well Presented Home with - Entrance Porch, Entrance Hall, Lounge & Dining Areas, Fitted Kitchen, 3 Bedrooms, Shower Room, Gardens & Garage - Book your viewing today!"
This three bedroom property is being offered for sale onto the open market and would be the ideal First Time Buyer property or Investment opportunity
"Whitakers are delighted to bring to the market this four bed semi-detached house! Rarely available, this lovely home would be ideal for the growing family! With ample off road parking, generous front and rear gardens, and spacious accommodation throughout! Situated in a pleasant resid..."
"This three bedroom mid- terrace family home in this popular residential location ideally placed for local amenities, East Park and well regarded school catchment areas. Don't miss out on this lovely home and book your viewing today."
"Three bedroom semi detached house, located off Holderness Road the property is well placed for local amenities nearby. The property has ground floor extended accommodation and comprises:- Entrance porch, hallway, lounge, dining area, kitchen, ground floor WC, first floor landing, three bedrooms a..."
"An opportunity to acquire a 6 bedroom student investment property 1 mile from Hull University campus, fully let at £17,784 per annum excl."
5 Bed HMO multi-let Investment property; Fully let £405pw/£21030pa/13.57% gross; 3 x en-suit first-floor beds; HMO licence accepted; Certificate of Lawful Use as HMO granted; 2 x kitchens and 1 x shared bathroom; Well maintained property; Long term tenants; A great opportunity to buy an off the s...
"An extended 3 bedroom end house with great potential on a plot which offers gardens to the front, side and rear and with a garage with rear access. The property is uPVC double glazed and gas centrally heated but is in need of a program of modernisation works and therefore offers the opportunity t..."
***A SUPERB EXTENDED THREE BED END TERRACED FAMILY HOME - CONSERVATORY - FITTED KITCHEN - CONTEMPORARY BATHROOM - NO FORWARD CHAIN - IMMEDIATE VIEWING IS ESSENTIAL!!!!***
"Inviting Offers Between £150,000 - £160,000, A WONDERFUL PERIOD MID TERRACE PROPERTY SET IN THE MOST SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION OF GARDEN VILLAGE - IMPROVED AND UPGRADED BY THE CURRENT OWNER THIS SUPERB PROPERTY IS SURE TO APPEAL TO THE FIRST TIME BUYER/FRESH STARTER/DOWNSIZER/INVESTOR"
"Located in a well sought-after residential area off Pickering Road, within easy reach of Anlaby Common and the village of Anlaby. There’s a wide range of local amenities on Anlaby Road and the nearby Anlaby Retail Park. Located approximately 5 miles west of Kingston upon Hull City centre and only..."
"We are pleased to present this three-bedroom terraced property located in the city of Hull The property consists of – Lounge, Kitchen/diner, Three bedrooms and a Bathroom. This property offers modern, light-filled accommodation arranged over two floors. It is situated close to d..."
"Semi-detached property situated in the popular residential location of Sutton Park with rear views overlooking Bude Park and within close proximity to an abundance of local shopping and recreational facilities at Kingswood, together with excellent transportation links. The accommodation ..."
"* REDUCED BY £10,000 * GREAT STARTER HOME in IDEAL LOCATION! Traditional terraced house with two DOUBLE bedrooms, two receptions plus a 20ft dining kitchen. SOUTHERLY rear garden. Early viewing essential!"
"++ AN ABSOLUTE GEM ON THE CUSP OF ONE OF HULL'S MOST SOUGHT AFTER LOCATIONS, THIS TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM MIDDLE TERRACE GARDEN VILLAGE PROPERTY OOZES WITH CHARACTER AND QUALITY ++ ALMOST 1000 SQ.FT WITH BEAUTIFUL AND IMMACULATE PRESENTATION ++ TASTEFULLY REFURBISHED AND INTELLIGENTLY RECONFIGURED FOL..."
"Home Estates are pleased to offer to the market, this appealing, traditional bay fronted, end of terrace house. The property is offered for sale with vacant possession on completion and with no c..."
"A true bungalow in a truly great area! With two double bedrooms, spacious lounge dining room, modern fitted kitchen and bathroom, driveway and gardens - what time would you like to view?!"
"Offered With No Onward Chain, This Well Proportioned Mid Terrace House Located In This Popular Location"
"A lovely, traditional middle house ideally placed between Willerby Road and Wold Road; both easily accessible for transport, shops and amenities. Extended to the rear, the house has 3 bedrooms, entrance hall, 23ft through lounge, 13ft fitted kitchen and family bathroom. Double glazing and gas..."
"Beautifully Presented, Extended Three Bedroom Family Home Attractive Open Kitchen Dining Room Fitted Wardrobes to All Bedrooms Large Master Bedroom Parking To The Front and Garden To The Rear Close To The Park And East Road Links Must Be Viewed"
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £145,000-£155,000 IDEAL FIRST TIME BUYER OPPORTUNITY THREE-BEDROOM MID-TERRACE WITH OFF-STREET PARKING - NO CHAIN INVOLVED"
Ready to move straight into is this lovely semi detached house standing on generous gardens and situated in a pleasant cul de sac on the ever popular Victoria Dock development.
This three bedroom mid terraced property is offered to the market as an ideal family property situated within easy access to Hull City Centre with local transport links and local amenities of Spring Bank West. Set in front and rear gardens the accommodation briefly comprises; entrance ha...
"This property is for sale by Modern Method of Auction - STARTING BIDS FROM £145,000. We are delighted to offer onto the market this large 5 Bedroom middle house benefiting from gas central heating, uPVC double glazing and enjoys a very pleasant rear courtyard garden. The very spacious acco..."
"Guide Price: £145,000 - £150,000 Stunning three bedroom property just off Holderness Road. The property would be perfect for a 1st time buyer or someone looking for a family home. The property is well maintained and decorated throughout allowing for plenty of natural light througho..."
"NO CHAIN !!! LOVELY TWO BED HOME WITH OFF STREET PARKING, A GARAGE AND A GENEROUS REAR GARDEN IN DESIRABLE AVENUES LOCATION PERFECT FOR A FIRST TIME BUYER This delightful mid terraced property is situated off the popular and vibrant Newland Avenue, close to well regarded schools and a h..."
"This lovely three bedroom end terrace home ticks all the boxes, situated in a quiet residential cul-de-sac on this exclusive development, perfect for commuters, with link roads in and out of Hull a short drive. Off road parking for two vehicles, rear garden, and spacious accommodation through..."
This three bedroom end of terraced property is situated on the Liberty Green development and would suit the growing family or first time buyer! Benefiting form having off street parking and being situated in this quiet cul-de-sac location!
"Eastfield Road, Hull, HU4 6DY- Inviting Offers Between £145,000 £155,000"
"** GUIDE PRICE £145,000 - £155,000 ** PURPLEBRICKS ARE DELIGHTED TO OFFER 67 BROCKWELL PARK, KINGSWOOD, TO THE MARKET. Presented to a high standard, this delightful home is ideal for all first time buyers, or those downsizing and looking for open plan living. In ready to move into condition,..."
"Stunning starter home! This two double bedroom recently built (2017)semi-detached home is immaculately presented! Ready to move in condition throughout, with generous rear garden with a southerly aspect, two off road parking spaces and situated in a quiet residential location, close to ac..."
"A spacious family home! This beautifully presented home has been in the same family for many years! Updated and maintained by the current owners, lounge/dining with log burner in situ, re-plastered walls to most of the house, with neutral decor, three very generous bedrooms and the family..."
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £145,000 - £150,000 ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS, DOWN SIZERS AND FRESH STARTERS THIS WONDERFULLY PRESENTED TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY IS SURE TO APPEAL."
"Fantastic Family Home, First Time Buy Close To Great Schools Parking To The Front and Garage To The Rear Modern Kitchen and Spacious Living Room and Dining Space No Forward Chain Involved Great Location For Road Links"
"We are delighted to present an amazing three bedroom semi-detached home on Greenwood Avenue to the market. Boasting amazingly sized front and rear yard spaces, this house is perfect for families and first time buyers alike. Comprising of lounge, kitchen/dining area, utility room, three double bed..."
"***Guide Price £145,000 - £155,000 plus Reservation Fee***
"
"Wow! Check out this beautiful modern family home. Amazing location close to various amenities. Must be viewed! This home briefly comprises: Entrance hall, through lounge, dining area with opening to the garden and kitchen to the ground floor. Large well maintained garden and garage. Stairs ..."
"A perfect opportunity to acquire a lovely, traditional end of terrace house, with a Conservatory and spacious boarded loft! The accommodation briefly comprises of an entrance vestibule, whi..."
***A GREAT THREE BED SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN READY TO MOVE INTO CONDITION - NO CHAIN INVOLVED - POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION - BE QUICK TO VIEW!!!!***
"We offer onto the market this popular-style middle house offering a good investment opportunity comprising 4 LETTING ROOMS currently rented out and achieving £17,160 per annum gross. The accommodation which benefits from gas radiator central heating and uPVC double glazing, briefly includes ..."
"Inviting offers between £140,000-£145,000 WELCOME TO MOORHOUSE ROAD - A STUNNING TWO BEDROOM EXTENDED HOME THAT HAS BEEN COMPLETED TO A HIGH SPECIFICATION STANDARD."
"***Guide Price £140,000 - £150,000 plus Reservation Fee***
"
"An opportunity to acquire a 5 bedroom student investment property 1 mile from Hull University campus, fully let at £16,400 per annum excl."
"An opportunity to acquire a 5 bedroom student investment property 1 mile from Hull University campus, fully let at £16,640 per annum excl."
"Urban Property are pleased to present this three bedroom mid terraced family home with a guide price of £150,000£160,000. Benefiting from having NO CHAIN INVOLVED, recently fitted carpets throughout and having a garage to the rear aspect. MUST BE VIEWED TO AVOID DISAPPOINTMENT!!"
"OUTSTANDING THREE BED END OF TERRACE HOME - FINISHED TO A HIGH STANDARD - POPULAR LOCATION - OPEN PLAN LIVING Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this outstanding three bed end of terrace home. Situated on Sutton Park, this property is close to well regarded schools..."
"Inviting offers between £140,000-£160,000 -PRINCESS AVENUE IS A TREE-LINED STREET IN A HIGHLY SOUGHT-AFTER AREA, AND THIS TOP FLOOR APARTMENT OFFERS VIEWS TO PEARSON PARK. RECENTLY MODERNISED TO THE HIGHEST SPECIFICATION."
A fantastic opportunity to purchase a two bedroom first floor apartment close to the City Centre. This superb property would be ideal for a First Time Buyer or an Investor looking to add to their portfolio.
"*** Immaculately presented Semi-Detached House offered with NO CHAIN INVOLVED. *** Refurbished internally to a high standard comprising; entrance hall, lounge, dining breakfast kitchen & WC. Lounge with bay window, feature fireplace and laminated flooring. Open Plan breakfast dining kitchen with ..."
"FANTASTIC 3 BED SEMI DETACHED HOUSE - OFF STREET PARKING - QUIET CUL DE SAC LOCATION Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic 3 bed semi-detached home with garage and off street parking. Located only a short distance from both Hull city centre, Victoria..."
"Inviting offers between £140,000-£145,000. WELL PRESENTED THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM HOME WITH OFF STREET PARKING, CONSERVATORY AND PRIVATE GARDEN TO THE REAR. CALL NOW TO AVOID DISAPPOINTMENT"
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £140,000-£150,000 GENEROUS THREE BEDROOM END TERRACE - RECENTLY DECORATED TO A HIGH SPECIFICATION THROUGHOUT - BEAUTIFUL LOW MAINTENANCE REAR GARDEN - IDEAL FOR ANY FAMILY WISHING TO MOVE INTO THE AREA - CALL NOW TO AVOID DISAPPOINTMENT"
"OFFERS INVITED BETWEEN £140,000 - £150,000OFFERED WITH NO CHAIN, 3-BEDROOM MID TERRACED PROPERTY LOCATED IN A CONVENIENT LOCATION FOR SCHOOLS, SHOPS AND COMMUTER ROUTES"
***LUXURY ONE BEDROOM HULL MARINA APARTMENT - BEAUTIFUL VIEWS OVERLOOKING THE MARINA - PRICED CORRECTLY TO SELL - IMMEDIATE VIEWING ESSENTIAL - NO CHAIN INVOLVED
Situated in this popular development off Springhead Lane is this well presented 2 bedroom middle house which would ideally suit a first time buyer or young family. The property is uPVC double glazed and gas centrally heated (recent new boiler fitted) and with an internal layout that comprises an ...
"THREE BED MID-TERRACED HOME - OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINER - LOVELY FRONT AND REAR GARDENS - PERFECT FOR A FIRST TIME BUYER This mid-terraced home is located on Dundee Street off Chanterlands Avenue close to well regarded schools and local amenities including supermarkets, restaurants and caf..."
"Inviting offers between £140,000-£150,000"
"Perfect opportunity to acquire a property which is perfectly located within the Avenues conservation area. The property is set back from the road with an attractive, tree lined, lawn divide...."
"Three bedroom mid terrace house, located off Brindley Street, off Holderness Road close to East Park. The well presented accommodation comprises: - Entrance porch, small hall, lounge, dining room, utility area, kitchen and ground floor entrance with WC off. First floor landing, three bedrooms and..."
"New to the market is this 2 double-bedroomed semi-detached family home, situated in a popular residential area within Hull."
"NO CHAIN - This stunning 3 bedroom home is offered to the market with no onward chain and provides deceptively spacious family sized accommodation in excess of 1000sq ft. The property is located within a popular street scene, towards Holderness High Road and close to local amenities including Ea..."
"Beautiful presented and deceptively spacious throughout this two bedroom home is located off the ever popular location of Anlaby Park Road South. A must see property that offers generous living accommodation with two excellent size bedrooms and a loft area, the property has a lot to offer interna..."
Bigger than expected this wonderful 2 bedroom home is located within an ever popular location. With open and generous living space to the ground floor as well as an extremely well fitted kitchen. To the first floor there are two double bedrooms with a variety of fitted furniture and a contemporar...
"Tucked away in a corner position and offering further scope to extend and improve due to the plot, this 3 bedroom end house is now in need of some modernisation but offers great potential. Ideally suited for a family home where a new owner could put their own stamp on the property the layout comp..."
Stunning Apartment Located in Old Town Hull Ideal City Location Close To All Amenities Sold With No Forward Chain Impressive River Views Open Living Accommodation With Modern Sleek Finish Two Double Bedrooms Master with En-suite First Floor With Lift Access Beautiful...
An excellent opportunity to purchase 2 investment properties placed within 1 building. The first floor apartment offers 3 bedrooms whereas the ground floor property features 2 bedrooms.
"No Onward Chain! This well presented three bed property has been altered and enhanced from its original design, now offering a great house for the growing family looking to be in this ever popular location. The main features include - entrance, front lounge, and large 18' fitted..."
"An opportunity has arisen to purchase this lovely three bedroom end terraced home which is a credit to it's current owner. The property is conveniently located with easy access to good transport links, amenities and eateries on Princes Avenue and Chanterlands Avenue. The property has the ben..."
"We offer onto the market this delightful and well-presented 3 Bedroom middle house benefiting from gas central heating and uPVC double glazing. The property briefly includes the following accommodation:- Entrance Lobby, Lounge with Wet Room/WC (off), fitted Breakfast Kitchen with integrated ove..."
" Check out this beautifully-presented mid-terraced property! This stunning newly refurbished property would make a fantastic family or first time home! Briefly offering entrance hall, lounge/diner and kitchen to the ground floor. 3 bedrooms and family bathroom to the first floor. Rear East facin..."
"This three-bedroom cottage is situated in the popular location, obtaining original features being offered to the market with no onward chain."
A deceptively spacious Bay windowed property ideally located on Spring Bank West. The property is currently presented as two individual flats. Each Flat briefly comprises: Bright ...
***BE QUICK TO VIEW!!!! YOU WILL LOVE THIS TRUE TWO BED SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW - CUL-DE SAC-LOCATION - STUNNING READY-TO-MOVE CONDITION- NO CHAIN INVOLVED***
"***Great investment opportunity for cash buyer*** This incredible apartment is being sold as a buy to let investment with 12 months tenancy with the current tenants paying £800 PCM currently. Situated in the iconic BBC Hull building. With the benefit of secure parking, two ste..."
Brought to the market with no chain involved! This two bedroom mid terraced property is ideal for first time buyers! Situated in this quiet cul-de-sac location close by to local shops & amenities. Benefiting from having off street parking to the front and a large rear garden.
"Fabulous Three Bedroom Family Home Large Living Room and Dining Room, Great For the Family To Gather and For Entertaining Modern Kitchen and Bathroom Dual Access Garage With Secure Gated Ten Foot Easy To Maintain Rear Garden - Great For Parties and Fully Enclosed For Children..."
"A lovely, modern two bedroom semi detached home. This property comprises of a lounge, kitchen diner, conservatory and a cloakroom WC. To the first floor accommodation are two bedrooms and a family bathroom. Externally having an enclosed rear garden and a driveway providing off street parking. ..."
"TENANTED INVESTMENT - THREE BED SEMI DETACHED HOME - FRONT AND SIDE DRIVE - OFF STREET PARKING - GENEROUS OUTDOOR SPACE This semi detached home is located on Greatfield in East Hull, close to well regarded schools and a host of local amenities including a super-market, a gym and a baker..."
"Internal viewing is highly recommended and essential in order to appreciate the size and standard of the accommodation on offer. The property is a real credit to the current owners, as the internal an..."
A two bedroomed mid-terraced cottage with period features in Sutton village.
"Inviting offers between £135,000-£145,000 Welcome to Oldfield Avenue, a two bedroom semi-detached home in a quiet cul-de-sac location."
Three-bedroom // Mid-terraced // Family Home // Clumber Street // HU5
"Inviting Offers Between - £135,000 to £145,000"
SUPERB THREE BED END TERRACE - THREE GENEROUS DOUBLE BEDROOMS - HUGE SOUTHERLY FACING GARDEN - ENSUITE TO MASTER - OFF STREET PARKING - PERFECT FIRST TIME BUYER HOME Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this brilliant three bedroom home. Situated on Tanfield Grove t...
"Investment property for sale in Clough Road, Hull The property is a mid terraced house, let to working people per room and it comprises Entrance Hall Kitchen Utility on the back Living Room Bedroom 1 Small garden First Floor Bedroom 2 Bedro..."
"This over 55's GROUND FLOOR apartment offers well presented accommodation in a great location! Two DOUBLE Bedrooms, modern Shower Room, modern Breakfast Kitchen and spacious Lounge Dining Room. Residents' parking and communal gardens. Viewing is a must!"
"Inviting Offers Between £135,000 - £145,000 Wow Wow Wow just take a look at the photos and floor plan of this stunning remodelled and extended semi detached property, which has undergone a comprehensive programme of modernisation and updating in recent years. No stone has been left unturned in provi"
"++ FOR SALE BY MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION; STARTING BID PRICE £135,000 PLUS RESERVATION FEE ++ SUBJECT TO AN UNDISCLOSED RESERVE PRICE ++ BUYERS FEES APPLY ++ ATTENTION INVESTORS, THIS SIZEABLE TWO BEDROOM (PLUS BOARDED LOFT) DETACHED HOUSE HAS A GENEROUS EXPANSE OF SIDE GARDEN WITH DEVELOPME..."
"++ PRESENTED WITH GREAT TASTE AND STYLE, THIS IMMACULATE THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IS A CUT ABOVE ++ EXTREMELY SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION HAVING BEEN THOUGHTFULLY IMPROVED AND ENHANCED ++ COMFORTABLE SITTING ROOM ++ FABULOUS 20 FOOT KITCHEN/DINING ROOM ++ LOVELY LOW MAINTENANCE REAR GARDEN ++ ..."
GENERATE INSTANT INCOME ON THIS EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY – Two one-bedroom apartments located in close reach of Hull with a great net yield.
"A Two bedroom mid terraced house situated on the popular Penshurst Avenue, close to all local amenities that Hessle Town has to offer, The property has gas central heating double glazing and briefly comprises entrance hall, lounge, dining area, fitted kitchen, cloakroom/w.c., landing, two bedroom..."
"An opportunity to acquire a traditional end townhouse in this ever popular residential area close to amenities. This great property now awaits its new owners. Double garage, good sized garden, three bedrooms, two reception areas - make this the top of your viewing list."
Spacious versatile family accommodation arranged over three floors. Please view the Video Tour to see the lay out and space on offer.
"**NEW BUILD PROPERTY** One of a pair of new build three bedroom semi detached houses scheduled for completion in August 2023. Each property will have gas central heating, Upvc double glazing and are set in gardens with two parking spaces. Comprises entrance hall, cloakroom/ WC, spacious loung..."
"Modern open plan 4 bedroom house includes a large spacious bathroom, modern open plan kitchen/living area and newly refurbished bedrooms. Located just off Newland Avenue a short walk to the university and very close to all locals shops and bars."
TRUE BUNGALOW WITH SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN AND GENEROUS SIDE DRIVE! This wonderful true bungalow enjoys a gorgeous south facing rear garden and a generous side drive. The property is situated close to well regarded schools and local amenities and has good transport linKs to both Hull ci...
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: Semi Detached House Fitted Ki...
"OVER 55'S ACCOMMODATION WITH NO CHAIN - LOCATED IN THIS FABULOUS COURTYARD DEVELOPMENT OFF MAIN STREET This well presented delightful two bedroom first floor apartment in ready to move in condition features personal entry Hall, large Living Room with built-in storage facilities, integrat..."
"** Fabulous Two Bedroom Property in this Highly Desirable Area ** Close to Kingswood Retail Park, Good Transport Links and Great Local Schools ** Well Maintained ** Enclosed Rear Garden ** Two Parking Spaces ** Great First Time Buyer/Downsizer Home **"
"Inviting Offers Between £135,000 - £145,000. BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED DUKERIES PROPERTY IN POPULAR LOCATION - OFFERED TO THE MARKET WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN - NEWLY FITTED KITCHEN AND BATHROOM - RECENTLY RE-DECORATED THROUGHOUT - CALL NOW TO AVOID DISAPPOINTMENT"
Located on the banks of the magnificent River Humber..
Downsizing but want to stay in the Avenues? This is rare and beautiful. Take a peek inside.....
"Are you a first time buyer looking for a property to move straight into and be the envy of your friends? If so, check out the photographs of this superb home and then call to view to fully appreciate!"
"An altered and much improved 2 bedroom middle house which enjoys the best of modern open plan living. The property is uPVC double glazed and gas centrally heated via a modern condensing combi boiler and provides well presented accommodation throughout which briefly comprises an entrance hallway, ..."
"An opportunity to acquire two tenanted houses creating an annual yield of over 7.5% in Hull, East Yorkshire."
"HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - THREE GOOD SIZED BEDROOMS - FANTASTIC REAR GARDEN - TWO RECEPTION ROOMS Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic three bed terraced property. Located on North Road, equidistant to a wealth of local amenities including shops..."
"*** NEW INSTRUCTION, PRICED TO SELL, MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! LOVELY 3 BEDROOM MID TERRACE - IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS / YOUNG FAMILIES, NOT TO BE MISSED, spacious accommodation, gas central heating / double glazing, kitchen, living ..."
"Lovelle are delighted to offer onto the market this spacious, three bedroom, family home. With a lovely size rear garden and generous living accommodation throughout, the property would make an ideal first time buy! There are local amenities close by, as well as well regarded Primary and Secon..."
"***A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE THIS THREE BEDROOM END TERRACED HOUSE - IDEAL FOR AN INVESTOR OR FIRST TIME BUYER - THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM - MODERN FITTED KITCHEN, SPACIOUS LOUNGE AND DINING AREA - CONTEMPORARY BATHROOM - BE QUICK TO VIEW!!!!***"
"Three bedroom semi-detached house located in James Reckitt Avenue. On approach is a generous gated front garden with boundary hedges along the front and side.  Recently re-decorated throughout and new carpets, and has been updated with re-wiring, new double glazed windows, boiler, fitt..."
***INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY*** Superb two bedroom second floor apartment.
"Inviting offers Between £130,000 - £135,000"
"This 4 bedroom mid-terraced house is the perfect investment property, selling with the tenant in situ. The property accomodates an upstairs and downstairs bathroom and is close to local shops, amenities and bus routes."
"ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS - STYLISH TWO BED TERRACED - OFF STREET PARKING - SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this incredible two bed end terraced property. Located off Willerby Road, this property is well placed for a wealth of local ame..."
*** ATTENTION INVESTORS!!! A GREAT FAMILY HOME WITH A LONG-TERM TENANT- PAYING £540PCM- CALL TO ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING TODAY!!***
"** Great Location ** Detached Rear Double Garage ** Generous Room Sizes ** Vacant Possession with No Onward Chain ** Lots of Potential ** Located on Willerby Road with good access and transport links into Hull and Willerby. Excellent local schools, nearby shops and amenities within thi..."
"***No Onward Chain*** New to the market is this charming two-bedroom terraced house located on the desirable Willerby Road/HU5 area of Hull. This property boasts a cozy living room, a separate dining room, a generously sized kitchen with a range of matching fitted wall and floor unit..."
" Early viewing essential on this beautifully presented, two bedroom mid terrace property in a highly sought after area in HU5, close to many amenities, including shops, schools and great road networks and public transport links. Extended to the ground floor, the property also boasts off street ..."
"CASH BUYERS ONLY !! Situated in this ever popular West Hull location, the property is close to local amenities and has fantastic transport links."
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £130,000 - £140,000 IMMACULATELY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY WITH STUDIO, WORKSHOP AND A WEALTH OF OUTSIDE SPACE LOCATED IN A POPULAR SPOT IN NORTH HULL"
***FIRST TIME BUYERS/INVESTORS TAKE A LOOK AT THIS SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME - POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION - READY TO MOVE INTO CONDITION - CURRENTLY TENANTED - IMMEDIATE VIEWING ESSENTIAL!!!!***
"A well presented two bedroom mid-terrace house, great for first time buyers."
"Inviting Offers Between £130,000 - £140,000"
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £130,000 to £140,000 - A FANTASTIC FIRST TIME BUYER OR INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY IN A FANTASTIC MODERN DEVELOPMENT WITH OFF-STREET PARKING, SPACIOUS GARDEN, WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT AND NO CHAIN!!!"
City Centre Apartment with Allocated Parking Space... what more could you need?
"Beautifully appointed, 2 bedroom, 2 bathroom apartment on the ever popular Victoria Dock. Spacious, light and modern with allocated parking, double glazed throughout with beautiful views across the Half Tide Basin, simply must be viewed to appreciate the quality of accommodation on offer here."
"++ FABULOUS FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME THAT HAS A GREAT DEAL TO OFFER ++ POTENTIAL FOR FIVE BEDROOMS ++ SIGNIFICANTLY IMPROVED, ALTERED AND RECONFIGURED ++ COMFORTABLE SITTING ROOM ++ IMPRESSIVE DINING KITCHEN ++ MODERN FULLY TILED BATHROOM/WC ++ POPULAR LOCATION CLOSE TO SHOPS AND SCHOOLS ++ REAR..."
"++ PRESENTED TO A HIGH STANDARD, THIS MUCH LOVED TWO BEDROOM MEWS STYLE PROPERTY ONLY NEEDS TO BE SEEN ++ ENJOYING A CHOICE POSITION WITHIN THIS POPULAR DEVELOPMENT HANDY FOR MANY FACILITIES ++ COURTYARD STYLE GARDENS AND PARKING ++ FABULOUS KITCHEN/DINING ROOM ++ CONSERVATORY ++ EXPECT TO BE IMP..."
"Lovely Apartment In Willerby Hall, The Redwoods in Willerby with - Lounge, Fitted Kitchen, Bedroom & Bathroom, Communal Gardens & Parking - Call now to book your viewing!"
" This beautiful family home is now available! This property comprises to the ground floor, entrance hall, large lounge area, 2nd reception room and kitchen/diner. The first floor comprises of three bedrooms and a family bathroom. Rear garden. The property benefits from double glazing throughout ..."
"Inviting offer between £130,000-£140,000 FANTASTIC INVESTMENT/ FIRST TIME BUYER PROPERTY IN A POPULAR LOCATION OFFERED TO THE MARKET WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN"
OFFERED EXCLUSIVELY TO INVESTORS - FREEHOLD PROPERTY SEPARATED INTO 2 X 2-BED TENANTED FLATS
"** GUIDE PRICE £130,000 - £140,000 ** A FABULOUS TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT IN THE STYLISH AND AWARD WINNING DEVELOPMENT OF THE SAWMILL IN THE HEART OF THE CITY OF HULL. IDEAL FOR INVESTORS THE PROPERTY COULD ACHIEVE IN THE REGION OF £800pcm. This immaculately presented and spacious ..."
Beautiful upgraded family home decorated to a high standard with new carpets throughout and now ready to move into and enjoy.
A Well Presented End Terrace House Located On This Popular Main Road Close To Local Shops
"NEW FOR 2023 in sought-after Kingswood, with NO CHAIN, an attractive, modern, 2 bed, end terrace with open plan living to the ground floor. ."
"++ THIS FABULOUS FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME HAS A GREAT DEAL TO OFFER! ++ SIGNIFICANTLY IMPROVED, ALTERED AND RECONFIGURED ++ COMFORTABLE SITTING ROOM ++ IMPRESSIVE KITCHEN ++ LUXURY REFURBISHED SHOWER ROOM/WC ++ POPULAR LOCATION CLOSE TO SHOPS AND SCHOOLS ++ GATED DRIVEWAY/PARKING ++ LARGE SOUTH F..."
"This 2 bedroom end terraced home has a huge amount of potential to offer its new owners. With 2 well-proportioned bedrooms, an open-plan lounge/diner, a fitted kitchen and a three-piece bathroom. Externally, there is parking available and an enclosed garden to the rear. There is already so muc..."
***AN OUTSTANDING THREE BED END TERRACED HOUSE WITH A USABLE LOFT SPACE - GARAGE AND PARKING - BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED - A GREAT FAMILY HOME - TAKE A LOOK AT THE PHOTOS AND 360 DEGREE VIRTUAL TOUR AND ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING TODAY!!!!***
"No Forward Chain, Move Into Condition, Great First Home, Good Location For Amenities And Schools Nearby. Three Bedrooms, Lounge, Dining Room, Kitchen and Bathroom, Along With Generous Garden and Garage to The Rear Not Overlooked With Woodland and River To the Rear Of T..."
"Brought to the market with NO CHAIN involved! This two bedroom end of terrace property is an ideal first home or investment opportunity! Potential for further extension! Situated within close proximity to local schools, amenities and excellent bus routes to the city centre."
"Fabulous starter home, investment opportunity or 'downsizer' Chain free, this lovely, very well presented semi-detached house has two bedrooms, off road parking & sunny rear garden. Spacious lounge with focal fireplace, modern, beautiful kitchen/dining room, this home will tick boxes. "
"*** NEW INSTRUCTION - MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! 2 BEDROOM MID TERRACE - IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS / YOUNG COUPLES, NOT TO BE MISSED, spacious accommodation, gas central heating / double glazing, living room, kitchen diner, bathroom an..."
"*** MUST BE VIEWED *** TO ARRANGE A VIEWING CALL OUR OFFICES 7AM TO 11PM 7 DAYS A WEEK! 3 BEDROOM MID TERRACE - IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS / YOUNG FAMILIES, NOT TO BE MISSED, spacious accommodation, gas central heating / double glazing, living room / diner, kitchen, bathroom and good size bed..."
"DONT MISS THIS ONE! WELL MAINTAINED ideal starter home or a home for the growing family. An excellent opportunity to acquire this smart three bed terrace with DOUBLE WIDTH EXTENSION to the rear, generous garden and garage. Off street parking to the front. "
" Well presented and deceptively spacious, three bedroom mid terrace property, located in a hugely popular residential area just off Spring Bank West which is close to many local amenities and excellent transport links into the city centre. Boasting off street parking, garage and generous rear g..."
"Stunning, spacious, this three double bedroom mid terrace house is situated in a highly regarded residential quiet cul-de-sac location in the East of the City of Hull, within walking distance to popular sought after schools, East Park and a wealth of amenities near by! Ideal for the 1st time ..."
"Wow! Just check out this immense property! Ready to move into and an ideal first time purchase, the property offers well presented accommodation in a great area. With low maintenance southerly facing garden to the rear, two double bedrooms, modern first floor bathroom, modern kitchen, spacious lo..."
"When a property has been owned for many years by the same person it truly speaks volumes about what a great house and area it really is! With no forward chain this home now awaits its new owners. With over 800 sq ft, the property has two reception rooms, breakfast kitchen, utility area, downstair..."
"Home Estates are pleased to offer to the market, this superb, mid terraced house, which has been subject to a stylish and tasteful refurbishment throughout. Internal viewing is highly recommended..."
A 2 double bedroom end house which has been the subject of considerable investment by the current owners including energy efficient improvements to deliver a C rating which will help keep the running costs down for a new owner. The property provides well presented accommodation throughout which c...
"EXTENDED AND IMPROVED HOME, IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS AND INVESTORS. Offering double off road parking and a fully modernised interior all within a convenient West Hull setting. Invited for inspection is this well maintained and modernised home. With a versatile and open plan ..."
Fantastic two bedroom bungalow situated off Sutton Road in East Hull. The property is spacious throughout boasting both a conservatory and garage for off street parking. The property is a blank canvas and is perfect for those wanting to put their own stamp onto the property. The loft space has en...
"Fair condition Traditional double fronted property with secure enclosed courtyard, and double utility/laundry rooms Split into 2 flats with private entrance halls 1 x bed ground floor f..."
The Centre of Modern Conveniences & Entertainment...
INVESTORS ONLY!!! A Really charming apartment and very attractive investment with tenants already in Situ! We are delighted to bring to market a fantastic opportunity to purchase this spacious and beautifully presented one bedroom apartment situated in the iconic BBC Hull building.<...
"A fantastic three bedroom terraced property close to Beverley Road. Benefiting not only from great location, but also a brilliantly spacious through-lounge/dining area, a cosy conservatory, large kitchen/diner, and upstairs bathroom. Boasting a great size garden with lawn and patio at the rear, a..."
"This key turn first floor retirement apartment is brought to the market with no chain. Beautifully presented throughout, the property awaits its new owners to thoroughly embrace living here. uPVC double glazing and gas central heating, the apartment has two good sized bedrooms, modern shower room..."
"EXCELLENT FIRST TIME BUYER PURCHASE OR PORTFOLIO ADDITION HOLDING CURRENT EICR AND GAS CERTS ** TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED WITH DOWNSTAIRS CLOAKROOM AND UPSTAIRS BATHROOM ** NEWLY REDECORATED AND PART RE-CARPETED ** PERFECT FOR AMENITIES CLOSE TO SHOPS, ROAD LINKS, PARK AND SCHOOLS **"
This has everything right on your doorstep! 
"This 3 bedroom end terraced property is perfect for first time buyers and investors alike. The property has no chain and off street parking. It is in a very sought after location close to local amenities, several good schools and on popular bus routes. Early viewing is highly recommended!!"
***No Onward Chain*** New to the market is this well presented two bedroom flat situated in the highly sought after Victoria Dock village offered with a vacant possession and no onward chain.  The property is on the first floor within the building and briefly comprises of;  ...
"Inviting offer between £125,000-£135,000 - THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE SITTING ON A LARGE PLOT WITH OFF-STREET PARKING IN NEED OF REFURBISHMENT"
A very unusual and unique three bedroom duplex apartment that really needs to be seen to appreciate it size and versatility. The property was once part of The historic Sutton Village police station with old cell. (which is currently converted to the en suite shower room.) The property has electri...
" A beautiful terraced house perfect for a family home. The ground floor comprises through lounge/dining area, kitchen, and access to the rear. The first floor comprises three bedrooms and a shower room. The rear of the property provides access to off-street parking, and there is space for parkin..."
++ ONE NOT TO BE MISSED ++ OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO CHAIN ++ MODERN TWO BEDROOM FIRST TIME BUYER HOME ++ IDEAL WELL PROPORTIONED ACCOMMODATION IN LOVELY CONDITION ++ VERY POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION ++ CLOSE TO SUTTON VILLAGE ++ MODERN DINING KITCHEN ++ FULLY TILED SHOWER ROOM ++ LOVELY ENCLOS...
This bay fronted end house situated in this sought after location is ideal for the first time buyer and offers three bedroomed living.
"This property would make an ideal Buy To Let for an investor looking to increase their portfolio currently let at £595 pcm making this a 5.7% return. This three bed end house is situated in a prime residential location, only paces away from Newland Avenue with its wide range of cafe's ..."
"Offered to the market as buy to let with tenant in situ at £495.00 Situated in a much sought after central location on the marina, well placed to access the Fruit market, city centre and Humber Street with its wide range of local amenities. Comprising entrance hall, open plan ..."
"We offer onto the market this middle house offering a great investment opportunity comprising 4 LETTING ROOMS (achieving a rental income of £13,680 per annum). The accommodation, which benefits from gas central heating and uPVC double glazing, briefly comprises Entrance Hall, ground floor Le..."
"LOVELY TWO BEDROOM HOME - OFF STREET PARKING - PERFECT FOR FIRST TIME BUYER/YOUNG COUPLES Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this lovely, two bedroom terraced home. Situated on Wises Farm Road, this property is ideally placed for amenities with shops, supermarkets,..."
"3 Bedroom Semi Detached Home In North Hull offering fantastic renovation opportunities with - Entrance Porch, Entrance Hall, Lounge, Dining Room, Kitchen, 3 Bedrooms, Family Bathroom & Gardens - Don't Delay - Book your viewing today!"
"GUIDE PRICE £125,000 - £130,000 Fantastic Apartment In This Over 60's Development with - Entrance Hall, Lounge, Fitted Kitchen, 2 Bedrooms, Shower Room and Communal Gardens - Call now and book your viewing!"
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £125,000-£135,000. BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED UPPER FLOOR APARTMENT IN A CENTRAL LOCATION OFFERED TO THE MARKET WITH PARKING & WITH NO CHAIN INVOLVED"
"A spacious three bedroom house, located on Boothferry Road in Hessle, close to many local amenities and shops. "
"This beautifully presented home is the ideal purchase for a first time buyer. Larger than expected, this lovely property has open plan living space, a stunning newly fitted modern kitchen and a newly fitted contemporary bathroom to the ground floor. To the first floor there are two double bedroom..."
"Substantial three bedroom mid terrace house! This lovely home has been in the same family for many years, requiring a little updating, yet benefits from Upvc double glazing and gas central heating! Generous plot with extensive rear garden, ideal for the growing family! Situated within..."
An ideal investment opportunity to purchase this middle house which is offered with NO CHAIN INVOLVED but has been rented out in the past as 4 Letting Rooms bringing in approximately £85 per room. The property also offers a good opportunity for a family home or private let due to the demand...
"WOW! Just check out this fantastic ground floor retirement apartment! Having been loving owned for many years by the current owners, providing modernised, beautifully presented accommodation with its own private entrance. Enjoying entrance hallway with two storage cupboards, stunning new wetroom,..."
" This potential property is now available! 3 bedrooms, bathroom and extensive rear garden! Perfect investment opportunity! Hurry! Book your viewing now! "
"BRILLIANT THREE BEDROOM HOME - THREE GENEROUS BEDROOMS - SOUTH FACING GARDEN Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this brilliant three bedroom home. Situated on Parthian Road, this property is ideally located for amenities with shops, supermarkets, cafes, bars and re..."
"This turnkey property would be an ideal first time purchase or investment opportunity. Two double bedrooms, first floor bathroom, spacious dining kitchen, lounge, nice sized plot - it truly ticks all the boxes and early viewing is recommended."
Brought to the market with NO CHAIN involved! This two bedroom end of terrace property is an ideal first home! Situated in this highly regarded residential area within close proximity of East Park gates! Surrounded by local amenities and excellent bus service to the city centre!
"Brought to the market with NO CHAIN involved! this three bedroom mid terraced property is situated in this popular residential location off of Holderness road and is close by to local amenities, excellent bus routes and East Park."
"Excellent family terraced home to the market. With a beautiful, large rear garden, and stylish modern decor throughout, the property is ready to be lived in. Comprising to the ground floor a wonderful lounge, kitchen/dining area, and downstairs bathroom. The first floor comprises three spacious b..."
"A very well presented three bedroom semi detached home which is situated off Seafield Avenue in East Hull, within easy access of local amenities, East Park and good transport links. The accommodation is spacious and benefits from full gas central heating and double-glazing. The property..."
"Lovelle are delighted to offer on to the market this charming terrace cottage situated on the edge of Hessle. Offering two double bedrooms, the property is presented with a modern finish throughout, whilst retaining some quaint, original features. The garden is larger than average and ideal fo..."
"Situated in the heart of the Hessle village and enjoying proximity to local amenities and leisure facilities, this traditional three-bedroom property falls into the catchment area of prestigious local schooling and benefits from being immaculately presented throughout. As such, the accommodation ..."
"Being Sold via Secure Sale online bidding. Terms & Conditions apply. Starting Bid £125,000 A fantastic three bedroom terraced property close to Beverley Road. Benefiting not only from great location, but also a brilliantly spacious through-lounge/dining area, a cosy conservatory, large k..."
"
Modern style detached house situated on the popular Kingswood development close by to local shops, amenities, schools and bus routes. *** NO CHAIN INVOLVED *** comprising; entrance hall, lounge/diner with feature fireplace and fitted kitchen. From the first floor landing are two double bedrooms ..."
Brought to the market with no chain involved! This three bedroom semi detached property is situated in a quiet cul-de-sac location. Benefiting from having a private driveway which leads to a garage. Ideal for the growing family! Installed with gas central heating & double glazing.
"Lovely 3 bedroom terraced house in West Hull Ideal for family, first time Buyer or as am investment property - **No Chain** Ground Floor Modern Kitchen with separate large utility room on the back of the house with a door into the garden. Big open living room Living Roo..."
"This property is available on Home Reach. Here you can buy the 50% share price shown and pay a low monthly rent on the 50% you don’t buy. This semi-detached home has a bright and modern open-plan kitchen diner with French doors to the garden. Upstairs, the main bedroom has it's own en suite and..."
This property is available on Home Reach. Here you can buy the 50% share price shown and pay a low monthly rent on the 50% you don’t buy.  This bright and practical home is ideal for modern family living. The large open-plan kitchen with ample dining space has French doors leading out to the gard...
"OUTSTANDING TWO BEDROOM SEMI - BRIGHT THROUGHOUT - OFF STREET PARKING - MOVE IN CONDITION Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this outstanding two bedroom home. Situated on Brunslow Close, this property is ideally located for local amenities with shops, supermarkets..."
Brought to the market with NO CHAIN involved! This unique three double bedroom detached property is tucked away off of New Bridge Road. Situated in this established residential area close by to local amenities and excellent bus route service to the City centre. Installed with gas central heating ...
"THREE BEDROOMS - EXCELLENT REAR GARDEN WITH GARAGE - POPULAR LOCATION Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic three bedroom mid terraced property. Located on Rockford Avenue, off Chamberlain Road, the property benefits from close proximity to a wealth ..."
"Inviting Offers Between £120,000-£130,000 A SUPERB END TERRACE PROPETY WITH SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION PLUS LOFT SPACE - OFFERED WITH LONG STANDING SITTING TENANT - SURE TO APPEAL TO THE INVESTOR WISHING TO START OR ADD TO THEIR PORTFOLIO"
"***OPEN HOUSE VIEWING BY STRICT APPOINTMENT ONLY SATURDAY 18TH MARCH 1PM-1.30PM . BOOK YOUR VIEWING VIA PURPLE BRICKS *** OFFERS CONSIDERED *** Vacant Possession and No Chain Involved *** Spacious house comprising; entrance hall, lounge/diner and breakfast kitchen to the ground floor with two d..."
***A GREAT FAMILY HOME AT A GREAT PRICE!!!!***
"This bright and practical family home is ideal for modern living. The spacious lounge is the perfect retreat after a busy day, whilst the large open-plan kitchen features ample dining space and French doors which leading out to the garden. Upstairs the three bedroom are close to the centrally l..."
"Inviting Offers Between £120,000-£130,000 Welcome to Woodcroft Avenue. This spacious property is a perfect home for you and your family."
"A fine example of city centre living, this spacious and extremely well presented ground floor apartment overlooks Kingston Square towards Hull New Theatre. The apartment features an open plan living kitchen which enjoys a light and airy feel with floor to ceiling windows, fully integrated kitche..."
"FANTASTIC PLOT - THREE GOOD SZIED BEDROOMS - SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION - OFF STREET PARKING - SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this fantastic 3 bed terraced property. Located on Taunton Road, this property benefits from close proximity to ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £120,000 - £130,000 Lovely Home On Westlands Road with - Lounge, Fitted Kitchen, 2 Bedrooms, Family Bathroom, Gardens & Garage - Call now to book your viewing!"
"Highly sought after residential area, this modern end house offers ideal family living or a superb first home."
" Offered for sale with no onward chain is this two bedroom mid terrace property, conveniently located off Spring Bank West, close to a range of shops and approximately 3 miles from the centre of Hull. Having been extended to the ground floor to create a larger dining kitchen, the property also ..."
"OUTSTANDING TWO BED END OF TERRACE - STYLISH AND MODERN THROUGHOUT - PERFECT FOR A FIRST TIME BUYER/YOUNG COUPLE Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this outstanding, two bedroom, end of terrace home. Situated on Thoresby Street within the popular Dukeries, this pr..."
"BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED - MODERN KITCHEN DINER - FANTASTIC REAR GARDEN Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this superb two bed mid-terraced property. Located off Beverley Road, this property benefits from close proximity to a wealth of local amenities on Beverley R..."
"This over 55's first floor apartment offers well presented accommodation in a great location! Two DOUBLE Bedrooms, modern Shower Room, modern Breakfast Kitchen and spacious Lounge with fireplace. Residents' parking and communal gardens. Viewing is a must!"
"A well presented three bed mid terraced property situated on Lymington Garth off Mollison Road. The property is close to local schools, amenities and has gas central heating, double glazing. The property briefly comprises entrance hall, lounge, Kitchen, landing, three bedrooms and bathroom. Outsi..."
"This delightful semi-detached bungalow offers a reception room, a fitted kitchen, two sizeable bedrooms and a three-piece bathroom. Externally the property boasts a wrap around garden and a summer house. This property presents a fantastic opportunity for any house hunter."
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £120,000-£130,000 STUNNING BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED FULLY RENOVATED THREE-BEDROOM PROPERTY OFF NEWLAND AVENUE & OFFERED TO THE MARKET WTH NO ONWARD CHAIN"
"Inviting Offers Between £120,000 - £130,000"
++ A FABULOUS OPPORTUNITY! ++ THIS ICONIC GARDEN VILLAGE PROPERTY OFFERS HANDSOME POTENTIAL TO CREATE A HOME TO SUIT YOUR OWN TASTES AND REQUIREMENTS WITHIN SUCH AN ASPIRATIONAL LOCATION ++ SPACIOUS ACCOMMODATION WITH CHARACTER IN ABUNDANCE ++ TWO RECEPTION ROOMS ++ THREE BEDROOMS ++ ESTABLISHED ...
"++ THE PERFECT CHOICE FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS, THIS MODERN AND STYLISH TWO BEDROOM END OF TERRACE HOUSE IS SURE TO IMPRESS ++ OFFERED TO THE MARKET WITH NO CHAIN ++ EXTREMELY POPULAR LOCATION ++ DEDICATED PARKING AND SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN ++ TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS ++ TAKE A LOOK AT OUR PHOTOS FOR A..."
"++ NO CHAIN INVOLVED, HERE IS A LOVELY EXAMPLE OF ONE OF THESE MUCH SOUGHT AFTER VICTORIAN FAMILY HOMES IN SUCH A POPULAR LOCATION CLOSE TO MANY FACILITIES ++ SUPERBLY PROPORTIONED AND NATURALLY LIGHT ++ MUCH IMPROVED AND ALTERED ++ THREE RECEPTION AREAS ++ ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN ++ EPC GRADE D ++"
"STUNNING! Fabulous property ! The perfect family home !Three bed terraced house! Spacious, ideal for a family, this lovely home has generous gardens to the front and rear, is close to local transport, amenities and schools! The house has modern décor throughout, spacious bedrooms and the ..."
"WOW - just take a look at the photos. Boasting a HUGE rear garden, superb garden room/man cave, covered area for a hot tub and en-suite facilities. Enjoying a quiet cul-de-sac location with easy access to Holderness Road amenities this three bed property will make a fantastic home for the new ..."
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: Property being refurbished Co...
"NO ONWARD CHAIN Situated in a highly popular residential location that benefits from close proximity to highly accessible transport links which connects the occupier to local amenities and leisure facilities, this extended two bedroom mid-terraced property is an ideal opportunity for th..."
"This three bedroom end of terraced property is an ideal first time buy or investment opportunity! Situated on the fringe of Cottingham. Benefiting from being placed on an extremely large plot, having off street parking and having three double bedrooms."
"New to the market is a fantastic three bedroom end-terraced property on York Road. With a spacious lounge AND dining area, the house is ready to be moved into. Comprising to the ground floor a lounge, kitchen/dining area, and downstairs bathroom. The first floor comprises three bedrooms and a WC...."
"Inviting offers between £120,000-£125,000 - FULLY RENOVATED THREE BEDROOM END TERRACE PROPERTY ON A GENEROUS CORNER PLOT WITH PLENTY OF OFF-STREET PARKING AND LARGE GARAGE TO THE REAR"
"SUPERB STARTER HOME! Chain free, this lovely two double bedroom house is ready to view! With sunny rear garden, low maintenance front garden and allocated parking! Situated on the ever popular Howdale Road development, within close proximity to sought after schools, the amenities of S..."
Attention first time buyers!! Take a look at this two bedroomed home ready to move into.
Good condition Traditional mid terrace property arranged to 3 floors Ground floor flat has 2 x bedrooms First floor flat has 2 x bedrooms Rented for several years with full occupan...
"An excellent modern development for tenants looking for premium city centre living, These new apartments will be perfect for investors, young professionals and mature students. To receive more information, please contact us directly. Comprising of modern fixtures and fittings, e..."
"***Guide Price £117,500 - £127,500 plus Reservation Fee***
"
"++ ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS, TAKE YOUR FIRST STEPS ONTO THE PROPERTY LADDER WITHOUT COMPROMISE WITH THIS BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE THAT HAS A GREAT DEAL TO OFFER ++ MUCH IMPROVED AND ENHANCED ++ MODERN AND STYLISH, SIMPLY MOVE STRAIGHT IN ++ FABULOUS KITCHEN WITH AP..."
Investment property has become avilable in the HU5 area with fantastic rental oppurtunity. The property is currently let out for £580 PCM which gives you a yield fo 6.3% The property has a large living/ dining area with a seprate kitchen downatairs and upstairs has two bathrooms and 2 lar...
"***PRIVATE OVER 60's DEVELOPMENT***Ideally situated within walking distance of Hessle Square is this spacious two bedroom ground floor apartment within Hudson Court. The apartment comprises a private entrance hall, lounge/diner, fitted kitchen, two bedrooms and shower room. The excellent resid..."
"Modern one bedroom apartment comprising of open-plan lounge/kitchen with a breakfast bar, double-bedroom and bathroom. This apartment is fitted with integrated white goods and a tenant in situ paying £700.00 pcm. For all occupiers, you will find yourself enjoying the private roof terrace..."
"Inviting offers between £115,000-£125,000 - FANTASTIC FIRST TIME BUYER/INVESTMENT PROPERTY - EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACE WITH POTENTIAL FOR OFF STREET PARKING TO THE FRONT AND NO CHAIN INVOLVED"
***WOW!!! TAKE A LOOK AT THIS TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM PROPERTY- MODERN FITTED KITCHEN-CONTEMPORARY BATHROOM- CONSERVATORY-PRIVATE DRIVEWAY- NO CHAIN INVOLVED- ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING TODAY***
"Inviting offers between £115,000-£125,000"
"LOVELY THREE BED END OF TERRACE - OPEN PLAN LOUNGE/KITCHEN - OUTSTANDING GARDEN ROOM Symonds and Greenham are delighted to bring to the market this lovely, three bed end of terrace home. Situated on 21st Street, this property is well placed for amenities with shops, supermarkets, cafes,..."
"SPACIOUS TWO DOUBLE BED END TERRACE HOME! This double fronted home is worthy of an internal inspection to appreciate the space! Ideal 1st time buyers home! Gas central heating and uPVC double glazed, generous front and sunny rear gardens, this home is situated close to amenities and l..."
***IF YOU ARE LOOKING FOR A SPACIOUS PROPERTY THEN LOOK NO FURTHER!!! 3 RECEPTION ROOMS- FITTED KITCHEN- DOWNSTAIRS WC- GENEROUS SIZED BATHROOM- 3 BEDROOMS. OUR ADVICE IS SIMPLE TAKE A LOOK AT THE 360 VIRTUAL TOUR AND ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING!!***
"If you are looking for a retirement development in a great location, then look no further! Situated in an enviable position in the much sought after Ella Court development in Kirk Ella, this immaculate, ground floor, leasehold apartment is located only paces away from the communal sitting room, ..."
++ THIS GREAT SIZED FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME HAS LOTS TO OFFER! ++ OFFERED FOR SALE WITH NO CHAIN INVOLVED ++ 24 FOOT KITCHEN! ++ POPULAR LOCATION CLOSE TO SHOPS AND SCHOOLS ++ REAR GARDEN ++ SIMPLY MUST BE VIEWED ++ EPC GRADE C ++
"NO CHAIN INVOLVED! An ideal investment property benefiting from 3 Bedrooms (one bedroom to the ground floor), end house offering deceptive accommodation and benefiting from gas radiator central heating and majority uPVC double glazing. The accommodation briefly includes Lounge, 2nd Reception Roo..."
"Delightful, spacious three-bedroom home! This modern home is situated very close to Kingswood, with amenities in abundance, local transport and schools nearby, off road parking and garage! Chain free, if you are looking for more space, then this home is for you! Front and rear gardens..."
"Whether you are an investor or first time buyer, this property truly offers turn key accommodation. Beautifully presented throughout with two reception rooms, modern fitted kitchen, two bedrooms, first floor bathroom, enclosed garden and a great location for commuting to local amenities and Hull..."
A two bed end terrace house offered with vacant possession.
"++ NO CHAIN INVOLVED!!!++ A FABULOUS OPPORTUNITY, THIS EXTREMELY DECEPTIVE (1250 SQ.FT) END OF TERRACE HOUSE OFFERS A GREAT DEAL MORE THAN FIRST GLANCE SUGGESTS ++ THIS INDIVIDUAL PROPERTY HAS BEEN ENJOYED BY THE SAME CAREFUL CUSTODIANS FOR OVER SIXTY YEARS ++ WELL PROPORTIONED ACCOMMODATION COVE..."
NO CHAIN ON THIS FANTASTIC THREE DOUBLE BEDROOM HOME WITH LARGE GARDEN IN A QUIET CUL DE SAC
Wonderful 3 bedroom terraced house in the Hesslewood Park development. The price advertised represents purchasing a 25% share of the home
"Unique styles in a new settingMeaux Rise is a collection of brand-new two, three and four-bedroom houses for sale in Kingswood, on the outskirts of Hull. This development features award-winning houses, striking architecture, ample gardens and plenty of space between each..."
"LONG TERM TENANCY - property to be sold with tenant in situ. An EXCELLENT FAMILY HOME, presented to a good standard is offered for sale at a price to appeal to most buy-to-let investors!"
Substantial three story traditional home ripe for updating and situated in a highly convenient location just off Holderness Road to the east of Hull city centre.
"FOR SALE BY AUCTION: Terms and conditions apply. We are pleased to offer to auction this 5 bed HMO. The property is being offered fully tenanted and is compliant with all necessary regulations. Further details can be found in the legal pack. Briefly comprising of 5 lettable rooms, two bathr..."
Property being sold with tenants in situ. * Excellent investment opportunity *
New to the market is this beautifully presented two bedroom terraced property situated in the heart of Hull on a quiet street close to plenty of local amenities including reputable primary and secondary schools and with fantastic public transport and road links both in and out of Hull.  T...
"FOR SALE BY INFORMAL TENDER - ALL OFFERS TO BE RECEIVED IN WRITING BY 5TH APRIL 2023 BY 12 NOON. OFFERS OVER £100,000-£110,000 - We are delighted to offer this unique superbly appointed two bedroom property forming part of a former chapel located in this cul-de-sac off First lane, Hessle, close ..."
"We offer onto the market this 2 Bedroom end terraced house which would be an ideal purchase for the first-time-buyer or investor. The property benefits from gas central heating and uPVC double glazing and briefly comprises the following accommodation:- Enclosed Porch, Lounge, fitted Kitchen, Lob..."
***A GREAT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY/FIRST TIME BUYER PROPERTY - THREE BEDROOMS - GARDENS TO FRONT AND REAR - MODERN FITTED KITCHEN - POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION - BE QUICK TO VIEW!!!!***
TWO-BED GROUND FLOOR CITY CENTRE APARTMENT - PERFECT FOR THE FIRST TIME BUYER!.
"Situated in this ever popular location, the property is close to numerous local amenities and has fantastic transport links"
"No Chain Involved. This extended two bed property has been altered and enhanced from its original design, extended to the rear, ideal for the growing family in this ever popular location. The main features include; entrance porch, front lounge and extended fitted kitchen along with the fa..."
"No Onward Chain This modern two bed apartment is located on the ever popular Amy Johnson development, built by reputable house builders Keepmoat Homes. The property is unique in design as it occupies the whole top floor over garages, giving this property privacy as it has no neighbouring ..."
"Top Floor Apartment in Victoria Dock with parking, what more could you want..?"
++ OFFERED EXCLUSIVELY TO INVESTORS WITH AN EXCELLENT LONG TERM TENANT IN SITU CURRENTLY PAYING £595 PCM - A FABULOUS ADDITION TO ANY RENTAL PORTFOLIO ++ AN EXTREMELY SPACIOUS FOUR BEDROOM LINK-SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY WELL LOCATED FOR ACCESS TO LOCAL FACILITIES AND THE CITY CENTRE WITHIN AN ...
++ A SUPERBLY PRESENTED TWO BEDROOM/TWO BATHROOM GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT IDEALLY PLACED TO EMERGE YOURSELF INTO ALL THAT THE CULTURAL CITY CENTRE HAS TO OFFER ++ VERY APPEALING TO A RANGE OF BUYERS INCLUDING A BUNGALOW ALTERNATIVE ++ MODERN AND STYLISH ACCOMMODATION ++ READY TO MOVE INTO ++ NO CHA...
Ideal first home or single occupancy in this semi detached bungalow situated on the popular Sutton Park development.
"We offer onto the market this good size two Bedroom end terraced house which is offered with NO CHAIN INVOLVED. Benefits including gas central heating, uPVC double glazing and briefly comprises the following accommodation Entrance Hall, Lounge, second Reception Room, fitted Kitchen with oven and ..."
"Located in prime position at the rivers edge, Plimsoll Way enjoys water views to three sides. Clearly allocated parking spaces with several visitor parking spaces available. The building enjoys direct access to the picturesque promenade with stunning views of the Humber."
"Inviting offers between £110,000-£120,000"
A well presented 2 bedroom middle house (with loft space) that offers nicely appointed accommodation throughout and a superb landscaped rear garden. The property has been upgraded by the current owners to their credit and includes uPVC double glazing and gas central heating (via a condensing comb...
***A LOVELY NATURALLY LIGHT AND MODERN APARTMENT IN READY TO MOVE INTO CONDITION - WHY RENT WHEN YOU COULD PURCHASE THIS STUNNING APARTMENT WITH LOVELY RIVER VIEWS? - FIRST TIME BUYERS THERE HAS NEVER BEEN A BETTER TIME TO BUY!!! - ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING TODAY***
"++ IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS, THIS SPACIOUS AND WELL APPOINTED TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY HAS PLENTY TO OFFER IN SUCH A POPULAR LOCATION ++ CLOSE TO LOCAL SHOPS AND FACILITIES ++ IMPRESSIVE COMBINED SITTING/DINING ROOM ++ MODERN SHAKER STYLE KITCHEN ++ TWO GENEROUS BEDROOMS ++ WELL APPO..."
"BEAUTIFUL THREE BED HOME - PERFECT FOR A FAMILY - GENEROUS REAR GARDEN WITH HOT TUB This mid-terraced home is sitiated on Greewood Avenue close to well regarded schools with good transport links to both Hull city centre and Kingswood retail park which is home to a supermarket, a cinema a..."
***A GREAT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY - FOUR BED PROPERTY CLOSE TO HULL UNIVERSITY - TENANTS IN SITU - CALL ZEST FOR MORE INFORMATION AND TO VIEW!!!***
Three bedroomed mid terrace home with enclosed rear garden and offered with no onward chain.
"GUIDE PRICE £110,000 - £120,000 Well Presented Apartment In This Over 55's Development In Hessle with - Private Entrance Hall, Spacious Lounge, Fitted Kitchen, 2 Double Bedrooms, Shower Room & Communal Gardens & Facilities! - Don't Delay! Book your viewing today!"
"FANTASTIC LOCATION - THREE BEDROOMS - ORIGINAL FEATURES - NO ONWARD CHAIN Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this superb three bed terraced property. Located on Ryde Street off Beverley Road, this property is ideally situated for a range of local amenities, incl..."
"Inviting offers between £110,000-£120,000 SMART TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY IN A POPULAR DEVELOPMENT PERFECT FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS OR INVESTORS"
"ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS - BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED - FRONT AND REAR GARDENS Symonds and Greenham are delighted to welcome to the market this delightful two bed mid terraced property. Located on Ash Grove off Beverley Road, this property benefits from close proximity to a wealth of loca..."
"Delightful, spacious two double bedroom home! Well presented throughout, this lovely house would be ideal for the 'downsizer' or 1st time buyer! Beautiful gardens to the front and rear, and offered to the market 'Chain free'! The house is situated close to Sutton village and a wealth ..."
"Three bed mid terrace house with NO CHAIN involved! Spacious, ideal for a family, this lovely home has generous gardens to the front and rear, is close to local transport, amenities and schools! The house has modern decor throughout, sizable bedrooms and the family bathroom to the 1st flo..."
"*CITY CENTRE LIVING *MODERN TENANTED 2 BED APARTMENT IN GATED DEVELOPMENT*RECENTLY FITTED KITCHEN*CONTEMPORARY BATHROOM*LOUNGE WITH JULIET BALCONY*DINING AREA OFF KITCHEN*2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS*PRIVATE PARKING SPACE*AUTOMATED ENTRANCE GATES* MODERN, LOCAL AMENITIES "
*** LOOKING FOR CITY CENTRE LIVING?? THEN LOOK NO FURTHER- 2 BEDROOM 5TH FLOOR APARTMENT WITH EN-SUITE BATHROOM TO MASTER BEDROOM- FITTED KITCHEN- CURRENTLY TENANTED AT £675PCM- TAKE A LOOK AND ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING TODAY!!***
" Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN is this well proportioned two bedroom mid terrace in popular residential area, located just off Wold Road. Having had the same careful owners for over 60 years, the property would benefit from some modernisation but would ideally suit a first time buyer lo..."
Internal viewing is highly recommended on this traditional extended mid-terrace House which is ideally located within a highly popular and well sought after 'Dukeries' area. The accommodation ...
"An ideal opportunity has arisen for the first-time buyer to acquire this one-bedroom quarter house as their first step onto the property ladder, or the investor seeking to increase their property portfolio. The property is situated in a private cul-de-sac off the well-connected Willerby ..."
"Fantastic opportunity to purchase this great family home within a popular residential location. As well as being close by local amenities and within easy reach of the A63, the property also benefits from three good sized bedrooms, off street parking and generous living accommodation. Drive..."
"CHARMING COTTAGE! This quaint, delightful cottage offers a step on the ladder for the 1st time buyer or ideal for the 'downsizer'! Chain free, the cottage is positioned in the very sought after Sutton village location, close to a wealth of amenities, local transport and village shops! "
"Being Sold via Secure Sale online bidding. Terms & Conditions apply. Starting Bid £105,000.This property will be legally prepared enabling any interested buyer to secure the property immediately once their bid/offer has been accepted. Ultimately a transparent proc..."
"This 2 bed terraced property is a perfect investment opportunity for both first time and experienced investors, selling with tenant in situ. The property lies within a number of popular bus routes to Hull City Centre and Hull Royal Infirmary."
***OFF THE SHELF INVESTMENT OPPPORTUNITY***Located in the heart of Hessle and sold as an investment property with sitting tenants is this 2 bedroom middle house which is uPVC double glazed and gas centrally heated and includes a low maintenance rear garden. The property is currently generating &p...
"INVESTMENT PROPERTY FOR SALE Newly-refurbished perfect family 4 bedroom home available now! Property consists of 2 first-floor and 2 second-floor rooms, ultra-modernised kitchen with all appliances and white goods. Large-vibrant garden to the rear also included. Double-glazing & gas-central h..."
First time buyers - look no further... A fine home very close to Newland Avenue.
"Modern, Convenience and Location..."
EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACE PROPERTY IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYER/INVESTOR - OFFERED TO THE MARKET WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN
*** IF YOU ARE LOOKING FOR A SPACIOUS PROPERTY TO PUT YOUR OWN STAMP ON LOOK NO FURTHER***. TAKE A LOOK AT THE 360 TOUR AND ARRANGE YOUR VIEWING TODAY!!
++ OFFERED EXCLUSIVELY TO INVESTORS WITH AN EXCELLENT LONG TERM TENANT IN SITU CURRENTLY PAYING £450 PCM - A FABULOUS ADDITION TO ANY RENTAL PORTFOLIO ++ A SPACIOUS TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY WELL LOACTED CLOSE TO SHOPS AND SCHOOLS WITH AN EXTREMELY POPULAR DISTRICT OF HULL ++ 21 FO...
"*SUPERB SPACIOUS TOP FLOOR APARTMENT WITH PARKING* Located in the heart of the City with shops, bars and restaurants on the door step! Hull Train Station is a stones throw away! Master bedroom with ensuite, kitchen with integrated appliances, tastefully decorated throughout! Book your..."
"A perfect opportunity to acquire a traditional, bay fronted Dukeries property. Realistically priced to ensure an early sale. The internal accommodation is arranged to two floors and briefly ..."
"No Onward Chain - Business In A Box!! This two bed property is offered to the market with a sitting tenant paying £495 PCM giving any investor a yield of 5.82% return on their investment, making money from day one. The property is situated in a prime residential location, well placed..."
"PERFECT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY! NO CHAIN INVOLVED! This spacious, three bedroom, two reception house is in need of updating, perfect for the investor! With front & rear gardens, this family home is positioned in this residential area, close to a wealth of amenities and local transport..."
This first floor apartment must be viewed to be appreciated and is situated opposite Hull University in a pleasant courtyard setting.
** TAKE A LOOK AT THIS 2 BEDROOM LUXURY APARTMENT WITH JULIET BALCONY OVER LOOKING EAST PARK**
"Being sold via Secure Sale online bidding. Terms & Conditions apply. Starting Bid £100,000A lucrative opportunity to purchase this FIVE BEDROOM LICENCED HMO, with four tenants in situ. Each room currently achieves between £80- £90 per week and the property is ideally p..."
MORE PHOTOS TO FOLLOW.......NO FORWARD CHAIN. A substantial 3 double bed mid terrace in need of refurbishment. This property would make an ideal family home or investment property. quietly located at the end of a no through street and boasting a southerly facing rear garden we strongly advise ...
"No Onward Chain! This three-bed property is offered to the market with no onward chain, situated in a prime residential location, well placed to access good local schools and benefits from a wide range of local amenities close by. The property would benefit from some TLC / modernisat..."
"2 Bedroom Apartment sold with tenant in situ in Grade 2 Listed Building in the centre of the Old Town opposite the Minster with - Private Entrance Hall, Lounge, Fitted Kitchen, 2 Bedrooms, Family Bathroom, Private Gated Parking Space & Bicycle Room - Call and book your viewing now!"
"This extended two bed end of terrace property has been altered and enhanced from its original design, ideal for the growing family looking to be in this ever popular location and within close proximity to Eastfield Primary school. The property would benefit from some TLC / modernisation,..."
Brought to the market with NO CHAIN involved! This spacious three bedroom (plus loft space) family home is in ready to move in condition having recently undergone refurbishments. An ideal first home or investment opportunity!
IDEAL FIRST TIME BUYER PROPERTY HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION EXTENDED TWO BEDROOM MID-HOUSE WITH GARDENS - NO CHAIN - VACANT PROPERTY
Beautifully Presented Second Floor Apartment with Two Bedrooms - Master with Ensuite Living Room is Dual Aspect with A Juliette Balcony Modern Gloss Black Kitchen Resident Parking In The Secure Garage Well Maintained Apartment Block Next To The River Hull Short Walk To the Cit...
"FOR SALE VIA ONLINE AUCTION: terms and conditions apply. We are please to offer for sale via online auction a lucrative opportunity to purchase this FIVE BEDROOM LICENCED HMO, with four tenants in situ. Each room currently achieves between £80- £90 per week, further details can be fo..."
"Calling all investors, this is the perfect investment opportunity! Selling with long term tenant in situ! Substantial plot! This spacious three bed end terrace house has a generous rear garden! Side drive for off road parking, a definite MUST SEE! Briefly- Entrance hall, loung..."
"INVITING OFFERS BETWEEN £100,000 TO £110,000 ATTENTION INVESTORS & FIRST TIME BUYERS!! CURRENTLY LET OUT AT £575 PCM - TWO DOUBLE BEDROOM HOME IN A HIGHLY DESIRABLE LOCATION IN HESSLE"
"***Guide Price £100,000 - £110,000 plus Reservation Fee***
"
"A fantastic two bedroom semi-detached property on the peaceful cul-de-sac of Brockton Close. Additionally comprising lounge, kitchen, and family bathroom. With a low maintenance front yard with lawn, rear yard, an allocated parking space, and plenty of on-street parking. Great for an investment o..."
This Well Presented End Terrace House Offers Two Good Sized Bedrooms And Is Offered For Sale With No Chain Involved
